United Nations officials negotiated on Thursday with Syrian rebels who had seized a group of United Nations peacekeepers in the disputed Golan Heights region between Syria and Israel , as the rebels offered assurances of the peacekeepers' well-being and appeared to back away from threats to hold them as hostages.Israel, which has watched anxiously for spillover as the Syrian civil war has intensified, signaled Thursday that it had no intention of becoming embroiled in the situation. Amos Gilad, a senior official in the Defense Ministry, told Israel Radio that "we can rely on the U.N. to persuade" the insurgent fighters to release the peacekeepers, who are from the Philippines, and that "neither the rebels nor anyone else has an interest in clashing with the international community, which it needs for support."The authorities in Manila said the troops had not been harmed, and President Benigno S. Aquino III said he believed the peacekeepers would be viewed by both sides in the Syrian conflict as a "benign presence, so we don't expect any further untoward incident to happen."The 21 peacekeepers seized Wednesday are part of a United Nations force that was set up to patrol the demilitarized zone along Syria's Golan frontier after the 1973 Arab-Israeli war, and their detention was the first time any United Nations forces had been drawn into the Syrian war.A group calling itself Martyrs of Yarmouk claimed responsibility for capturing the unit and, in a video posted on the Internet, threatened that if Syrian forces did not withdraw from the surrounding area within 24 hours, the peacekeepers would be dealt with "like war prisoners."But on Thursday, a statement on what appeared to be the group's Facebook page asserted that the rebels had acted to protect the Filipino unit from a Syrian government assault. "With God's help, we were able to keep a group of U.N. members, who work in the border village of Al Jamlah, safe from the barbaric shelling of Assad's criminal gang," it said, referring to President Bashar al-Assad of Syria.The peacekeepers were "under our protection until we can get them to safe areas," the post continued."We dissociate ourselves from all statements issued prior to this one regarding the detention of U.N. personnel," it said. "They are now safe and honored and hosted as guests by the brigade's leadership until we can deliver them safely to their headquarters."A series of videos was also posted on the Internet showing different groups of the peacekeepers offering remarkably similar accounts. In each, an officer identifies himself and his unit, explains that they came under fire from government forces and were aided by civilians, who were giving them food and water and keeping them safe.A spokesman for the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an activist group based in Britain, said Thursday that the rebels were seeking the withdrawal of Syrian forces from the area, a halt to their shelling and a secure road to use to hand the Filipino soldiers over to international forces in the Quneitra border region. The observatory, which has a network of opposition contacts in Syria, said the soldiers were still in Al Jamlah and reported "clashes" between government troops and rebels on Thursday on the village's northern outskirts. There was no immediate independent confirmation.The group said that Arab League representatives had joined United Nations officials in negotiating with the rebels.Violence continued elsewhere, with activists reporting that warplanes struck the north-central city of Raqqa, where rebels have made gains in recent days, and that the neighborhood of Khalidiya, in Homs, was being shelled.There were also reports of a warplane crashing in a southern suburb of the northern city of Idlib. An activist working with the Syrian Observatory said it was hit by antiaircraft fire and poured out black smoke. Other witnesses said they saw two parachutes.The scale of the destruction wrought by the almost two-year-old conflict emerged starkly on Thursday when Doctors Without Borders, a humanitarian aid organization, said in a report that Syria's once-efficient health care network had broken down, with patients treated in caves and basements as large numbers of hospitals closed and medical facilities became tools "in the military strategies of the parties to the conflict.""Medical aid is being targeted, hospitals destroyed and medical personnel captured," said Marie-Pierre Allié, the president of Doctors without Borders.The report, issued in New York, added to a catalog of woes this week as the number of refugees fleeing Syria exceeded a million and the school system was reported to have collapsed.
With fighting raging in Damascus and other cities in Syria on Wednesday, Amnesty International issued new reports detailing what the group called war crimes committed by both sides in the conflict.The group said that its researchers in Syria had confirmed government shelling and indiscriminate bombing of civilian residential areas, "flattening entire neighborhoods, often with internationally banned weapons," including cluster bombs.It said it also found "an escalation of abuses by armed opposition groups," including brutal summary killings of captured officers, though the group was at pains to say that the "vast majority" of war crimes were being committed by government forces."If left unaddressed, such practices risk becoming more and more entrenched," Ann Harrison of Amnesty International said in a statement. "It is imperative that all those concerned know they will be held accountable for their actions."The bitterness of the conflict threatened to rebound in Europe on Wednesday. The Netherlands said it was raising its terrorism alert level because of concerns that scores of Dutch citizens who have traveled to Syria to fight in the civil war were returning as radicalized, battle-hardened jihadists. Dick Schoof, the country's counterterrorism chief, said in a statement that such people had "a strong desire to commit violence, thus posing a significant threat to this country," The Associated Press reported.The Syrian state-run news agency and opposition activists each reported fresh violence on Wednesday. Mortar shells falling on a residential area near Damascus, the capital, killed three people and wounded more than 50, The A.P. said, citing the Syrian state-run agency; the government said rebel forces were responsible.Opposition fighters have been trying to advance into Damascus for weeks, battering regime checkpoints and military bases in the heavily fortified capital, The A.P. said, adding that both sides see Damascus as the ultimate prize in the civil war.The news agency quoted a resident of the Jobar and Barzeh area of the capital describing overnight shelling that "shook apartments."Fierce clashes broke out after a car bomb exploded outside a police station in the Khan Sheih neighborhood west of Damascus, activists told the news agency; there were no immediate reports of casualties.South of the capital, casualties in a rocket attack on an opposition stronghold in Daraya included a police officer who lived in the area and was working for the European Union.Fighting also raged in other Syrian cities, including Homs, where the military pounded rebel positions with artillery and airstrikes, the news agency said.Aid groups again warned on Wednesday of the conflict's worsening effect on Syrian children. About two million young people are malnourished, suffering from disease or traumatized as a result of the civil war, Save the Children said."I have to say I have been shocked and horrified by the stories that I've heard from the children here in Lebanon who fled from Syria," Justin Forsyth, chief executive of Save the Children, told The A.P. at the group's offices in Beirut, Lebanon. "You never want to hear a child talk about watching their friend killed or their father tortured in front of them or their brother shot through the leg."Similarly, a report issued by Unicef on Tuesday said that unrelenting violence, sweeping population displacement and damage to infrastructure and essential services caused by the Syrian conflict risk leaving an entire generation of children scarred for life. The report said that in areas where the fighting is most intense, few people have access to fresh water, and many schools have been destroyed or put to use as refugee shelters. In Aleppo, the center of months of fighting, only 6 percent of children are attending school, Unicef said.
HEESH, Syria — The Islamic fighters peered through rifle scopes and machine-gun sights at the remains of a Syrian military convoy disabled on the highway several hundred yards away. They were peppering President Bashar al-Assad 's soldiers with gunfire, trying to prevent their escape."Here are the heroes and mujahedeen of the Shield of Mohammed, peace be upon him," one fighter said softly as others opened fire.The Syrian Army answered the rebels' gunfire. Tanks fired into the village from one direction, artillery from another. The ground shook. Smoke and dust rose. Defenseless against the exploding artillery rounds, the rebels kept firing, and were not driven off.As spring arrives in Syria, the civil war closes out its second year in a mosaic of vicious and widely scattered battles, like this one, where the Damascus-Aleppo highway crosses an open agricultural plain in the south of Idlib Province.Since late last spring, antigovernment fighters have wrested much of northern Syria from Mr. Assad's control, overrunning military checkpoints and several bases, and pushing the army back. But the rebel tide, largely led in northwestern Syria by Islamic groups, moves slowly, checked by weapon shortages and by a lingering archipelago of government positions where the army and loyalist militias have settled in with powerful weapons, equipped for a long fight. Each of these military positions, and the roads between them, have become minifronts, an almost uncountable set of bloody battlefields where rebels try to silence government outposts, which are mostly arrayed around Syria's main cities.It is a bitterly personal war, in which Islamic and more secular fighters share an immediate goal: to protect their own families, an ambition they accuse the West of not adequately supporting.From its remaining positions, Mr. Assad's army maintains a lethal reach over ground it can no longer walk, firing rockets, mortars and artillery into residential neighborhoods. Often the weakened Syrian Air Force joins in, dropping bombs. Ballistic missiles occasionally crash in from afar.These attacks, doled out by the Alawite-led government against a predominantly Sunni Muslim population, and sustained now for many months, are killing civilians, idling the economy and driving families away from their homes. They are also fuel for sectarian anger.The rebels have had high-profile successes. In January they captured both the Taftanaz air base and Idlib's main prison. But for months their gains have mostly been incremental.The battle at Heesh — for one of the few roads in the Idlib region that Mr. Assad's forces still risk using — is, as one fighter described it, a contest for a "death highway" in which one side has a full conventional arsenal and the other is armed with faith as much as weapons. It captures part of the war in a microcosm.From a knoll rising above farmers' fields, Heesh overlooks the stretch of four-lane highway between Hama and Aleppo, two cities where the army is thickly garrisoned.Several Syrian Army checkpoints are strung along the asphalt, a bid to keep ground supply lines open — a military imperative for Mr. Assad in part because his government's helicopter fleet has been thinned, making aerial resupply difficult.Fighting had already ravaged part of the village by last fall, when the government hit it with airstrikes several times. But in late January, hundreds of rebels from an Islamic brigade known as Soqour al-Sham, or the Falcons of Syria, gathered in Heesh and formed a blocking position on the western side of the road.Another armed group, the Grandsons of the Prophet, took up positions on the opposite side, creating a gauntlet for the army.The battle has flashed intermittently ever since.Creeping forward by night and massing by day, rebels now watch from small bunkers, buildings and fighting holes that extend from the town toward the highway's edge. The army, unwilling to give up a vital leg of road, uses artillery and airstrikes to try to force them back; it has recently struck the town with cluster bombs.In all, 50 rebels have been wounded and 20 killed in the contest for this tiny place in the past six weeks, according to Fadi Yasin, a spokesman for one of Soqour al-Sham's battalions.Blast by blast, what is left of Heesh is being cracked into rubble. Its people have moved away.The fighters remain, hoping that by cutting off supplies to the army checkpoints north of Heesh they will cause the soldiers there to run low on ammunition, and ultimately to abandon them.Each silenced outpost, they know, is one less outpost that can fire on Idlib's towns.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Syria 's main exile opposition coalition elected a naturalized Syrian-born American citizen early Tuesday to be the first prime minister of an interim Syrian government, charged with funneling aid to rebels inside Syria and offering an alternative to the government of President Bashar al-Assad .By choosing Ghassan Hitto, 50, an information technology executive who lived in Texas until recently, the Syrian opposition coalition concluded months of contentious efforts to unite behind a leader, under pressure from the United States and its allies, which demanded that the opposition set up clear chains of command as a condition of increasing aid to the rebels.Mr. Hitto, a relative unknown in opposition politics who rose to prominence recently through efforts to improve the delivery of humanitarian aid, was far from a unanimous choice. After a day of maneuvering and voting on Monday that lasted into early Tuesday, he won 35 votes, just three more than Assad Mustafa, a former agricultural minister under Mr. Assad's father and predecessor, Hafez al-Assad.Mr. Hitto faces formidable challenges in his quest to to establish administrative authority over areas of northern Syria that have been secured by the rebels.Mr. Assad's air force still rules the skies, so any attempt to govern from those rebel-held areas risks the constant threat of airstrikes. And antigovernment fighters and activists inside Syria, who have long complained that the coalition offered little concrete help and had little connection to the struggle on the ground, remain skeptical of any interim government based outside the country.Even opposition leaders outside Syria are divided on whether an interim government makes sense. Fahed al-Masri, a spokesman for the rebel Free Syrian Army's unified command, questioned how a government could function when it controlled little territory or money yet would be held responsible for the fate of more than one million Syrian refugees and several times that number displaced inside the country.Mr. Hitto — who ruled out negotiations with Mr. Assad, another blow to wavering efforts to find a political solution — has argued that forming a government would help keep Syria from slipping further into chaos."There is always a possibility that this regime might fall suddenly," he said, in a video posted on YouTube to announce his candidacy. "And we can't avoid a political vacuum in the country and the ensuing chaos unless there is a transitional government."He called for "a government of institutions and law" that would be accountable and transparent.The stakes are high. Many nations have recognized the coalition as the legitimate representative of the Syrian people, meaning that if Mr. Hitto is able to form a cabinet, which is far from certain given the group's fractiousness, his government could try to claim Syria's frozen state assets and other levers of power.With his many years in Texas, Mr. Hitto may seem like an unusual selection to lead a government struggling to establish street credibility with rebels — or an uprising facing allegations from Mr. Assad's supporters that it is an American creation.But he said he could not resist getting involved, especially after his son Obaida, 25, sneaked off to Syria and joined rebel fighters to shoot videos, deliver humanitarian aid and spread word of their struggle.Mr. Hitto and his wife, Suzanne, an American schoolteacher, have four children, all born in the United States, where Mr. Hitto advocated for Muslim Americans after 9/11 as a representative of the Council on American-Islamic Relations.He traveled to the Middle East last fall to learn more and never went back. "I have a career back home that I'm in the process of destroying," he said jovially over lunch recently in Istanbul.In his role heading the humanitarian aid arm of the coalition under Suhair Atassi, a coalition vice president and respected activist from Damascus, Mr. Hitto quickly came into close contact with American and other foreign officials. Frustrated with what he saw as anemic and disorganized international efforts to aid displaced Syrians, he hired internationally known aid consultants to do a survey that found that the number of needy people in six Syrian provinces was more than 50 percent higher than United Nations estimates.
SARJAH, Syria — Abdulkader Darwish did not go far after a Syrian military aircraft dropped a bomb near his house last year, prompting him to gather his family and flee. He ventured with a shovel into the local olive groves. There he dug through the sealed entrance to an abandoned Roman cave.Nine months on, dozens of members of the extended Darwish family have passed a cycle of the seasons crowded together in the damp and almost unlighted space. They have gained neighbors all the while, residents of a subterranean community in Syria's northwest."There are many caves here, a line of caves, like an ancient village," Mr. Darwish said as he huddled with several children inside. "All of them have been cleaned and are now occupied. There is not a vacant cave."As the bloody civil war between the government of President Bashar al-Assad and the opposition enters its third year, and Mr. Assad's military continues to pound neighborhoods aligned with the rebels, uncountable Syrian families are waiting out the violence in the caves of bygone times. They are part of the four million people who the United Nations estimates have been forced by the war from their homes, a displacement that seemingly grows each week.They live a grim existence — a routine of trying to eat, to stay warm and dry, to gather firewood and water out in the elements, all while listening for the sounds of incoming planes and artillery shells.Explanations of the origins of these underground shelters, many of which are set among other Roman ruins, vary from squatter to squatter. Some say they once were pens for livestock. Others say they were temporary quarters, occupied while more impressive dwellings were built in the centuries before Jesus. Perhaps some were crypts.Whatever the intention of those who first dug them, Syria's caves have become essential once more, restored to modern use because their thick walls offer a chance of survival to a population under fire.Villagers in Idlib Province talk of tens of thousands of people living this way. While these numbers are unverifiable, there are signs that cave demand exceeds cave supply, as more people lose their homes or take flight."This was the only cave I could find when I came here," said Ahmed Sheikh, 51, whose family lives in a smaller cave than the Darwish family's four-room warren, and slightly farther uphill.In other towns across the province, part of the population remains at home. In those places, some families rely on caves only as temporary bomb shelters, places to rush to during danger. Their shelters vary from holes freshly chipped under stone ledges to deep basementlike rooms, known as beli, where food and animal feed would normally be stored beneath a villager's home.For those lucky enough to have them, the temporary shelters can be stocked with hanging kerosene lamps, blankets and bedrolls, offering families a place to pass the most dangerous hours or nights.But in many villages, as in Sarjah, which the government has punished with what seems a special fury, the dangers are of a different order. People have moved from village centers into rural caves full-time. They have no plans to leave until Mr. Assad's military is weakened to the point that its ordnance can no longer regularly reach their former neighborhoods."It became impossible to live in the village without being exposed to the possibility of your death at any time," Mr. Sheikh said.He spent 35 days improving his cave after claiming it last summer. He installed a wood-burning box stove, cut a ventilation hole, dug and hauled away mud, and hung heavy blankets to reduce drafts and create one area warmer than the rest.His family is fastidious. The warmest room is neat, and shoes are stacked at its edge. "I keep it organized," he said.Cleanliness alone cannot keep away the hardship. After enduring the winter, he said, his wife's legs are swollen. Their three young children suffer from chest infections and earaches.As he spoke, a sluggish black beetle, about the half the size of his thumb, slid off the wall and came to rest on its back beside his feet.Mr. Sheikh picked up the insect and threw it toward the cave's entrance, like a stone."Now you have seen with your own eyes how we are forced to live," he said.
DAMASCUS, Syria — More and more students at Damascus University were skipping classes. The whack and thump of shelling in the distance punctuated the hum of the downtown campus. Some students walked miles to avoid the security checkpoints that choke traffic.But classes continued at the Syrian capital's flagship university, and many students kept coming. The university, where President Bashar al-Assad and many other Syrian elites completed their studies, became a sanctuary for young people still preparing for a future, however uncertain, when their country would not be in the midst of a ferocious civil war.Then, on Thursday afternoon, a mortar shell crashed into the engineering campus, through the orange canvas awning of a cafe where students were smoking Gauloise cigarettes, chatting and studying on a shiny spring day, in what could have been a university scene playing out anywhere. The blast killed at least 10 students and injured 29, soaking the concrete floor with blood.With it, the war invaded a campus that, like much of Damascus, the Syrian capital, had done its best to go about its business."I was laughing," recalled Abdelhamid Rifai, a third-year civil engineering student who was taking a break from an exam as a cool wind tossed the eucalyptus trees overhead. "I straightened my chair, and then it happened."The blast was deafening. Blue and orange plastic chairs flipped over. Students helped carry away the dead and the injured, then filed out of the gate, many holding hands and pressing cellphones to their ears to reassure worried parents.The engineering dean vowed to reopen next week, but for some students, the attack, which came two days after a shell exploded a few hundred yards away, signaled the end of normal studies.Roaa Salem, an architecture student, had dreamed before the war of designing artistic buildings and, since the crisis began, of rebuilding her damaged country. On Thursday, though, standing outside the hospital room of a friend injured in the attack, she said she would not return."I know Syria needs us right now," said Ms. Salem, her pink-striped boatnecked sweater stained with blood from a shrapnel wound to her shoulder. "But ... " she said, her voice trailing off.The Syrian war had already transformed the lives of many students. They have lost friends to attacks off campus. They struggle to concentrate on their work. They file into class past armed guards; some have joined neighborhood militias. And their great debates have been about one thing — the war."It's all we think about — what should we do, how should we act?" Ms. Salem said.The common view, she said, is that "Syria is a victim between two forces" — Russia, which backs Mr. Assad, and the United States, which backs the opposition — and that "ignorance" in Syrian society is fertile ground for war.But Ms. Salem and her classmates disagree on the solution. Some, whom she called extremists, back a military solution that crushes the armed uprising, which began as a political protest movement that many Damascus students joined. But most, she said, want a political settlement."The majority want a compromise," she said. "It's impossible to bring things back under control as they were."On Thursday, though, many students said the rebels had declared war on them — and their education."They want to stop our studies," said Alaa, a student by the campus gate who was still holding the clear plastic ruler she had brought to her interrupted exam."They want to paralyze the country," said the engineering dean, Mohammed Gharib, as he got in a car to drive his daughter, a first-year student, to safety.Syria prides itself on its universities, which produce doctors and engineers who work across the Middle East and the world. The country's many colleges help Syria maintain a middle class that is sizable by regional standards. Mr. Assad once called the university "a rallying point for the vanguard of Syrian and Arab young people."It is not the first time during the conflict that university students have been killed or wounded on campus. Two months ago more than 80 people were killed at Aleppo University in northern Syria — also during exams — when multiple explosions possibly caused by airstrikes or bombs struck near a dormitory complex. The Assad government and insurgents blamed each other.After Thursday's attack, the Syrian government ordered all universities and state hospitals to pause for five minutes at noon on Monday in honor of the victims.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Torches flickered outside the church. Little girls wore their sparkly Easter best. Children bearing lanterns filed out through the heavy gilt doors, as worshipers carried an icon of Jesus and a cross covered with carnations.But the Good Friday procession at St. Kyrillos Church here in Syria's capital did not follow the route it had taken for generations. No drums or trumpets announced its presence. The marchers made a tight circle inside the iron-gated courtyard, then headed back into the church, a hedge against the mortar shells like the one that hit a hospital across the street recently. At pauses in their singing, gunfire rattled, not more than a few blocks away.Easter weekend is usually the year's most festive for Syria's Christians, but this year, it is infused with grave uncertainty. Christians here say they primarily fear the general chaos enveloping the country as the war enters its third year. But like members of Syria's other religious minorities, many Christians also fear what they see as the rise of extremists among the mainly Sunni Muslim rebels fighting the government of President Bashar al-Assad.As they gathered in small knots in the church courtyard — which on a normal Good Friday would have been packed — many parishioners wondered aloud where they would be next Easter."Either everything will be O.K. in one year, or there will be no Christians here," said Ilias, 20, a man who, like some other Christians quoted in this article, was willing to give only a first name.At the church on Friday night, many parishioners said the coexistence of Christians and Muslims was deeply ingrained in Syrian society, and they did not believe that the rebels were targeting them because of their religion. Their main fear was that Christians, perceived as wealthy, were targets for financially motivated kidnappers.But they worried that the equilibrium had changed. They have heard stories of churches being burned. They are hosting Christians who have fled Damascus suburbs as fighting encroached, some of them saying they were pushed out by hostile Sunni fighters.Although the nominal rebel leadership outside the country has vowed that all sects will be treated equally if Mr. Assad falls, some rebel groups inside Syria have called for an Islamic state. That means different things to different people, but some fighters have alarmed Christians by calling for archaic practices from the days of the caliphates, like taxing religious minorities."There are strangers who are against the way we used to live together," said Nancy, 16, who was heading home for her family's usual Easter feast, a classically Syrian meal of kibbe — bulgur wheat stuffed with meat — and tabbouleh."The only way to split Syria was through sectarianism," she said. "They want to split the Christians from the other sects."The government and rebels blame each other for introducing sectarianism into the conflict. The government has long portrayed the uprising, which began as a peaceful protest movement, as fueled by foreign-driven Muslim extremism. The rebels say the government, dominated by Mr. Assad's Shiite Alawite sect, stoked fear among minorities to keep them loyal. There are some Christians among the opposition, but not a critical mass.Syria has one of the oldest Christian communities in the world and one of the largest in the Middle East — about 10 percent of the population. (Most Syrian Christians are Eastern Orthodox and will celebrate Easter on May 5.) Christians have long been prominent among the country's elite, and before the Baath Party coup that led to Assad family rule, a Christian, Fares al-Khoury, served as prime minister."The Christians in Syria are the only ones left in the region," said Bashar Ilias, a theological student and social worker who distributes church donations to people displaced by the fighting. "If they leave, Christianity will lose its roots."Unlike some Christian factions in Lebanon, which claim to be descended from the ancient Phoenicians, Syria's Christians generally pride themselves on their Arab heritage and see themselves an integral part of the region.Most church services are in Arabic; Arabic inscriptions are carved on the marble walls of ornate churches. At St. Kyrillos Church in the Qassaa neighborhood on Friday, a haunting melody seemed to meld with the sweet, waxy smell of votive candles: the song "Ya Habibi," Mary's lament for Jesus, beloved throughout the Arab world as a classic in the repertory of the Lebanese diva Fairouz.Most Christians interviewed emphasized that Syrian Muslims were largely tolerant, and blamed the influence of Saudi Arabia and foreign fighters for sectarianism.But amid the atmosphere of fear, many have begun to speak of the conflict in religious terms."The Christians in Syria are being crucified in Syria for the church," Mr. Ilias said as he visited an elderly friend, Janette Shaheen, after services."Jesus was oppressed once, but we are being oppressed every day," added Mrs. Shaheen, who lives near a church that has been shelled several times.Mr. Ilias added: "If someone is born a Muslim, I can't say he's the devil. His action is an evil action, but he's human." But Syrian Muslims, he said, "acknowledge the existence of others."The thud of a distant mortar shell could be felt faintly through the floor. Just a few blocks to the east is Jobar, a rebel-held neighborhood.Mrs. Shaheen served coffee to Fouad Anouf, 51, who fled Jobar recently. He and his wife and three small children were the only Christians in their apartment building, but they stayed there for nearly a year after rebels entered the neighborhood.The rebels were Syrians, he said, and did not threaten him, even after a new wave of Islamist fighters arrived. They let him cross the battle lines every day to get to work. He left, he said, when his building became a battleground between government tanks and rebel snipers. Now it has been burned, leaving him penniless."Both sides are using the same methods to destroy the country," he said.Christians are far from unanimous on the conflict. Mr. Ilias, the social worker, said Mr. Assad — "May God prolong his life" — was the protector of minorities.Yet Mr. Anouf assigned equal blame for the conflict to Russia and Iran, which back the government, and the United States and its allies, which back the opposition. He referred to the fighters not as terrorists, as the government does, but as "the free army," which he distinguished from "the regular army."Another displaced Christian, Marzouk, said he had fled the suburb of Harasta after Saudi fighters arrived and his Sunni neighbors told him that he was not safe. "The compromise should be crushing those people with the military boot," he said. "The government should have no mercy upon them."
TELL MARDIKH, Syria — Ali Shibleh crawled through a two-foot-high tunnel until reaching a slightly larger subterranean space. He swung his flashlight's beam into the dark.A fighter opposed to President Bashar al-Assad, Mr. Shibleh was roaming beneath Ebla, an ancient ruin that for several decades has been one of Syria's most carefully studied and publicly celebrated archaeological sites. He had just made another of his many finds: he lifted something resembling a dried stick, then squeezed it between his fingers and thumb.It broke with a powdery snap. "This is human bone," he said.Across much of Syria, the country's archaeological heritage is imperiled by war, facing threats ranging from outright destruction by bombs and bullets to opportunistic digging by treasure hunters who take advantage of the power vacuum to prowl the country with spades and shovels. Fighting has raged around the Roman ruins of Palmyra, the ancient city in central Syria, once known as the Bride of the Desert. And the Syrian Army has established active garrisons at some of the country's most treasured and antiquated citadels, including castles at Aleppo, Hama and Homs.For decades Ebla has been celebrated for the insights it offers into early Syrian civilization. The scenes here today offer something else: a prime example of a peculiar phenomenon of Syria's civil war — scores, if not hundreds, of archaeological sites, often built and inhabited millenniums ago because of their military value, now at risk as they are put to military use once more.Seen from afar, Ebla is a mound rising above the Idlib plain. It was first settled more than 5,000 years ago. It eventually became a fortified walled city whose residents worshiped multiple gods, and traded olive oil and beer across Mesopotamia. The city was destroyed around 2200 B.C., flourished anew several centuries later and then was destroyed again.The latest disruption came after war began in 2011. Once rebels pushed the army back and into nearby garrisons, the outcropping upon which Ebla rests presented a modern martial utility: it was ideal for spotting passing government military planes.And so Mr. Shibleh and several other fighters have been posted on the mound with two-way radios, to report the approaches of the MIG and Sukhoi attack jets that have repeatedly dropped bombs on cities and towns that have fallen from Mr. Assad's control."I keep a watch here," he said.He and other members of his fighting group, which calls itself The Arrows of the Right, perform a dual duty. They say they also try to protect Ebla from full-on looting by thieves who want to sort through the place with earth-moving equipment, looking for artifacts to sell on the black market.But even if the presence of The Arrows of the Right may have prevented the site from being scoured by bulldozer blades, it has brought harm. Ebla, occupied by even a few rebels, is suffering the effects of more traffic, damage and theft.Mr. Shibleh himself digs on the ancient mound, and he has explored its underground passages. He led the way on this day into a series of ancient crypts."It is another country underground," he said, crawling on his chest through tunnels he clearly knew well.In one section of tunnel, Mr. Shibleh found a large scoop-shaped piece of bone that appeared to be as light as a wafer. It had been part of a human head. "There were too many skulls," he said. "The cave here was full of them."Those skulls, he said, are now gone — removed by artifact hunters and then thrown away.Grave sites are potential spots to find jewelry or figurines, as some corpses were interred with offerings and possessions. This has made Ebla, like hundreds of other sites in a country that sometimes refers to itself as an open-air archaeological museum, a tempting spot for thieves.Ebla's crypts have not been the source of its fame. In the 1960s and 1970s the city's prominence was restored and its name became well known among archaeologists when an archaeological mission led by an Italian, Paolo Matthiae, discovered the city-state's long buried archive, which held more than 16,000 stone tablets.As they have been translated from cuneiform script, these records written on stone have shed light on the administration, trade, theology and life in a city from another time.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — The embattled Syrian government mounted attacks on rebel positions across the country on Sunday, according to opposition activists.Fighting intensified in and around Aleppo, the country's largest city, after government forces regained control of Aziza, a village near the city's military airport, following weeks of clashes, the reports said. According to the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a Britain-based activist organization that tracks the fighting, the rebels in the village ran out of ammunition and were forced to withdraw. The village sits on high ground commanding the road between the military airport and the city.Syrian warplanes hit Aleppo in the north, Latakia on the Mediterranean coast, the eastern province of Deir Ezzor and other locations in an apparent effort to counter recent territorial gains by the rebels, the activists said.The insurgency seeking the overthrow of President Bashar al-Assad holds large stretches of territory in the north and has been gaining ground for weeks in the south. Near the Jordanian border, it captured an air defense base near the city of Dara'a and seized the nearby town of Dael, further loosening the government's grip on Dara'a Province.One airstrike on Sunday pounded the Sukkary neighborhood in Aleppo, killing at least 12 civilians, according to the Local Coordination Committees, an opposition network. Clashes were also reported near Aleppo's civilian international airport.Activists posted video images online that appeared to show the aftermath of the airstrike. A crowd of men is seen standing on the rubble of destroyed buildings, looking for survivors and calling out anguished cries of "Allah Akbar" (God is great).A woman is shown perched on the edge of the second floor of a building whose facade has collapsed, as men standing below her encourage her to climb down.In the suburbs of Damascus, the capital, government forces reportedly fired rockets on Sunday at the town of Mleeha, where clashes have been raging for the past few days. In a video posted online by activists, black smoke is seen spiraling from a building on fire, and a man's voice says that more than 75 missiles had hit Mleeha since early morning.The state news agency, SANA, gave a different account of the day's events. It said that the Syrian Army "pursued an armed terrorist group west of Adra in the Damascus countryside, killing and injuring a number of terrorists," using the term the government loosely applies to all its opponents. The agency said government troops carried out special operations in several other provinces on Sunday as well, inflicting heavy losses on rebel fighters.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Jayda al-Kanna, 65, was cooking in her kitchen across from the Syrian Central Bank on Monday afternoon, a dish towel slung around her neck. Downstairs, children packed the Salim Bukhari primary school, and older students studied drawing at a technical school in the same building.Without warning, an explosion shook the street, blasting a six-foot hole in Ms. Kanna's living room wall, shattering the schools' windows onto their students and blowing in the doors. Cars, body parts and broken glass flew through the air. Black smoke billowed.The attack, witnesses and the government authorities said, was the latest of dozens of car bombs to rip through Syrian business districts and neighborhoods during the country's two-year war. It again turned a wary but busy downtown commercial area into a scene of terror and chaos. The Syrian government blamed its opponents for Monday's attack and said it had killed at least 15 people and wounded at least 53.The proliferation of car bombs across Syria has frightened and enraged many on both sides in this battle, government supporters and opponents alike. The use of these powerful and indiscriminate weapons — rejected by some rebel factions — has undermined support for the uprising against President Bashar al-Assad and left many Syrians angry at the government for failing to stop the bombings.In Damascus, the Syrian capital, on Monday, some residents blamed the United States and its allies, which back the opposition, for the devastation.A half-hour after the bombing, a drawing teacher, her hand bandaged, wept as she picked her way past bloodstains and shattered furniture inside what was left of the technical school."I was going to open the door, and it fell on me," she said shakily, giving only her first name, Hanan. "Many students were injured."A man with her prevented her from talking and shouted: "This is America, Jordan, Qatar, Saudi Arabia! They are funding those people to do those explosions!"In December 2011, when car bombs began hitting government security buildings — and killing civilians nearby — government supporters and opponents alike viewed the explosions as an ominous turn in the conflict.Until then, the fighting had largely pitted rebels with small arms and roadside bombs against the army and security forces. But suddenly, the Syrian capital was witnessing scenes reminiscent of the Iraqi insurgency. Checkpoints and blast walls went up everywhere.Some in the opposition said they suspected the government of setting the bombs to tarnish the uprising. But one rebel group, the extremist Nusra Front, began claiming responsibility for many of those attacks. That led to one of the first signs of the split in the armed opposition, between those who said they were defending themselves against a violent government crackdown and a minority who called for an Islamic state. And it repulsed some civilian activists who then distanced themselves from the movement.Now, the Nusra Front has become a major force on the battlefield, leading other rebel groups in more conventional fights. That poses a quandary for the United States, which supports the opposition but rejects the Nusra Front and accuses it of ties to Al Qaeda.The bombs have killed Syrians of all sects and views. In November, a car bomb hit the Damascus neighborhood of Mezze 86. News media speculated that the neighborhood had been chosen because it includes military families and members of Mr. Assad's minority Alawite sect.That characterization infuriated Salah, a graphic designer who lives there. Among the dead, he said in an e-mail interview, were his wife, Amal, and 7-year-old daughter, Hanan.Salah, 31, who gave only a first name, said he was not an Assad supporter, nor, for that matter, an Alawite, though he stressed that attacking those groups was not justified. The bombing convinced him that Western-backed rebels aimed to destroy Syria because its army is one of the few in the region not "funded, trained and controlled by the United States," he said.
ZARGALI, Iraq — In a safe house made of cinder blocks and surrounded by grazing goats and sheep, nestled high in the remote mountains of northern Iraq, a Kurdish fighter who has waged a guerrilla war against Turkey for nearly three decades remains defiant in the face of peace."Our forces believe they can achieve results through war," said the fighter, Murat Karayilan, who commands the thousands of fighters of the Kurdistan Workers' Party, or the P.K.K.For all the costs of the long war, Mr. Karayilan, his fighters and millions of Kurds believe it helped them achieve something they never would have without armed struggle: a recognition of Kurdish identity and more democratic rights.Now, as the P.K.K. negotiates peace with Turkey to end one of the Middle East's most intractable conflicts, it is clinging to its guns despite demands by Recep Tayyip Erdogan, Turkey's prime minister, that it lay them down as a condition of talks. This defiance suggests that the peace process, despite the hope it has engendered on both sides, could be longer and more arduous than at first anticipated."Our guerrillas cannot give up their arms," said Mr. Karayilan, in an interview here in the safe house, which had a freezer full of ice cream and satellite television despite its remote location. "It is the last issue, something to discuss as a last issue to this process."The shape of a peace deal is being negotiated in the Turkish capital, Ankara, and in the island prison cell of Abdullah Ocalan, the P.K.K. leader and philosopher-king of Turkey's Kurdish resistance. But it has fallen to Mr. Karayilan to manage the peace process from his mountain redoubt in this lawless nook of Iraq, where the only authority is that wielded by gun-toting Kurdish rebels who operate checkpoints and live in caves at remote outposts.The skies above these mountains have gone quiet, for now, as the bombing runs by Turkish planes, their pick of targets aided by imagery provided by American drones, have ceased in order to allow the talks to proceed.Since a cease-fire was announced in March by Mr. Ocalan, pausing a war that has claimed nearly 40,000 lives since it began in 1984, Mr. Karayilan has been holding meetings and conferences with his followers to convince them of the merits of a deal that many of them are reluctant to accept for one overriding reason.The rank and file, he said, "do not believe and trust the approach of Turkey."Mr. Erdogan, whose efforts at peace could establish his legacy as a peacemaker and propel him to the presidency next year, has demanded that the thousands of fighters scattered around Turkey lay down their weapons before withdrawing to safe havens in these mountains."We don't care where those withdrawing leave their weapons or even whether they bury them," Mr. Erdogan said in a recent television interview. "They must put them down and go. Because otherwise this situation is very open to provocation."Mr. Erdogan has also resisted new legislation, demanded by Mr. Karayilan's party, to ensure the safety of retreating rebels. Instead, he has created a so-called committee of wise men, including Turkish and Kurdish intellectuals and leaders, to promote the peace talks.Mr. Karayilan criticized Mr. Erdogan's tactics, saying: "It needs a serious approach. Erdogan does not approach it seriously; he doesn't understand the deep history. Everyone has to know that our guerrilla forces have continued our struggle successfully to this day."But Mr. Karayilan's defiant words are tempered by his desire for peace. The latest cease-fire is the ninth announced by the P.K.K., which was designated a terrorist organization by the United States and Europe in 1993. Years ago the party gave up its ambition to create a separate Kurdish state, and it now says it will exchange peace for the expansion of Kurdish rights enshrined in a new constitution and the release of thousands of political prisoners from Turkish prisons."We want to solve our problems through peace and dialogue," Mr. Karayilan said. "That is what we believe."But, he said, "if they do not accept Kurds as equal citizens, this problem cannot be solved."As the commander of the P.K.K., Mr. Karayilan also has influence — if not outright authority — over the group's offshoot in Syria, the Democratic Union Party, or the P.Y.D., which has taken up arms in that country's civil war to defend Kurdish areas. He and many other Kurds believe that the close relationship between the West, including the United States, and Turkey has been at the expense of the Kurds.
WASHINGTON — On the hawkish end is the Pentagon's intelligence arm, the Defense Intelligence Agency , which fears that North Korea could threaten American troops with a nuclear weapon on a crude missile. On the skeptical end is the State Department, which has more doubts about Pyongyang's capabilities. And somewhere in the middle is the Central Intelligence Agency.Those contrasting views are vying with one another in the intelligence community, and a hint of those differences came into rare public view on Thursday when an assessment by the Defense Intelligence Agency that it has "moderate confidence" that North Korea has the ability to shrink a nuclear weapon and fit it into a missile warhead surfaced at a Congressional hearing. That conclusion was disputed by James R. Clapper Jr., the director of national intelligence, who issued a statement later in the day saying that it did not reflect "the consensus" of the nation's intelligence community.The contradictory statements and sudden round of finger-pointing seemed to underscore once again the difficulty of obtaining reliable information — and making educated guesses — about one of the world's most closed societies. But it also highlighted the sensitivity surrounding intelligence estimates in the wake of the highly publicized intelligence failures leading up to the Iraq war, and some subsequent failures involving North Korea."The situation is that there is so little direct evidence that I don't think it's possible to come to a firm conclusion on whether or not they currently have a nuclear warhead that can be delivered by missile," said Gary Samore, who until early this year served as President Obama's coordinator for weapons of mass destruction, "or how far away they are from getting there."Mr. Samore, now at Harvard's Belfer Center, added that when it comes to arming the North's Nodong missiles — which can hit South Korea and American troops there, but not beyond — with a nuclear warhead, "the best you can say is that they might have."A decade ago the Defense Intelligence Agency was among the most aggressive in pressing the case that Iraq had an active nuclear weapons program. It was famously deceived by information provided by an insider code-named "Curveball."But the differences between this case and Iraq are considerable. There is no argument that the North can build a modest bomb — its most recent test is believed to have yielded an explosion of 6 to 10 kilotons, less than what the United States dropped on Hiroshima. But there does not appear to be clear evidence of its work on miniaturizing that bomb.An administration official said that including an unclassified passage in a largely classified seven-page assessment of North Korean capabilities by the Defense Intelligence Agency was "clearly a human error." But he would not describe how it happened, nor would Defense Department officials say how that single conclusion ended up in the open, especially if it lacked the context of much more detailed reports.In his statement, the famously press-shy Mr. Clapper said, "North Korea has not yet demonstrated the full range of capabilities necessary for a nuclear armed missile."On Friday morning, a Republican member of Congress said "demonstrated" was the crucial phrase: North Korea has never conducted a test of a warhead, showing that it could be precisely targeted or that it could survive the heat and forces of re-entry into the atmosphere. But he said that there is "a consensus building" among rival intelligence agencies that "If they are not there, they are close to there." Differences among the assessments, he added, "are not huge."The last time the differences among intelligence agencies came into such sharp relief was 10 years ago this spring, when the Bush administration sought to explain why it had dismissed the dissenting opinions of parts of the intelligence community over Iraq's nonconventional weapons.The Defense Intelligence Agency's conclusion was clearly an assessment that the Obama administration was not eager to share with the world. Officials said that at a moment when there were troubles with Iran and Syria, to say nothing of the rest of the Arab world, there was little desire to rekindle the North Korean crisis. That is especially true because North Korea has not demonstrated any capability to place its weapons on a missile, meaning that all the intelligence assessments were based on analysis, not discoveries.But that effort came undone when a staff member on a House Armed Services subcommittee that oversees nuclear issues read a copy of the agency's classified report, as part of his regular staff work, according to two people briefed on the matter who spoke on the condition of anonymity to describe the internal communications between Congress and the Pentagon.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — A leading coalition of Syrian Islamist insurgents broke with a more radical group on Friday, sharply criticizing its announced alliance with Al Qaeda 's Iraq branch as a moral and political mistake that would benefit only their common enemy, President Bashar al-Assad ."The relentless pursuit of power should not be one of our goals," said a statement by the coalition, the Syrian Islamic Liberation Front, referring to the alliance between Syria's Nusra Front and the Qaeda branch. "This is not the right time to declare states, or to unify a state with another state."Expressing "surprise and dismay" at the development, the coalition statement said, "We don't need imported charters or a new understanding of the nation's religion." And in a further criticism of Nusra's loyalty to outsiders, the statement said, "We won't be doing our population, and our nation, any service if we pledge our allegiance to those who don't know a thing about our reality."The criticisms were the most strident in a series of negative reactions to the Nusra-Al Qaeda combination by other members of Syria's armed opposition. Such a combination could further complicate the two-year-old civil war in Syria by strengthening the radical jihadist component of the insurgency, undermining efforts by other rebels to obtain weapons from Western powers.Mr. Assad has long contended that his enemies are foreign-backed terrorists affiliated with Sunni extremist groups like Al Qaeda. The news that Al Qaeda and Nusra were joining together not only appeared to partly validate his claims but reflected the divergent paths of the insurgency against him.Nusra members have been at the forefront of the insurgency's battlefield triumphs in recent months, admired for bravery in fighting Mr. Assad's military. But moderate compatriots consider them worrisome because of the group's intolerant and extremist views, including a disregard for civilian casualties and its call for a strict Islamist religious state to take over in Syria. Some Syrian rebels are skeptical of Nusra's ultimate motives and allegiances because most of the leaders of its units are not even Syrians. Some are Jordanians and Iraqis."Look, I respect their prowess and their struggle," said Abu al-Hasan, an activist in Marea, an Aleppo suburb, reached via Skype. "I respect their ideology, even if I strongly disagree with it, on one condition! They must remain one faction among many other factions of the revolution and one component of Syrian society which has many other components."The leader of Iraq's Qaeda branch, Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi, announced the combination of the two groups on Tuesday in an Internet posting, characterizing it as a merger, saying that it would be known as the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant, and that half of its budget would be committed to toppling Mr. Assad.The Nusra Front leader, Abu Mohammed al-Jawlani, distanced himself somewhat from Mr. Baghdadi's announcement, saying that he had not been informed in advance and that Nusra would keep its own name. But Mr. Jawlani confirmed that they were working together and pledged fealty to Al Qaeda's top leader, Ayman al-Zawahri, the former second-in-command to Osama bin Laden.Mr. Assad appears to have lost no time in exploiting the news for his own political advantage.The Syrian delegation to the United Nations requested that the Security Council, which has long been paralyzed over how to address the conflict, pursue sanctions against the Nusra Front as a terrorist group. French diplomats said Friday that discussions were under way in a Security Council committee to explore that possibility.The United States, which supports the effort to topple Mr. Assad, already considered the Nusra Front a terrorist group, in effect agreeing with him on that point. The Obama administration has resisted requests to supply weapons to the array of loosely affiliated anti-Assad forces, partly out of concern that Nusra fighters would receive them.Worried about the political implications on their requests for Western aid, other Syrian opposition figures began criticizing the Al Qaeda-Nusra combination immediately after it was announced, including Moaz al-Khatib, the leader of the National Coalition of Syrian Opposition and Revolutionary Forces, the main political group."The bottom line: the ideology of Al Qaeda doesn't suit us, and the revolutionaries in Syria must take a clear stance on this matter," Sheik Moaz wrote on his Facebook page.Louay Mekdad, a spokesman for the Free Syrian Army, the umbrella group of armed fighters inside Syria, was less emphatic in his criticism, possibly reflecting its respect for Nusra's combat skills. While he asserted that "no one has the right to impose any form of state on Syrians," he acknowledged that there had been "de facto cooperation" with Nusra fighters on the ground.Other rebel subsidiaries of the Free Syrian Army distanced themselves from Nusra while respecting their common goals. Col. Khaled al-Hbous, commander of the group's Damascus military council, said it had "not established any contact with this faction and does not claim its mistakes." At the same time, Colonel Hbous said, he recognized "their role in defending our oppressed population."The harsh criticism by the Syrian Islamic Liberation Front, however, appeared to portend the potential for hostilities, possibly even armed confrontation with Nusra fighters. The front is an alliance of 20 rebel groups that are among the opposition's most important insurgent forces. One of those groups, the Tawheed Brigade, has clashed with Nusra fighters before.Andrew J. Tabler, a Syria expert at the Washington Institute for Near East Policy, said the Al Qaeda-Nusra combination had brought further into the open the factionalism and diverging motives of the anti-Assad insurgency. "They're important because they show the Islamist-nationalist divide," he said. "Not all the opposition is speaking with one voice."He said Mr. Assad, recognizing Western fears about the possibility of Syria's disintegration, was seeking to turn that to his advantage and "trying to spin a story that we're fighting on a common front here."
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Loyalist forces in Syria have breached the insurgency's extended blockade of two important northern bases, possibly opening the way for the military to strengthen supply lines and undertake a new campaign to recapture territory lost to the rebels in the north, antigovernment activist groups said Monday.The fracturing of the blockade that had isolated the two bases, Wadi el-Dayf and Al Hamidiya in Idlib Province, began on Sunday, the activists reported. It appeared to be at least a temporary victory for the military loyal to President Bashar al-Assad, which has been increasingly stretched in seeking to halt territorial gains in Syria's civil war by rebel fighters in the north, east and south.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an antigovernment group based in Britain that has a network of contacts in Syria, said that vehicles loaded with ammunition and military reinforcements were seen heading to the two formerly besieged bases for the first time in at least two months.It said that at least 21 insurgent fighters had been killed and that others were missing in clashes with government forces that had outflanked the rebels responsible for the blockade of the bases. Other activists affiliated with the insurgency said more than 50 rebel fighters had been killed.Whether the insurgency's forces would be able to re-establish the blockade remained unclear on Monday. The Local Coordination Committees, an antigovernment activist group, reported that at least 10 government soldiers had defected from the Wadi el-Dayf base, an indication that control of the area was still to be determined.Other activists said clashes were raging on Monday near the bases in territory that included the outskirts of Maarat al-Noaman, a town in Idlib Province ravaged in fighting last year because of its strategic location. It sits on the main north-south highway between Damascus, the capital, and Aleppo, a city near the border with Turkey that has been a contested battleground since last July."To be honest, after seeing the army's operation today, there is a widespread fear among people that regime forces will soon regain control of other areas in the province," said Asaad Kanjo, an activist in Idlib reached via Skype. "People are worried it's part of some kind of big military operation to recapture Idlib suburbs."Other areas of Syria were also afflicted by fighting on Monday, including the northern Damascus suburb of Barzeh, where an important mosque was hit by government shellfire, the Syrian Observatory reported. Opposition activists said that in another northern Damascus suburb, Qaboun, nearly 30 children were killed on Sunday in government airstrikes.The National Coalition of Syrian Revolutionary and Opposition Forces, Syria's main political opposition group, said in a statement released Monday that the Qaboun killings were "yet another war crime by the Assad forces."Each side in the conflict, which has left more than 70,000 people dead, has repeatedly accused the other of atrocities, including unverified claims of chemical weapons use, but the Syrian government has not allowed independent investigators from the United Nations or other organizations into the country to look into them.The Syrian Observatory also said on Monday that a petition had been sent to Ban Ki-moon, the United Nations secretary general, seeking his assistance in securing the release of Abdelaziz al-Khayer, a prominent figure in Syria's officially tolerated political opposition. Aides say Mr. Khayer was arrested by Syrian intelligence officials upon his return last September from China, where he had been engaged in talks to find a negotiated settlement of the Syrian conflict.Mr. Khayer, an advocate of peaceful political change, was convicted of sedition in 1995 and served 10 years of a 22-year prison sentence before he was freed because of international pressure. His rearrest last year and the subsequent vacuum of information on his condition or whereabouts have been regarded as signs of what Mr. Assad's critics call the president's insincerity in saying he wants to seek dialogue, even with nonviolent political adversaries.Mr. Assad has sought to portray the insurgency as the work of foreign-backed terrorist groups like Al Qaeda, a narrative that gained credibility last week when the Nusra Front, a Syrian formation of feared Sunni militant fighters, publicly declared its allegiance to Al Qaeda's leadership.Alarmed by the Nusra-Qaeda alliance, members of the so-called Friends of Syria group of Western countries that support the insurgency but do not want to intervene militarily in Syria have been struggling to devise a strategy to respond, and were expected to address the issue at a meeting this weekend in Istanbul.The United Nations Security Council will also take up the Syria issue this week and was expected to be briefed on Thursday by Lakhdar Brahimi, the special envoy representing the United Nations and the Arab League. Both the Syrian government and Russia, its strongest foreign backer, have called Mr. Brahimi's impartiality into question because the Arab League has officially seated the Syrian opposition coalition as the legitimate representative of Syria.There have been numerous unattributed reports in the Arab news media in recent days that Mr. Brahimi would resign. Khawla Mattar, a spokeswoman for Mr. Brahimi, said in an e-mail that "we are aware of all these reports" but that he had not submitted his resignation.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Syrian opposition activists said Sunday that government forces had killed at least 80 people in a town south of Damascus, and then carried out mass arrests as the residents tried to bury the bodies.Residents in the town, Jdaidet al-Fadl, and activists described a three-day campaign in which soldiers from the army and loyalist militias systematically burned houses, arrested men, took over field hospitals and killed the wounded.The state news agency SANA gave a somewhat different account: "Armed forces units inflicted heavy losses upon terrorists in the town of Jdaidet al-Fadl in the Damascus countryside, injuring a number of them and killing others."Neither version of events could be independently confirmed.The town is near a military base along a corridor connecting the city of Dara'a with two southern suburbs of Damascus — Daraya and Moadhamiya — that have been hotly contested. Rebels have hung on in the two suburbs through months of withering shelling and airstrikes.The area has grown in importance in recent months as weapons have been sent from Jordan north to rebel groups in Syria, with American assistance. Both sides have stepped up fighting in the area.Shamel al-Jolani, an activist who lives nearby, said area residents were able to document the names of 80 people who had been killed. The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a British-based group that tracks the conflict through a network of contacts in Syria, said the victims included 71 men, 3 children and 6 women. It said 19 of the men were rebel fighters.Residents said the death toll was much higher — and the Observatory said the total could reach 250 — but that it was difficult to identify and count the victims because the fighting was continuing and because many of the bodies had been disfigured."They're just scattered limbs and charred bodies that are completely unrecognizable," Mr. Jolani said in an interview conducted over Skype.Video images posted on the Internet by activists appeared to show a row of bodies, bloodied and wrapped in carpets or bags. Several appeared to have been shot in the face. Most were men, but a few seemed to be children.The town appears to have been badly damaged. By Mr. Jolani's account, electricity, water and communications links have been cut off and the town's only bakery destroyed. He estimated that 300 to 400 people were in makeshift hospitals and that "hundreds of shells landed here in the past five days."Many people who have fled the Damascus suburbs also were sheltering in the area. Mr. Jolani said hundreds of people were arrested on Sunday and taken to the military base, which is home to a unit called the Regiment 100.An activist in the Damascus suburbs said that rebel fighters withdrew from the area near Jdaidet al-Fadl after running out of ammunition. "It's not acceptable to pull out and leave civilians behind," he said. "Sometimes I feel the Free Syrian Army is collaborating with the regime."The sound of gunfire echoed through the streets overnight, Mr. Jolani said, but it was not clear whether it came from the fighting or from summary executions.Saeed, an activist from Jdaidet al-Fadl who recently fled Syria, said Sunday that his parents and siblings who were still in the town had survived the attack and described it to him. "Snipers shot whoever was caught trying to escape," they told him. "Some were shot three days ago, and their bodies were left in their places."He said that his father was arrested and later released, though others who were detained were found killed.On Saturday night, he said, the army captured the hospitals; doctors fled, and "the army then burned all the wounded people there."Mr. Jolani said all members of a family named Turkmani were killed and burned — mother, father, son and daughter — and that more arrests were made at the funerals on Sunday. He described government soldiers "driving through the streets in their cars and chanting for Assad," referring to Syria's embattled president, Bashar al-Assad.The local opposition committee in Jdaidet al-Fadl posted an emotional statement online explaining why it had not posted video clips to back up its assertions."We don't have satellite Internet," they wrote. "We don't have generators. And if we use regular generators, the area from which the sound of the generators can be heard gets shelled or raided. My dear, I stand in a place exposed to a sniper for 15 minutes, just to be able to publish one single 300-kilobyte picture. The media blackout is contributing to our killing."There were new warnings on Sunday that fighting in Syria could spill into Lebanon. Syrian rebels say that the Lebanese militant group Hezbollah, which supports the Assad government, has sent new forces across the border to the Syrian town of Qusayr in recent weeks.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Two Syrian archbishops from Aleppo were abducted on Monday while traveling outside that besieged northern city, the official news media and antigovernment activists reported, making them the most senior church clerics to become entangled as victims in the two-year-old civil war.The government and insurgent groups blamed each other for the abduction of the two clerics, the Syriac Orthodox archbishop, Yohanna Ibrahim, and the Greek Orthodox archbishop, Paul Yazigi. Activists reached by telephone in the Aleppo area said the pair's vehicle had been waylaid in the countryside by armed men who shot their driver.Several prominent Muslim religious leaders have been persecuted or killed since the Syria conflict began, including the highest-ranking Sunni imam in the country in a bombing of his Damascus mosque last month. But until now the fighting had largely bypassed the clerical hierarchy of Syria's Christian minority.Archbishop Ibrahim had been supportive of President Bashar al-Assad and had urged his followers not to abandon Syria, but he had recently turned critical of the government. In an interview with the BBC on April 13, the archbishop said that perhaps a third of Syria's Christians had left the country and that he could not blame them, considering the "difficult circumstances in terms of security and the threats they face daily."In the same interview, the archbishop chided Mr. Assad's government for "not dealing with the crisis in a better way."Archbishop Yazigi was not known to be politically outspoken.Syria's official news agency, SANA, said the pair had been engaged in humanitarian work when they were seized in the village of Kfar Dael by "terrorists," the government's catchall term for the armed opposition.Antigovernment activists said the pair had been in southern Turkey earlier Monday and had crossed back into Syria at the Bab al-Hawa crossing, which is controlled by insurgent forces. Aleppo, which has been a battleground of the insurgency since last summer, is about 40 miles south of the Turkish border.The abduction of the clerics in northern Syria came as concern intensified about border tensions in western Syria with Lebanon. A Human Rights Watch report released Monday accused both the Syrian government and the insurgency of striking residential areas in Lebanon on several occasions and killing a number of its citizens. The cross-border attacks appeared to be largely indiscriminate, Human Rights Watch said.While the Syrian government and armed opposition groups have both said that their attacks on Lebanese villages were in retaliation for provocations, Human Rights Watch said it had not found any evidence of military targets when it visited the Lebanese villages that had been attacked. Its report said the evidence "strongly suggests these attacks were indiscriminate and therefore violate the laws of war," according to a summary of the report on its Web site.Lebanon has officially adopted a policy of dissociation from the Syrian conflict, which has pitted President Assad's Alawite minority against a Sunni-dominated rebellion, but violence is beginning to spill over the border, intensifying sectarian tensions in Lebanon.Insurgents and their sympathizers have accused Hezbollah, the Lebanese Shiite militant group that supports Mr. Assad, of sending fighters into the Syrian town of Qusayr in recent weeks. On Sunday, rebel groups in Qusayr threatened to "transfer the battle of blood into the heart of Lebanon" because of what they called incitement by Hezbollah. Some rebel fighters in Qusayr also sent a message via Skype to comrades beseeching them to come and help defend against "the party of the devil" — a disparaging reference to Hezbollah, which translates from Arabic as "the party of God."Hezbollah has not commented on the Syrian rebels' accusations, but it has said that Lebanese citizens living inside Syria have been attacked and that they have the right to defend themselves.Anti-Assad activists also reported on Monday that the number of deaths from an attack by government forces on a town south of Damascus had risen to at least 101, mostly civilians, and could exceed 250 if the missing remain unaccounted for, which would make the attack one of the bloodiest since the conflict began two years ago.The attack on the town, Jdeidet al-Fadel, which happened over this past week, has been described by the Syrian opposition as an intense campaign of shelling, burning and summary executions, while the official news media has described it as a cleanup operation against terrorists, an operation that had been welcomed by area villagers.In other Syria developments, the main anti-Assad group, the National Coalition for Syrian Revolutionary and Opposition Forces, chose a caretaker leader to replace Sheik Moaz al-Khatib until a formal election is held. Sheik Moaz, a Sunni cleric, was temporarily succeeded by George Sabra, a leftist Christian dissident and outspoken critic of Mr. Assad.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — A Christian advocacy group and the television network Al Jazeera reported the release on Tuesday of two Syrian archbishops who had been seized on a road trip outside their home city of Aleppo 24 hours earlier. But others said the archbishops were still held by unidentified kidnappers, in a day of conflicting accounts about the fate of the pair, the most prominent clergymen drawn into Syria 's civil war.The Syrian government issued a statement condemning the kidnapping and saying that "it was confirmed that those who perpetrated this brutal act are Chechen mercenaries," working for a militant Islamist rebel faction called the Nusra Front. The statement, reported by the Sana state news service, offered no evidence for the assertion that the kidnappers were Chechen, the same ethnicity as the suspects in the Boston Marathon bombing.The advocacy group, L'Oeuvre d'Orient, which assists Middle Eastern Christians, posted a statement on its Web site that the two kidnapping victims — a Syriac archbishop, Yohanna Ibrahim, and a Greek Orthodox archbishop, Paul Yazigi — had been freed early Tuesday afternoon. The group, based in Paris, said the archbishops were staying in a Greek Orthodox Church in Aleppo, the northern city that has been a combat zone since last summer.Al Jazeera also reported their release, quoting a priest, Tony Yazigi, a relative of the Greek Orthodox archbishop.The two were abducted on Monday by armed men who ambushed their vehicle in Aleppo Province and executed their driver, who had worked for Archbishop Ibrahim, according to both Syria's official news media and antigovernment activists."While L'Oeuvre d'Orient rejoices at the news of their release, it deplores the murder of the driver," the advocacy group's statement said. It also called for the release of two priests missing in Syria for three months.Despite the reports that the archbishops had been freed, there was no confirmation, and as the day progressed contradictory accounts emerged. Abdel-Ahad Steifo, a Syriac member of the National Coalition of Revolutionary and Opposition Forces, the main political opposition group, said in an interview on Al Jazeera that the archbishops were still being held by the kidnappers.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a Britain-based group, claimed the two archbishops had been kidnapped by foreign fighters who had been heard speaking classical Arabic.This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: An article on Wednesday about the disputed fate of two kidnapped Syrian archbishops misidentified, in some editions, the Syrian province where they were abducted on Monday. It is Aleppo Province, not Idlib. This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: An article on April 24 about conflicting reports on the fate of two Syrian archbishops who had been seized on a road trip outside their home city of Aleppo misidentified the position within the Greek Orthodox Church that is held by Tony Yazigi, a relative of one kidnapping victim. He is a priest, not a bishop.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Fighting between Syrian insurgents and government forces in Aleppo left one of the Middle East's most storied mosques severely damaged on Wednesday, its soaring minaret toppled by explosives. Each side accused the other of responsibility for the destruction at the Umayyad Mosque in Aleppo's walled ancient city , a Unesco World Heritage site.The mosque is considered an archaeological treasure but has been a battleground for months. It was first heavily damaged by fighting last October, and President Bashar al-Assad promised a restoration. But the military later retreated from the mosque and rebel fighters have occupied it since early this year.Syria's state media said the Nusra Front, an Islamic militant faction of the insurgency, had placed explosives inside the minaret, which dated from the 11th century. Anti-Assad activist groups at the site posted YouTube videos showing the rubble of the collapsed minaret strewn about the mosque's tiled courtyard, with rebel fighters saying it had been hit by outside artillery fire as part of an attempt by Mr. Assad's forces to rout them and retake the mosque."If he attacks all of the mosque, we will stay here, we will stick with our position, we won't abandon our Islam even if all the world does," one military commander says in a video.Unesco has repeatedly pleaded for all combatants to pull back from the mosque and other World Heritage sites hit by fighting in Syria's civil war. Last month, the director general of Unesco, Irina Bokova, issued a public appeal in which she said she had "called upon all those involved in the conflict to ensure the respect and protection of this heritage."Fighting was reported elsewhere in Syria on Wednesday, including a town east of Damascus that insurgents had regarded as strategically important because it was a way station for their weapons and food. Activists reached by telephone and Skype said government forces were trying to seize the town, Otaiba, after weeks of clashes, which if successful would complicate the ability of the rebels in the area to resupply themselves.Hundreds of Syrians have been reported killed over the past week in a Damascus suburb, Jdaidet al-Fadl, which anti-Assad groups have called a war atrocity and government news media have described as a campaign to purge the area of terrorists, using Mr. Assad's description for his armed opponents.The United Nations estimates that more than 70,000 Syrians have been killed and millions displaced since the conflict began as a peaceful protest against Mr. Assad's government in March 2011. It is now a civil war that has pitted his minority Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shiite Islam, against an opposition drawn largely from the Sunni majority.The fighting has threatened to destabilize Syria's neighbors, particularly Lebanon, where the powerful Shiite militant group Hezbollah, which supports Mr. Assad, has sent fighters into Syria. The Syrian town of Qusayr, near the Lebanese border, has become a focal point of sectarian tensions and potential clashes between Hezbollah militants and Syrian rebels.On Wednesday, Sheik Moaz al-Khatib, the departing president of the National Coalition for Syrian Revolutionary and Opposition Forces, the main anti-Assad political group, angrily criticized Hassan Nasrallah, the general secretary of Hezbollah, over his support for Mr. Assad and urged him to renounce the alliance."Is it satisfying to you that the Syrian regime shells its citizens with fighter planes and Scud missiles, mixing the blood and flesh of children with the bread?" Sheik Moaz asked in a speech, posted on his Facebook page. Citing a call by two Sunni scholars this week for a holy war in Syria, Sheik Moaz said it was a "response to the chilling events that are occurring, from the butchering of civilians and the gushing of blood, to the screams of the women in the prisons."
ISTANBUL — The Kurdistan Workers' Party, the main Kurdish rebel group in Turkey , said Thursday that it would withdraw all of its forces from the country by May 8 as part of a peace agreement to end a 30-year conflict with the Turkish state.Speaking at a rare news conference at the group's base in the Qandil mountains of neighboring Iraq, Murat Karayilan, the commander of the group, known as the P.K.K., called on the Turkish Army not to launch attacks during the rebels' gradual withdrawal into northern Iraq. Any such confrontation will end the P.K.K.'s cease-fire, he said.Mr. Karayilan, in a statement read in Turkish and summarized in English, outlined the process by which the P.K.K. expected the government to meet its end of the bargain, by giving the Kurds further democratic rights under a new constitution and releasing Kurdish prisoners, including the P.K.K.'s highly influential primary founder, Abdullah Ocalan. However, he refused demands by the Turkish government that rebels disarm before leaving the country, and said his militants would carry weapons strictly for self-defense. He also suggested that foreign observers monitor the withdrawal for any misconduct on either side, reported NTV, a private TV network.Many analysts agree that despite the P.K.K.'s announcement, the peace process is fragile and still at risk of disruption by opposing groups inside the P.K.K. and Turkish nationalist circles. In a recent interview, Mr. Karayilan himself was defiant, emphasizing his rebels' eagerness to fight. Three female Kurdish political activists were killed in Paris a few weeks after talks started in January, an attack many analysts said was aimed at intimidating the negotiating parties.Over the decades, a military solution had eluded the government despite the military might of Turkey, with the second-largest army in the NATO alliance, and early this year, the ruling Justice and Development Party decided to cash in on its popularity to force a political resolution."It is highly hopeful that the will of the P.K.K., the will of the government and the will of the people join for the first time for a common cause, to end a 30-year-old conflict," Numan Kurtulmus, deputy chairman of the party, said on NTV."The first step has been made, so we hope the process would be finalized without any acts of provocation," he said.Many analysts agree that the government's success in resolving the conflict will win the already popular prime minister, Recep Tayyip Erdogan, even greater acclaim, which could then allow him to replace Turkey's parliamentary system with a strong-president system of some kind.After the government made Mr. Ocalan, the sole political authority of the P.K.K., a party to the talks, he communicated with his rebels from a fortresslike prison on an island in western Turkey in March, calling off the armed struggle.His message was largely welcomed by Turkey's nearly 15 million Kurds, who were long denied their ethnic rights and had been subject to severe human rights violations. Turkey has improved Kurdish rights to some degree as part of a membership requirement for the European Union, which it is trying to join.Although the government agreed to other changes in exchange for the P.K.K.'s calling off the struggle, it is unclear whether it can deliver on its promises. For major legislative changes like a new constitution, for example, the government needs the backing of the main opposition parties, none of which fully supports the peace process.Staunchly nationalist lawmakers claim that talks will ultimately lead to the destruction of Turkey's territorial unity at a time when its Middle Eastern neighbors are engaged in sectarian and ethnic conflicts, as in Syria.Kurds are spread over Iraq, Syria, Iran and Turkey, and Kurdish nationalists have long aspired to establish a new country called Kurdistan — an aspiration that the P.K.K., which is listed as a terror group by Turkey, the European Union and the United States, said it dropped in exchange for some form of autonomy and democratic rights within Turkey."The moment that weapons stop being used as a political tool, the Kurdish issue gets freed from the stigma of terror," Muhsin Kizilkaya, a Kurdish intellectual, said in a telephone interview."From now on, democratic and legislative demands of Kurds can no longer be rejected, as they were seen as a compromise to terror, so today is the real beginning of the Kurdish conflict in a political framework."
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Fighting raged on Friday between Syrian insurgents and loyalists in the northern suburbs of Damascus, northern Idlib Province and areas near Syria 's southern and eastern borders, antigovernment activists reported, including what they described as a deadly military airstrike that may have originated in Iraq.The battles were reported as the United Nations refugee agency announced that the number of Syrian refugees in surrounding countries now exceeded 1.4 million, far more than had been projected months ago. The agency also said financing problems were forcing it to curtail some health services to the refugees.Activist groups in eastern Syria asserted that the military airstrike, which hit the eastern city of Deir al-Zour, was carried out by a warplane that had flown across the border with Iraq. Some accused Prime Minister Nuri Kamal al-Maliki of Iraq, whose Shiite-dominated government is engrossed in a worsening conflict with Sunni militants, of ordering the strike. Others said the plane was a Syrian Air Force MiG that had crossed into Iraqi airspace before turning back into Syria for its bombing sortie.There was no independent confirmation of the origin of the aircraft, and no immediate comment from Mr. Maliki's government.Mr. Maliki has warned that the fighting in Iraq could lead to a civil war like the one consuming Syria, where a Sunni-led insurgency is seeking to topple President Bashar al-Assad, whose minority Alawite sect is an offshoot of Shiite Islam.The eastern command of the Free Syrian Army, a rebel group, issued a statement blaming the Maliki government: "This attack is a flagrant violation perpetrated by Maliki forces against our people in Deir al-Zour in collaboration with Assad gangs, and we will not forgive them this brutal, barbaric assault."The Local Coordination Committees, a network in Syria of activists opposing Mr. Assad, said the airstrike had killed at least seven people and wounded dozens. "It is worth indicating," the group said in a statement, that the plane "came from Iraq and not from the Syrian lands."Activists also posted video on Friday said to show heavy clashes between government forces and rebels in the Barzeh area of northern Damascus, with gray and black smoke rising from battered high-rises. The provenance of the video could not be independently verified.Elsewhere, the Local Coordination Committees reported clashes between Free Syrian Army fighters and Syrian forces south of the southern city of Dara'a near the Jordanian-Syrian border. The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a Britain-based group with a network of contacts in Syria, reported battles in Idlib Province near a military air base.The wide geographic scope of the fighting on Friday suggested an intensified push by the government to gain momentum in the conflict, which the United Nations estimates has left more than 70,000 people dead. The fighting followed what appeared to be a strategic victory earlier in the week by military forces who recaptured an important town east of Damascus. The official SANA news agency said the town, Otaiba, had been riddled with tunnels used to transport rebel weapons and ammunition.In Geneva, the United Nations refugee agency said in a weekly briefing that more than 1.4 million Syrians had registered as refugees in Turkey, Iraq, Jordan, Lebanon and Egypt. That is 30 percent more people than the agency had projected would seek safety in neighboring countries by the end of June.In a separate report, the agency said weak donor funding and the soaring refugee population was "straining existing health services in each of the affected countries." The report said it had become increasingly hard to provide coverage. In Lebanon, the agency said it was faced with "having to reduce support for both primary and more costly referral health care" like that required for cancer treatment or dialysis.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Prime Minister Wael Nader al-Halqi of Syria escaped what appeared to be an assassination attempt on Monday in an upscale neighborhood of Damascus, where a car bomb exploded near his convoy, according to state-run media and opposition accounts. The blast was the latest in a series of attacks on high-ranking Syrians targeted by insurgents in the civil war.The bombing took place in Mezze, a central district of the Syrian capital where many senior officials live, and at least one opposition account said a bodyguard had been killed. The state media reported injuries, but said the prime minister was unhurt. Video on state television showed a car's charred skeleton and, nearby, a bus with its windows shattered.The assault fit a pattern of attempts to attack high officials and religious figures close to President Bashar al-Assad. Less than two weeks ago, another official — Ali Balan, the government's chief coordinator of emergency aid distribution to civilians — was killed by gunmen with silencer-equipped weapons at a restaurant in the same heavily guarded neighborhood, close to buildings housing government and military institutions.In March, a large bomb hit a central Damascus mosque and killed at least 42 people including Syria's top Sunni cleric, Sheik Mohammad Said Ramada al-Bouti, who was an early supporter of Mr. Assad's side in the conflict.Last July, an explosion at a security headquarters in the Syrian capital killed or wounded several key aides loyal to President Assad, who has been fighting a growing revolt that began with street protests in March 2011 and has escalated into a bloody civil war with insurgents battling for positions across the land, including the outskirts of Damascus.State television in Syria called the attack a "terrorist explosion" that was "an attempt to target the convoy of the prime minister." The Syrian authorities use the term terrorist as a generic description of all armed opponents.Mr. Halqi has been part of an effort by President Assad to wage an energized diplomatic campaign to persuade the United States that it is on the wrong side of the civil war."We are partners in fighting terrorism," Mr. Halqi said of the United States in a recent interview.At the United Nations on Monday, Secretary General Ban Ki-moon met with the leader of his newly appointed fact-finding panel on suspected chemical weapons use in Syria and reiterated his request that the Syrian government allow it to enter the country.Speaking to reporters, Mr. Ban said the panel's leader, Ake Sellstrom, and his experts "remain ready to deploy to Syria within 24 to 48 hours" of consent by the Syrian government, which requested the panel last month.The trip has been stalled over Syria's objections to giving the panel unlimited access to all suspected sites of chemical weapons use. Syria has insisted that the panel investigate only one suspected attack, outside Aleppo on March 19, in which it contends that insurgents used chemical agents.Mr. Ban also told reporters that he took "very seriously" an assessment by United States intelligence agencies, disclosed last week, that concluded with varying degrees of certainty that chemical weapons had been used in the Syrian conflict.Unverified reports by the opposition of the Syrian military's chemical weapons use have proliferated in recent weeks. Even as Mr. Ban was speaking at the United Nations, anti-Assad activist groups said military aircraft had dropped an unspecified chemical on the town of Saraqeb in northwestern Syria, with at least 10 people on the ground suffering severe respiratory problems. These accounts could not be independently corroborated.The United Nations has estimated that the conflict has killed more than 70,000 people, left 6.8 million in need, displaced 4.25 million inside the country and forced about 1.4 million to flee to neighboring countries. Aid agencies of the United Nations and nonprofit charitable groups have expressed growing alarm that vast numbers of needy inside Syria are not getting any assistance, partly because the Syrian government is restricting access to insurgent-occupied areas.Oxfam, one of the biggest aid organizations, said in a statement released Monday night that it now considered a response to the Syria crisis its No. 1 priority. "The world risks failing the people of Syria at a time when they most need our help," Mark Goldring, Oxfam's chief executive, said.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — The leader of Hezbollah , the powerful Lebanese Shiite organization, edged closer on Tuesday to acknowledging that its fighters were battling rebels in neighboring Syria , an intervention that threatens to drag Lebanon deeper into that conflict.The leader, Hassan Nasrallah, declared in a televised speech that Hezbollah could become more deeply involved in the future, and warned that Syria had "real friends" who would not allow it "to fall into the hands" of America, Israel and Islamic extremists, the forces that the Syrian government routinely blames for the two-year uprising against it.He appeared to be referring to Iran, a patron of both Hezbollah and the Syrian government, as well as Hezbollah itself, whose well-organized guerrilla fighting force, honed by past battles with the Israeli military in southern Lebanon, is widely considered more effective than Lebanon's army. Hezbollah relies on Iran and Syria to supply its arms."You won't be able to bring down Damascus and you cannot bring down the regime, militarily," Mr. Nasrallah said. "The battle will be long."As President Obama faces questions about whether the Syrian government has crossed what his administration has called the "red line" of using chemical weapons in the conflict, Mr. Nasrallah sketched some red lines of his own.He warned of "very serious repercussions" if rebels destroyed or damaged the shrine of Sayida Zeinab, a site near Damascus that is a revered pilgrimage site for many Muslims, especially Shiites. Such an attack would unleash an uncontrollable conflict, he said, invoking a fearsome precedent: the destruction of a Shiite shrine in Iraq in 2006 that contributed to years of sectarian bloodletting between Shiites and Sunni Muslims there.Fighting has engulfed areas around the Syrian shrine, and many Shiite fighters — Syrian as well as Iraqi and Lebanese — have rushed to defend it, according to fighters interviewed in Syria.Until now, Mr. Nasrallah has maintained that individual members of Hezbollah were fighting to defend Lebanese citizens in Shiite villages inside Syria, notably around Qusayr, which has become a flash point of sectarian conflict not far from the Lebanon border. But on Tuesday, Mr. Nasrallah made clear that Hezbollah, Lebanon's most powerful political and military organization, is ready to back its longtime ally, President Bashar al-Assad of Syria, with its full organizational might."We won't let the Lebanese in Qusayr be exposed to attacks," he said. "Whoever needs help, we wont hesitate in assisting them," he said, adding that he was referring not only to Shiites but to all Lebanese who needed help. The Lebanese Army, he noted, was not in a position to send fighters to Syria.Mr. Nasrallah denied the widespread opposition claim that Iran had sent troops to Syria. "There might be a small number of experts who have been in Syria for decades," he said, "but you are fighting Syrian forces."Syrian opposition leaders have long charged that Hezbollah was sending an increasing number of fighters to Syria, and in recent weeks have said the party is leading the fight against rebels in bloody battles around Qusayr.Sunni factions in Lebanon — which still bears the scars of its own sectarian civil war — have also sent fighters to Syria, on the rebel side. Sectarian rhetoric in Lebanon has ratcheted up in recent weeks, with some imams sympathetic to Syria's opposition issuing fatwas, or religious decrees, calling on Sunnis to fight in Syria.As Lebanese factions take sides, they pose new challenges to the country's stability. Lebanese leaders are struggling to form a new government, deeply divided by the Syrian conflict, despite the country's official policy of "disassociation" from it.Until now, Hezbollah has kept its public statements on Syria relatively subdued, partly to avoid further inflaming Lebanese politics. But after the Hezbollah-led government was dissolved last month, Mr. Nasrallah appears to have calculated that an all-out push to save Hezbollah's ally, Mr. Assad, and the arms conduit he provides is worth the domestic political costs.Critics attacked Mr. Nasrallah's speech in Lebanese news outlets and social media, saying it was contradictory to blame the United States and its allies for intervening in Syria — where a government crackdown on peaceful protests prompted a conflict that has killed more than 70,000 people — while claiming a moral imperative for Hezbollah to intervene.Mr. Nasrallah cast himself as the voice of reason. He castigated clerics who had issued fatwas calling for the death of Syrian government employees — "never mind if they turn out to be oppressed people themselves."No loyalist cleric has issued a fatwa saying "it is O.K. to spill the blood of everyone who works for the opposition," Mr. Nasrallah said. "Find me one cleric who issued such a fatwa."
REYHANLI, Turkey — Turkish officials said Sunday that they had arrested nine people accused of carrying out twin bombings in this town near the Syrian border the day before, as the investigation moved at a clip that underscored the intense pressure on the government to contain the fallout from the attacks.Officials said the detainees were all Turkish citizens and asserted that the group had been backed by the intelligence services of President Bashar al-Assad of Syria.Anxieties were high in Turkey's ethnically and religiously mixed southern border region, where some saw the bombings — which killed 46 and injured more than 100 — as a menacing consequence of the government's strong support for Syria's rebels. Officials' repeated calls for calm reflected fears not only of the conflict's spreading across the border, but also of the contagion of its sectarian fighting, with massacres and forced relocations compounding the horrors of the war.Turkey, like Syria's other neighbors, is increasingly worried that the conflict will inflame border areas, where tensions among various groups are deepening amid the flood of traumatized Syrian refugees.The reaction to the bombings in Reyhanli was a reminder of how quickly fissures could open. In a predominantly Sunni town that was seen as sympathetic to Syria's Sunni-led opposition and the plight of those who have been displaced, some residents lashed out at Syrian refugees, tens of thousands of whom have settled in the town over the past two years.Some youths attacked cars with Syrian license plates, and Syrians spent a second day hidden indoors in fear. Yet it was not difficult to find Turks who said the government's Syria policy had caused the violence.Turkey's prime minister, Recep Tayyip Erdogan, said the country needed to be "extremely calm in the face of provocations that are aimed at dragging us into the bloody quagmire in Syria."He added, "Today, we have to be one."Analysts said such appeals amounted to recognition of Turkey's heightened risk of communal strife. "There is always a danger of events unfolding into something bigger," said Ilter Turan, a professor of political science at Istanbul Bilgi University. "Both in terms of avoiding any possible reactions against Syrian refugees, and to prevent any negative interaction between ethnically and religiously diverse groups, the government used all possible tools to calm people."The calls for unity may have had another purpose: to quiet domestic arguments over the government's peace talks with the P.K.K., the Kurdish separatist group, according to Guven Sak, the director of the Economic Policy Research Foundation of Turkey. The P.K.K.'s armed conflict claimed tens of thousands of lives over three decades.The peace talks may also have played a role in the government's quick blame of Mr. Assad's government for the bombings."Naming the Syrian regime as the usual suspect might have been aimed at clearing the names of the separatist Kurds, when peace talks remain fragile," Professor Turan said.The Syrian government on Sunday denied any involvement in the bombings, and said Turkey's government bore responsibility. "Syria didn't and will never undertake such acts because our values don't allow us to do this," Omran al-Zoubi, the information minister, was quoted as saying in Damascus.Turkish officials said the bombers were members of a Marxist, pro-Assad organization with links they did not specify to Syrian intelligence. Ahmet Davutoglu, Turkey's foreign minister, suggested that the group's "footprints" were on a recent massacre in the Syrian town of Baniyas, though he provided no details.Muammer Guler, the interior minister, said Turkey's assertions were backed by "concrete facts," including the suspects' own incriminating statements. If the Syrians wanted more evidence, "we will pass on our findings with related documents, together with code names," he said, apparently referring to some detail of the investigation.It remained to be seen whether the government's reaction would be enough to console the people of Reyhanli. On Sunday, officials said they had identified 39 of the victims — 36 Turkish citizens and 3 Syrians.Ibrahim al-Ibrahim, a Syrian refugee, sat in his apartment a few blocks from the scene of the attacks. After the bombings, youths threw rocks at his windows. On Sunday, three young Turkish men smashed the hood and windows of a white van that belonged to a Syrian neighbor.Mr. Ibrahim said the bombings had occurred as he received word that his house in Syria had been destroyed. "I have no house there, and no house here," he said.Under pine trees at a cemetery at the edge of town, mourners gathered to bury Erkan Calim, a 41-year-old farmer and father who had been rushing to help victims of the first blast when he was killed by the second. Some of the mourners lashed out at Mr. Erdogan, holding him responsible for the bombings.But a close friend of Mr. Calim, who declined to give his name, said it was pointless to assign blame after violence that had touched Syrians and Turks alike. "The dead are dead," he said. "No accusation would bring them back."
REYHANLI, Turkey — Turkish officials said Sunday that they had arrested nine people accused of carrying out twin bombings in this town near the Syrian border the day before, as the investigation moved at a clip that underscored the intense pressure on the government to contain the fallout from the attacks.Officials said the detainees were all Turkish citizens and asserted that the group had been backed by the intelligence services of President Bashar al-Assad of Syria.Anxieties were high in Turkey's ethnically and religiously mixed southern border region, where some saw the bombings — which killed 46 and injured more than 100 — as a menacing consequence of the government's strong support for Syria's rebels. Officials' repeated calls for calm reflected fears not only of the conflict's spreading across the border, but also of the contagion of its sectarian fighting, with massacres and forced relocations compounding the horrors of the war.Turkey, like Syria's other neighbors, is increasingly worried that the conflict will inflame border areas, where tensions among various groups are deepening amid the flood of traumatized Syrian refugees.The reaction to the bombings in Reyhanli was a reminder of how quickly fissures could open. In a predominantly Sunni town that was seen as sympathetic to Syria's Sunni-led opposition and the plight of those who have been displaced, some residents lashed out at Syrian refugees, tens of thousands of whom have settled in the town over the past two years.Some youths attacked cars with Syrian license plates, and Syrians spent a second day hidden indoors in fear. Yet it was not difficult to find Turks who said the government's Syria policy had caused the violence.Turkey's prime minister, Recep Tayyip Erdogan, said the country needed to be "extremely calm in the face of provocations that are aimed at dragging us into the bloody quagmire in Syria."He added, "Today, we have to be one."Analysts said such appeals amounted to recognition of Turkey's heightened risk of communal strife. "There is always a danger of events unfolding into something bigger," said Ilter Turan, a professor of political science at Istanbul Bilgi University. "Both in terms of avoiding any possible reactions against Syrian refugees, and to prevent any negative interaction between ethnically and religiously diverse groups, the government used all possible tools to calm people."The calls for unity may have had another purpose: to quiet domestic arguments over the government's peace talks with the P.K.K., the Kurdish separatist group, according to Guven Sak, the director of the Economic Policy Research Foundation of Turkey. The P.K.K.'s armed conflict claimed tens of thousands of lives over three decades.The peace talks may also have played a role in the government's quick blame of Mr. Assad's government for the bombings."Naming the Syrian regime as the usual suspect might have been aimed at clearing the names of the separatist Kurds, when peace talks remain fragile," Professor Turan said.The Syrian government on Sunday denied any involvement in the bombings, and said Turkey's government bore responsibility. "Syria didn't and will never undertake such acts because our values don't allow us to do this," Omran al-Zoubi, the information minister, was quoted as saying in Damascus.Turkish officials said the bombers were members of a Marxist, pro-Assad organization with links they did not specify to Syrian intelligence. Ahmet Davutoglu, Turkey's foreign minister, suggested that the group's "footprints" were on a recent massacre in the Syrian town of Baniyas, though he provided no details.Muammer Guler, the interior minister, said Turkey's assertions were backed by "concrete facts," including the suspects' own incriminating statements. If the Syrians wanted more evidence, "we will pass on our findings with related documents, together with code names," he said, apparently referring to some detail of the investigation.It remained to be seen whether the government's reaction would be enough to console the people of Reyhanli. On Sunday, officials said they had identified 39 of the victims — 36 Turkish citizens and 3 Syrians.Ibrahim al-Ibrahim, a Syrian refugee, sat in his apartment a few blocks from the scene of the attacks. After the bombings, youths threw rocks at his windows. On Sunday, three young Turkish men smashed the hood and windows of a white van that belonged to a Syrian neighbor.Mr. Ibrahim said the bombings had occurred as he received word that his house in Syria had been destroyed. "I have no house there, and no house here," he said.Under pine trees at a cemetery at the edge of town, mourners gathered to bury Erkan Calim, a 41-year-old farmer and father who had been rushing to help victims of the first blast when he was killed by the second. Some of the mourners lashed out at Mr. Erdogan, holding him responsible for the bombings.But a close friend of Mr. Calim, who declined to give his name, said it was pointless to assign blame after violence that had touched Syrians and Turks alike. "The dead are dead," he said. "No accusation would bring them back."
BEIRUT (Reuters) - Syria's Internet started working again on Wednesday evening, a U.S. web tracking firm said, and residents reported phone lines were back up after an eight-hour blackout left much of the population cut off from the outside world.Communication networks have been crucial for opposition activists trying to get out videos and information about a two-year conflict that has killed at least 80,000 people, according to a rights group opposed to President Bashar al-Assad."Internet came back at 15:26 UTC (18:26 Damascus time). Duration 8h25m," Renesys said on its Twitter account.This is the sixth communications blackout of the revolt and web tracking firms say the government is probably responsible. Authorities blamed a blackout last week on a malfunctioning fiber optic cable.
REYHANLI, Turkey — Turkey's President Abdullah Gul criticized the world's response to the Syria conflict on Thursday as limited to "rhetoric", saying his country had received little help in coping with a huge influx of Syrian refugees.Speaking in the border town of Reyhanli where car bombs killed more than 50 people at the weekend, Gul also called for calm after the incident, which has sparked anti-government protests and a backlash against Syrian refugees in the town.Four suspects were formally arrested and remanded in custody late on Wednesday over the bombings, state-run Anatolian news agency said. It was not clear what charges they faced.They were among nine Turks, including the alleged mastermind of the attacks, detained soon after the bombings.Foreign Minister Ahmet Davutoglu has said the perpetrators were from an "old Marxist terrorist organization" with ties to Assad's government. Damascus has denied any involvement.Interior Minister Muammer Guler has said the bombings - the deadliest on Turkish soil since Syria's war began - were carried out by a group with direct links to Syrian intelligence.Apart from hosting about 400,000 Syrians, Turkey strongly backs the uprising against Syrian President Bashar al-Assad, and the Reyhanli bombings have sharpened tensions along the frontier as the civil war in its southern neighbor spills over."The international community's contribution to Turkey's financial aid to these people who are in a difficult situation is only symbolic," Gul told reporters in Reyhanli."From the very start the international community has only used rhetoric and heroism in their approach to the Syrian problem," he said.Turkey is struggling to manage the flow of Syrians across its border, with only around half of those who have fled living in refugee camps. Tens of thousands of others have settled in towns and cities along the 900 km (560 mile) border.The United Nations says the number of Syrian refugees in Turkey could climb to one million by the end of the year.Ankara, reluctant to act unilaterally in Syria, has grown increasingly troubled by what it calls international inaction on the crisis, which has long divided the big powers.Turkish Prime Minister Tayyip Erdogan, who has often voiced such frustrations, was meeting U.S. President Barack Obama in Washington on Thursday, with Syria expected to top the agenda.The twin bombings in Reyhanli, among the bloodiest in Turkey's modern history, stoked unease among Turks along the border most affected by the turmoil in Syria.Several protests have erupted in Reyhanli and other nearby towns since the bombings, with many locals blaming security problems on Ankara's policy of supporting the Syrian opposition.Others have taken out their frustration on the Syrians themselves. Thousands of Syrians have settled in Reyhanli because of its proximity to the border and because most of its people are Sunnis, like almost all the refugees.A Syrian doctor in Reyhanli who treats wounded Syrians at a rehabilitation center said one of his nurses had been attacked on the street hours after the blasts. Others said their cars had been attacked and one said locals had seized him and handed him over to the police.While the incidents appear to be isolated and sporadic, the general sense of anger directed at the Syrians has made most of the refugees too afraid to venture out of their homes.Gul said any sudden population influx could allow those with "bad intentions" to surface, but urged people in the area to be "level-headed" and said the bomb perpetrators would be punished.
BEIRUT — A video published on Thursday showed fighters of the al Qaeda-linked Nusra Front in Syria executing 11 men they accused of taking part in massacres by President Bashar al-Assad's forces.The film is believed to be from eastern Deir al-Zor province and dates from some time in 2012, according to the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an opposition monitoring group.The Observatory's head, Rami Abdelrahman, said the Nusra Front has recently been releasing several videos of their past operations. He said the man seen executing the prisoners in the video - a Nusra commander - had been killed in March 2013 in battles with local tribes in the province.The footage shows the commander, his face covered in a black balaclava, shooting each prisoner in the back of the head as they kneeled, blindfolded and lined up in a row in the sand."The sharia court for the eastern region in Deir al-Zor has sentenced to death these apostate soldiers that committed massacres against our brothers and families in Syria," the executioner said on the video.Islamist militants with black flags shouted "God is great" as each man was shot. The executioner returned to some victims, firing more bullets into them to make sure they were dead.Videos of executions and torture have become increasingly common in Syria, where more than 94,000 people have been killed in a conflict now in its third year, according to the British-based Observatory, which has a network of activists in Syria.Such videos posted online are hard to verify due to government restrictions on access for independent media.The Nusra video is the second video to be published in the past two days showing executions by fighters who say they are from al Qaeda-linked groups.A video issued on Wednesday from the northern province of Raqqa, which is controlled by Islamist rebels, showed three blindfolded men sitting on the curb of a central roundabout before being shot in the head with a pistol.A man speaking in the video said the executions were revenge for killings in the coastal town of Banias two weeks ago. Photos and videos of the alleged Banias massacre showed dozens of mutilated bodies, many of them children, lying in the streets.
BEIRUT — The Syrian rebel commander who rose to international notoriety for footage of him cutting out and eating the organ of a slain soldier said he was willing to face trial for his actions if President Bashar al-Assad was also sent to court.A video released on Friday showed the commander in Syria's central Homs province, known as Abu Sakkar, praying in a field and taking questions from a cameraman."I am ready to be held accountable for my actions, on condition that Bashar and his shabbiha (militias) are tried for crimes they committed against our women and children," he said."I send this message to the world: if the bloodshed in Syria does not stop, every Syrian will become Abu Sakkar."A video of Abu Sakkar, a founder of the well known Farouq Battalion in Homs, went viral earlier this week. It showed him cutting into the torso of a dead soldier and taking a bite out of one of his organs.The video caused outrage among both supporters of Assad and opposition figures. But many in the opposition have since expressed anger that the video has sparked a greater outcry than similarly horrific videos of rebels and activists being tortured to death.Asked by the unseen interviewer why he mutilated the soldier's body, Abu Sakkar said the man's phone contained video clips of him raping women, burning bodies and cutting off the limbs of captives.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a pro-opposition group which has documented and published dozens of execution and torture tapes from both sides, said it was frustrated by what it said was a disproportionate response."The Observatory condemns such acts no matter the perpetrator and has regularly released videos like Abu Sakkar's or executions by the (al Qaeda linked) Nusra Front," Rami Abdelrahman, the group's head, said by telephone."But we have also sent dozens of videos of summary killings, of men being tortured to death, of children's bodies burned or shot in the head. The international community seems to ignore the inhumane treatment of Syrian opposition (activists) and children but cries injustice over the abuse of the corpse of an Assad soldier."The uprising against four decades of Assad family rule began as peaceful protests but turned into a bloody insurgency after a fierce crackdown by state forces and pro-Assad militias.Videos of torture and execution have become increasingly common tools of psychological warfare and intimidation on both sides of a conflict that has killed more than 94,000 people, according to the Observatory.The United Nations says at least 80,000 have died.The violence has become increasingly sectarian. Majority Sunni Muslims have led the revolt while minorities, particularly Assad's Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam, have largely backed the president.Human Rights Watch monitors said that in the unedited version of Abu Sakkar's mutilation film, the commander tells his men to "slaughter the Alawites and take their hearts out to eat them", before biting into the soldier's heart.Abu Sakkar has been seen in previous videos firing rockets at Lebanese Shi'ite villages on the border and posing with the body of a soldier purportedly from the Lebanese Shi'ite militant Hezbollah group, which is helping Assad's forces.Reuters could not independently verify the videos or rebel reports, as access to the country for independent media is restricted by the government and security constraints.
CAIRO — An international human rights group said Friday that visits to two Syrian security centers recently captured by rebel fighters contained proof of widespread, arbitrary detentions and torture by the government of President Bashar al-Assad.The group, Human Rights Watch, said the centers provided a rare glimpse into the extensive security and intelligence apparatus that the Assad government has mobilized to try to quash the uprising against his rule.Among its findings were the use of solitary confinement cells and a cross-shaped device known as the "the flying carpet" to which detainees were tied so they could be beaten and bent into painful, sometimes harmful positions. The group also found lists of university graduates.Rights groups have long accused the Syrian government's many security and intelligence agencies of intimidating and silencing foes by detaining them without charge in centers where torture is routine. Many detainees disappear.Those accusations have accelerated since the anti-Assad uprising began in March 2011 and later escalated into a civil war.Rights groups now estimate that at least 25,000 Syrians are in detention, and some say the true number is likely much higher.The Syrian government has denied using torture, and does not comment on the number of detainees it holds.In late April, Human Rights Watch investigators visited the local branches of State Security and Military Intelligence in the northern city of Raqqa, which antigovernment forces seized in March and still control.A researcher, Lama Fakih, who was on the trip, said that besides proof that detainees were ill treated, the team found large quantities of documents, including a list of security staff members and innumerable case files for local residents."You could see in each case file the picture of the person who was being investigated, how old he was, where he lived and other things like the types of activities he was engaged in," she said.The team also interviewed several men who had been held in the centers. Most said they had been detained for marching in antigovernment protests, and some said they had been beaten and electrocuted. One said he had confessed to demonstrating after his captors threatened to detain his mother.The research team visited two of the five security agencies with centers in Raqqa, Ms. Fakih said, adding that there is a network of such centers throughout Syria."What we've seen in these branches pales in comparison to the types of torture we've heard about in other branches," she said. "This is just the tip of the iceberg."Human Rights Watch considers the information in these centers essential to understanding how the Syrian government's security groups function, as well as potentially valuable in future prosecutions against government officers who participated in abuse. It has called on rebel leaders to protect the sites until their contents can be studied.Many local residents, however, seemed uninterested in preserving the centers, Ms. Fakih said."There is a real, palpable sense of fear and hatred for these facilities and what they stood for," she said.
BEIRUT — Islamist rebels in the northern Syrian town of Saraqeb have publicly flogged two men for violating an Islamic ban on marriage to recently divorced women, according to an internet video uploaded this week.The video showed a gunman reading out the verdict of an Islamic court which found the elder of the two men guilty of marrying off his daughter to the younger man less than three months after her divorce.He said the normal punishment for the two men would have been death, but due to the turmoil of Syria's two-year civil war the court had handed down sentences of 50 lashes for the older man and 40 for the younger.The two men then lay on the ground as a masked man whipped them one after the other.Syria's uprising against President Bashar al-Assad started as peaceful protests for reform but his opponents resorted to arms after he sought to crush the protests by force.The mainly Sunni Muslim rebellion against the Alawite president has taken an increasingly Islamist tone, with rebels setting up Islamic courts dispensing Sharia justice in areas under their control - alarming many of Syria's minorities including Christians, Druzes and Alawites.
JERUSALEM — Israeli troops shot at a target across the Syrian frontier on Tuesday in response to gunfire that struck its forces in the Golan Heights, the Israeli military said.A statement said a military vehicle was damaged by shots fired from Syria but that there were no injuries. It said that soldiers "returned precise fire".Gunfire incidents across the frontier from Syria have recurred in past months during an escalating a civil war there in which rebels have sought to topple President Bashar al-Assad. Israel's Army Radio said Tuesday's was the third consecutive cross-border shooting this week.The Israeli military added in its statement that it viewed these incidents "with concern".Israel captured the Golan territory from Syria in a 1967 war and later annexed the area. Negotiations aimed at resolving that conflict ran aground in 2000.Israel has not taken sides in Syria's internal conflict, but has been worried about the involvement of its Iranian-backed foe, Hezbollah, in the fighting.Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu held out the prospect on Sunday of Israeli strikes inside Syria to stop Hezbollah and other opponents of Israel getting advanced weapons.Netanyahu said Israel was "preparing for every scenario" in Syria. He added "we will act to ensure the security interest of Israel's citizens in the future as well".Israel has neither denied nor confirmed reports it attacked Iranian-supplied missiles stored near Damascus this month that it believed were waiting delivery to Hezbollah, which fought a war with Israel in 2006 and is allied with Assad.
HERMEL, Lebanon — On a country road in Lebanon's northeast, traffic is heavy; ambulances screech by, sirens blaring, and cars packed with mourners follow coffins as Hezbollah brings wounded fighters home from Syria, and its dead.With the bodies from the battle over the border at Qusair, comes the violence, as civil conflict between Syria's Iranian-backed ruler and Sunni rebels spreads across the Middle East; the Shi'ite militia's drive to save Syria's president is testing Lebanon's own fragile, sectarian peace and raises the stakes in a broader struggle for power in the region and the wider world.Having long denied its engagement in Syria behind President Bashar al-Assad, Hezbollah has committed itself this week to the fight for the strategic small town of Qusair, sending hundreds of men and losing dozens wounded and between 20 and 50 killed.Their coffins, escorted by stern-faced Hezbollah gunmen and corteges flying the movement's yellow banner, stream back to Shi'ite villages in the northeastern Bekaa Valley, ending any discretion about its backing for Assad and his Alawite minority.For all that staff at hospitals taking in the wounded around the town of Hermel keep doors closed to journalists and insist "There's nothing to see", the war has widened its scope.And with Sunnis and Alawites in the nearby Lebanese port of Tripoli also engaged in the fiercest communal fighting yet, the spread of violence beyond Syria is accelerating.Already sectarian killing has surged in Iraq, bombs have hit Turkey and Israeli air strikes in Syria targeted Iranian arms for Hezbollah while world powers remain divided among themselves as they try to push Syria's rivals into holding peace talks.For Rami Khouri at the American University of Beirut, Hezbollah's Syrian venture risks rebounding into Lebanon and could even - in a very worst case - fuel a regional war:"It would vastly increase the likelihood of massive internal Lebanese strife between pro- and anti-Hezbollah groups, broadly pitting Sunnis and Shi'ites against each other, while also inviting another major war with Israel, or possibly participation in an American-Israeli/Iranian-Syrian war."Hezbollah, armed by Iran since Lebanon's civil war in the 1980s, outguns Beirut's weak central government as well as other factions, including Sunnis, Christians, Druze and Palestinians.But in nailing its colors to Assad's bid to crush a Sunni uprising, the Shi'ite movement has alienated fellow Arabs in the region who once respected it, at least for fighting Israel. It may also irk Lebanese Shi'ites, who have counted on Hezbollah's protection locally but are not necessarily enthusiastic about dying for Iran in its rivalry with Arab powers and the West.Rafik Nasrallah, a political analyst in Beirut who is close to Hezbollah, said the movement had been obliged to intervene in Syria to protect Lebanese interests and it had taken into account the prospect of a violent reaction from rival groups:"There is no Lebanese state, there are groups in the security apparatus here that serve different regional powers or countries," Nasrallah said. "Hezbollah's job is to protect Lebanon and its borders, it is doing what it has to do."This is a decisive battle," he said of Qusair, near Homs, which rebels have held to secure supply routes from Lebanon and to disrupt movement between Damascus and Syria's Alawite region."Hezbollah believes that this battle is of great strategic importance, and they will bear the consequences," he added, as reports from Syria indicated Hezbollah fighters and Assad's troops had made some gains after days of fighting in the town.On the frontlines, the intervention appears to have hardened sectarian attitudes among rebels fearful of losing a key position: "The fall of .... Qusair will completely change the struggle in Homs province from a revolution into a major assault on Alawites and Shi'ites wherever they are," said a fighter who uses the name Abu Bilal, speaking to Reuters from Homs."Rebel battalions here all agree on this. And every side of this conflict knows this is what is at stake in Homs."Hezbollah's forces are tiny beside the tens of thousands of troops, with tanks and jet aircraft, that Assad can call on even after Sunni desertions from his army. But it does have thousands of guerrillas, many of whom saw action against Israel in 2006.Hezbollah's alliance with Assad has not been an easy one for it on the regional stage, but its leaders remain unapologetic, arguing it is crucial to their "axis of resistance" - the term it uses for its anti-Israel alliance with Tehran and Damascus.The "Party of God", once admired across the Arab world as a bulwark against Israel, is now derided as "Hezb al-Shaytan" - Party of the Devil - and a sectarian catspaw of non-Arab Iran.Former Lebanese prime minister Saad Hariri, a Sunni with powerful allies in Saudi Arabia, said this week: "Hezbollah has chosen to copy Israeli crimes against Lebanon and its people and apply them to the inhabitants of the Syrian city of Qusair."It has become the spearhead of a crime carried out by the regime against its people, which can also be described as the Iranian defense army of Bashar al-Assad's regime."Hezbollah, in turn, has sought to shore up its pan-Arab credentials by accusing its rebel enemies at Qusair of being sponsored by Israel and Western powers - thus justifying its intervention as part of its "resistance" to the Jewish state."Israel is in Qusair ... The attack on Syria is all part of an Israeli, foreign-led attack on Syria," said Amin Hateit, a Lebanese commentator close to Hezbollah. "This is a party of ideology, not nationalities. So wherever there are enemies to those beliefs, its fighters will go. They go voluntarily."It is unclear, however, quite how willingly Lebanese Shi'ites will go on fighting and dying in Syria like Radwan and Ali Qassem al-Attar, brothers who fell at Qusair a few days ago and in whose memory yellow Hezbollah banners now fly at a spot near their home, off a dusty side road in the Bekaa Valley.Syria's war is intruding on pastoral tranquility. Men in camouflage secure checkpoints; the peace of cows grazing nearby is shattered by occasional rocket fire. Locals point to a white-tented Hezbollah position just over the border, on Syrian land.But a security source close to Hezbollah believes it cannot count on unlimited backing from its local supporters. Leaders had calculated, he said, that the movement could afford to lose several dozen men at Qusair, due to its strategic importance.But if the battle drags on, recruitment might suffer. Party media were playing down the losses, he said. But he added: "The party can't help that, whatever they do, if a man in one of these villages dies, every villager will go to that funeral."Soon they could start asking 'Why should we fight and die for Syrians?'"
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syria's fighting has uprooted more than half of the country's 530,000 Palestinians — descendants of refugees from a Mideast conflict half a century ago — and their situation is becoming increasingly desperate, the head of a U.N. aid agency said Thursday.The Palestinians in Syria are particularly vulnerable because of their refugee status, Filippo Grandi, head of the U.N. Relief and Works Agency, told The Associated Press in an interview.He said most of the 12 Palestinian camps have been affected by the fighting."Armed groups and the government are confronting each other near the camps, inside the camps, and most or a large portion of the Palestinian population has had to leave those camps," he said after a two-day visit to Syria.He estimated that 70 percent to 80 percent of the Palestinians have been affected by Syria's civil war. "Many of them, maybe more than half ... are displaced from their homes," he said.He said about 54,000 have fled to Lebanon and several thousand to Jordan and Egypt, while others have sought shelter elsewhere in Syria. "These are refugees that became refugees a second time," he said. "It's really a very tragic situation."Grandi's agency provides support for some 5 million Palestinians in Jordan, Syria, Lebanon, the West Bank and Gaza. They are descendants of hundreds of thousands of Palestinians who fled or were driven out of their homes during the fighting over Israel's 1948 creation.When the Syria conflict erupted in March 2011, most Palestinians initially remained on the sidelines, though some joined protests against Syrian President Bashar Assad.As a popular uprising escalated into an armed insurgency and then a civil war, some Palestinians joined the fight — some siding with the rebels and others with the regime.The Yarmouk refugee camp, a sprawling neighborhood of 150,000 Palestinians on the outskirts of the capital Damascus, has been the scene of heavy clashes in recent months. Palestinian officials have said more than 700 camp residents have been killed in fighting, and that many of the others have left."The Yarmouk area is controlled by a variety of groups," Grandi said Thursday. "There are continued tensions and clashes with government forces, so it's a difficult situation for people to come back to."He said he visited another Damascus area camp on Thursday and encountered many displaced Yarmouk residents there. "They are really in a very desperate situation because they even have no news about their houses, which may be destroyed, and their relatives (who) remained inside," he said.Grandi appealed to the Syrian government and rebel fighters to allow the U.N. to deliver aid to the Palestinian camps. "We cannot do that and many people are at risk of their lives if we cannot resume the delivery of assistance," he said.Zakariya al-Agha, in charge of refugee affairs in the Palestine Liberation Organization, said a Palestinian delegation will visit Damascus next week to speak to the government and anti-regime fighters in Yarmouk."Our message to all is that we want to spare the Palestinians the effects of the war," he said from the West Bank. "We are not part of it and our people should be protected from the conflict."He said the PLO sends $1 million a month in aid to Palestinians in Syria, but cannot give more because of its own cash crisis.Overall, the Syria fighting has displaced several million people, including hundreds of thousands who fled to neighboring countries. More than 70,000 people have been killed, according to U.N. estimates.
ISTANBUL - Syrian opposition talks aimed at presenting a coherent front at an international peace conference to end the civil war faced the prospect of collapse after President Bashar al-Assad's foes failed to cut an internal deal, opposition sources said on Friday.The failure of the Syrian National Coalition to alter its Islamist-dominated membership as demanded by its international backers and replace a leadership undermined by power struggles is playing into the hands of Assad, whose forces are attacking a key town as his ally Russia said he would send representatives to the conference, coalition insiders said.After two days of meetings in Istanbul, senior coalition players were in discussions late into the night after veteran liberal opposition figure Michel Kilo rejected a deal by Syrian businessman Mustafa al-Sabbagh, who is the coalition's secretary-general, to admit some members of Kilo's bloc to the coalition, the sources said.Kilo has said that his group wants significant representation in the opposition coalition before it will join."There is a last-minute attempt to revive a kitchen-room deal. The coalition risks undermining itself to the point that its backers may have to look quickly for an alternative with enough credibility on the ground to go to Geneva," a senior opposition source at the talks said.While the opposition remained wracked by differences, a major assault by Assad's forces and their Lebanese Hezbollah allies on a Sunni town held by rebels near the border with Lebanon over the past week was shaping into a pivotal battle.The intervention of Shi'ite Hezbollah is justifying fears that a war that has killed 80,000 people would cross borders at the heart of the Middle East."It is ironic that Lebanon's civil strife is playing itself out in Syria. The opposition remains without coherence and the regime is intent on taking back anything it promises with violence," said one diplomat.The diplomat was referring to a deepening sectarian divide between Shi'ites and Sunni Muslims in Lebanon, where Syrian troops were present for 29 years, including for most of the civil war that ended in 1990.Assad belongs to Syria's minority Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ism that has controlled Syria since the 1960s.He has vowed to defeat what he calls terrorists and foreign agents behind the uprising, which began with months of peaceful protests and evolved into an armed revolt after months of military repression.Washington and Moscow have been compelled to revive diplomacy by developments in recent months, which include the rise of al Qaeda-linked fighters among rebels and reports of atrocities and accusations that chemical weapons are being used.The United States, which suspects Assad's forces of using the banned weapons, is also concerned they could eventually fall into the hands of jihadists now fighting Assad.U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry and Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov will meet privately in Paris on Monday to discuss their efforts to bring Syria's warring parties together, U.S. and Russian officials said.Russia said the Syrian government had agreed in principle to attend the planned peace conference, which could take part in Geneva in the coming weeks.Senior opposition figures said the coalition was likely to attend the conference, but doubted it would produce any immediate deal for Assad to leave power - their central demand."We are faced with a situation where everyone thinks there will be a marriage when the bride is refusing. The regime has to show a minimum of will that it is ready to stop the bloodshed," said Haitham al-Maleh, an elder statesman of the coalition.There was more heavy fighting on Friday in Qusair, a town controlling access to the coast that Assad's forces and Hezbollah allies have tried to take in a battle that could prove an important test of Assad's ability to withstand the revolt.Assad wants to secure the coastal region, which is the homeland of his Alawite minority sect. He is backed by Shi'ite Iran and Hezbollah against mainly Sunni rebels supported by Saudi Arabia and Qatar.Much to the frustration of its backers, the coalition has struggled to agree on a leader since the resignation in March of respected cleric Moaz Alkhatib, who had floated two initiatives for Assad to leave power peacefully.Alkhatib's latest proposal - a 16-point plan that sees Assad handing power to his deputy or prime minister and then going abroad with 500 members of his entourage - won little support in Istanbul, highlighting the obstacles to wider negotiations."He has the right to submit papers to the meeting like any other member, but his paper is heading directly to the dustbin of history. It is a repeat of his previous initiative, which went nowhere," a senior coalition official said.Washington threatened on Wednesday to increase support for the rebels if Assad refused to discuss a political end to the violence, a sentiment echoed on Friday by British Foreign Secretary William Hague, who has been pressing the European Union to amend a weapons embargo to allow arming the rebels.Concerned by the rising influence of Islamists in the rebel ranks, Washington has pressured the opposition coalition to resolve its divisions and to expand to include more liberals."The international community is walking a little faster than the opposition. It wants to see a complete list of participants from the Syrian side for Geneva and this means that the coalition has to sort its affairs," a European diplomat said.
BEIRUT — Syrian government forces and the Lebanese guerrilla group Hezbollah launched a fierce campaign to seize more rebel territory in the border town of Qusair on Saturday, sources on both sides of the conflict said.Rebels fighting to topple President Bashar al-Assad said additional tanks and artillery had been deployed around opposition-held territory in Qusair, a Syrian town close to the Lebanese border."I've never seen a day like this since the battle started," said Malek Ammar, an activist speaking from the town by Skype. "The shelling is so violent and heavy. It's like they're trying to destroy the city house by house."At least 30 people were killed in opposition-held areas on Saturday, most of them rebels, and dozens were injured, according to the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights.Rebels are largely surrounded in Qusair, a town of 30,000 that has become a strategic battleground. Assad's forces want to take the area to secure a route between the capital Damascus and his stronghold on the Mediterranean coast, effectively dividing rebel-held territories in the north and south.The opposition has been fighting back, seeing it as critical to maintain cross-border supply routes and stop Assad from gaining a victory they fear would give him the upper hand in proposed U.S.-Russia led peace talks next month.Assad's forces are believed to have seized about two-thirds of Qusair, but the price has been high and rebels insist they are preventing any further advances."We are in the second phase of our plan of attack but the advance has been quite slow and difficult," an official close to Hezbollah told Reuters."The rebels have mined everything, the streets, the houses. Even the refrigerators are mined."Hezbollah's Manar TV said the Syrian army had recaptured the Dabaa airport near the town, which rebels had seized several weeks ago.There is an increasingly sectarian tone of Syria's political struggle, which is not only overshadowing the revolt but threatening to destabilize the region. Israel has launched two air strikes in Syria, and Lebanon has seen a rise in Syria-linked violence.Syria's Sunni Muslim majority has led the struggle to topple Assad, which has been joined by Islamist fighters across the region, some of them linked to the militant group al Qaeda.Assad comes from the minority Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam, and has relied on an army led mostly by Alawite forces. He has been bankrolled by Shi'ite power Iran and now increasingly by Iran's Lebanese proxy, Shi'ite Hezbollah.The British-based Observatory, which has a network of activists across Syria, said Assad forces led by Hezbollah were trying to advance from three directions in Qusair."Every area they didn't have a foothold in, they are trying to gain one now," said Rami Abdelraham, head of the Observatory.Rebels from across Syria say they have sent units into Qusair.Colonel Abdeljabbar al-Okaidi, the Aleppo-based regional leader of the moderate, internationally-backed rebel Supreme Military Council said he and Islamist brigade al-Tawheed had sent forces to the outskirts of the town to help the Qusair fighters.But activist Malek Ammar said no forces had arrived and insisted the rebels surrounded in Qusair were on their own."No one is helping Qusair other than its own men," he said.
Two wounded men were treated on Sunday by their friends after two rockets hit their houses in Beirut.BEIRUT — A pair of rockets slammed into a car dealership and a residential building in strongholds of Lebanon's Hezbollah militia in southern Beirut on Sunday, wounding four people and raising fears that Syria's civil war is increasingly spreading into Lebanon.Lebanon's sectarian divide mirrors that of Syria, and Lebanese armed factions have taken sides in their neighbor's civil war.There was no claim of responsibility for Sunday's attack. However, a Syrian rebel commander threatened earlier this week to strike against Hezbollah strongholds in retaliation for the militia's military support for Syrian President Bashar Assad. Hezbollah is a Shiite Muslim group, while most of the rebels are Sunnis.Street fighting between rival Lebanese groups has been relatively common since the end of the country's 15-year civil war in 1990, but rocket or artillery attacks on Beirut neighborhoods are rare.The rockets struck hours after Hezbollah's leader, Sheik Hassan Nasrallah, vowed to help propel Assad to victory in Syria's civil war and warned that the Syrian leader's overthrow would give rise to extremists.One rocket struck a car dealership in the Mar Mikhael district on the southern edge of the capital, wounding four Syrian workers, according to Lebanese security officials.After the attack, part of the rocket's main body was left embedded in the ground, where a Lebanese soldier measured its diameter. Two cars were badly damaged and others had windows broken by shrapnel.Another rocket hit the second floor of an apartment building in the Chiyah district, about two kilometers (one mile) away. It damaged a living room, but no one was hurt.Lebanese media said security forces were searching for a third unexploded rocket.A security official said rocket launchers were found in the woods in a predominantly Christian and Druse area in suburbs southeast of Beirut. The official spoke on condition of anonymity in line with regulations.An ongoing battle in the Syrian town of Qusair on the Lebanese border has laid bare Hezbollah's growing role in the Syrian conflict. The Iranian-backed militia and Syrian troops launched an offensive against the town last weekend. After dozens of Hezbollah fighters were killed in Qusair over the past week and buried in large funerals in Lebanon, Hezbollah could no longer play down its involvement.Col. Abdul-Jabbar al-Aqidi, commander of the Syrian rebels' Military Council in Aleppo, appeared in a video this week while apparently en route to Qusair, in which he threatened to strike in Beirut's southern suburbs in retaliation for Hezbollah's involvement in Syria."We used to say before, 'We are coming Bashar.' Now we say, 'We are coming Bashar and we are coming Hassan Nasrallah,'" he said, in reference to Hezbollah's leader."We will strike at your strongholds in Dahiyeh, God willing," he said, using the Lebanese name for Hezbollah's power center in southern Beirut. The video was still online on Youtube on Sunday.Hezbollah lawmaker Ali Ammar said the incident targeted coexistence between the Lebanese and claimed the U.S. and Israel want to return Lebanon to the years of civil war. "They want to throw Lebanon backward into the traps of civil wars that we left behind," he told reporters. "We will not go backward."Interior Minister Marwan Charbel blamed "saboteurs" and said: "We hope what is happening in Syria does not move to Lebanon."Nasrallah's speech Saturday offered the clearest public confirmation yet that the militia is directly involved in Syria's war. Nasrallah's remarks were also the first since Hezbollah fighters have pushed to the front lines of Qusair.In his televised address, he said Hezbollah members are fighting in Syria against Islamic radicals who pose a danger to Lebanon, and pledged that his group will not allow Syrian militants to control areas along the Lebanese border. He pledged that Hezbollah will turn the tide of the conflict in Assad's favor, and stay as long as necessary to do so."We will continue this road until the end, we will take the responsibility and we will make all the sacrifices," he said. "We will be victorious."Lebanese Sunnis sympathetic to the Syrian opposition have also been fighting in Syria alongside the rebels. Nasrallah urged both sides to fight for their side in Syria "and leave Lebanon out of it."The fighting next door has repeatedly spilled over the border. For the past week, Assad's opponents and supporters have been clashing in the Lebanese port city of Tripoli, using mortars, grenades and machine guns to attack densely populated areas.Syria's main opposition group, the Syrian National Council, slammed Nasrallah's speech as an "an attempt to pit the Lebanese people against their Syrian brothers and sisters who have revolted against the brutal dictator."In a statement Sunday, it said his speech "has the potential for serious ramifications in the region.""It explicitly declares Iranian interests as superior to the basic, inherent rights of people across the region," the statement said.
BEIRUT — Sniper fire killed a well-known Syrian journalist working for a pro-government television channel near the Lebanese-Syrian border on Monday, the state news agency said.Yara Abbas, a reporter for the al-Ikhbariya news channel, was killed near Debaa airport in Homs province. Forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad there have been trying to recapture the base from the rebels seeking to oust him.Syria TV said Abbas, in her mid-twenties, was targeted by "terrorists", the term commonly used by Assad supporters to describe the rebels.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a pro-opposition monitoring group, said several members of her television team were also wounded in the attack.Abbas was a common sight for Syrian television viewers. She frequently reported alongside Assad's forces from the frontline of Syria's two-year conflict.
BRUSSELS — European Union governments reached a political deal on Monday to extend all EU financial and economic sanctions on Syria for one year despite their failure to agree on amending an arms embargo to help the Syrian opposition, EU diplomats said.EU governments will refrain from any arms deliveries to Syria for now, the diplomats said.
BAIDA, Syria — Awakened by the sound of gunfire, Ahmad could hear the armed men knocking on his brother's door, shouting insults and calling the family "dogs".Ahmad's sister-in-law said the gunmen told her husband to "bow to your god, Bashar" -- the Syrian president. She and her husband and their two teenage sons were dragged towards the village square."She told me her son's knees were bloodied as they kicked and dragged him," Ahmad said.When the violence was over, Ahmad ventured out from his hiding place in an attic. In less than two hours, Baida, his picturesque village near the Mediterranean, had become the scene of one of the worst mass killings in Syria's two-year-old war.As the country fragments under the weight of civil strife, troops loyal to Bashar al-Assad have made gains against rebel fighters in a counteroffensive to secure a corridor linking the capital Damascus with the president's clan heartland on the coast. Baida, a tiny pocket of rebel sympathizers surrounded by pro-Assad villages, was an ideal place for the government to deliver a harsh message.International peace talks are expected to be held in Geneva next month, but there is little hope of a breakthrough to end a war that has already killed 80,000 -- and left Baida a shell.A few steps from his home, somewhere near the main village square, Ahmad discovered his brother's body."He had been stripped of his clothes," he said, reading from his own record of what he saw. He paused and composed himself. "He had been shot in the head, and the bullet left a gaping hole the size of a hand. His blood had been shed on the ground."For almost 90 minutes, Ahmad described how he found torched bodies and evidence of mass killings: in one case 30 men, and in another, 20 women and children who had hidden in a small room.He read out the names of the dead, their occupations, ages and relations to each other, and the positions of their bodies. The attack left dozens of his relatives and neighbors dead. Ahmad recorded every detail so that history might judge.It was May 2, a Thursday and the start of a six-day holiday. Many students had come home, and the men of the village had no plans to venture down to the coast to sell their vegetable crops, as many usually do. Children had no school that day.The roosters had already crowed when armed men entered Baida, a close-knit village of narrow alleyways that was home to 5,000 mostly Sunni Muslims. Baida, visible from surrounding Alawite villages with whose inhabitants it had coexisted well enough before the war, sits just outside the small town of Banias, which overlooks Syria's coastline from the hills.According to opposition activists, what came later was a sectarian bloodbath followed by another in Ras al-Nabaa, the next village along.The attack on Baida came shortly after rebels had attacked a bus carrying pro-Assad militiamen, killing six.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, based in Britain, says at least 300 were killed in Baida and Ras al-Nabaa. Victims were buried in mass graves, activists say, and thousands fled.The International Criminal Court in The Hague, which deals with war crimes, cannot investigate in Syria unless it receives a referral from the United Nations Security Council - something Russia and China have blocked.The Syrian government has kept silent about Baida. But a Syrian intelligence officer, speaking anonymously, acknowledged that the perpetrators were government loyalists, including some from the surrounding Alawite villages.The mainly Sunni Muslim villages of Baida and Ras al-Nabaa had aligned themselves with the rebels, putting them in a precarious position amidst the mainly Alawite, staunchly government loyalist villages that surround them.Baida and Ras al-Nabaa became havens for army defectors, and many young men also joined the rebel Free Syrian Army.Today, like Ras al-Nabaa, Baida is a ghost town. Houses have been torched and hardly any women and only a few men remain. Except for a few chickens, most livestock has disappeared.Tightly controlled by government security, the only way for a stranger to enter Baida is through a dirt back road that snakes through the hills. Reuters made the journey to gather eye-witness testimony."I woke up to the sound of bullets before 7 a.m.," Ahmad said in his modest but immaculately tidy home. He fetched from another room his notebook, where he had meticulously recorded in neat handwriting everything he saw.Ahmad withheld his full name and exact occupation in the public sector for fear of reprisal."None of us knew what was happening. We couldn't tell where the shells were falling," he said, reading from his account.His wife and children hid in the basement, and Ahmad went to his brother's home, located on the first floor of the family's two-storey building. When the sound of gunfire kept getting closer, Ahmad's mother urged her sons to hide.Over the past two years, whenever government security forces raided the village, usually only men with suspected ties to rebels were arrested. Women and children were left alone.But this time, something urged Ahmad to hide, even though he had done nothing wrong. He went up to the attic, but his brother stayed put, arguing with their mother."He kept telling her 'Why should I run away? I haven't done anything wrong. It's best I stay put at home. They have nothing on me,'" Ahmad recalled.The list of victims included women and toddlers, the elderly and community leaders. Mohammad Taha, 90, was for decades the village shoemaker, even after he lost a leg in a car accident.There was Sheikh Omar Biyasi, 62, whose body Ahmad found alongside the Sheikh's slain wife and son, Hamzah, a medical student.Sheikh Biyasi had been the village imam for 30 years. He was a government loyalist who alienated local people with his political views before resigning two years ago."Even though he always opposed the protests, they still killed him," said Ahmad.The Biyasi family suffered some of the worst losses, with 36 documented deaths. Ahmad found bodies belonging to the family in one small room; a mother and her three daughters and young son, who was at the local school with Ahmad's children."They were leaning on each other," Ahmad recalled.Before dark set in, Ahmad stumbled upon another chilling sight. Three charred bodies lay one on top of the other."Smoke was still rising from one of them," he said.They were identified the next day, when the Red Crescent came in with a government official. One of the charred victims was Ibrahim al Shoghri, 69, who was mentally disabled.The bloodshed has left many Syrians wondering if the Syrian government is preparing for an Alawite state along the coast.The coast is home to the majority of the country's Alawites, a Shi'ite offshoot sect to which Assad and his clan belong.One Alawite anti-government activist, who goes by the nom de guerre Sadeq, said it was unlikely Assad would establish a separate Alawite state, or that he would homogenize it ethnically. But an autonomous Alawite region, something like Kurdistan, might be viable.So far, there have been no direct clashes between rebels and government forces along the coast. Many Alawite villagers did not believe the rebels could make it to the mountains.So when the rebels started to make verbal threats against the coast over the past few weeks, alarms went off, explained Sadeq. The sectarian killings in Baida and Ras al-Nabaa were a message from the Assad government to the rebels."It's a reminder that the coast is a red line. That if they so much as think they can attack the coast, this is what will happen to the pockets of Sunni Muslims here," he said. "It was ethnic cleansing, and the objective is to frighten."Ahead of the killings, tensions had been rising in Alawite villages, where many serve in the Syrian army and security forces. Alawites have mourned hundreds of their dead. During a drive through some of the Alawite villages, larger-than-life posters of the town's fallen hung on lampposts along main roads.The few men remaining in Baida agreed that the massacre was something of a payback for the village's pro-uprising stance."Let us speak the truth. We support the uprising, and they don't," said one young man.It was not clear to what extent news of what had happened in Baida and Ras al-Nabaa traveled along the coast. In the town of Banias, people were too nervous to discuss the topic. In Latakia, the news traveled only in hushed conversation among the Sunni Muslims. Sadeq, the Alawite activist, said the Alawite community was "in denial about it"."They believe it was a fight against terrorists from Chechnya or something like that," he said.But there is little doubt that details of the massacre are known among the ranks of Syrian intelligence.In Tartous, a hefty, tattooed man who works for state intelligence, "in the cyber security branch", and is a member of the pro-government Shabbiha militia, said his chain of command knew exactly what had unfolded in Baida and Ras al-Nabaa."It was the regime loyalists who did it, from the surrounding Alawite villages," said the official, who did not want to give his name. "But they were not acting under orders. They carried it out on their own accord.""The leadership has all the names of the perpetrators, but now is not the time to punish them for the crime."Asked if the idea of an Alawite state sounded viable to the intelligence community, he said the idea is often discussed."But the leadership definitely rejects it. It would be the absolute worst case scenario, an independent Alawite-loyalist state," he said."We'll have Homs, Damascus and the coast. (The rebels) can have Aleppo and Deir al-Zor, Qamishli and the north. Sure, let them have it."
BEIRUT — Syrian forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad seized an air base near the strategic town of Qusair on Wednesday and took more ground to the east of Damascus, state media said, dealing fresh setbacks to rebel fighters.Assad's troops have been battling alongside Hezbollah fighters from neighboring Lebanon for the last 10 days to drive rebels from Qusair.Taking the air base and neighboring Dabaa village puts Qusair under siege from all sides and cuts a main reinforcement line for rebel weapons and fighters."Our troops are now in full control of Dabaa air base," Syrian state television said, after five hours of fierce fighting in and around it.Shortly afterwards, rebels inside Qusair reported the town coming under bombardment from government forces. "They fired three rockets at us - each one can bring down a whole street," one fighter told Reuters by Skype.The battle for Qusair, which straddles important supply lines for both rebel and government forces, has seen heavy fighting in which dozens of Hezbollah fighters have been killed.If Assad's forces took the town they would secure territory connecting the capital Damascus to Assad's stronghold on the Mediterranean coast, home to his minority Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam that has largely supported him.It would also allow Assad to sever links between rebel-held areas in the north and south of Syria and strengthen his hand ahead of peace talks which are planned to take place in Geneva, possibly in July.Hezbollah's Manar TV, which has a crew with government forces, showed tanks deployed inside Dabaa air base and soldiers walking around empty hangars, some making victory signs."We are standing in the airport. It is now safe and secure," said a Syrian officer who took part in the assault, adding that some rebels had escaped and were being chased by government troops. Some were detained and many killed, he said.As the army and Hezbollah tightened their grip around Qusair, state media said Assad's forces had also reached the town of Adra to the east of Damascus, completing a sweep through rebel-held territory to seal off more rebel supply lines.Syrian television said the army would now push west, squeezing rebels between the advancing forces and the government-held areas in the center of the city.The army gains consolidate several weeks of counter-offensives by Assad's forces, focused on securing main highways and cutting off rebel supplies.Despite regaining ground around Damascus and in the center of the country, Assad has lost control of much of northern Syria and the eastern oil-producing districts.More than 80,000 people have been killed in the uprising, which has drawn regional powers into a conflict which pits mainly Sunni Muslim rebels against a president from Syria's Alawite minority, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam.
UNITED NATIONS — Britain said it has sent a letter to Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon with new information on three further incidents of alleged chemical weapons use by the Syrian government.Britain's U.N. Ambassador Mark Lyall Grant said Wendesday his government has continued to provide new information to the secretary-general and the head of the U.N. team Ban appointed to investigate alleged chemical weapons attacks in Syria.The Syrian government asked Ban to investigate an alleged chemical weapons attack by rebels on March 19 on Khan al-Assal village in Aleppo, but insists that a probe be limited to that incident. Syrian soldiers were reportedly killed and injured in the incident, which the rebels blame on Syrian forces.Ban is insisting on a broader investigation, including a December incident in Homs raised by Britain and France. He appointed Swedish chemical weapons expert Ake Sellstrom to lead a U.N. investigation. Syria has refused to allow his team into the country."We continue to inform the secretary-general and Mr. Sellstrom of any information as and when we get it," Lyall Grant told several reporters. "I sent a further notification to the secretary-general last week."The U.K. Foreign Office said the letter was meant to draw Ban's attention to three further allegations of chemical weapons use and ask that those be included in the U.N.'s investigation. Those allegations relate to incidents which reportedly took place in March and April of this year and which have been reported in the media, the Foreign Office added."The U.K. is extremely concerned about the ongoing allegations of chemical weapons use in Syria," it said in a statement.A senior U.N. diplomat said last week that Ban has received new information about alleged chemical weapons incidents since the beginning of April. The diplomat, speaking on condition of anonymity because of the sensitivity of the issue, refused to give any details.The confirmed use of chemical weapons could escalate the international response to the more than two-year-old conflict, which has killed more than 70,000 people, according to the United Nations."Our view is that all the attacks are by the government," Lyall Grant said. "We have no information that the opposition has access, let alone used chemical weapons."Last week, U.N. Mideast envoy Robert Serry told the Security Council that there were mounting reports of chemical weapons use as violence escalates in Syria. He gave no details but said the secretary-general remains "gravely concerned" about the allegations of chemical weapons use.In response to the reports, Serry again urged the Syrian government to allow chemical weapons experts into the country immediately to investigate the allegations. While the U.N. team can question people outside Syria and analyze material they obtain, Ban has stressed repeatedly that on-site investigations are essential if the U.N. is to determine whether chemical weapons have been used.U.S. Ambassador to the U.N. Susan Rice said American experts have briefed the U.N. team twice "and we will continue to provide relevant information as time goes on."White House spokesman Jay Carney said the United States is working with its allies and the opposition to gather evidence about the potential use of chemical weapons."I think there's a concerted effort from a number of areas to try to gather information about this possible chemical weapons use, to document it, to prove it, and then to move forward once that process is ... completed," Carney said.U.N. diplomats said France has provided additional information to the U.N. about the incidents in Khan al-Assal and Homs as well as a third incident in March near Damascus that Britain and France wanted investigated.Rice also urged Syria to give the U.N. team unfettered access so it can investigate all allegations of alleged chemical weapons use."We're not surprised but indeed disappointed that the Syrians have reneged on their initial willingness to admit the investigation team, and thus the investigation remains stalled," she said.Vinograd reported from London. Associated Press writer Karin Laub contributed from Beirut.
BEIRUT — Syrian forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad have destroyed several trucks carrying crude oil being smuggled from eastern oil fields to Turkey, state television said on Wednesday.It said the tankers were being taken from Tayem oil field, which rebel sources said earlier this month was partly under the control of rebel forces.Syrian television did not say exactly where the tankers had been hit, but said "terrorists" smuggling the consignment had been killed in the attack.Crude from the Tayem field, close to the eastern city of Deir al-Zor, had until recently been shared between rebels and government forces, the sources said.Some was piped to the goverment's coastal refinery in Banias in return for rebels siphoning off some to sell locally or smuggle across the border to Turkey.Syrian Oil Minister Suleiman Abbas was quoted as telling parliament on Tuesday that oil production had collapsed from 380,000 barrels per day before the crisis to just 20,000 barrels per day.It was not clear whether Abbas was referring to actual production levels or the volume of oil received by the government. Gas production had halved to 15 million cubic metres a day, he said in comments reported by Al-Baath newspaper.The shortfall in crude supplies meant the government had to import oil at a cost of $500 million a month, Abbas said.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syria's oil minister says the country's production has fallen drastically over the past two years because of the crisis.Suleiman Abbas told lawmakers Wednesday that daily oil production stands at 20,000 barrels, roughly 5 percent of the 380,000 barrels produced daily before the March 2011 uprising against President Bashar Assad began.Oil was the main source of revenue for the government until the European Union imposed an embargo to punish Damascus for its crackdown on the opposition. The crisis turned into a civil war, in which the rebels have captured much of northern and eastern Syria, where most oil fields are located, depriving the government of much needed cash and fuel for its military machine.The EU lifted its oil embargo last month to allow crude exports from rebel-held territory.
BEIRUT — Syria's foreign minister laid out a hard line Wednesday, saying Bashar Assad will remain president at least until elections in 2014 and might seek another term, conditions that will make it difficult for the opposition to agree to U.N.-sponsored talks on ending the civil war.Any deal reached in such talks would have to be put to a referendum, Foreign Minister Walid al-Moallem added in a TV interview, introducing a new condition that could complicate efforts by the U.S. and Russia to bring both sides together at an international conference in Geneva, possibly next month.Drawing a tough line of its own, the main exile-based political group, the Syrian National Coalition, reiterated that any negotiations require "the head of the regime, security and military leadership to step down and be excluded from the political process."While the Assad regime has agreed in principle to attend peace talks, the opposition has not, insisting it first get international guarantees on the agenda and timetable. The coalition has been meeting for the past week in Turkey but spent most of that time arguing about membership issues, rather than making a decision about Geneva.U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon said Wednesday that while Russia and the United States have asked him to convene a meeting as soon as possible, "there are still many elements that we have to clear." He said there is still no agreement on a date, on who will participate, and on the membership of a united opposition delegation.In his wide-ranging comments, al-Moallem, an Assad stalwart with decades in top positions, reflected a new confidence by the government. The regime had seemed near collapse during a rebel offensive last summer but has scored a number of battlefield successes in recent weeks."Our armed forces have regained the momentum," he told the Lebanese station Al-Mayadeen, suggesting that the regime is digging in. Asked when the civil war might end, he said: "That depends on when the patience of those conspiring against Syria will run out."The uprising against Assad began in March 2011, turned into an armed insurgency in response to a harsh regime crackdown, and escalated into a civil war. The fighting has killed more than 70,000 people, uprooted more than 5 million and devastated large areas of the country.The conflict has taken on strong sectarian overtones — most of the armed rebels are Sunni Muslims, a majority in Syria, while Assad has retained core support among the country's minorities, including his own Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shiite Islam, along with Christians and Shiite Muslims.Both the regime and the opposition still bet on a military victory but are being pressured by their backers to attend the Geneva talks, the international community's only plan at the moment for trying to end the war.Chances of success seem slim, with a host of issues remaining open, including a detailed agenda, the list of participants and a mechanism for implementing any possible agreement.Al-Moallem introduced what appeared to be a new Syrian condition Wednesday, saying that "anything agreed on in Geneva will be held to a referendum in Syria.""If it wins the support of the Syrian people, we will go ahead with it," he added.He said Assad will remain in his post at least until scheduled elections in 2014."From now until the next elections, President Bashar Assad is president of the Syrian Arab Republic," he said. "Will Assad run in 2014 or not? This depends on the circumstances in 2014 and on the popular will. If the people want him to run, he will run. If the people don't want that, I don't think he will. Let us not jump the gun."The West, including the United States, has repeatedly called for Assad to step down. Al-Moallem said that "Americans have no business in deciding who will run Syria," adding that this "would be a precedent in international relations that we must not allow."Al-Moallem also delivered the regime's most serious warning to Israel since the start of the conflict, saying Syria "will retaliate immediately" if Israel strikes Syrian soil again. Earlier this month, Israeli warplanes struck near the capital of Damascus, targeting purported Iranian missiles intended for Assad ally Hezbollah, a Lebanese militia. Syria did not respond at the time.Israel, though not officially acknowledging it was behind the strikes, has hinted it could strike again if more weapons are shipped. In another warning, Israel's defense chief said Tuesday a Russian plan to supply sophisticated anti-aircraft missiles to Syria is a threat and signaled that Israel is prepared to use force to stop the delivery.Russia has said it remains committed to the deal, despite U.S. and Israeli objections.Al-Moallem said he did not know if the missiles have reached Syria yet, but noted that they are defensive weapons. "The people who are not planning to attack Syria are not scared of these missiles," he said. "Those who fear them are those who intend to attack Syria."While the regime was portraying itself as willing to negotiate a peace deal, the political opposition seemed in disarray at its marathon talks in Istanbul that began last week and were to continue Thursday.On Wednesday, exasperated grass roots activists in Syria threatened to cut ties with the Syrian National Coalition if it doesn't end the internal wrangling and come up with a political strategy. Syria's main opposition group has long been accused of being out of touch with those on the ground in Syria.It was not clear if and when the opposition would make a decision on whether to attend the Geneva talks. In a statement late Wednesday, it demanded among other things that Hezbollah fighters and Iranian advisers be expelled from Syria, but it was not clear if these were conditions for attending the talks.Hezbollah has been fighting alongside regime troops, and the militia's growing role has been highlighted since the May 19 start of an offensive against the rebel-held western Syrian town of Qusair. Pro-Assad forces have gained ground in Qusair, though rebels have been able to hang on to some of their positions.In Washington, State Department spokeswoman Jen Psaki said Hezbollah's growing involvement marks a dangerous escalation. "We demand that Hezbollah withdraw its fighters from Syria immediately," she said.Asked if Iran should be invited to the Geneva conference, she said the final decision would have to be made together with other international partners and the United Nations."That decision has not yet been made," she said."But let me say and take this opportunity to say that Iran has not played a constructive role in regard to Syria. They have sent weapons. They have sent money. They have provided fighters. They have financed Hezbollah. And we have no reason to believe that Iran wants a peaceful transition."Earlier, French Foreign Minister Laurent Fabius said there are concerns an Iranian presence would be counterproductive, and that Tehran would try to leverage the Syria crisis to win international acquiescence in its suspected nuclear weapons program.On Wednesday, the U.N. Human Rights Council called for an urgent investigation into alleged abuses by regime troops and Hezbollah fighters in Qusair. The resolution, backed by the U.S., Turkey and Qatar, also condemned the presence of foreign fighters supporting Assad.Ban said in a statement that "Syria is disintegrating before our eyes," and that radicalism fed by chaos "increasingly threatens regional security."In Geneva, U.N. High Commissioner for Human Rights Navi Pillay said Syria's civil war "reflects a colossal failure to protect civilians."
BEIRUT — President Bashar al-Assad said Syria would attend peace talks with the opposition in principle but any deal that was struck would have to be approved by referendum.Asked whether Syria had any preconditions for attendance at the talks, Assad told Lebanon's al-Manar television: "The only condition is that anything to be implemented will be submitted to Syrian public opinion and a Syrian referendum."
BEIRUT — Syrian rebels pleaded for military and medical aid in the embattled border town of Qusair on Thursday, saying they were unable to evacuate hundreds of wounded under an onslaught from government forces backed by Lebanese Hezbollah fighters.President Bashar al-Assad launched an offensive to capture Qusair two weeks ago in what many see as a bid to link territory from the capital Damascus up to his Alawite community heartland on the Mediterranean coast."We have 700 people wounded in Qusair and 100 of them are being given oxygen. The town is surrounded and there's no way to bring in medical aid," said Malek Ammar, an opposition activist in the besieged town.Assad is widely believed to be making a push to cement his hold on the critical centers of Syria to strengthen his hand in a planned U.S.- and Russia-led peace conference.Qusair, a small town sitting near critical supply lines for both Assad's allies and the rebels seeking to topple him, and the rebel-held suburbs of Damascus have been focal points for the army.Local opposition councils on the outskirts of Damascus issued their own plea for support, saying suburbs around the capital that have been besieged for 7 months now face a heavy onslaught from Assad forces supported by Iraqi and Lebanese militias."Today these forces are massing...from the east and west and preparing to commit more massacres," the councils from the Ghouta region wrote in a statement distributed on Facebook."We call on all battalions and brigades to come help block this violent assault against more than 1.5 million people living in besieged eastern Ghouta," it said. Blame for losses in the area would be placed on Damascus-based rebels and the opposition's umbrella National Coalition abroad, it said.Rebels have been trying to counter the army offensive but have suffered setbacks around their supply routes in Damascus and in the central province of Homs, where Qusair is located.Rebels in Qusair sent out an appeal for support using social media outlets, saying the town near the Syrian-Lebanese border could be devastated."If all rebel fronts do not move to stop this crime being led by Hezbollah and Assad's traitorous army of dogs..., we will soon be saying that there was once a city called Qusair," the statement said.Syria's two-year old conflict began as a peaceful protest movement but evolved into an armed insurrection after a violent security crackdown on demonstrators. More than 80,000 people have been killed and the violence is now stoking political and sectarian tensions in neighboring countries.Shi'ite Muslim Hezbollah is believed to have committed hundreds of guerrilla fighters, many of them with battle experience from a 2006 war with Israel, to help its ally Assad secure Qusair.Fighters in Qusair said they were hearing at least 50 shells crashing every hour.The Qusair fighting has intensified already simmering sectarian tensions. The rebels are mostly from Syria's Sunni Muslim majority while minorities have largely backed Assad, himself from the Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam.Rebel units from different parts of Syria have said for days that they have sent fighters to support the opposition in Qusair, but rebels inside say none have made it into the town.YouTube videos published by several units suggest some brigades have arrived around the outskirts of Qusair, but not advanced further.Ahmad Bakar, a doctor in a hospital near Qusair, posted an appeal on Facebook."We need immediate intervention from outside battalions. I swear to God no supplies have gotten through to us and we need a route to be opened to evacuate the wounded and civilians."Thousands of civilians are believed to have fled Qusair before the offensive began, after Assad's forces distributed leaflets by plane saying they would be attacking the town. But a small number remain in the town.Sunni rebel groups have threatened to commit sectarian revenge massacres in Shi'ite and Alawite towns both in Lebanon and Syria in retaliation for Hezbollah's participation in the Qusair attack. They see the battle-hardened Hezbollah's role as critical to Assad's battlefield strength.
BEIRUT — Hundreds of rebels from northern Syria managed to enter the besieged city of Qusair on Friday, activists said, to help opposition forces battling government troops backed by the Lebanese group Hezbollah.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said hundreds of fighters from the Tawheed brigade, an Islamist group that is powerful in Aleppo in the north, had entered the town.The brigade confirmed the report on its Facebook page.The two-week battle for Qusair is aimed at securing supply routes near the Syrian-Lebanese frontier, which both sides accuse the other of using to bolster their forces inside Syria.For Syrian President Bashar al-Assad, seizing Qusair would also allow him to cement control of a belt of territory between the capital Damascus and his stronghold on the Mediterranean coast.Fighters coming to support Qusair's embattled rebel forces had been bogged down for days on the outskirts of the town, once home to about 30,000 people.Rebels have lost more than two-thirds of the town to Assad and Hezbollah forces, but say they are still hunkered down in central Qusair. They had faced a tight blockade that prevented fighters or supplies from entering and the wounded from leaving.Rami Abdelrahman, head of the Observatory, said it was unclear whether or not the fresh influx of Tawheed fighters was enough to help the opposition regain some lost ground."It is too soon to tell if they can make a difference. We will have to watch today and see if they can help the fighters create a turning point," he told Reuters by telephone.Syria's bloody conflict, now in its third year, began as peaceful protests against Assad's rule but devolved into civil war after a fierce security crackdown.The fighting, particularly in battles such as Qusair, has stoked sectarian tensions and has become increasingly regionalised.Syria's Sunni Muslim majority, as well as Sunnis from across the region, have largely supported the revolt. Minorities, fearing Islamist groups, have generally backed Assad, who has also drawn substantial backing from Shi'ite Iran.Shi'ite Hezbollah, a guerrilla group with battle experience fighting its sworn enemy Israel, is now openly operating in Syria on behalf of Assad and its fighters have been spotted in several areas across the country.Dozens of Hezbollah fighters have died in and around Qusair, while hundreds of rebels have been killed in the clashes.
HERMEL, Lebanon — In Shiite towns and villages near the border with Syria, residents who support Hezbollah are bearing the brunt of the militant Lebanese group's growing involvement in the Syrian civil war.Shells fired by Syria's overwhelmingly Sunni rebels regularly fall on the town, killing civilians, scaring off visitors and keeping schools and many shops shuttered.Many believe the shelling is a message from Sunni extremists that there would be a price to pay for supporting the Shiite Muslim group.This week, 20-year-old Loulou Awad was the latest victim of growing sectarian hatred on both sides of the border.It was around sunset Monday when the first rocket from Syria slammed into her hometown of Hermel, a predominantly Shiite area in Lebanon's northeastern corner. The hotel management student ran to the roof of her uncle's house across the street from her parents' apartment to see the damage.Fifteen minutes later, the second rocket fell on the roof of her parents' building, spraying shrapnel everywhere, including some that struck her head.Her father, Abdullah, and her mother, Salma, were watching the main evening news bulletin when the second rocket hit their two-story house. The electricity was cut and dust filled the rooms. With the help of a lighter, Awad helped his wife outside their damaged home and rushed to the roof across the street where he found his daughter, face down, with shrapnel wounds in the back of her head."I knew immediately that she was dead," said Awad taking a deep breath.Rocket attacks on Hermel and nearby villages have killed three and wounded 21 over the past two months, according to residents and local officials.The attacks appear to be retaliation for Hezbollah fighters' support to President Bashar Assad's forces in battles in the central Syrian province of Homs.The Hermel region is overwhelmingly Shiite, and Hezbollah enjoys wide support among the population here. The town's main Sabeel Square is decorated with giant posters of both Hezbollah leader Sheik Hassan Nasrallah and Assad.Salma Awad said the loss of her daughter will not affect her support for Hezbollah."We are all for Sayyed Hassan (Nasrallah)" said Awad, dressed in black mourning clothes and holding a picture of her dead daughter.Fighting between Hezbollah and Syrian opposition fighters began last year, mostly in Syrian border villages where many Lebanese Shiites have lived for decades.Hezbollah's involvement in the Syrian war increased sharply in April, when the group's fighters and Syrian government forces began a major offensive to recapture Qusair, which had fallen to the rebels shortly after the uprising against Assad began in March 2011.The regime and the opposition both value Qusair, which lies along a land corridor linking two Assad's strongholds, the capital of Damascus and an area along the Mediterranean coast that is the heartland of his minority Alawite sect. For the rebels, holding the town means protecting their supply line to Lebanon, just 10 kilometers (six miles) away.Lebanon's population is deeply divided over the war in Syria, with Sunnis supporting the rebels and Shiites backing Assad's regime, dominated by Alawites — whose religion is an offshoot of Shiite Islam.Hezbollah's very public and bloody foray fighting alongside Assad's regime against rebels in Syria's 2-year-old civil war is a strategic shift for the group and one that comes with a steep price.It risks wrecking the group's already eroding image among many Lebanese as their champion and protector against Israel, which it drove out of southern Lebanon in 2000 and fought to a standstill in 2006.By declaring war on Syria's mainly Sunni rebels, Hezbollah risks sparking retaliation from Lebanese Sunnis supporting their Syrian brethren or from the rebels themselves carrying out attacks against the Shiite group on its home turf in Lebanon. Recent rocket fire against a pro-Hezbollah neighborhood of Beirut underlined the threat of violence spreading.In Hermel, a town with a population of nearly 70,000, the attacks now come on almost daily basis.Mayor Bassam Taha said more than 65 rockets have hit the area in the past two months. He added that many families have fled with their children to areas outside rocket range."When rockets start falling, my little daughter hides in the corner," said Taha, blowing on a cigarette while sitting behind his desk at his office in the center of town.Before Syria's uprising, which eventually turned into a civil war, residents of Hermel used to go to Qusair, just 25 kilometers (15 miles) away, for shopping or treatment at hospitals and clinics where prices were lower than in Lebanon.A few weeks after the uprising began, a Lebanese citizen from Hermel who had been living in the Syrian village of Nizariyeh near Qusair for more than 20 years was killed by Sunni extremists in front of his house, Taha said.Sectarian tensions have been simmering since then and worsened as the rebels captured some areas on the border with Lebanon last year, he said.Tension peaked in April after Hezbollah fighters began openly crossing the border to fight in Syria.Earlier this week, activists released a video showing rebels firing Russian-made Grad rockets toward Hermel. A rebel appeared in the video vowing to continue shelling Hezbollah's stronghold inside Lebanon "until they withdraw from our territories."The videos appeared genuine and corresponded to other AP reporting on the events depicted.Rebels now regularly refer to Hezbollah, or Party of God, as "party of the devil."The rocket attacks have transformed life in Hermel, where streets are less crowded these days and schools have been closed for weeks. Many shops are also closed and restaurants around the Orontes river, famous for their fresh fish, are empty.The rocket attacks have also stopped the flow of tourists and sports fans who came in large numbers every weekend for river rafting.A day after Loulou Awad was killed, a rocket hit the home of Ali Qataya, a 48-year-old butcher, in central Hermel, wounding two women and causing extensive damage.About three hours later, another rocket hit the same house, wounding three men who came to inspect the damage. Qataya's mother and wife were lightly wounded by the first rocket."I fell on the ground and started bleeding" said Ali Jawhari, 23, bandaged where shrapnel hit him on the forehead and legs. "I heard its buzz then the explosion hit. I had no time to run away."There are fears that the rocket fire could expand and lead to sectarian battles in this region as well. So far, most of the street fighting has taken place in the coastal city of Tripoli about 50 kilometers (30 miles) away, where at least 28 people have been killed and over 200 wounded recently.Jawhari's father, Nayef, claimed that at least some of the rockets hitting Hermel were fired from the Lebanese Sunni town of Arsal, about 25 kilometers (15 miles) away, where support for the rebels fighting to topple Assad runs high. The claims could not be verified.He said Hermel residents, a tribal region where even non-Hezbollah combatants have artillery and mortars, should impose a "formula of terror" from now on."The security of Arsal should be like the security of Hermel. When they fire a rocket, we fire 10. They wound one, we wound 10," he said.
BEIRUT — Syria gleefully turned the tables on Turkish Prime Minister Tayyip Erdogan on Saturday over his response to anti-government demonstrations, calling on him to halt the violent repression of peaceful protests or resign.Erdogan, a former ally of Bashar al-Assad, turned against him after the Syrian president sought to crush largely peaceful protests which broke out in March 2011 and have since descended into a brutal civil war that has left at least 80,000 dead.Syrian state television broadcast hours of live footage from Istanbul, where thousands of protesters clashed for a second day with riot police who fired teargas and water cannons.The unrest was triggered by government plans for a building complex in Istanbul's Taksim Square, long a venue for political protest, but widened into a show of defiance against Erdogan and his Islamist-rooted Justice and Development Party (AKP)."The demands of the Turkish people don't deserve all this violence," Syrian television quoted Information Minister Omran Zoabi as saying. "If Erdogan is unable to pursue non-violent means, he should resign.""Erdogan's repression of peaceful protest ... shows how detached he is from reality."The Turkish prime minister turned against Assad after he said the Syrian leader had rejected Ankara's advice for political reform in response to protests which erupted in Syria two years ago, inspired by uprisings across the Arab world.It now hosts Assad's political and military opponents, infuriating Damascus which accuses Erdogan of fuelling the bloodshed in Syria.
BEIRUT — Syria will allow the Red Cross to enter the besieged town of Qusair after military operations are over, Foreign Minister Walid al-Moualem told U.N. Secretary General Ban Ki-moon on Sunday, state TV said.U.N. humanitarian officials have called for an immediate ceasefire in Qusair, where President Bashar al-Assad's forces and Hezbollah fighters are battling to drive out rebels, saying 1,500 wounded people are in need of emergency medical treatment.Moualem expressed surprise at the international concern over the fighting around Qusair, saying the world had been silent when rebels took over the town 18 months ago and that Syria was now clearing it of "terrorism".
WASHINGTON — Rebuffing President Barack Obama's latest plea, House Republicans on Monday proposed keeping open the military-run prison at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, by barring the administration from transferring its terror suspects to the United States or a foreign country such as Yemen.The provisions dealing with the fate of the remaining 166 prisoners are part of a defense policy bill drafted by Armed Services Committee Chairman Howard P. "Buck" McKeon, R-Calif. The chairman released the bill Monday, two days before Republicans and Democrats on the committee will vote on it.Overall, the bill would authorize $638 billion for the military in the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1, including $86 billion for war costs. The committee responded to concerns that the military was headed toward a readiness crisis due to automatic spending cuts by adding nearly $5 billion beyond the president's budget request for training programs, equipment maintenance, spare parts and more.The final bill is likely to include additional provisions addressing the epidemic of sexual assaults in the military, missile defense and weapons programs, with most reflecting the will of Republicans who control the House. The full chamber is expected to vote on the bill this summer and then work out differences when the Democratic-run Senate passes its version."The bill restores vital readiness programs, invests in capabilities to meet the threats of the future, and supports our troops and their families," McKeon said in a statement.Addressing a range of policy issues, the chairman's legislation would block the U.S. from spending $2.6 billion to train and equip Afghan security forces until the Defense and State departments have certified to Congress that the two countries have a bilateral security agreement governing the presence of U.S. forces there after the current combat mission ends in 2014.McKeon's bill also urges the Obama administration to "fully consider all courses of action" to remove President Syrian President Bashar Assad's regime from power. The legislation does not endorse providing weapons to the rebel forces in Syria, as the Senate Foreign Relations Committee did last month.Less than two weeks ago, Obama renewed his 2008 campaign promise to close the Guantanamo prison. He argued that the indefinite detentions with little prospect of charges or a trial flouts the rule of law and said terrorists have used the naval detention center as a recruiting tool."Given my administration's relentless pursuit of al-Qaida's leadership, there is no justification beyond politics for Congress to prevent us from closing a facility that should never have been opened," Obama said May 23 in a speech at the National Defense University.Obama lifted the moratorium on transferring prisoners to Yemen and said their status would be reviewed on a case-by-case basis. In Yemen this past weekend, officials said they were moving ahead on a facility to house any transfers from Guantanamo."To the greatest extent possible, we will transfer detainees who have been cleared to go to other countries. Where appropriate, we will bring terrorists to justice in our courts and military justice system. And we will insist that judicial review be available for every detainee," the president said.Republicans and several Democrats have repeatedly stymied the president's past efforts to close Guantanamo or transfer prisoners.McKeon has said he is open to a proposal to close Guantanamo, but like other Republicans has criticized the White House for lacking a workable plan for what to do with the detainees there and where terrorists captured in the future would be housed.The bill would keep the naval detention center open by prohibiting the Defense Department from spending any money to construct or modify facilities in the United States to house terror suspects from Guantanamo. The restriction would apply from the bill's enactment through 2014.It also would bar the Pentagon from spending any money to transfer prisoners to the United States or a foreign country. The bill provides a waiver, but the Defense Department would have to make several certifications to Congress.Although Obama has pressed to close Guantanamo, the Pentagon in its latest budget request is seeking $450 million for it, including millions for upgrading the temporary facility and $40 million for a fiber optic cable. Past budgets have reflected the Washington contradiction of Obama waging a political fight to shutter the facility while the military calculates the financial requirements to keep the installation operating.In his speech, Obama said Guantanamo makes no sense in a time of deficit-driven budget cuts as the United States spends $150 million each year on 166 prisoners — almost $1 million per prisoner.McKeon's bill says the Pentagon can spend money to upgrade Guantanamo, including $247.4 million for military construction.The bulk of the money will pay for improvements to the barracks used by the American guard forces at Guantanamo and the prison facilities where the detainees are housed. Gen. John Kelly, the top U.S. commander in South and Central America, told the Armed Services Committee in March that the living conditions for U.S. personnel at the base were "pretty questionable" because the buildings were designed as temporary structures and never intended to last as long as they have."This is a ridiculous waste of money and we should be closing this expensive and unnecessary facility," said Rep. Adam Smith of Washington state, the top Democrat on the Armed Services Committee.More than a decade since the Sept. 11 terror attacks, senior American and Afghan officials continue to negotiate the parameters of the bilateral security agreement as the Obama administration looks to wind down the war.The pact spells out Washington's commitment to Afghanistan over the next decade as well as its expectations of Kabul, including free and fair presidential elections next year, pledges to fight corruption, improve efficiency and protect human rights, including women's rights.In addition to putting a hold on the security forces' money until the agreement is certified, McKeon's legislation requires that the agreement protect U.S. military and civilian personnel and contractors from having to pay any Afghan tax related to efforts to carry out missions in Afghanistan.The Armed Services Committee has complained previously about the Afghan government's practice of taxing U.S. companies involved in America's multibillion-dollar effort to rebuild the war-torn nation. McKeon's bill says it is "illegal" to tax U.S. assistance.The security agreement also must mandate that the U.S. has exclusive jurisdiction over American armed forces in Afghanistan, according to the legislation.On Syria, the House bill underscores concerns among lawmakers that they don't know enough about what resources and other assets would be required should the U.S. take military action in Syria.The Obama administration has provided millions of dollars in humanitarian assistance to Syria but has been reluctant to arm the rebels or launch military strikes despite recent evidence that Assad used chemical weapons on his people."Events in Syria threaten the vital national security interests of the United States; however, the committee remains concerned that it does not have a comprehensive understanding of the resources required for certain courses of action that could shape the outcome of the conflict in Syria," McKeon's bill reads.The measure directs Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel to provide committee members with a briefing by Sept. 1 on what would be required to carry out a variety of possible military actions against Syria.Potential military scenarios include conducting air strikes against Syrian airfields to keep Assad from deploying aircraft, establishing a no-fly zone over western Syria and arming the opposition Free Syrian Army with heavy military equipment to change the military balance on the ground.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Inside the cordon of government checkpoints that ring the Syrian capital, residents are used to the crack of outgoing mortar fire. Scores of shells fly each day from bases atop Mount Qasioun, overlooking the city. For most people, their impact is left to the imagination, as state-run news media contend they are hitting "terrorists," rebels led by foreign fighters who are bent on destroying the ancient, diverse culture of Damascus.But a handful of ambulance crews from the Syrian Arab Red Crescent are among the few who regularly see for themselves what is on the other side. As Red Crescent volunteers, they are not allowed to be overtly political. But they cross the checkpoints to help in contested suburbs, and on coming back, describe what they see to one another and to friends and family. It does not always match the government's description."For sure they are hitting civilians, and they know," said one volunteer, smoking and chatting with colleagues recently in a sunlit break room. Out the window, smoke rose from the suburb of Barzeh."We are not facing an outside enemy, we are killing ourselves," said another volunteer, Mohammed, a dental student and crew leader. "Civilians are paying the price, from both sides."What makes these accounts stand out is that the volunteers live and work in Damascus, where the wrong comment about the rebellion against President Bashar al-Assad can result in indefinite detention or worse. They work for an organization that, like all legal charities in Syria, is overseen by the government.Their mission, the volunteers said, is to aid those in need, no matter what their political affiliation. In Syria's polarized conflict, that amounts to a radical stance. Across the country volunteers have paid a heavy price.At least 17 have been killed, by both sides, while aiding the wounded or delivering relief supplies, said Khaled Erksoussi, the Red Crescent's director of operations. Most were killed by shells; others by bombs and snipers. Dozens have been detained by the government, he said."If you give first aid to one side," Mohammed said, "the other side thinks you are with that side."The Syrian Arab Red Crescent's 14 branches and 84 subbranches reflect the political diversity of their communities. Some — called "the bad Red Crescent" by some security officials — work entirely in rebel-controlled areas. The Damascus branch, headed by a businessman close to Mr. Assad, is widely viewed by the opposition as a tool of the state, accused of delivering humanitarian aid disproportionately to pro-Assad areas.But over the past year, volunteers and international humanitarian workers say, some Damascus crews have pursued neutrality with surprising vigor.The Red Crescent has an incentive to claim neutrality; at stake are hundreds of millions of dollars of international aid that opposition leaders in exile are trying to divert from the organization to their own aid groups or to international agencies they say would be more impartial.But international aid workers say the group's evolution also appears to be driven by new volunteers, starved for meaningful civic action, who take the mission of serving all sides seriously. Volunteers coordinate with security forces and rebels to cross battle lines. Permission is often denied, and when it is granted it does not equal protection.One Damascus squad leader, accused of supplying armed groups in Zabadani, near Damascus, spent 75 days in prison. He lost 88 pounds and had to undergo reconstructive surgery on a leg in Switzerland "because of the good treatment he faced," a volunteer said sarcastically, speaking on the condition of anonymity for fear of retribution.Asked about such cases, the volunteer let out an acid chuckle."We are guilty," he said, of treating and feeding people some officials say they "want to kill." The Red Crescent, he explained, gives supplies to civilian committees in rebel-held towns, without tracking where they end up.In the break room, nearly all the volunteers — students of pharmacy, music and French literature — said they had been at least briefly detained. They fretted about one squad, arrested that morning en route to a clinic in the contested neighborhood of Jobar. Just then, the missing crew burst into the room, newly released, still in their red uniforms.Colleagues leapt to hug them, shouting, "Thank God for your health!"Moments later, a bell rang. One recent detainee, an actor in his former life, rushed out for a mission, chewing a sandwich and pumping his fist like a champion.
BEIRUT — Hezbollah's deputy leader said the fall of the Syrian town of Qusair was a blow to American-Israeli interests and would prove that efforts to topple the Lebanese group's ally President Bashar al-Assad were "delusional".Hundreds of Shi'ite Hezbollah fighters joined Assad's forces in the battle for Qusair, which sits on a strategic route between Lebanon and Syria.Deputy leader Naim Qassem said the fight to defend Assad, who is believed to have allowed Iran to send Hezbollah weapons through Syria, was part of its struggle against the United States and Israel."The battle today has only one significance, and that is the fight against Israel and those who support its plans," Qassem said in a statement. "Today we proved without any doubt that the gamble to topple Syria is a delusional plan."The Qusair offensive, which began two weeks ago, was the first time the group, which was founded to fight Israel, openly acknowledged playing a role in neighboring Syria's two-year-old conflict.The rebels trying to overthrow Assad are mainly Sunni Muslims, and the Syrian president is a member of the minority Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ism.Hezbollah is believed to be fighting on the Lebanese border, around the capital Damascus and in the northern city of Aleppo.
BEIRUT — Walaa's parents used to force her to stay indoors, fearing for her safety in the war-torn city of Homs. Now she proudly walks the streets each day with a kalashnikov and camouflage uniform.For many women like Walaa, living in hard-hit areas loyal to President Bashar al-Assad, it is the first time in months they have been able to rejoin the outside world since Syria plummeted into civil war.In a conservative region where laws and custom typically restrict the rights and opportunities of women, they are playing a part in Assad's paramilitary forces, evidence of just how much the conflict, after more than two years and 80,000 dead, has reshaped and militarized Syria."I was an office secretary before 2011. Then the kidnappings started in Homs, and the war here began. From then on I stayed home. All I did was watch the news and argue with my parents," the 32-year-old told Reuters."In mid-2012 people started to talk about the creation of the National Defence Forces (NDF). I thought this could be my opportunity to get out of the house and get some work."The NDF were formed to regularize militias that backed Assad. Groups that once were accused by the opposition of brutal massacres now have uniforms and salaries paid by the army. They call themselves a new kind of military reserve force.Walaa got three weeks' training in firearms, first aid and military drills. Like the men, she gets 15,000 Syrian pounds ($150) a week - no small sum in a country whose economy is collapsing.Women like her who have joined the NDF do not go into combat and are never near the front line, but they are an increasingly common sight for drivers going through checkpoints.More than the risks or economic rewards, most women interviewed talked about joining the NDF as a social and perhaps even a romantic opportunity."A lot of my girlfriends are in the NDF. I went home a few weeks ago to check it out, and it seemed really cool ... All the girls seemed happy, and the environment is friendly," said Nisreen, a Homs native currently living in Damascus.She is considering going back to Homs to join up."A lot of girls in my family joined. And hey, you never know, I may even find myself a husband," she joked.The trend is still small - NDF fighters say female recruits number in the hundreds - but the number is rising, and is higher if you include women who have signed up for training as a self-defense skill, but not to work.Vendors in Assad strongholds say militarization has become a marketable fashion statement."I've bought lots of camouflage shirts and sweaters, and lots of girls buy them now," said Yasser, a Tartous shopkeeper."It's a really good business for us small shop owners."Syria's laws are less restrictive for women than in many parts of the Middle East, but gender roles were still largely determined by conservative societal norms, and wartime severely curtailed their opportunities.The NDF has given them back a small public role."From the beginning it was completely accepted, and I was surprised. I didn't expect that. So we started to organize things better," said an army officer in Homs, who asked to remain anonymous."This is an investment in our national pride. It doesn't have to be materially effective; it's about raising spirits."Women are in NDF units in central Homs and Hama province as well as coastal Latakia and Tartous. There are also plans to expand training for women to Damascus, the officer said.The symbolism of the NDF women feeds into the sectarian divide that has deepened during the civil war. For Assad's supporters, largely drawn from minorities like his Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam, putting women in uniform and at checkpoints demonstrates the more liberal and tolerant image they want to project."This reflects the regime's claim of being a secular state," said Rakan, a 30-year-old NDF fighter in Homs.He says there are concrete benefits, too: "It's helped us a lot with them at the checkpoints; it lightens our burden."It is also a way to provoke opponents they call Islamist "terrorists", most of whom are from Syria's more conservative Sunni Muslim majority."We see them as whores for Assad. This is just to taunt us for our morals," said Ahmed, a rebel in Aleppo. "Guys make rude jokes about what they would do if they caught them."Rebels have occasionally filmed female "fighters", their faces wrapped in headscarves, saying they had no choice but to take up arms. Most opposition activists admit this is a media ploy to stir up their followers.Syria analyst Joshua Landis says the embrace of women in Syria's traditionally male army environment is a sign of how much fighting now defines this country of 23 million."Every aspect of society is becoming militarized. This is particularly pressing for the state side. Alawites have around 3 million people. If you are trying to use that for most of your fighting force, it's very limited," he said.Rebels, he said, have less need to turn to women. They have a much larger pool of young Sunni male combatants.Wary of rising sectarian tensions, other women say they are preparing for an all-out war.Fadwa, from the mostly Alawite town of Masyaf, has lost a brother, cousin and brother-in-law to the fighting.She fears for her four young children and husband and believes that given her town's proximity to pro-opposition Sunni areas, the fighting could one day hit her army-fortified town."Alawites are under threat. We are targets. This is the least we can do; learn to defend ourselves," she said.Fadwa kept her job as a teacher instead of joining patrols. But she is encouraging women in her family to join the NDF, or at least get training.For Walaa, joining the NDF was about regaining the dignity she felt she lost when armed men took charge of her streets."The way people look at me has changed," she said. "I feel like I regained old parts of my life. I feel confident again. I feel respected."
WASHINGTON — The White House is condemning the Syrian regime's capture of a strategic border town and says the involvement of Lebanese Hezbollah threatens Lebanon's stability.Syrian troops and their Hezbollah allies captured Qusair Wednesday after a three-week battle. It was a severe blow to rebels and opened the door for President Bashar Assad's regime to seize back the country's central heartland.White House spokesman Jay Carney says Assad's regime clearly couldn't wrest control of Qusair (koo-SAY'-er) alone and had to rely on help from Iranian-backed Hezbollah. Carney says Syria's government must allow the U.N. and others to evacuate Qusair's wounded and provide medical treatment.Carney also says the Syrian regime blatantly violated Lebanon's sovereignty by mounting a cross-border attack Wednesday on a mainly Sunni town in Lebanon near the Syrian border.
BEIRUT — Syria's army said on Wednesday that the capture of the town of Qusair from rebel fighters showed that President Bashar al-Assad's forces would eventually regain control of the whole country from their enemies."This is a clear message to all those who share in the aggression on Syria ... that we will continue our string of victories until we regain every inch of Syrian land," said a statement by the armed forces command read out on state television. "We will not hesitate to crush with an iron fist those who attack us. ... Their fate is surrender or death"
QUSAIR, Syria — Apart from a bullet-scarred clock tower that somehow survived the battle, few buildings still stood on Wednesday in the ruined streets of the former rebel stronghold of Qusair, seized hours earlier by Syrian President Bashar al-Assad's forces.A Syrian flag, planted on top of the tower by one of the fighters who drove the rebels out, fluttered above the concrete shells of buildings which ring Qusair's central square.Windows had been blown out and walls flattened in the brutal two-week battle for the border town which rebels used as a bridgehead to bring in weapons and fighters from Lebanon.The streets of the town, once home to 30,000 people, were empty except for Syrian soldiers and their Lebanese Hezbollah guerrilla allies who launched the final pre-dawn offensive of a battle that has turned momentum in the two-year civil war.Three dead men lay in one street, their twisted, bullet-riddled bodies lying on a mound of concrete debris in front of a wall daubed with blood.Amid the destruction and desolation, tired but jubilant troops celebrated their triumph."My happiness is indescribable," said Hossam, a 25-year-old soldier from the southern province of Suwaida. "This is a real victory for us - Qusair is back to Syria and the Syrians.""We are heading now to crush Debaa," said one of his army comrades, referring to the village north-east of Qusair where rebel fighters had been holding out earlier this week. At one stage six tanks could be seen heading out on the Debaa road.The triumphalism was echoed in graffiti written on Qusair's remaining walls. "Our leader Bashar" and "We will not bow" the slogans said.Another fighter said he was going home to rest after four sleepless nights. "We went in, there was some fighting and then (the rebels) withdrew," he said. "We saw them leaving in about 400 cars."On opposite sides of the main square a church and a mosque both bore the scars of war. The church walls were damaged and the dome of the mosque had also been hit.On a tour of four streets near the center of town, hundreds of shops and houses were destroyed or damaged. Trees lining the streets were burnt."The people of Qusair will build it again. There is a reconstruction plan," regional governor Ahmad Mounir Mohammad said, calling on residents to return now that their town was "stable and secure".Shortly afterwards bulldozers started moving piles of rubble, as bursts of gunfire still erupted across the town - fired either in celebration or by soldiers shooting into buildings as they combed the town for remaining rebels.Soldiers said they had cleared hundreds of mines and unexploded ordnance, warning visitors to stay away from home-made bombs made out of gas canisters which still lay among the debris throughout the streets.Residents had long since fled the fighting. There were few traces left of the rebels who made a last stand here over the past week.Near the main square a two-storey building appeared to have been used as a clinic for rebel fighters.A man's leg lay in a bag on the bloodstained floor. Tea cups were had been left out and the fan was still whirring to temper the early summer heat."Please do not bring weapons into the hospital," said a sign at the entrance. The clinic was packed with hundreds of boxes of drugs, most of them unopened, containing blood serum, antibiotics and adrenaline. In one of three operation rooms on the upper floor, dozens of blood-soaked bandages had been discarded, leaving a stale smell through the building.One of the houses nearby showed signs that its occupants had left in haste - plates, glasses and a teapot were still laid out, abandoned. Inside a shop next door, a large hole in the ground marked the opening of a tunnel, part of a network used to connect neighborhoods of the fortified rebel stronghold.On another street some army soldiers could be seen looting goods from a shop, carrying two electric fans away with them.On the road into Qusair from neighboring Lebanon some fields had been set alight. Burnt out cars on the roadside became more frequent on the approach to the town and heavy tank tracks made the road itself hard to pass.Sandbags, some piled up to three meters high, were riddled with bullet-holes.In the Christian village of Rableh outside Qusair children waved Syrian flags, people held up pictures of Assad and Hezbollah leader Sayyed Hassan Nasrallah, and a woman shouted their thanks to a passing army convoy.
IBLIL, Syria — The airstrikes resumed at 7:30 a.m., beginning with a rolling series of explosions in the village of Zoghba. An extended roar shook the northern Hama Plain.In nearby Iblil, rebel fighters listened knowingly. If the pattern held, shells and rockets would soon follow — and hundreds of opposition fighters in villages they had recently claimed would face another punishing day.Roughly six weeks ago, as foreign governments were focused on whether chemical weapons had been used in Syria's civil war, several rebel groups made a decision blending boldness and risk. Eager to break a painful near-stalemate that has settled over the war since late last summer, they opened a front here on the arid flatlands east of the Aleppo-Damascus highway.At first the rebel thrust moved swiftly. But as the fight has unfolded, the battle here has assumed the war's seesawing and bloody rhythm, capturing many of the dynamics of a conflict exhausting its mismatched adversaries, and putting the nation on a path toward disintegration.The rebels had calculated that a successful offensive through the network of villages here would bypass government strong points near the cities and create fresh opportunities for severing Syria's main highway.In this way, they might deplete the ammunition and other supplies of army outposts in Idlib and Hama — sources of much of the shelling of civilian neighborhoods — so that the outposts could be defeated piecemeal. And it might also take pressure off a long-running siege. "We are making a corridor not to Hama, but to Homs," said Abu Hamza al-Hamwi, from Ahfad al-Rasul, or the Grandsons of the Prophet, who commands part of the rebel forces on this new Hama front. Homs is a major city south of Hama.The military has replied with intensive shelling and repeated airstrikes. Villages along the way have been abandoned and partly destroyed. And tensions have flared, with forces divided on sectarian lines and neighbor turning on neighbor, for profit, power and personal gain.For many of the fighters, the new offensive had an especially emotional character, of a sort played out often in Syria's displaced population: These were men trying to return to villages from which they had been driven at gunpoint.In recent decades, the northeastern Hama Plain had been a demographically mixed area, its villages populated by Alawite, Sunni and Bedouin families.After the Syrian Army was deployed into the cities in 2011, these villages assumed a tactical significance. A formerly quiet patch of not especially fertile farmland was now a buffer that insulated Hama, where the army is thickly garrisoned, and the eastern side of the Aleppo-Damascus highway, one of the military's logistical lifelines.The area's new importance brought with it loyalist militias, criminal opportunities and sectarian troubles. The Alawite-led military, rebels said, set about forcing Sunni families away from villages and neighborhoods, and established a network of outposts, often supported with tanks and armored fighting vehicles, and within range of supporting rocket and artillery fire from larger outposts near the highway.The war took an intimately ugly shape. Mohammad Ibrahim Derey, 45, a farmer and business owner from the plain who is now a rebel battalion commander, said one of his Alawite friends, Rifaat Baroudy, became the leader of a loyalist militia, known among rebels as shabiha, and began ordering Sunni farmers and families to leave.Mr. Derey said he called Mr. Baroudy for permission to remove his possessions from his own home. He was told he could not. "I had never thought of such a thing," he said. "I found myself jobless, homeless."That a man he knew well had turned on him made Mr. Derey's losses even more disorienting. "We were friends, we had some trade together," he said of Mr. Baroudy. "We used to have breakfast together."
MANILA, Philippines — A Filipino peacekeeper in the Golan Heights was wounded Thursday during fighting between Syrian government and rebel forces, a Philippine military spokesman said.The soldier suffered a leg injury from an artillery or mortar shell that landed at Camp Ziouni, a logistics base for the U.N. Disengagement Observer Force, said Lt. Col. Ramon Zagala.The soldier, one of the more than 300 Filipino peacekeepers, was in stable condition, Zagala said.It was unclear whether the shell came from the government or rebel side.The incident highlights the vulnerability of peacekeepers in the Syrian conflict.In March, 21 Filipino peacekeepers were taken captive by a rebel group which released them unharmed after four days. The same group, the Yarmouk Martyrs Brigade, seized four more Filipino soldiers last month and released them five days later.Philippine Foreign Secretary Albert del Rosario recommended the pullout of all Filipino peacekeepers from the Golan Heights after the latest abduction. President Benigno Aquino III has not yet approved the recommendation.
BEIRUT — Two men died in clashes near a Lebanese army checkpoint on Thursday, a security source said, in a possible spillover from the recent fighting in the nearby Syrian border town of Qusair.Forces loyal to Syrian President Bashar al-Assad seized Qusair on Wednesday after two weeks of fighting during which some people escaped towards the Lebanese town of Arsal, close to where the gunfight happened.The security source said one of the dead gunmen was a Syrian national, while the second man was not carrying any ID.In further overnight violence, Lebanon's national news agency said 11 rockets had hit the town of Baalbek, a stronghold of the Lebanese Shi'ite group Hezbollah, which has thrown its weight fully behind Assad's war effort.There were no reports of injury or damage.Syrian rebels, who are mainly Sunni Muslims, have said they will take revenge on Hezbollah, whose well-trained guerrillas proved decisive in the capture of Qusair.
WASHINGTON — President Obama named Susan E. Rice and Samantha Power to major national security posts on Wednesday, promoting two outspoken voices for humanitarian intervention on a foreign policy team known for its deep caution in dealing with conflicts abroad.The president they serve has steadfastly resisted intervening in the most dire human-rights calamity he has faced since taking office: the civil war in Syria. Given Mr. Obama's well-known skepticism about the dangers of more direct involvement, it is not clear whether Ms. Rice and Ms. Power can — or even want to — change his mind about more aggressive action.But there is little doubt that along with two other recent additions to his national security team, Secretary of State John Kerry and Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel, they will bring a different tone to foreign policy in Mr. Obama's second term.At the same time, the resignation of Tom Donilon as national security adviser, which precipitated Wednesday's announcement, could create complications for a White House that takes pride in a smooth-running operation that Mr. Donilon has overseen for more than two and a half years.Ms. Rice, who is taking Mr. Donilon's job, and Ms. Power, who is replacing Ms. Rice as ambassador to the United Nations, joined forces in 2011, along with Hillary Rodham Clinton, then the secretary of state, to persuade Mr. Obama to back a NATO-led intervention in Libya. Yet neither Ms. Rice, 48, nor Ms. Power, 42, has spoken out in favor of a more aggressive response in Syria, attesting to both the insoluble nature of the conflict and the discipline of the White House.In introducing Ms. Rice, who like Ms. Power worked on his 2008 campaign, Mr. Obama praised her mix of idealism and pragmatism."Everybody understands Susan is a fierce champion for justice and human dignity," he said in a Rose Garden ceremony. "But she's also mindful that we have to exercise our power wisely and deliberately."How Ms. Rice wields her enhanced power could have implications for what has been a generally harmonious national security team. Given her foreign policy background, strong views and personal ties to Mr. Obama, some believe her appointment will further consolidate foreign policy decision-making in the White House.In an interview, Ms. Rice said she viewed her role as bringing "as much rigor to our problem-solving as possible.""My style is to be collegial," she added. "I don't need the glory; I want to get stuff done."But Ms. Rice's ascendancy could be a headache for Mr. Kerry, whose path to the State Department opened up after the furor over her role in explaining the deadly attack on the American Mission in Benghazi, Libya, forced her to withdraw her name from consideration for the department's top job.White House officials played down suggestions that Mr. Kerry was at risk of being marginalized, noting that he had carved out a prominent role in dealing with the Syrian conflict as well as in trying to revive peace talks between the Israelis and the Palestinians."John Kerry is going to be a very aggressive diplomat," said Benjamin J. Rhodes, a deputy national security adviser. "We support him diving headfirst into some very tough issues."Mr. Rhodes said that although Ms. Rice and Ms. Power adhered to the tenets of liberal interventionism, which holds that the United States has an obligation to defend human rights aggressively, neither reflexively advocated the use of military force.During the administration's debate last summer about whether to supply the Syrian rebels with weapons — a proposal pushed by the director of the Central Intelligence Agency at the time, David H. Petraeus, and favored by Mrs. Clinton — Ms. Rice sided with officials who opposed it. Mr. Obama shelved the idea.Over time, friends of Ms. Rice said, she has become more open to providing lethal aid because it could change the momentum in what has become a stalemate. But she is said to be wary of any halfway strategy, which she believes would do more harm than good.
NEAR QUSAYR, Syria — In the final days of their stubborn but increasingly hopeless stand against an overwhelming assault, Syrian rebels hid among the concrete shells of destroyed houses in the village of Hamediyeh, subsisting on olives and canned beans. They tried to sleep, without much success, in tunnels dug for shelter from government shelling.Explosions echoed from the nearby town of Qusayr, a besieged rebel stronghold where a humanitarian crisis was growing as trapped fighters and civilians died of treatable wounds and surgeons operated without anesthetics. In the surrounding villages, ripening yellow wheat went unharvested. Apricot orchards stood neglected. Fields were burned, trees chopped for firewood.Yet even before the rebels fled from most of Qusayr on Wednesday under withering fire, the most striking destruction was intangible: the rending of the area's social fabric. A patchwork of sects and ethnicities, long intertwined through ties of business, friendship, tribe and family, stretches across the nearby border to Lebanon's northern Bekaa Valley.As Hezbollah guerrillas from across the border besieged Qusayr along with Syrian troops, Sunni Muslim rebels and civilians here declared that those ties were broken, perhaps irrevocably, and that their struggle to topple the government had become a sectarian war.As a reporter traveled last week through Qusayr's hinterland, rebels and civilian opponents of President Bashar al-Assad said they still dreamed of a better future and a stronger say in their government. But sooner or later, nearly all of them veered into venting rage against other sects they saw as supporting Mr. Assad — particularly Shiite Muslims, whom they blamed for the many casualties they suffered as the well-trained soldiers of Hezbollah, the Lebanese Shiite militia, led an intense assault."We will not forget what Hassan Nasrallah did," Abu Zaid, 40, a fighter from Qusayr, said, referring to Hezbollah's leader. "We will take revenge from him and his organization even after 100 years."People here feel particularly betrayed by Hezbollah, an organization long respected by Syrians of all faiths for its fight against Israel. Because of their proximity to Lebanon, families in Qusayr and the surrounding villages sheltered many Lebanese refugees during Hezbollah's war with Israel in 2006.Leading the way through back roads to avoid government checkpoints, where weary-looking soldiers stopped cars carrying young men, Abu Mahmoud, 50, said he and his sons had used the same routes to smuggle many weapons to Hezbollah. Now, he said, he was using them to smuggle rebel arms and fighters to Qusayr."Oh God," he said, "it is like a dream to see Syrians fighting Hezbollah."Rebel fighters proudly described the preparations that had allowed their outnumbered and outgunned force to hold off the assault for longer than expected: tunnels that allowed them to slip in and out of the town; underground command rooms stocked with food, water and drugs; booby traps and mines; even cameras that monitored their attackers."We got this experience from Hezbollah's tactics against the Israelis," said Abu Ali, a fighter in Hamediyeh who, like most people interviewed, gave only a nom de guerre for safety. "Today we are using the same tactics against Hezbollah."Taking a break from leading a band of rebels in the village, he added: "They attack us in our villages and homes, we don't attack them in their houses. So they will see something they will never forget."Despite their bravado, fighters around Qusayr said they felt alone, exhausted and abandoned in the face of a more powerful opponent. Strikingly, some seemed to borrow from Hezbollah's history: a sense of dispossession and grievance that they said would be felt for generations.That feeling is more traditionally embraced by Shiites, who still mourn the defeat and death of the revered Imam Hussein in a 7th-century battle that cemented the temporal power of the faction that would become known as Sunnis. In Qusayr, as the rebels saw it, it was the Shiites who were allied with the powers that be."The Shiites shout at us that we are the killers of Hussein," Abu Zeid said. "We will call them the killers of women and children."
DAMASCUS, Syria — With fresh momentum from the capture of a strategic town in western Syria, President Bashar Assad's forces have turned their sights to driving rebel fighters from the country's densely populated heartland, including the cities of Homs and Aleppo.The latest battlefield success, due in large part to Lebanese Hezbollah fighters' increasing role and the West's continued reluctance to arm the rebels, raises the possibility that Assad can cling to power for years, even if he won't be able to recapture all of the country.Government troops pressed ahead Thursday with an aggressive military offensive in Homs province, seizing control of the village of Dabaa just north of Qusair, near the border with Lebanon. Hundreds of rebel fighters who had been entrenched in Qusair for more than a year fled Wednesday after a punishing three-week assault, retreating to surrounding areas.The regime triumph in Qusair, a key crossroads town of supply lines between Damascus and western and northern Syria, showcased the potentially game-changing role of Hezbollah in Syria's civil war and was openly celebrated in the militant group's strongholds in Lebanon and in Damascus, the seat of Assad's power.Syrian state-run media portrayed Qusair's fall as a turning point in the more than two-year civil war that has killed more than 70,000 people.In reality, though, it's unlikely that Assad will be able to roll back rebel gains across the country. Dozens of rebel fighter brigades have taken unquestioned control of huge swathes of territory in the country's north and east, setting up local councils and Islamic courts to administer affairs in towns and villages. Kurds have all but carved out their own separate existence in the country's northeast.At best, Assad will continue to preside over a divided country, with armed militias ruling over ethnic fiefdoms. A violent insurgency is likely to continue even in areas where the regime regains control.But if the regime continues to enjoy the strong backing of allies Hezbollah, Russia and Iran, Assad could try to reassert himself in much of Syria, even if he can't win back all of the country.Josef Holliday of the Institute for the Study of War, a Washington think tank, said he believes Assad is not aiming for outright victory over the rebels in all of Syria. "The objective is survival in what they (regime loyalists) consider the strategically important parts of Syria, with the majority of the population," he said.Following the victory in Qusair, the regime's next targets are rebel-held areas in and around the city of Homs, a government official told The Associated Press. As Syria's third-largest city and one-time epicenter of the uprising, Homs holds both strategic and symbolic importance for the regime.In April 2011, one month after the uprising against Assad began, protesters gathered at central Clock Square in Homs, bringing mattresses, food and water in hopes of emulating Cairo's Tahrir Square during the Egyptian revolution.The peaceful, mass protests eroded Assad's narrative that the uprising was the work of "terrorists" and "armed thugs," and were quickly put down. Since then, the predominantly Sunni city, with Christian and Alawite minorities, has come under crushing attack on numerous occasions."The (army) command has put forward a plan, which is being executed," said the government official, speaking on condition of anonymity because he was not authorized to divulge details about ongoing military operations.He said the army was carrying out "quick, successive attacks" to secure the northern entrance of Homs city and seized the village of al-Khaldiyeh along the way Thursday. It also intends to regain the rebel strongholds of Rastan and Talbiseh, towns just north of Homs city.Securing Homs could boost the momentum for Syrian troops in rolling back rebel gains in other parts of the country, including northern Syria, where the sides have been locked in a stalemate for months. Pro-regime media outlets have said government forces are preparing to move to retake the contested northern city of Aleppo next.Aleppo, Syria's largest city and commercial hub, was overrun by rebels last summer, and remains one of the country's bloodiest battlegrounds as rebels and regime forces fight over it.Hezbollah fighters were instrumental to the regime victory in Qusair, but it's not clear whether they will participate to the same extent in future battles deeper inside Syria.Qusair is close to the Lebanese borders, making it easier for Hezbollah to ship fighters and weapons from the Lebanese side of the border. The militia has also sent fighters to two areas near Damascus, just a two-hour drive from the Lebanese border, while many of the rebel-held areas are more remote and more difficult for Hezbollah to reach.The level of Hezbollah's future involvement might depend, at least in part, on the backlash in Lebanon. The militia's involvement, particularly since the start of the Qusair offensive, has led to growing clashes between Assad opponents and supporters in Lebanon, raising fears of a spillover into a fragile country scarred by its own 15-year civil war.Hezbollah has justified its involvement in the fight for Qusair by saying it was protecting Lebanon from Sunni extremists among the ranks of rebels fighting Assad.It's unclear whether the Shiite militant group will be willing to stray so far from the Lebanese border, although there are unconfirmed reports that its fighters took part in an assault on two Shiite villages in Aleppo province.Jeff White of the Washington Institute for Near East Policy said the rebels were in for trouble, unless they improve their military and political command structure and get more weapons."The regime has laid down the challenge, and the rebels will have to respond, or they will have a bleak future ahead of them," he said.The West, particularly the United States, has been reluctant to send more sophisticated weapons out of fear they might fall into the hands of Islamic extremists fighting in the rebel ranks, including members of Jabhat al-Nusra, which has sworn allegiance to al-Qaida.It remains to be seen whether Hezbollah's military engagement alongside the Syrian regime will prod the West to arm the rebels, who are no match for Hezbollah's military power and the regime's aerial superiority. A European arms embargo expired last week, freeing up individual nations to arm the rebels unilaterally.The recent military gains are also bound to harden regime positions if talks on a peaceful transition ever get off the ground.A U.N.-sponsored international conference that was to bring representatives of the Assad government and the opposition together for negotiations has now been put off to at least July.The regime has confirmed it will attend, albeit with conditions, while the main opposition group has gotten bogged down in discussions over who might attend, in part a reflection of rivalries between backers Saudi Arabia and Qatar, instead of devising a strategy for talks. Turkey, another country backing the rebels, has been distracted by large-scale anti-government protests at home.All the while, Assad ally Russia has never wavered in its support of the Damascus government.Holliday, the analyst, said that although Assad may succeed in expanding his control and cling to power, the conflict in Syria is likely to go on for a long time."No one is going to win this war. It's going to go on for a while," he said.Karam reported from Beirut. Associated Press writer Karin Laub in Ramallah, West Bank, contributed to this report.
BEIRUT/CAIRO — Sunni Muslim preachers condemned Iran and its "Satanic" Shi'ite allies in Friday sermons, after a battle in Syria that has inflamed sectarian rhetoric which risks spreading violence around the Middle East.In Tehran, the non-Arab power behind the Shi'ite strand of Islam followed by a minority of Muslims, Iran's Supreme Leader Ayatollah Ali Khamenei called for restraint and unity, blaming Western powers and Israel for fomenting the sectarian strife.But across the Gulf in Saudi Arabia, a bastion of hardline Sunni theology and opposition to Iran, a senior cleric aligned with the U.S.-allied government spoke of a Shi'ite "plot against Islam" that was made newly apparent in the assault by Lebanese Hezbollah fighters on Sunni rebels in the Syrian town of Qusair.In Qatar, the International Association of Muslim Scholars, a Sunni body headed by influential cleric Sheikh Youssef al-Qaradawi, condemned the "Qusair massacre" and called for "a day of rage" in support of the Syrian people next Friday, according to a statement posted online.The two-year-old uprising against Iranian-backed Syrian President Bashar al-Assad, whose Alawite minority is an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam, has taken an ever more poisonously sectarian tone as the number of dead and displaced has soared, increasing risks of inflaming the broader Sunni-Shi'ite confrontation.In Egypt, by far the most populous Arab state, where the Arab Spring protests of 2011 brought the Sunni Islamist Muslim Brotherhood to power, a leading cleric and Brotherhood member led televised prayers on Friday in which he described Hezbollah - 'the party of God' in Arabic - as "the party of Satan"."God, break the backs of Bashar and his supporters," Salah Sultan, secretary-general of Egypt's Supreme Council for Islamic Affairs, said at a Cairo mosque. "God, break the back of Hezbollah, the party of Satan, God, break the back of Iran."While Shi'ites and Alawites rejoiced after the border town of Qusair fell on Wednesday to Hezbollah and Assad's troops, talk of vengeance against entire communities has increased both in Syria and across the frontier in Lebanon, where sectarian rivalries remain acute two decades after its own long civil war.In the northern Lebanese city of Tripoli, where Shi'ites and Sunnis have fought, a hardline cleric, Sheikh Bilal Baroudi, told worshippers: "Hezbollah is responsible for the consequences of this jihad invasion against Sunnis in Qusair."The response that is coming will be harsh."In Beirut, where the Shi'ite southern suburbs erupted in joy after the fall of Qusair, prominent Sunni preacher Da'i al-Islam al-Shahhal urged followers to resist Iranian attempts to control Iraq, Lebanon and Syria as a step to conquering the Gulf states:"I call on all those zealous and concerned to help us," he said. "Stand with us financially and morally to foil the plan."Ayatollah Khamenei appealed for pan-Muslim unity against "hegemonic powers" - the "corrupt capitalist" West and Israel: "The enemy's main scheme is to create rifts and conflict among Muslims," he was quoted as saying. "So, unity, solidarity and cooperation are the most pressing needs of the Muslim world."Senior Saudi cleric Sheikh Saleh al-Fawzan, in comments in al-Madina newspaper, underlined Sunni suspicion of such calls:Shi'ites, he said, "pretend to be Muslims and try to get closer to the Sunnis ... in order for them to be able to plot against Islam ... these days their hostility has become more apparent in their war against the Sunnis in Syria."Appeals for a united front, notably against Israel, which once won Hezbollah widespread respect among Sunni Arabs, now fall on deaf ears following the Shi'ite movement's overt drive to save Assad and provide a bulwark for Iranian influence.As one Lebanese woman in a Sunni neighborhood of Beirut put it, as she listened with disdain to festivities echoing from a Shi'ite stronghold after Hezbollah's victory at Qusair: "What are they celebrating? You'd think they'd liberated Jerusalem."Hardliners on each side accuse the other of furthering the goals of common adversaries in the West or in Israel.In the Gaza Strip, whose Palestinian Hamas rulers were once allies of Assad and Hezbollah, hardline cleric Imad al-Daya told worshippers that Qusair had exposed the "fraud" of Hezbollah's rhetoric about leading "resistance" to Israel."Wake up," he told worshippers. "This is a war of religion." Shi'ites, he added, had always been "a knife in Muslims' backs".The numbers across the Middle East who may be enraged to the point of taking up arms may be small, but any such move threatens to add to the 80,000 or more already killed in Syria and to the countless thousands killed in sectarian bloodletting in Lebanon from 1975 to 1990 and in Iraq over the past decade.The level of sectarian rhetoric seen from leaders of various kinds in the two weeks since Hezbollah's Sheikh Hassan Nasrallah pledged to fight for Assad until a final victory may pressure regional governments to be seen to take their own hard lines.The rift among world powers along Cold War lines, between the West and Moscow, has thwarted efforts for a U.N. peace deal within Syria or to stop the flow of arms to the warring parties.Israel has already stepped in to the conflict, bombing Syria and now facing trouble on the Golan Heights. Some in the West also now want their governments to intervene to prop up a rebel cause that has suffered a serious setback at Qusair.Many Sunni clerics have spoken in support of a call to holy war in Syria issued last week by Qaradawi. Based in Qatar, which like Saudi Arabia backs the rebels, he has at times been seen as opposed to favoring reconciliation with Shi'ites.But he has now said Sunnis should go to fight in Syria. His comments were endorsed by the kingdom's Grand Mufti - whose voice carries special weight in coming from the birthplace of Islam. Similar statements from some of Egypt's ruling Muslim Brotherhood, long at odds with the Saudi religious hierarchy, underlined the broad strength of feeling.Many mainstream mosques in Egypt avoided outspoken comment on Syria on Friday. Islamist President Mohamed Mursi has opened some rapprochement with Tehran in the past year. But the arrival of Iranian tourists that this warming of relations has brought since the fall of the U.S.-backed rule of Hosni Mubarak has been accompanied by new criticism of Shi'ites by some in Egypt.In the Red Sea city of Hurghada, where some Iranians have been on holiday lately, preacher Mohamad Daraz, whose Salafist movement sees the Brotherhood as too liberal, said: "God, annihilate the Shi'ites and those who cooperate with them."While there are few Shi'ites in Egypt, risks of sectarian conflict have risen from the Gulf in the east, where Saudi Arabia has a Shi'ite minority, through Iraq and Syria to Lebanon and Turkey in the west.Syria and its immediate neighbors Lebanon and Iraq provide a proxy battleground for bigger regional powers that seem, for now, unlikely to risk a direct conflict. But there is also little sign of leaders trying to moderate sectarian passions.In a blog for Foreign Policy magazine, Marc Lynch of George Washington University saw the hard line taken by the sometimes conciliatory Qaradawi as a signal that Sunni leaders may try to outbid each other, raising the stakes of anti-Shi'ite populism."He clearly calculates that anti-Shi'ite sectarianism in support of the Syrian insurgency is both strategically useful and a political winner," Lynch wrote. "Expect the competition among Sunnis to adopt the most extreme stances to accelerate."By the time more responsible figures realize the destructive forces they've unleashed - or Qaradawi attempts his standard pivot towards reconciliation - it may be too late."
HOMS, Syria — In one district in the battered city of Homs, one school educates children while the other three shelter families who fled fighting in neighboring areas more than a year ago.Most of the 1,200 people camped out in the classrooms only expected to stay for a few days in the mistaken belief that the violence would soon end.But as the weeks turned to months, a new order has taken hold - one where only the women can safely venture out, where the men live in fear of arrest, where a barter economy thrives and inventiveness has flourished."In a way, it's like a large prison," said a female resident of one of the schools, who, like many of the displaced people, declined to give her name for fear of reprisals. Most in the schools, which are in a government controlled area of Homs, are opposed to President Bashar al-Assad.The Syrian Arab Red Crescent says up to four million people have been internally displaced within Syria by the rebellion against Assad, which broke out more than two years ago and shows no sign of abating.With the humanitarian crisis worsening, the United Nations warned on Friday that half of all Syrians -- or more than 10 million people -- will need aid by the end of this year and called for $5 billion in emergency funds, which it said was the biggest such appeal ever made.Homs, 140 km (90 miles) north of Damascus, is Syria's third largest city and an epicenter of the revolt, with fierce battles leaving 17 of its 21 neighborhoods in rubble.Shelling and gunfire continue in and around the city in restive areas. Further to the south, Assad's forces launched a successful counteroffensive to capture the town of Qusair this week, but whether they will push north to Homs or bypass it remains unclear.Snipers, kidnappings and revenge killings make travel in most of Homs particularly perilous. Exactly who is behind such mayhem is hard to determine in the chaos of war, with pro-government residents blaming the rebels and vice versa.Occasionally one of the men might sneak out of the school and try to cross the devastated city to see whether it is safe to return to their abandoned homes. It clearly isn't."We don't hear of them again. They disappear," said Fatma, a mother of four who used to live in the nearby suburb of Bayada.The lurking danger leaves the school's unwilling residents stuck in limbo, surviving day-to-day as best they can.Fresh food is hard to find, with young children starting to show the signs of vitamin deficiencies and mothers facing a dire shortage of baby milk, volunteer doctors say.Hepatitis A is on the rise as government-subsidized vaccines are no longer available, and an outbreak of Leishmania, a parasitic disease transferred through the bites of sand flies, needed some inventive thinking to bring under control.To combat the illness, which can cause fever, breathing problems, ulcers and skin sores, a few residents, most of them unemployed engineers, managed to build an insecticide machine."Then we went to the municipality and begged for pesticide, and luckily they had some in stock. It was one month away from its expiry date," said one of the organizers.Such resourcefulness is typical of school life. Recruiting carpenters and metalworkers from among the displaced men, they have built outhouses in the playground, and refurbished half-finished apartments to allow displaced families to squat there.Since cash is hard to come by, workers get paid through a barter system. "You do my window frame. I'll do your door," explained one of the organizers.Most of the men stick close to the school for fear of running into a government checkpoint, where they have to show their ID card. These documents clearly mark the origin of their holders, so men who come from restive areas known for harboring armed rebels face immediate detention and questioning.Death is perhaps one of the most complicated acts that can unfold at the school, as it creates "a nightmare of red tape and interrogations," said one of the residents."State security used to allow two family members to bury the body," said a young mother who recently lost a female relative, adding that the authorities were now suspicious of every death, probing for possible involvement in the rebel cause."They ask so many questions about how the death occurred, and they don't allow anyone to go with the body ... Inshallah they prayed over her when they buried her, but I don't know."When families fleeing the nearby fighting started to arrive in previously affluent neighborhoods, some locals realized it was for the long-term. One such resident, an art teacher named Ezza, decided not to give them any charity but instead tried to help them earn some money."Don't buy them fish, but show them how to fish," she said. "So I've been teaching some of the women how to do embroidery and art craft, and we've put together three exhibits so far, and sold their work."Fatma, one of her best students, lives with her family and dozens of relatives. Asked how the men view her work, which brings in the only income, she laughed: "Sometimes my husband helps out by holding the ball of yarn as I knit."Each classroom is shared by two families, with a makeshift wooden wall in the middle providing some semblance of privacy. A strict schedule dividing time and precious hot water among the resident families hangs at the bathroom entrance. Meals are eaten communally. Home life is a distant memory."We used to talk a lot about returning home. We don't any more. But the kids always have dreams," said Fatma."My daughter tells me: 'Mama, I saw myself walking down our street, and our home was still there.' And the other one says: 'Mama, I saw our home, but it was missing a wall.'"
LONDON — Britain said on Sunday it and other countries were "very reluctant" to arm rebels in Syria even as it warned that success on the battlefield by forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad was undermining chances of a Geneva peace conference.Britain and France worked together last month to lift a European Union embargo on arms shipments to Syrian rebels, giving them the flexibility to send weapons to forces who complain they are dramatically outgunned.But Foreign Secretary William Hague said on Sunday that no such decision had yet been taken and promised for the first time to give MPs a vote in parliament if and when it was."There would be a vote one way or the other," he told BBC TV, saying Britain and the world were faced with an agonising foreign policy and ethical dilemma."People have understandable concerns about the idea of sending arms to anybody in Syria and we'd all be very reluctant to do that," he said."On the other hand, at the moment, people are being killed in huge numbers while the world denies them the right to defend themselves."Hague's intervention comes as U.S.-Russian efforts to convene a peace conference in Geneva are faltering after the rebels lost control of the strategic border town of Qusair last week, weakening their negotiating hand.One rebel commander has since been quoted as saying the opposition will boycott a peace conference unless it receives arms.But Prime Minister David Cameron's government is split on the issue with some ministers fearing such a move could worsen the bloodshed and drag Britain into a protracted conflict.Hague said he was gloomy about the prospect of a Geneva peace conference."The regime has gained ground. That makes the Geneva conference harder to bring about and to make a success. It makes it less likely that the regime will make enough concessions in such negotiations, and it makes it harder to get the opposition to come to the negotiations."They're not coming together in the next couple of weeks. I find that worrying and depressing," he added.The United Nations estimates at least 80,000 people have died in the Syrian conflict.U.N. humanitarian agencies launched a $5 billion (3.2 billion pounds) appeal on Friday, the biggest in their history, to cope with the fallout from the fighting that has sent some 1.6 million refugees fleeing to neighbouring countries.
WASHINGTON — Moved by the Assad regime's rapid advance, the Obama administration could decide this week to approve lethal aid for the beleaguered Syrian rebels and will weigh the merits of a less likely move to send in U.S. airpower to enforce a no-fly zone over the civil war-wracked nation, officials said Sunday.White House meetings are planned over the coming days, as Syrian President Bashar Assad's government forces are apparently poised for an attack on the key city of Homs, which could cut off Syria's armed opposition from the south of the country. As many as 5,000 Hezbollah fighters are now in Syria, officials believe, helping the regime press on with its campaign after capturing the town of Qusair near the Lebanese border last week.Opposition leaders have warned Washington that their rebellion could face devastating and irreversible losses without greater support, and the warnings are prompting the United States to consider drastic action.Secretary of State John Kerry postponed a planned trip Monday to Israel and three other Mideast countries to participate in White House discussions, said officials who weren't authorized to speak publicly on the matter and demanded anonymity.While nothing has been concretely decided, U.S. officials said President Barack Obama was leaning closer toward signing off on sending weapons to vetted, moderate rebel units. The U.S. has spoken of possibly arming the opposition in recent months but has been hesitant because it doesn't want al-Qaida-linked and other extremists fighting alongside the anti-Assad militias to end up with the weapons.Obama already has ruled out any intervention that would require U.S. military boots on the ground. Other options such as deploying American air power to ground the regime's jets, gunships and other aerial assets are now being more seriously debated, the officials said, while cautioning that a no-fly zone or any other action involving U.S. military deployments in Syria were far less likely right now.The president also has declared chemical weapons use by the Assad regime a "red line" for more forceful U.S. action. American allies including France and Britain have say they've determined with near certitude that Syrian forces have used low levels of sarin in several attacks, but the administration is still studying the evidence. The U.S. officials said responses that will be mulled over in this week's meetings concern the deteriorating situation on the ground in Syria, independent of final confirmation of possible chemical weapons use.White House spokeswoman Bernadette Meehan said Obama's advisers were considering all options to hasten a transition in Syria."The United States will continue to look for ways to strengthen the capabilities of the Syrian opposition," she said.Any intervention could have wide-reaching ramifications for the United States and the region. It would bring the U.S. closer to a conflict that has killed almost 80,000 people since Assad cracked down on protesters inspired by the Arab Spring in March 2011 and sparked a war that has since been increasingly defined by sectarian clashes between the Sunni-led rebellion and Assad's Alawite-dominated regime.And it would essentially pit the United States alongside regional allies Saudi Arabia, Turkey and Qatar in a proxy war against Iran, which is providing much of the materiel to the Syrian government's counterinsurgency and, through Hezbollah, more and more of the manpower.Syria's precarious position in the heart of the Middle East makes the conflict extremely unpredictable. Lebanon, across the western border, suffered its own brutal civil war in the 1970s and the 1980s and is already experiencing increased interethnic tensions. Iraq, to Syria's east, is mired in worsening violence. And Israel to the southwest has seen shots fired across the contested Golan Heights and has been forced to strike what it claimed were advanced weapons convoys heading to Hezbollah, with whom it went to war with in 2006.Iran could wreak havoc in the region through its support of Shiite militant groups, and U.S. officials fear Iran may seek to retaliate for any stepped-up American involvement by targeting Israel or U.S. interests in the region. It's also unclear what American action would mean for relations with Russia, which has provided Assad with military and diplomatic support even as it claims that it working with the United States to try to organize a Syrian peace conference.At the same time, it's unclear how Washington could fundamentally change the trajectory of a conflict that has increasingly tilted toward Assad in recent months without providing weapons to the opposition forces or getting involved itself.The administration has been studying for months how to rebalance Syria's war so that moderate, pro-democracy rebels defeat the regime or make life so difficult for Assad and his supporters that the government decides it must join a peace process that entails a transition away from the Assad family's four-decade dictatorship.But Assad's military successes appear to have rendered peace efforts largely meaningless in the short term. While Kerry and his Russian counterpart Sergey Lavrov have been trying to rally support for the planned conference in Geneva — first envisioned for May and since postponed until July at the earliest — even America's allies in the Syrian opposition leadership have questioned the wisdom of sitting down for talks while they are ceding territory all over the country to Assad's forces.Beyond weapons support for the rebels, administration officials harbor deep reservations about other options.They note that a no-fly zone, championed by hawks in Congress such as Sen. John McCain, R-Ariz., would require the U.S. to first neutralize Syrian air defense systems that have been reinforced with Russian technology and are far stronger than those that Libyan dictator Moammar Gadhafi had before the U.S. and its Arab and European allies helped rebels overthrow him in 2011. And unlike with Libya, Washington has no clear international mandate for authorizing any strikes inside Syria, a point the Obama administration has harped on since late 2011 to explain its reticence about more forceful action.Homs has one of the biggest Alawite communities in Syria and is widely seen as pro-Assad. The rebels control the city center, however, with regime forces besieging them on the outskirts.Many towns north of Homs also are rebel-controlled, while to the south Hezbollah-backed government forces have been clearing rebels from villages and towns. Fierce fighting there over the past three weeks has killed dozens of rebels, troops and Hezbollah fighters and wounded hundreds.Seizing control of Homs would clear a path for the regime from Damascus to the Mediterranean coast, and firm up its grip on much of the country.
WASHINGTON — The Obama administration began discussing Monday whether the Assad regime's rapid military advance across the heart of Syria necessitates a drastic U.S. response, with officials saying a decision on arming beleaguered rebels could happen later this week.Top aides from the State and Defense Departments, the CIA and other agencies were gathering for a "deputies meeting" at the White House on Monday afternoon. There, they'll seek to lay the groundwork for a meeting that President Barack Obama will hold with his senior national security staff, planned for Wednesday, said U.S. officials, who weren't authorized to speak publicly on the closed-doors talks and demanded anonymity.Moved by the Syrian regime's rapid advance, officials say the administration could approve lethal aid for the rebels in the coming days. The president and his advisers also will weigh the merits of a less likely move to send in U.S. airpower to enforce a no-fly zone over the civil war-wracked nation, officials said.The White House meetings are taking place as Syrian President Bashar Assad's government forces are apparently poised for an attack on the key city of Homs, which could cut off Syria's armed opposition from the south of the country. As many as 5,000 Hezbollah fighters are now in Syria, officials believe, helping the regime press on with its campaign after capturing the town of Qusair near the Lebanese border last week.Opposition leaders have warned Washington that their rebellion could face devastating and irreversible losses without greater support.Secretary of State John Kerry postponed a planned trip Monday to Israel and three other Mideast countries to participate in White House discussions, officials said. He may travel to the region later in the week.State Department spokeswoman Jen Psaki said Monday that internal administration discussions were focused on "helping the Syrian opposition serve the essential needs of the Syrian people and hasten a political transition."White House spokesman Jay Carney said Obama's Syria policy was under constant review to find "what policy tools will help achieve our goal, which is a transition in Syria to a post-Assad government that respects the rights of the Syrian people and that gives that country a chance for a better future, a democratic future and an economically prosperous future."While nothing has been concretely decided, U.S. officials said Obama was leaning closer toward signing off on sending weapons to vetted, moderate rebel units. The U.S. has spoken of possibly arming the opposition in recent months but has hesitated because it doesn't want groups that are linked to al-Qaida and other extremists fighting alongside the anti-Assad militias to end up with the weapons.Obama already has ruled out any intervention that would require U.S. military troops on the ground. Other options such as deploying American air power to ground the regime's jets, gunships and other aerial assets are being more seriously debated, officials said, but they cautioned that a no-fly zone or any other action involving U.S. military deployments in Syria were far less likely right now. The U.S. can provide weapons without sending soldiers into Syria, either by sending materiel to rebels in neighboring Turkey and Jordan or working with regional allies.The president also has declared chemical weapons use by the Assad regime a "red line" for more forceful U.S. action. American allies including France and Britain have say they've determined with near certitude that Syrian forces have used low levels of sarin in several attacks, but the administration is still studying the evidence. The U.S. officials said responses that will be mulled over in this week's meetings concern the deteriorating situation on the ground in Syria, independent of final confirmation of possible chemical weapons use.U.S. lawmakers, particularly in the Senate, are clamoring for greater action.In a letter to Obama on Monday, Sen. Bob Corker of Tennessee, the ranking Republican on the Senate Foreign Relations committee, urged the president to start providing lethal aid as soon as possible to "shift momentum away from radical Islamist groups, the Assad regime and its militias toward more moderate elements."But Rep. Adam Schiff, D-Calif., a member of House Intelligence committee, said the U.S. shouldn't get drawn into the conflict. "We have a poor track record of intervening in sectarian civil wars," he said. "We need to be mindful of limitations in our ability to shape the outcome and very resistant to being pulled in in a way that we cannot later extricate ourselves very easily."Any intervention could have wide-reaching ramifications for the United States and the region. It would bring the U.S. closer to a conflict that has killed almost 80,000 people since Assad cracked down on protesters inspired by the Arab Spring in March 2011 and sparked a war that has since been increasingly defined by interethnic clashes between the Sunni-led rebellion and Assad's Alawite-dominated regime.And it would essentially pit the United States alongside regional allies Saudi Arabia, Turkey and Qatar in a proxy war against Iran, which is providing much of the materiel to the Syrian government's counterinsurgency and, through Hezbollah, more and more of the manpower.Syria's precarious position in the heart of the Middle East makes the conflict extremely unpredictable. Lebanon, across the western border, suffered its own brutal civil war in the 1970s and the 1980s and is already experiencing increased interethnic tensions. Iraq, to Syria's east, is mired in worsening violence. And Israel to the southwest has seen shots fired across the contested Golan Heights and has been forced to strike what it claimed were advanced weapons convoys heading to Hezbollah, with whom it went to war with in 2006.At the same time, it's unclear how Washington could fundamentally change the trajectory of a conflict that has increasingly tilted toward Assad in recent months without providing weapons to the opposition forces or getting involved itself.If the regime seizes control of Homs, it would clear a path for it from Damascus to the Mediterranean coast and firm up its grip on much of the country.Associated Press writers Mathew Lee and Donna Cassata contributed to this report.
AMMAN/BEIRUT — Forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad are massing around Aleppo in preparation for an offensive to retake the city and build on battlefield gains that have swung the momentum of Syria's war to Assad and his Hezbollah allies.Rebels reported signs of large numbers of Shi'ite Muslim fighters flowing in from Iraq to help Assad end the civil war that has killed at least 80,000 people and forced 1.6 million Syrians to flee abroad.The move to a northern front comes as Syria's war is increasingly infecting its neighbors - Iraq, Lebanon, Jordan and Israel - and widening a regional sectarian faultline between Sunni and Shi'ite Muslims.For the first time since the start of the uprising in March 2011, an Israeli minister suggested on Monday that Assad might prevail in the war, thanks in large part to support from Shi'ite Iran and the Lebanese guerrilla group Hezbollah.However, efforts to dislodge rebels in Aleppo will be a much tougher proposition than last week's capture of the town of Qusair, with military analysts predicting that the conflict will probably drag on for months or years as Assad's many foes are likely to be galvanized by recent rebel reversals.Alarmed by Assad's swift advances and hoping to turn the tide, Washington might decide later this week on whether to start arming the rebels, a U.S. official said.Assad's army is preparing to lift sieges on areas close to Aleppo before turning its sights on the country's second city, according to the semi-official Syrian al-Watan daily"Any battle in Aleppo will be huge and most certainly prolonged," said Charles Lister, an analyst at IHS Jane's Terrorism and Insurgency Centre."You have large numbers of rebels in several areas of the city. There will have to be a lot of very close combat fighting that always takes a lot of time and leaves many casualties."Rebel brigades poured into Aleppo last July and have more than half the great merchant city under their control. The front lines are largely stable and a growing number of radicalized, Islamist foreign fighters have joined rebel ranks.Opposition activists and military sources said the army was airlifting troops to Aleppo airport and to the Kurdish area of Ifrin behind rebel lines, as well as reinforcing two rural Shi'ite Muslim enclaves, Zahra and Nubbul, north of the city."The regime appears to be making a pincer movement to try and regain the major cities across the north and east of Syria ahead of the Geneva conference," said Abu Taha, a northern rebel commander, referring to proposed international peace talks.The United States and Russia hope to hold the conference in Switzerland next month, but Britain has warned that Assad's recent success might make him reluctant to offer the sort of compromises believed necessary to end the bloodshed.After appearing to seize the initiative in 2012, the rebels have suffered a series of setbacks this year, with Assad's demoralized forces significantly bolstered by the arrival of well-trained fighters from the Shi'ite Muslim group, Hezbollah.Rebels said these guerrillas had played a determining role in the emphatic victory last week in Qusair, which controls vital supply routes across Syria and into Lebanon.A security source in Lebanon said Hezbollah would continue to assist Assad, but unlike the battle for Qusair, which lies close to its home turf, it might not dispatch its troops north to Aleppo, preferring instead to offer training.Looking to relieve the growing pressure on Aleppo, rebels attacked on Monday two major military compounds in northern Syria -- on the outskirts of the city of Raqqa and the Minnig airport in the adjacent province of Aleppo."The rebels have raised pressure ... in the last two days to pre-empt any attack on Aleppo," said Abdelrazzaq Shlas, a member of the opposition administrative council for the province.Activists said the army had retaliated by bombing Raqqa, killing at least 20 civilians and fighters."There is a big loss of lives, but the aim is to deflate the morale boost that the regime received after Qusair and not allow it to go to Geneva as a victor," Shlas said.But in a worrying development for the rebels, Shlas said there were reports of militiamen loyal to Iraqi Shi'ite Cleric Moqtada al-Sadr streaming into Syria to bolster Assad's forces.Their arrival would underline the increasingly regionalized nature of the war following Hezbollah's entry into the fray.Lister, who monitors Sunni Muslim Jihadist forums, said it seemed a growing number of Sunni men appeared ready to take up arms in Syria with the mainly Sunni rebel forces."If you believe what you read in the forums, then there are a lot of people heading to Syria to take up the fight," he said, adding that there were also a growing number of death notices for foreign fighters appearing on the web, including six in one day last week.Israel, which shares a tense border with Syria, has regularly predicted the fall of Assad. But on Monday, Minister for Intelligence Yuval Steinitz offered a very different view.Speaking to foreign reporters in Jerusalem, he said Assad's government "might not just survive but even regain territories".Western nations, including the United States, have said Assad must stand down, but have thus far refused to arm the rebels, worried the weaponry might fall into the hands of radical elements, including groups tied to al Qaeda.On a visit to Aleppo earlier this month, a Reuters correspondent saw a marked increase in the number of hardcore Islamist groups, who seemed to have gained ascendancy over the more moderate Free Syrian Army that led the initial combat.Rebels in the city also seemed more focused on resolving day-to-day issues rather taking the fight to Assad."The biggest problem we have is thievery. There are thieves who pretend to be rebels and wear rebel clothes so they can steal from civilians," said Abu Ahmed Rahman, head of the Revolutionary Military Police in Aleppo, an organization set up to resolve disputes between rebels and civilians.But there were also signs of anti-Assad forces digging in, preparing for an eventual army onslaught."This conflict has no discernable end point at the moment," said Lister.
ISTANBUL — Turkey's Islamic-led government is facing its biggest protests in years as demonstrators and police clashed Tuesday for the 12th straight day. Here's a look behind the scenes:Q: What's going on in Turkey?A: Demonstrators were camping out in a park in Istanbul's landmark Taksim Square, protesting plans to cut down trees and redevelop the area when police went in May 31 to clear them out. That heavy-handed raid ignited protests that have since spread to dozens of Turkish cities. On Tuesday, police went into the square again, pulling down protesters' makeshift barricades and chasing some with tear gas and water cannons.Q: Is this just about trees — or something else?A: Protesters are venting pent-up resentment against Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan, who has been in office for 10 years. Many secular Turks see him as an authoritarian figure trying to force his conservative religious Islamic views on them. Erdogan rejects those accusations. Still, he has spoken out against Caesarean births, said women should have at least three children, and backed laws to curb the sale of alcohol.Q: What does Erdogan say?A: The prime minister says the protests are being instigated by extremists who want to blacken Turkey's international image and he has lost patience with them. "For those who want to continue with the incidents I say: 'It's over,'" Erdogan said Tuesday. "Not only will we end the actions, we will be at the necks of the provocateurs and terrorists, and no one will get away with it."Q: Why should other nations care about Turkey?A: Turkey, a largely Muslim nation that straddles Europe and Asia, is a stable democracy, a key U.S. ally and an important regional influence. It has taken in tens of thousands of Syrian refugees fleeing that country's civil war.Turkey's economy is worth $1.3 trillion annually, almost as much as Canada's. It also has a flourishing tourist industry that welcomed nearly 38 million visitors last year to ancient historical sites and ruins, wide sandy Mediterranean beaches and stunning regions of natural beauty.Q: How is Turkey a key U.S. ally?A: Turkey borders Iran, Iraq and Syria. The U.S. needs Turkey's help to quell the violence in Syria, stabilize Iraq and stem Iran's nuclear ambitions. Turkey also played a key role as the U.S. military went after Iraqi dictator Saddam Hussein. Erdogan visited the White House last month for talks with President Barack Obama.Q: What's next? Will Turkey see an Arab Spring revolution?A: Turkey holds a presidential election next year in which Erdogan — who will hit his term limit as prime minister — could run against the current president. Despite the protests, Erdogan is unlikely to fall. His backing by rural conservative voters — the so-called silent majority — still appears to be strong.
LONDON — The leader of the far-right British National Party says he has traveled to Syria on a "fact-finding mission."Nick Griffin, chairman of the BNP and a member of European Parliament, has called the Holocaust a hoax, Islam a wicked faith and defended the Ku Klux Klan.In a series of Twitter messages posted Tuesday, he said he had crossed the border into Syria and was in Damascus. He said life in the capital is normal.One message suggested sympathy with Syria's president Bashar Assad, saying the U.K. plans to send money and weapons to rebels dominated by "jihadis." Another message was a photo of Syria's ministry of the interior.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — The teenager's name was Muhammad al-Qatta, and he was 14 years old when witnesses said radical Islamists in the northern Syrian city of Aleppo pulled him from his coffee kiosk on Sunday and later executed him in a public square.Muhammad had left his house to close up his kiosk, where his work supported his family, his mother said. When someone approached him looking for a free cup of coffee, the teenager uttered the phrase that cast him among the victims of the war's growing depravity."He was talking to this guy and told him, 'I don't want to lend you anything,' " the teenager's father quoted him as saying."If Muhammad, peace be upon him, were to come to this earth right now, I would still not lend a cup of coffee to anyone unless they pay for it," the teenager said.Three men with long hair, wearing long beards and the robes favored by ultraconservatives, overheard the exchange. They accused the teenager of insulting the prophet, told him to leave the kiosk and then took him away in the car. When they returned an hour later, Muhammad bore the marks of a beating. In a square, they covered his head with his shirt, a makeshift blindfold, as if he were "some big shot," his mother said.She watched from her balcony, as hundreds of people gathered around. A resident of the neighborhood, Abu Abdo, heard what the men said. Addressing the "respected people of Aleppo," they warned that cursing God or the Prophet Muhammad was a sin, saying it would be "punished this way."The teenager's father heard the shots. His wife told him that the men had killed their son."His blood ran in front of me," Muhammad's mother said in a grim video posted on the Internet on Monday. In her anguish, she invoked the name of another teenage victim in Syria, Hamza Ali al-Khateeb, whose death at the hands of government forces helped propel the uprising, now a war in its third year. He was pulled aside two years ago by government agents at a protest, brutalized and killed before being sent back to his family.Just as Hamza's death crystallized the rage against President Bashar al-Assad, Muhammad's killing stoked similar feelings against a new power that has emerged during the war. It focused anger on hard-line Islamists, including foreigners, some of whom have seized on the conflict in Syria as an opportunity to impose their mores. For Muhammad's mother and some her neighbors, the tyrannies were indistinguishable, trapping many Syrians in a vise.In a home in Muhammad's neighborhood, Mr. Abu Abdo said what had happened to the two boys was "the same.""Who kills a teen, whatever the reason is, is a killer," he said, adding that Syrians were looking for life without the government's security thugs "or radical Sunnis who raise black flags, and want to build a state not fit for our minds."On Monday, Syrian opposition groups rushed to distance themselves from the killing, which was publicized by a watchdog group, the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights based in Britain.The Syrian Coalition, the main umbrella opposition group, said in a statement that it "condemned the unconfirmed reports" of the death and called it a crime against humanity. The Local Coordination Committees, an antigovernment group, called the killing "heinous" but blamed the Syrian Coalition for failing to secure "liberated areas."The condemnations were a measure of the growing anger at the small but assertive cadre of extremists who have joined the rebel ranks, and whose hard-line beliefs have unsettled even pious Syrians. Their influence is being felt in mosques, in schools and in committees and courts intended to enforce a strict version of Islamic law. Disgust with the radicals has peaked in recent months after reports of summary executions, including of government soldiers and men accused of crimes and then punished.Last month, antigovernment activists in Aleppo were beaten and detained by armed guards of the city's Shariah committee, after the activists tried to raise the flag of the Syrian revolution.One of them, Seif Azzam, said the Islamists threatened two of his friends by saying they were "infidels who should be killed for the sake of God." The two were eventually released."The Shariah committee's behavior is completely identical to that of air force intelligence," said Mr. Azzam, referring to the most feared government intelligence agency. "We are revolting against Assad's regime, and the Shariah committee at the same time," he said.The identities and affiliations of the three men remained a mystery. Muhammad's mother said she thought that two of them were possibly foreigners, but that the third was Syrian. His father, who spoke in a separate video interview, was less sure. "Are they Afghans? I don't know. There are a lot of battalions nowadays, how can we know?"
BEIRUT — With President Barack Obama weighing the issue, increasingly desperate Syrian rebels are pressing the U.S. and its allies to send weapons to even their odds now that Lebanon's powerful Hezbollah guerrillas are fighting alongside the regime.The U.S. and its allies so far have refused to send lethal aid to the rebels in part because of fears that the arms could fall into the hands of Sunni extremist groups that have joined the fight against President Bashar Assad.Moderate opposition leaders have stepped up efforts to turn that argument around, saying Western inaction will deal a blow to their leadership and let al-Qaida-linked militants take the forefront in the rebellion or hand victory to Iran and Hezbollah, a Shiite militant group. They're hoping the newly visible role of Hezbollah and the fall of the strategic town of Qusair to regime forces will spur the U.S. and other countries to send weapons.Ahmed Ramadan, a member of the main Western-backed opposition group, the Syrian National Coalition, said the failure to supply weapons and ammunition to moderate forces within the rebels' Free Syrian army will let radical forces take the lead."Who is the U.S. denying weapons to? Everyone," he said. "This punishes the moderate forces, not the radical ones, because the radical forces continue to find armament through their own means," he said.The Obama administration has been alarmed by the Assad regime's rapid military advances, but U.S. officials said those closest to the president are still split on whether to begin providing Syria's armed opposition with weapons or to consider more drastic steps such as using U.S. airpower to ground Assad's gunships and jets. The officials spoke on condition of anonymity because they weren't authorized to speak publicly on private talks being held Wednesday on the issue.Burhan Ghalioun, a prominent Paris-based Syrian opposition leader, said he and his comrades have been trying to convince U.S. officials that it's time to put an end to the tragedy in Syria by empowering moderate rebels. He warned an Assad victory also would mean more sway in Syria for Hezbollah and its Iranian backers."The U.S. now faces a real test that has to do with its credibility," he said in a telephone interview. "Are they going to let Syria become an Iranian protectorate? This is what it boils down to," he said."Their hesitation and reluctance is prolonging the war and giving false illusions that Bashar Assad can win the war," he added.Opposition leaders stepped up their outreach after the fall of Qusair, a key western town near the border with Lebanon. Hezbollah fighters openly joined the fight in Qusair, helping propel Assad's forces to victory. The group's leader, Sheikh Hassan Nasrallah, has vowed to fight to help secure a victory for the Syrian regime.Gen. Salim Idris, the main rebel military commander in the Free Syrian Army, has repeatedly pleaded for Western anti-tank and anti-aircraft missiles, saying the rebels' weapons were no match for the Syrian regime's modern tanks and warplanes.Any military assistance to the rebels would likely be funneled through Idris' council, according to U.S. officials.Syrians complain that by denying Idris the weapons, the West has effectively undermined the commander's authority on the ground."Rebel loyalty is going to be with whoever is providing them with the guns and ammunition, and so far it's not Idris who is doing that," said Amr Al Azm, a U.S.-based Syrian activist and professor at Shawnee State University in Ohio.Bassam al-Dada, an official with the Free Syrian Army, expressed skepticism that the U.S. would start providing weapons, and said even if it does the amount is unlikely to be sufficient to change the situation on the ground."If it happens, it will likely be small, insignificant aid that will in fact create problems between the military leadership and the rebels on the ground, who will think weapons were coming in when in fact they are not," he said.Zeineddine al-Shami, a media coordinator for the First Brigade in the Free Syrian Army in Damascus, said radical groups such as Jabhat al-Nusra represent a small percentage of the fighters on the ground but their impact has been felt because of tactics, including suicide bombings."We won't need (suicide bombers) if we have artillery or rockets" or more sophisticated weaponry," he said. "If we don't, the spirit of Nusra will prevail."Associated Press writers Bradley Klapper and Julie Pace in Washington contributed to this report.
WASHINGTON — The Obama administration is promising to step up assistance to Syrian rebels after concluding Damascus used chemical weapons against opponents of President Bashar al-Assad, but the military options facing the United States are no easier than before.President Barack Obama has been slow to move toward military assistance for Syria's opposition in the past and is likely to continue to move judiciously, looking to work with allies in any intervention in the country's civil war."Thankfully the president is being cautious about his military options. This is not a place where America can go it alone," said David Solimini, a vice president at the Truman National Security Project think tank.The Obama administration's possible military choices range from limited one-off missile strikes from ships - one of the less-complicated scenarios - to bolder operations like carving out no-fly safe zones.White House officials on Thursday played down the prospects of a no-fly zone, citing the open-ended costs and uncertainty of such an operation in a place like Syria, with its well-defended air space. But they did not rule it out either.The White House did, however, rule out the more politically unpalatable possibility of sending U.S. forces into the country.A more likely move would be to begin providing lethal assistance to Syrian rebels. The White House said on Thursday it would increase support to the opposition Supreme Military Council, including military support, but it did not specify lethal aid.A source close to the matter said on Thursday that Obama has authorized sending some U.S. weapons to Syrian rebels as part of a new package of military support. There was no word on the type of weaponry the United States would provide or when it would be delivered.Obama had opposed limited steps like arming anti-government rebels, but pressure to deepen U.S. involvement in Syria's civil war after American intelligence agencies concluded Damascus used chemical weapons appears to have changed the calculation.Obama last August pledged he would consider more significant aid to the rebels if Assad's regime crossed a "red line" by moving around or using sizeable amounts of chemical weapons.Representative Ed Royce, chairman of the House of Representatives Foreign Affairs Committee, said on Thursday: "It is now clear that the Assad regime has crossed a red line. ... I encourage the administration to begin in earnest arming the Free Syrian Army."One form of military intervention that could limit to some extent U.S. and allied involvement in Syria's war would be one-off strikes on pro-Assad forces or infrastructure tied to chemical weapons use. Given Syria's air defenses, planners may choose to fire missiles from ships at sea."The most proportional response (to limited chemical weapons use) would be a strike on the units responsible, whether artillery or airfields," Jeffrey White, a Middle East expert at the Washington Institute For Near East Policy, said recently."It would demonstrate to Assad that there is a cost to using these weapons. The problem so far is that there's been no cost to the regime from their actions."It is not clear how the Syrian government would respond and if it would try to retaliate militarily against the U.S. forces in the region. U.S. military involvement would also upset Russia, which has a naval facility on Syria's Mediterranean coast.Another option the Pentagon has examined involves the creation of humanitarian safe areas in support of Turkey and Jordan that would also be no-fly zones off limits to the Syrian air force - an option favored by lawmakers including Republican U.S. Senator John McCain.That would involve taking down Syrian air defenses and destroying Syrian artillery from a certain distance beyond those zones, to protect them from incoming fire.But officials, including Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel, have warned that establishing safe zones would tie the United States more closely to Syria's messy conflict. Assad would almost certainly react.The U.S. military has also completed planning for going into Syria and securing its chemical weapons under different scenarios, including one in which Assad falls from power and his forces disintegrate, leaving weapons sites vulnerable to pillaging.But any eventual move to put U.S. boots on the ground in Syria remains a remote possibility.
WASHINGTON/BEIRUT — President Barack Obama has authorized sending U.S. weapons to Syrian rebels for the first time, a U.S. official said on Thursday after the White House said it has proof the Syrian government had used chemical weapons against opposition forces fighting to overthrow President Bashar al-Assad.The U.S. decision came as Assad's surging forces and their Lebanese Hezbollah allies turned their guns on the north, fighting near the northern city of Aleppo and bombarding the central city of Homs after having seized the initiative by winning the open backing of Hezbollah last month and capturing the strategic town of Qusair last week.The White House said Washington would provide "direct military support" to the opposition but did not specify whether it would include lethal aid, which would mark a reversal of Obama's resistance to arming the rebels. But the U.S. official, speaking on condition of anonymity, said the package would include weapons.Syrian rebel and political opposition leaders immediately called for anti-aircraft and other sophisticated weaponry.The arrival of thousands of seasoned, Iran-backed Hezbollah Shi'ite fighters to help Assad combat the mainly Sunni rebellion has shifted momentum in the two-year-old war, which the United Nations said on Thursday had killed at least 93,000 people.U.S. and European officials anxious about the rapid change are meeting the commander of the main rebel fighting force, the Free Syrian Army, on Friday in Turkey. FSA chief Salim Idriss is expected to plead urgently for more help.Obama has been more cautious than Britain and France, which forced the European Union this month to lift an embargo that had blocked weapons for the rebels.After months of investigation, the White House on Thursday laid out its conclusions that chemical weapons were used by Assad's forces, but it stopped short of threatening specific actions in response to what Obama said would be a "game changer" for Washington's handling of the conflict."The president ... has made it clear that the use of chemical weapons or transfer of chemical weapons to terrorist groups is a red line," said Ben Rhodes, Obama's deputy national security adviser. "He has said that the use of chemical weapons would change his calculus, and it has.""Our intelligence community assesses that the Assad regime has used chemical weapons, including the nerve agent sarin, on a small scale against the opposition multiple times in the last year," Rhodes told reporters.He said the U.S. intelligence community had high confidence in the assessment and estimated that 100 to 150 people had died from detected chemical weapons attacks in Syria to date.The U.S. announcement followed deliberations between Obama and his national security aides as pressure mounted at home and abroad for more forceful action on the Syria conflict, including a sharp critique from former President Bill Clinton.Rhodes said the U.S. military assistance to the rebels would be different in "both scope and scale" from what had been authorized before, which included non-lethal equipment such as night-vision goggles and body armour."We want anti-tank and anti-aircraft weapons," George Sabra, acting leader of the National Coalition political opposition bloc, told Al-Arabiya television. "We expect to see positive results and genuine military support."U.S. Senator John McCain, who said he had been told by a reliable source that Washington would provide arms to the rebels, called for the establishment of a no-fly zone and said the United States needed to neutralize Assad's air power."They (rebels) have enough light weapons. They've got enough AK-47s. AK-47s don't do very well against tanks," McCain told CNN. "They need anti-tank weapons and they need anti-air weapons."The Wall Street Journal, citing U.S. officials, reported that the administration's proposal included a no-fly zone stretching up to 25 miles (40 km) inside Syria.Western governments that predicted months ago that Assad would soon fall now believe that support from Tehran and Hezbollah are giving him the upper hand. But they also worry that sending arms to rebel fighters could empower Sunni Islamist insurgents who have pledged their loyalty to al Qaeda.While Britain and France have yet to announce their own decisions to start arming the rebels, their diplomats have been making the case that the best way to counter both threats is to beef up support for Idriss' mainstream rebel force.Strengthening the FSA with money, weapons and ammunition, they argue, would help combat Assad and also provide a counterweight among the rebels to al Qaeda-linked groups.France in particular has developed good relations with Idriss while providing funds and non-lethal support, and seems eager to send him military aid.Assad's government says its next move will be to recapture Aleppo in the north, Syria's biggest city and commercial hub, which has been divided since last year when advancing rebels seized most of the countryside around it.Syrian state media have been touting plans for "Northern Storm," a looming campaign to recapture the rebel-held north.The United Nations, which raised its death toll for the war to 93,000 on Thursday, said it was concerned about the fate of residents if a new offensive is launched."All of the reports I'm receiving are of augmentation of resources and forces (for an Aleppo offensive) on the part of the government," U.N. Human Rights Commissioner Navi Pillay told Reuters Television.Assad's army appears to be massing some troops in its footholds in Aleppo province, particularly in Shi'ite areas such as the enclaves of Nubel and Zahra, although some opposition activists say the government may be exaggerating the extent of its offensive to intimidate rebel supporters.Activists reported fighting in the area around Aleppo on Thursday, especially near an airport that rebels have been trying to capture. The government has also launched an offensive in Homs, the closest big city to its last victory in Qusair and one of the last major rebel strongholds in the country's centre."There was a fourth day of escalations today on the besieged neighbourhoods of Homs' old city. Early in the morning, there were two air strikes ... followed by artillery and mortar shelling," said Jad, an activist from Homs speaking via Skype.Ahmed al-Ahmed, an activist in Aleppo, said the government's reinforcements in the north were just a distraction from Homs."They've turned the world's attention to watching northern Aleppo and fearing an attack and massacres as happened to our people in Qusair, to get us to forget Homs, which is the decisive battle."Hezbollah's participation has deepened the sectarian character of the war, with Assad, a member of the Alawite offshoot of Shi'ite Islam, backed by Shi'ite Iran and Hezbollah, while Sunni-ruled Arab states and Turkey back the rebels.The 7th century rift between Sunni and Shi'ite Islam has fuelled violence across the Middle East in recent decades, including the sectarian bloodletting unleashed in Iraq since the 2003 U.S. invasion and the Lebanese civil war of 1975 to 1990.Leading Sunni Muslim clerics met in Cairo on Thursday and issued a call to jihad against Assad and his allies on Thursday, condemning the conflict as a "war on Islam.
BEIRUT — Syrian rebels will use a planned meeting with Western officials to drive home a warning that continued reluctance to arm them will hand an irreversible military advantage to President Bashar al-Assad's Iranian-backed forces.Deeply frustrated by the foot-dragging over military aid, several rebel commanders contrasted what they said was Western preference for talks over action with the unqualified support Assad enjoyed from his allies in Tehran and Moscow.Assad's forces, helped by guerrilla fighters from the pro-Iranian Hezbollah, recaptured the strategic town of Qusair last week and may be preparing an offensive to wrest back Syria's biggest city Aleppo, in the north.A Western diplomat said the meeting in Turkey had been planned for Saturday and had been brought forward by one day to Friday. But a senior Syrian rebel officer based in Damascus said it was part of a series of talks since the battle of Qusair, which he described as a "wake-up call" to the West."They know for sure that unless something happens within days, the West will find itself dealing with a completely new scenario," he said, painting a picture of Shi'ite Iranian dominance in Syria and an extreme Sunni Muslim jihadi backlash.Iranian commanders are believed to have set out the strategy for the recent Syrian army counter-offensive, while Russia has ignored Western calls to halt arms sales to the government.The setbacks for Assad's foes, who just six months ago were battling his forces at the gates of Damascus, have alarmed French, U.S., British and Turkish officials who are due to meet rebel leaders to discuss new aid and the military buildup around Aleppo."All we need is weapons. Why does it have to take so long to send proper anti-aircraft weapons or arms to help us finish the battle?" said another senior commander who is due to attend the talks."The Party of Satan (Hezbollah) and the Russians are sending Assad fighters, warplanes and more weapons...while our allies who are supposed to be helping us only ask for meetings," he said, using the rebels' derogatory label for the Lebanese militant group, whose name in Arabic means Party of God.He said that Western officials continued to demand assurances that any weapons would not fall into the hands of radical Islamists, whose influence and military capabilities overshadow those of the perceived moderates."All they ask about is the Islamists and what they describe as weapons 'going to the right hands'," the rebel said. "They ask us to take a clear stance on the Islamists."He also bemoaned the fact that it would be attended by ambassadors who were in no position to take on-the-spot decisions about military aid, saying the threat on the ground required immediate action.The Damascus-based rebel said talks over the last week had covered a framework for ensuring that weapons did not end up with radical Islamist groups, but no final agreement had so far been reached.The rebels say that they are in no position to dictate terms to Islamist brigades who already outgun them and upon whom they have depended for most gains of the last two years."How can we tell the Islamists thank you and goodbye when they are the ones with weapons and making the success on the ground? They are helping us big time we cannot deny that and we will be ungrateful to do so," the rebel fighter said.Selim Idris, a former brigadier-general, will lead the rebel delegation in the talks.A diplomat from one country who will attend Saturday's planned talks said his government had worked with Idris for six months and regarded him highly."But the problem is his ability to impose his leadership. He needs money, ammunition and weapons to ensure he is credible," the diplomat said.Idris heads a military command which includes many liberal and Islamist brigades, but neither he nor the leadership exerts genuine authority on the ground and its military successes depend more on individual commanders than coherent planning.Idris himself is dismissively referred to as "the teacher" by some rebels who say he has few leadership attributes and criticize his absence from the battlefield.Another Syrian army defector, who is based outside Syria, accused the West of "playing games" with the rebels on the question of arms and said he doubted the Turkey meeting would lead to any change in policy.But the senior Damascus-based rebel fighter said there was no alternative to arming Assad's foes if the West wanted to prevent Tehran delivering a conclusive triumph for Assad."They do not have any choice but to make this successful otherwise Iran would have had a clean victory," he said.
BEIRUT — Syrian rebel and political opposition leaders called on Friday for anti-aircraft and other sophisticated weapons after the United States said it would boost military support to President Bashar al-Assad's foes."(They) need to provide effective military assistance to take the necessary steps to prevent the criminal regime from using chemical weapons," Brigadier-General Selim Idris, a rebel commander, told Al-Arabiya Television.He said rebels, on the defensive in many parts of the country after weeks of counter-attacks by Assad's forces, needed "large quantities of weapons and ammunition, anti-aircraft (weapons) and sophisticated weapons."He was responding to a statement by U.S. deputy national security adviser Ben Rhodes that the United States would increase military support to Idris' Supreme Military Council after determining that Assad's government had used chemical weapons.Rhodes did not specify what support was planned, but said it would be different in scope and scale from the non-lethal assistance that Washington says it currently provides.George Sabra, acting leader of the National Coalition political opposition bloc, echoed Idris' call for significant weapons supplies and said the United States was taking a belated step after two years of conflict in which more than 90,000 people have been killed."We want anti-tank and anti-aircraft weapons," he told Al-Arabiya, adding that the coalition also wanted to see the Friends of Syria group of anti-Assad countries take a "radical position after the truth has been revealed about the regime's use of chemical weapons.""We expect to see positive results and genuine military support," he said.
SARAQIB, Syria — The workers arrive by darkness, taking their stations at the vise and the lathe. Soon metal filings and sparks fly, and the stack of their creations grows at their feet: makeshift mortar shells to be fired through barrels salvaged from disabled Syrian Army tanks.Across northern Syria, rebel workshops like these are part of a clandestine network of primitive arms-making plants, a signature element of a militarily lopsided war.Their products — machine-gun mounts, hand grenades, rockets, mortar shells, roadside bombs and the locally brewed explosives that are packed inside — help form the arsenal of a guerrilla force that has suffered serious setbacks this year in its effort to overthrow President Bashar al-Assad."Everybody knows we do not have the weapons we need to defend ourselves," said Abu Trad, a commander of the Saraqib Rebels Front, shortly before he allowed visitors into this mortar-round plant. "But we have the will, and we have humble means, and we have tools."The value of workshop-grade weapons, while once crucial to the rebels' success in claiming territory in northern Syria, may have substantially declined.Last spring, when Mr. Assad was struggling to confront the armed opposition that his crackdown had fueled, shops like these forced Syria's military to change tactics. The roads became so laced with their output of hidden bombs that the army stopped roaming areas where the rebels were strongest, and pulled back to defensive positions. The shops were a marker of the rebels' budding organization and lethal skill.But the government has spent a year refitting its troops, Hezbollah has sent in reinforcements, and Iran and Russia have kept Mr. Assad's forces resupplied.These days the government's forces are less likely to venture out on patrols or expose themselves in small checkpoints, reducing their vulnerability to the rebels' makeshift bombs. And most of the shops' other weapons systems lack the accuracy, range or explosive punch to drive the army from the positions where it is entrenched and from where soldiers can fire back with barrages of more powerful and precise weapons.Moreover, some of the locally made weapons are prone to malfunction, which can kill those who use them.And yet the arms plants remain a prominent feature of the opposition's logistics, as arms flows from the Arab world fail to keep up with demand. Though the European Union lifted its embargo on arms transfers to the opposition last month, many rebels said they see the decision as a diplomatic tactic intended to pressure the Syrian government, and unlikely to lead to shipments from Western governments soon."They promise things all the time," said Maj. Mohammad Ali, who commands the fighters in northern Syria for the Grandsons of the Prophet, a large rebel formation. "We are now in the third year, and so far we have had so many decisions from the West and nothing was acted on."Abu Trad and other rebels said the workshops have been as essential as the fighters on the front lines, and the laborers are part of a revolution's foundation. "The mother who cooks for the fighters is a revolutionary, the medic who helps the wounded is a revolutionary, and the man who makes the mortar and the shell is a revolutionary, too," he said.On several trips into Syria, journalists for The New York Times visited four active arms workshops in Idlib and Aleppo Provinces, interviewed other bomb- or weapons-makers who agreed to discuss their work but not to allow access to their plants, and examined other workshops' products on rebel bases and front lines.The plant in Saraqib is one part of a larger and more complicated supply chain. On this night, it had received a batch of freshly cast shell bodies from a rebel foundry elsewhere. (Its workers declined to discuss its location, beyond saying that it was "underground.")
LONDON — Britain said on Thursday there was a growing body of evidence showing that the President Bashar al-Assad had used and was continuing to use chemical weapons."There is a growing body persuasive evidence showing that the regime used - and continues to use - chemical weapons, including sarin," a spokesman for the Foreign Office said."The room for doubt continues to diminish. Assad must grant the UN investigation unrestricted access to investigate on the ground in Syria and establish the full facts."
WASHINGTON — President Obama's decision to arm Syrian rebels for the first time follows an intense, nearly two-year debate within the White House in which the president and his closest advisers consistently expressed skepticism about U.S. intervention in a Middle East civil war, current and former officials said.The two deciding factors in the decision to change course, they said, were growing military gains by forces loyal to Syrian President Bashar al-Assad, aided by the Iranian-backed Hezbollah militia, and harder intelligence that the Syrian military had used chemical weapons in the form of sarin nerve gas.Which of the developments played a greater role in tipping the balance was unclear. Publicly, the Obama administration pointed to the evidence of chemical weapons use, which one senior administration official said had "ripened" in the last two weeks.Some of the U.S. officials said on Friday that the real game-changer in Obama's calculus on Syria was not the chemical weapons issue - which had been known about for months - but the growing role of Lebanese-based Hezbollah.The battlefield advances by Hezbollah have raised the prospect that Assad could stay in power for some time. The Shiite militia's decision to get more directly involved in the conflict against mostly Sunni rebels has also heightened the war's sectarian divide, and increased Sunni-Shiite tensions in neighboring Lebanon.U.S. officials and European diplomats also cited as a factor in Obama's decision a looming meeting next week with G8 allies - especially France and Britain - in which Syria will be a major issue."Had they not made the beginnings of a move on the issue, the G8 meeting would have been pretty hard on the president," said a European diplomat, speaking on condition of anonymity.Obama was roundly criticized by Syria hawks in the U.S. Congress and elsewhere for first suggesting in April that chemical weapons may have been used in the Syrian civil war, crossing a "red line" he set last year, but not then following up with actions against the Damascus government.But in an interview 10 days ago, well before the White House announced Obama's decision on Thursday, a senior aide insisted that the chemical weapons question had never been dropped.There are "clear instructions from the president that we are not walking back from the red line," the senior administration official said at the time. "The intelligence community is all over this."The White House on Thursday announced that it had concluded that Syrian forces had used chemical weapons, and said Obama had decided to supply direct military assistance to the opposition.While Obama crossed a line of his own in making the move - the White House had for more than a year resisted calls to arm the rebels - he appears determined to keep the United States from getting sucked too deeply into Syria's sectarian civil war.European officials and others with close knowledge of the situation said the United States would supply the Western-backed Syrian Military Council with automatic weapons, light mortars and rocket-propelled grenades.While significant, the weaponry will not include shoulder-fired surface-to-air missiles known as MANPADs that could bring down Syrian military planes and helicopters, officials said.And for now, Washington is not backing the establishment of a "no-fly zone" over Syria, which would involve a major commitment of U.S. and European air power to counter Syria's extensive air defenses, they said, in part because there is no international consensus on the step."This is, in a way, a low-cost option," a former U.S. official with extensive contacts in the region said of the White House's new steps, worrying that the U.S. military aid was months too late.The White House and State Department declined to publicly detail what sorts of weaponry and other materiel will be sent to the rebels, or how quickly it will arrive.While Obama has been consistently cautious about U.S. involvement in Syria, his team has been at times less than unified.Obama's original decision, in August 2011, to call on Assad to leave power, was preceded by intense debate in Washington, London and other capitals, according to diplomats and former officials.The Pentagon has been consistent in opposing deep U.S. military involvement, such as a no-fly zone.Last fall, however, then Secretary of State Hillary Clinton and CIA chief David Petraeus presented a joint proposal for the United States to arm the rebels. The White House turned down the idea.In the current situation, Secretary of State John Kerry is said to have been active in pressing Obama on the need to do more."The constituency within the administration for doing more is much more significant that it was in the past," said Dennis Ross, who was a senior Middle East adviser to Obama. "But the hesitancy remains, I believe."Ross, who left government in December 2011, said that during his time at the White House, Obama would closely question the wisdom and consequences of Syria options presented by his advisers."What's fair to say, he wanted to be very cautious about the kinds of commitments we would make, he wanted to know even then, look if we're going to take steps, I want to hear, tell me where that leads to," Ross said in an interview this week. "Tell me what's the consequence of doing 'X'. And tell me how that is going to improve the situation and make an outcome that we favor more likely."Ross said that during his time at the Obama White House, the U.S. experience in recent wars, which highlighted the difficulty in changing conditions in Islamic countries, weighed heavily in the president's thinking."I don't think you can look at it independently from Iraq and Afghanistan. And particularly the sense that these are easy to get into and hard to get out of," Ross said.Obama's calculus would have been different, he added, if there had been a "more coherent, more credible and more compelling" opposition in Syria.A senior Western diplomatic source gave a similar account, saying Obama essentially tells his aides to prove to him that American intervention would improve the situation."It's a legitimate position," this source said. "I don't see at this point the Americans authorizing the delivery of heavy weapons."It remains to be seen whether the aid will change a military picture that has seen Assad's forces, backed by Hezbollah fighters, steadily regain ground against the rebels, capturing the key city of Qusair and preparing for an assault on rebel-held areas of northern Syria."We believe that we can make a difference," White House deputy national security adviser Ben Rhodes said, when asked if the U.S. aid was too little. He noted that Arab nations and Turkey are also supporting the Syrian opposition.State Department spokeswoman Jen Psaki said Obama's decision was made some days ago, but would not be more specific."This has been something that the national security team and the president has been discussing for weeks. I know the White House said the president decided long before this week," Psaki said.
BEIRUT — Hezbollah leader Sayyed Hassan Nasrallah promised on Friday the Lebanese militant group would keep fighting for Syrian President Bashar al-Assad after it spearheaded the recapture of the strategic town of Qusair last week.Echoing the determination of a speech three weeks ago, when he pledged to battle until victory, Nasrallah said Hezbollah was aware of the cost of military engagement in Syria's civil war and would not be deflected from its goal."We will not change our position. After Qusair is the same as before Qusair ... Wherever we need to be, we will be," Nasrallah said in a televised speech."What we assumed responsibility for, we will continue to be responsible for, and there is no need to give details," he said during an address commemorating fighters wounded in Hezbollah's military campaigns including a 2006 war with Israel.The Shi'ite Muslim movement's open military intervention to seize back Qusair from mainly Sunni rebels has escalated tensions in Lebanon between supporters and opponents of Assad. Many Sunnis have also gone to Syria, to fight alongside rebels.Nasrallah urged his supporters to exercise restraint and maintain stability in Lebanon after rocket fire hit both Sunni and Shi'ite towns in the Bekaa Valley and dozens of people were killed in street fighting in the northern city of Tripoli.
WASHINGTON — After more than two years on the sidelines, President Barack Obama is going to start arming Syrian rebels but that is unlikely to reverse the recent momentum won by the government and its Lebanese Shi'ite Hezbollah allies any time soon.Obama's decision to send U.S. weapons to opposition fighters came as the White House announced it had proof that President Bashar al-Assad's government had used chemical weapons against rebel forces in the civil war.The U.S. government made clear that even though it was now confirmed that Assad had crossed a chemical weapons "red line" set by Obama, Washington intends to move cautiously - and in concert with its allies - on what steps to take.With rebel forces desperate for weapons after battlefield setbacks like the fall of the strategic town of Qusair, Obama's deputy national security adviser, Ben Rhodes, said only that the president had decided to ramp up military support to the opposition both in "scope and scale."A U.S. official said this would include sending weapons to the Syrian insurgents. That marks a shift in longstanding U.S. policy against lethal aid, which sought to keep war-weary Washington from being drawn into another conflict in the Middle East.Obama administration officials have said that any arming of the rebels would likely be limited to small arms and ammunition rather than anti-aircraft weapons, which could have an immediate impact on the battlefield.The New York Times reported that the supplies, to be coordinated by the Central Intelligence Agency, might include anti-tank weapons.The arrival of thousands of seasoned, Iran-backed Hezbollah fighters to help Assad combat the mainly Sunni rebellion has shifted momentum in the 2-year-old war, which the United Nations said on Thursday had killed at least 93,000 people.Thursday's announcements followed a series of urgent White House meetings on Syria amid mounting pressure at home and abroad for Obama to act more forcefully in the conflict, including a sharp critique of his hesitant policy from former President Bill Clinton. The meetings reportedly exposed divisions among Obama's aides on the issue.The White House unveiled what it called conclusive findings on Assad's chemical weapons, saying intelligence officials believed that 100 to 150 people had died in the attacks."Our intelligence community assesses that the Assad regime has used chemical weapons, including the nerve agent sarin, on a small scale against the opposition multiple times in the last year," Rhodes told reporters.The chemical weapons findings, Rhodes asserted, had prompted Obama approve stepped-up support for the rebels. "He has said that the use of chemical weapons would change his calculus, and it has," Rhodes said.The U.S. decision came as Assad and Hezbollah turned their guns northward, fighting near the city of Aleppo and bombarding the central city of Homs.U.S. and European officials anxious about rebel losses are meeting the commander of the main rebel fighting force, the Free Syrian Army, in Turkey in the coming days. FSA chief Salim Idriss was expected to plead for more help.Western governments that predicted months ago that Assad would soon fall now believe that support from Tehran and Hezbollah are giving him the upper hand. But they also worry that sending arms to rebel fighters could empower Sunni Islamist insurgents who have pledged their loyalty to al Qaeda.Obama has been more cautious than Britain and France, which forced the European Union this month to lift an embargo that had blocked weapons for the rebels. He plans to consult allies during a Group of Eight summit in Northern Ireland next week.The White House made clear, however, that Obama still intends to tread carefully. Rhodes said there was little support for creating a Libya-style no-fly zone - considered too risky by some Obama aides because of Syria's anti-aircraft system - and stopped short of threatening other military action.Some Republicans urged Obama to move more assertively."Official confirmation of Assad's use of chemical weapons heightens the urgency for the U.S. to provide the kind of decisive support, including arms and training, to vetted Syrian opposition groups as soon as possible," said U.S. Senator Bob Corker, ranking Republican on the Foreign Relations Committee. "I want to urge the president to exercise leadership."But David Solimini, a vice president at the Truman National Security Project think tank, said: "Thankfully the president is being cautious about his military options. This is not a place where America can go it alone."
BEIRUT — Gunmen shot dead four Shi'ite Muslim men in Lebanon's Bekaa Valley in an ambush on Sunday, security sources said, in the latest sectarian violence close to the border with Syria.The civil war just a few miles across the border in Syria has inflamed tensions in the Bekaa Valley, where Sunni Muslims who support the uprising against Bashar al-Assad live close to Shi'ites who back the Syrian president.It was not clear who was responsible for Sunday's killings. A military source said residents of the nearby Sunni Muslim town of Arsal denied any involvement.The recapture of the Syrian border town of Qusair by Assad's forces, spearheaded by Shi'ite Lebanese Hezbollah guerrillas, led to an influx of Syrian rebel fighters and civilians into Lebanon and more violence spilling over into the Bekaa region.Rockets fired from areas believed to be controlled by Syrian rebels have targeted the Shi'ite town of Hermel, while a Syrian helicopter crossed into Lebanon last week and fired at buildings in the town of Arsal, wounding several people.Lebanon's National News Agency said protesters blocked two roads in the area after Sunday's killings - one leading to Arsal and another near the Shi'ite town of Baalbek.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syria said Sunday that Egypt's decision to cut diplomatic ties with his country is "irresponsible," accusing its president of fueling sectarian conflict in Syria and serving a U.S.-Israeli conspiracy to divide the Middle East.The government statement quoted in state media comes a day after President Mohammed Morsi told supporters at a Cairo rally that his country is severing ties with Damascus and closing its embassy in the Syrian capital.Morsi, an Islamist who hails from Egypt's powerful Muslim Brotherhood, made the decision as calls proliferate from hardline Sunni clerics in Egypt and the region to launch a "holy war" against the regime of Syrian President Bashar Assad.In his Saturday night speech, Morsi also called for a U.N. endorsed no-fly zone over Syria.The strongly-worded Syrian statement said on Sunday said Morsi is supporting an idea that would violate its sovereignty, and is "serving the goals of Israel and the United States" in the region."Mohammed Morsi joins a choir of conspiracy and incitement led by the United States and Israel against Syria," the statement said.It also accused Morsi of endorsing calls by hardline clerics calling for fighting in Syria against Assad's regime "to shed Syrian blood instead of directing the compass toward liberating occupied Palestinian lands." The statement added that Morsi doesn't reflect the views of Egyptians, who have longstanding ties with the Syrian people and who have fought alongside them against Israel in wars of the past.The statement taunted Morsi, whose Brotherhood group is known for its enmity to Israel, for cutting ties with Syria but maintaining them with Israel despite its treatment of the Palestinians and recent airstrikes inside Syria. That policy "exposes the real identity of Morsi and his group," it said.Since taking office, Morsi has attempted to reconcile his group's traditionally anti-Israel and anti-US positions with the requirements of his role as the leader of Egypt — the first Arab country to sign a peace deal with Israel in 1979.Morsi, who took office in June last year, tried to make Syria the focus of his foreign policy project, launching a regional peace initiative that includes rivals Saudi Arabia, a Sunni Muslim country, and Shiite Iran. But the complexity of the Syrian conflict, with now both the United States and Russia supporting different sides of an already gruesome war, has drowned the initiative.Morsi's decision Saturday comes as the conflict is increasing taking sectarian overtones. The fighting pits Assad's regime — dominated by a Shiite offshoot and supported by Shiite Iran and Lebanon's Shiite Hezbollah guerrillas — against mostly Sunni rebel fighters backed by Sunni Gulf regimes. Hardline Sunni clerics have called on able-bodied young men to join Syrian rebels in their fight against Assad's regime, and blasted Hezbollah for taking part in the fighting.Morsi called on Hezbollah to get out of Syria, a view previously expressed by Gulf countries.In Egypt, Morsi faces a fresh round of street protests later this month by opposition parties who are urging him to step down. His opponents accuse the Islamist leader of monopolizing power and failing to address the country's myriad of social and economic problems."Syria condemns this irresponsible position that reflects an attempt by Morsi to implement the agenda of the Muslim Brotherhood," the official said. "Syria is confident that the brotherly Egyptian people will bring down these (Morsi) policies and ... their grave consequences on the region."
GAZA — The Palestinian Islamist Hamas movement on Monday urged Lebanese militant group Hezbollah to withdraw its forces from Syria, where they are battling for President Bashar al-Assad, and focus on fighting Israel instead.Hamas, which controls the Gaza Strip, was once an Assad ally but last year endorsed the revolt against him in a shift that at the time deprived the Syrian leader of an important Sunni Muslim supporter in the Arab world."We call on Hezbollah to take its forces out of Syria and to keep their weapons directed against the Zionist enemy," Moussa Abu Marzouk, a Cairo-based Hamas leader, said on his Facebook page.The call marked a further deterioration in relations between Hamas and Hezbollah, two long-time allies who have each fought against Israel and advocate its destruction.Abu Marzouk said Shi'ite Muslim Hezbollah's involvement in Syria, where Assad, a member of the Shi'ite-rooted Alawite sect, is fighting mainly Sunni rebels, had stoked sectarian conflict.Hamas has denied some Lebanese media reports that its fighters were present in Syria to train rebels in weaponry, bomb-making and tunnel digging.On Friday, Hezbollah leader Sayyed Hassan Nasrallah promised his group would keep fighting alongside Assad's forces after it spearheaded the recapture of the strategic town of Qusair.Hamas's leaders in exile were once based in Damascus but left, mainly for Egypt and Qatar, in 2012 as the civil war escalated.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Many exchange shops closed in Damascus on Tuesday, fearing more chaos a day after the Syrian currency plunged to a new record low, reflecting growing fears in the capital following a U.S. decision to arm rebel groups fighting to topple President Bashar Assad's regime.The currency woes add to the embattled president's troubles, and government officials rushed to allay public fears by announcing Damacus' top ally Iran was extending a credit line to make up for market needs.Traders in the capital said a rush to buy U.S. dollars on Monday sent the Syrian pound's value tumbling to 210 to the dollar, compared to 170 just that morning. Many exchange shops closed Tuesday while others opened their doors without doing business, saying it was difficult to value the pound.The official price of the dollar Tuesday was 99 pounds, according to state news agency SANA, though the widespread black market price is considered to reflect its real value. When Syria's conflict began in early 2011, the dollar was worth 47 pounds.The currency dive followed last week's decision by the Obama administration to arm rebel groups in Syria, deepening U.S. involvement in the more than 2-year civil war which has killed 93,000 people, according to the U.N. The U.S., Britain and France accused Assad's regime of using chemical weapons, which President Barack Obama called a "red line.""Expectations of a stronger U.S. involvement in Syria following the decision to arm rebels groups was almost certainly the key factor behind the recent drop in the Syrian pound," said Torbjorn Soltvedt, senior analyst at the British risk analysis firm Maplecroft."The decision reinforced the view that ultimately the Syrian regime will be unable to survive in its current form, despite recent strategic gains," he said, predicting a prolonged stalemate.Regime forces have been waging a stepped-up offensive in the central Homs province and the northern city of Aleppo, Syria's largest city and once the country's commercial center. The assaults were launched after troops backed by Hezbollah fighters captured the rebel-held strategic western town of Qusair near the Lebanon border on June 5.Officials rushed to assuage currency fears. Central Bank governor Adib Mayaleh said the pounds drop was unjustified and that government "put in place the required mechanism" — a $1 billion credit line from Iran to help support the pound, the state news agency SANA reported.Iran is one of Assad's strongest allies and is believed to have supplied his government with billions of dollars since the country's crisis began in March 2011.Syrian Prime Minister Wael al-Halqi said the government still has large reserves of foreign exchange and would put in place a package of economic measures to enhance the economy. He referred to the support of "friendly countries," including Iran's willingness to finance Syrian imports and the needs of industrial and agricultural production.Syrians in the past few months have rushed to get rid of their pounds by buying gold or dollars and euros to preserve the value of their savings. Lack of tourists and a ban on Syria's oil exports by the U.S. and the European Union months after the crisis began deprived the government of billions of dollars annually.The rising dollar has fueled a hike in prices."I keep changing the price of the products I sell to match the price of the dollar, otherwise I would be losing all the time," said a Damascus resident who sells spare car parts. He spoke on condition of anonymity for fear of reprisals.Aleppo-based activist Mohammed Saeed said the rebel-held northern regions depend on goods imported from Turkey — including rice, sugar, butter and cooking oil, which are becoming more expensive in pounds."People get paid in Syrian pounds and are finding it more difficult to buy their needs," Saeed said by telephone.Syria-based economist Hisham Khayat said the danger is that "the market is being dollarized. Buying and selling in Syria is based on the exchange rate."When the conflict began, the government had some $17 billion in foreign currency reserves. But that figure has dropped from blows to two main pillars of the economy: oil exports, which used to bring in up to $8 million per day, and tourism which in 2010 earned $8 billion. Now U.S. and European Union bans on oil imports are estimated to cost Syria about $400 million a month.The government has not said what currency reserves it has left, but the London-based Economist Intelligence Unit estimates it at a little more than $4.5 billion.All those factors mean the currency is likely to continue falling, Soltvedt said."For the foreseeable future it is difficult to imagine even a limited degree of economic normalcy returning to Syria."
BEIRUT — Lebanon's main Sunni Muslim political party pleaded with the presidency on Tuesday to prevent "state collapse", blaming the Shi'ite Hezbollah group for dragging the country into the war in neighboring Syria.Iranian-backed Lebanese Hezbollah militants are openly fighting for Syrian President Bashar al-Assad as he battles a 27-month-old Sunni-led revolt. Inter-communal violence has spread to religiously-mixed Lebanese cities and border towns."Hezbollah is serving Syria and Iran at the expense of the Lebanese," ex-Prime Minister Fouad Siniora told reporters. He said President Michel Suleiman should launch an initiative "to stop the state's collapse and give the Lebanese hope".Siniora, head of the Future Movement that is part of the "March 14" coalition opposed to Syrian influence in Lebanon, said March 14 had sent a memorandum to Suleiman calling for the deployment of the army on the northern border with Syria, and suggesting a role for United Nations peacekeepers there."We need a full and immediate withdrawal (of Hezbollah) from the fighting in Syria," he said.He said Hezbollah's huge arsenal of weapons supplied by Syria and Iran had made the Islamist group, which says its priority is fighting Israel, "stronger than the state".The United Nations says 93,000 people have been killed in the Syrian conflict, which has displaced millions of people, including more than 500,000 to Lebanon, a country of only 4 million. Fighting between Lebanese groups supporting and opposing Assad has cost dozens of lives in Lebanon.Hezbollah helped Assad's forces retake the Syrian border town of Qusair from rebels this month. Sayyed Hassan Nasrallah, the leader of the Lebanese political and military movement, vowed on Friday to maintain the fight in Syria.
WASHINGTON — President Obama defended his authorization of recently revealed domestic and international surveillance programs in comments broadcast Monday night but rejected the suggestion that his policies were basically a warmed-over version of those of the last White House."Some people say, 'Well, you know, Obama was this raving liberal before. Now he's, you know, Dick Cheney,' " Mr. Obama told Charlie Rose on his PBS interview show. "Dick Cheney sometimes says, 'Yeah, you know, he took it all lock, stock and barrel.' My concern has always been not that we shouldn't do intelligence gathering to prevent terrorism, but rather, are we setting up a system of checks and balances?"In perhaps his most expansive explanation of his surveillance policies since leaked documents exposed a pair of secret programs, Mr. Obama said he had made important changes from the policies of George W. Bush, including making sure that surveillance was approved by Congress and a secret foreign intelligence court. "But I think it's fair to say that there are going to be folks on the left — and what amuses me is now folks on the right who are fine when there's a Republican president, but now, Obama's coming in with the black helicopters," he said.Yet like Mr. Cheney, who appeared on "Fox News Sunday" over the weekend, Mr. Obama defended the effectiveness of surveillance programs in heading off threats to the United States. "The one thing people should understand about all these programs, though, is they have disrupted plots, not just here in the United States but overseas as well," he said. He added that while other factors were at work, "we are increasing our chances of preventing a catastrophe like that through these programs."The White House hoped to use the interview to calm concerns about the surveillance programs, and Mr. Obama emphasized that intelligence agencies were not listening in on Americans' telephone calls without court orders. A new CNN/ORC International poll suggested that many Americans were uncomfortable with his handling of surveillance, and in the wake of several recent controversies, his approval rating had slipped to 45 percent from 53 percent.Mr. Obama said he had directed intelligence agencies to examine whether more information about the surveillance programs could be declassified to satisfy Americans that they were conducted within legal bounds and were far less intrusive into personal privacy than critics assume. He said that the intelligence agencies were only collecting data like telephone numbers called and the duration of calls. An Internet monitoring program, he added, was directed at foreigners with ties to terrorism, cyberhacking and the spread of dangerous weapons or technology.In his first public remarks about his shift on Syria, Mr. Obama said he wanted to bolster the opposition to President Bashar al-Assad "so there's a counterweight that can potentially lead to political negotiations." But he rejected more assertive measures like establishing a no-fly zone or a humanitarian corridor to help refugees. He said that "90 percent of the deaths" had not been caused by airstrikes and warned against anything that would "slip-slide your way into deeper and deeper commitments."Mr. Obama said it was important to understand "if you set up a no-fly zone, that you may not be actually solving the problem on the zone.""Or if you set up a humanitarian corridor, are you in fact committed not only to stopping aircraft from going that corridor but also missiles?" he continued. "And if so, does that mean that you then have to take out the armaments in Damascus and are you prepared then to bomb Damascus? And what happens if there's civilian casualties?"Noting extensive deliberations in the Situation Room, he added, "Unless you've been involved in those conversations, then it's kind of hard for you to understand that the complexity of the situation and how we have to not rush into one more war in the Middle East."
Seeking to regain lost momentum, Syrian rebels mounted what appeared to be one of the deadliest strikes against government forces to date on Monday, sending a suicide bomber to detonate what they said was six tons of explosives in a truck. The bombing near the city of Aleppo in northern Syria was said to have killed as many as 60 soldiers.The blast, reported by rebel activists reached by telephone and on the Web site of Al Jazeera, came a day after a car-bomb attack on a military checkpoint near Damascus that killed up to 20 people. The bombings reflected efforts by some rebel contingents to counter a series of advances by government forces that have emboldened President Bashar al-Assad in recent weeks.The most important government victory, on June 5, was the routing of outgunned rebel forces in Qusayr, near the Lebanon border, after a protracted siege. Fighters from the Lebanese Shiite militant group Hezbollah helped their Syrian government allies in that effort, raising the possibility that the Syrian conflict, now in its third year, could entangle Lebanon and become a broader sectarian struggle.Hezbollah's alliance with Mr. Assad has also created tensions between it and other militant organizations that had been united in their common hostility toward Israel. Hamas, the Islamist group that governs Gaza, on Monday called on Hezbollah to withdraw its fighters from Syria and focus instead on keeping guns aimed "against the Israeli occupation." Hamas, which once kept its leadership headquarters in Syria, broke with Mr. Assad in early 2012 over his repression of the uprising against him.After the Qusayr battle, the triumphant Syrian forces turned their attention to recapturing rebel-held stretches of Aleppo, the formerly bustling commercial center of the country, where the two sides have fought steadily for nearly a year.More than 93,000 people have been killed in the Syrian conflict, the United Nations said last week.Al Jazeera quoted an activist in Aleppo, identified as Mohammad al-Hadi, saying that a jihadist group affiliated with Al Qaeda carried out the truck-bomb attack in a suburb near the city's international airport. He was quoted as saying that the vehicle "was filled with six tons of explosives."A rebel video posted online showed a young-looking man in a baseball cap climbing into the driver's seat of a rusty-looking step van; the video said he was the suicide bomber. A second video purported to show a thunderous blast. There was no way to confirm the authenticity of the videos, but activists reached independently said there was a large explosion at a military base in the Aleppo area. An activist who identified himself as Abul Hassan said 60 soldiers were killed in the attack on the base, which he said was a former mental hospital that was taken over by the military.The Syrian state-run news agency, SANA, made no mention of the Aleppo attack. Instead, its broadcasts were dominated by coverage of an interview Mr. Assad gave to a German newspaper, the Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, that was scheduled for publication on Tuesday. In the interview, Mr. Assad warned the European Union not to send arms to the rebels, saying it would "pay the price" by spawning terrorism in its own backyard.The European Union is debating whether to provide weapons to vetted segments of the rebel forces in Syria. Last week, the Obama administration went one step further, deciding to provide the rebels with limited supplies of small arms, after having concluded that Mr. Assad's government had used chemical weapons several times.The American decision to become more directly involved in the conflict appeared to play a role on Monday in a new wave of chaotic selling of the Syrian pound, the national currency, according to Reuters. The news agency quoted currency dealers in Damascus and elsewhere saying that it cost at least 205 Syrian pounds to buy one American dollar, meaning that the Syrian currency had lost 20 percent of its value in a week and had fallen 77 percent since March 2011, when the conflict began. At that time, one dollar cost 47 Syrian pounds.SANA made no direct mention of the pound sell-off, but it alluded to the problem by quoting Adeb Mayaleh, the governor of Syria's central bank, as saying that the central bank would provide more foreign currency to Syrian banks "to restore the price of the Syrian pound against the foreign currencies back to normal."
PARIS — World powers will meet this weekend in Qatar to decide on how to answer a list of requests for help from Syrian rebels, a French diplomat said Wednesday.The U.S., France, Britain and Germany are among 11 countries meeting in Doha as part of the Friends of Syria group. Foreign ministers will be attending the discussions.A "precise" list of demands from Syrian rebels was set out Friday during a meeting in Ankara, Turkey, with Free Syrian Army Gen. Salim Idris, who spelled out urgent needs ranging from equipment to sophisticated arms, the diplomat said on condition of anonymity because he wasn't authorized to be publicly named while discussing sensitive diplomatic issues.The U.S. decided last week to send arms to the rebels, and Britain and France have stressed the need to level the playing field for the rebels against Syria's military. A balance of power on the ground between rebels of the Free Syrian Army and forces of Syrian President Bashar Assad is considered crucial to holding planned peace negotiations in Geneva. No date for those talks has been set, but leaders at the Group of Eight meeting this week in Northern Ireland all agreed talks should start soon.The French diplomat refused to provide details of what exactly was on the "broad list" — except to say it covers anti-aircraft weapons, and he refused to hint what France might be prepared to provide. However, he stressed that a "collective and complementary" approach by 11 nations is an optimal way of exploring the list and, ultimately, delivering."It's a list that corresponds to needs of Free Army joint chiefs to respond to challenges posed by the growing ... regime forces and their allies ...," he said. He was referring to the forces of Iran-backed Hezbollah which have joined Russian-backed Syrian government troops, fighters from Iraq, which the official placed at several hundred and climbing, and Iranians on the ground, too.Assad's troops dealt a major blow to rebels earlier this month, changing the balance of power by pushing rebels out of the strategic town of Qusair near the Lebanese border, with Hezbollah's help.The U.N. says Syria's more than two-year-old civil war has killed more than 93,000 people.
BEIRUT — Rebels attacked a main highway in northern Syria on Wednesday, opposition groups said, to try to choke off a major supply line for President Bashar al-Assad's forces in the region.Assad's troops, backed by battle-hardened Lebanese Hezbollah fighters and emboldened by their capture of a strategic border town, are starting an offensive to regain the rebel-dominated north and remaining rebel strongholds around Damascus.The pro-opposition Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said the rebels had seized an army checkpoint on the Ariha-Latakia stretch of an international highway that goes through Syria's biggest city, Aleppo, to the Turkish border.Other rebel groups said opposition forces had seized three checkpoints and needed to capture three more to cut off army access to the M5 highway."This is a very important battle in our move to put a stranglehold on regime supply lines from its stronghold on the coast into the north, particularly to Idlib city, which is one of the regime's last footholds in Idlib province," said Mohammed Fizo, a rebel spokesman speaking by Skype."The regime is responding by shelling the highway and sending fighter jets to bomb nearby villages."Assad's forces aim to retake Aleppo, where they have been mired in a bloody stalemate with rebels for nearly a year.World powers remain at odds about how to handle the Syrian crisis, which dominated the Group of Eight conference this week but led to no political breakthroughs. The United States wants Assad removed and has promised to arm the rebels, while Russia, the Syrian leader's main arms supplier, opposes these policies.Their disagreements have complicated their joint efforts to bring the Syrian government and opposition together for proposed "Geneva 2" peace talks, now not expected to start before August.Assad's military offensive aims to strengthen his hand in any negotiations, but his forces face a tough task in the north, where rebels hold swathes of territory, some adjacent to Turkey, which backs them and lets weapons and supplies cross the border.Rebel spokesman Fizo said rebels had been working to isolate army checkpoints along the highway in Idlib for months. If they successfully seized the road, they would then move on to the army's secondary supply route further north.Rami Abdelrahman, head of the British-based Observatory, said that a successful rebel campaign could sever all ground supply routes into northern Syria from the Mediterranean coast, where many of Syria's most fortified military sites are located.The coast is home to many minority Alawites, whose sect is an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam and who form Assad's core support group.In the port city of Latakia, part of Assad's coastal stronghold where rebel attacks have been rare, opposition and state media said an arms store on a military site had exploded.State television said the blast was caused by a technical fault and had wounded six people. The Observatory said 13 soldiers had been hurt, some of whom were in critical condition. It said the cause of the blast was still unclear.Syria's 27-month-old conflict began as a protest movement against four decades of Assad family rule, but has evolved into a civil war that has killed more than 93,000 people.The violence risks splitting Syria between Alawites, Sunni Muslims and Kurds, and igniting a regional conflict as Hezbollah and Iraqi Shi'ite fighters join Assad's forces and foreign Islamist militants line up with mostly Sunni Syrian rebels.A Syrian rebel unit claimed responsibility in a video for killing four Shi'ite men in Lebanon this week, saying they were Hezbollah fighters trying to enter Syria.When Assad's forces captured Qusair, in central Homs province near the Lebanese border, earlier this month, they had the support of Lebanese Shi'ite towns loyal to Hezbollah.
PARIS — The U.N. cultural agency says six historical sites in Syria are in imminent danger because of the country's civil war and is urging international support to protect them.UNESCO said in a statement Thursday that its World Heritage Committee says the sites are "of outstanding universal value for humanity as a whole."Some significant mosques, citadels and souks have gotten caught in the crossfire between regime forces and rebels, and illicit trade in Syria's rich archaeological heritage has flourished during the two-year war.The sites on the UNESCO committee's danger list include the historical centers of Damascus, Bosra and Aleppo, as well as the desert oasis of Palmyra, a cultural center of the ancient world.
BEIRUT — Syria's rebels have received shipments of more powerful weapons from Gulf allies in recent weeks, particularly anti-tank and anti-aircraft missiles, that have already helped stall aggressive new advances by regime forces.But those same shipments have sparked feuding and squabbling among rebel factions, illustrating the complications the United States will face as it starts directly arming the rebels, a major policy shift by the Obama administration.Every shipment enters a tangle of complex rebel politics, with dozens of brigades and battalions operating on the ground, riven by jealousies, rivalries and competition, with radical Islamist fighters dominant. Moderate brigades complain Islamists are being favored. Islamists say they are being unfairly blamed. On the ground, rebels are making efforts to organize themselves to better funnel weapons and more effectively fight, but they often stumble over the same splits.The new shipment earlier this month— said to be only the second sent by Gulf countries since November, and the first ever known to include some anti-aircraft missiles — caused a stir among rebels who say it went to one of the extreme Islamist groups, Ahrar al-Sham. The group is the strongest member of the Syrian Islamist Front, made up of 11 Islamist factions, which appears to be increasingly posing as a parallel to the Western-backed Free Syrian Army, a loose umbrella group of rebel fighters."The distribution was not fair," said Zeineddine al-Shami, a spokesman for the First Brigade of the Free Syrian Army in the Damascus area. "It was random, based on the people they know."Rebels in the Damascus area have struggled in recent weeks against a stepped-up campaign by regime forces, backed by Lebanese Hezbollah and Iraqi Shiites fighters, to push them out of suburbs that have been rebel strongholds.Ahrar al-Sham is one of the most well-established rebel groups to emerge in the Syrian conflict, with fighting units in nearly all the provinces. It has coordinated to some degree with the new unified Supreme Military Council of the Free Syrian Army, created in December to incorporate the disparate rebel brigades, but it still maintains an independent command.Although it calls itself a moderate Islamist group, activists and residents in areas the group controls describe them as hardcore. Alongside Jabhat al-Nusra, an al-Qaida-linked force that includes many foreign jihadis, Ahrar al-Sham controls Raqaa, the only city the rebels managed to fully seize in Syria. One activist reported seeing Ahrar al-Sham fighters threatening to cut off an old man's hands for smoking, a vice for observant Muslims.Its leader Abdullah al-Hamawi wrote on his Twitter account Wednesday that reports his group has received new anti-tank missiles "can only be taken in the context of attempts to incite factions against each other."Whether the denial is true or not, it reflects the deep sensitivity among the factions over who gets weapons."They deny it for a simple reason, because of the high competition, even conflict, between groups," Mustafa Alani, a Dubai-based expert on Gulf countries' policies including aid to Syrian rebels, said. "And they don't want to appear as having been adopted by outside parties."President Barack Obama has resisted directly arming rebels, fearing getting mired in the conflict, now in its third year with some 93,000 estimated dead. The U.S. is also concerned that stronger weapons could fall into the hands of extremists. Until now, it has only consulted as regional allies including Saudi Arabia and Qatar began sending ammunition and lighter arms last year through Jordan and Turkey, while the Americans provided non-lethal equipment. The countries have never publicly confirmed their involvement in arms shipments.But earlier this month, Obama announced the United States would begin providing arms and ammunition, after President Bashar Assad's military dealt the rebels serious setbacks. U.S. officials say they want weapons to go to more moderate factions. The most likely funnel would be the Supreme Military Council, headed by Gen. Salim Idris, a defector from Assad's military.The recent shipment was provided by Gulf nations, not directly by the U.S, according to activists.Alani said it included Russian anti-tank missiles, which rebels have previously obtained from raids on Syrian military arsenals, and some Chinese anti-aircraft missiles in small quantities. The United States and its allies have been highly reluctant to provide anti-aircraft missiles to the rebels, but the rebels have been desperate for them to counter regime aircraft that relentless pound their positions.Alani would not say how many anti-aircraft or anti-tanks missiles were in the shipment, but said a figure of 250 missiles that has circulated was "exaggerated."He said there was already evidence of rebels using the new anti-tanks missiles in the city of Aleppo to counter two weeks of intensified regime assaults on their neighborhoods, and in the southern province of Daraa. "This could change the features of the battle greatly in favor of the rebels."The shipment also illustrates the problem of defining moderate or Islamist factions. Alani said Ahrar al-Sham is seen by some as a relatively moderate Islamist force.FSA leaders argue that funneling weapons through Idris' command structure will strengthen moderates and sideline Islamic radicals, who have been among the most powerful fighters in the field. Idris has been criticized by some rebels for being ineffective in providing weapons — but if he becomes the gatekeeper for arms, he could also come under heavy criticism and backlash for doling out to some groups and not others.Over the past six months, Idris' council has worked to create regional command centers, integrate disparate groups and establish coordination with the more Islamist groups.But efforts to integrate rebels also run into issues of vanity and territorial disputes, said al-Shami, the Damascus rebel spokesman.In recent months, the FSA formed an umbrella group for 12 brigades in the Damascus suburb of Eastern al-Ghouta to better defend it, he said. Months later, a new group of different brigades started operating in the same area, after their own unification process."There are also a lot of differences, in the way of thinking and method of working. There was also selfishness."Some groups recognize Idris as chief of staff. But others mock the FSA as a virtual myth or perceive FSA rebels as disunited, hungry for plunder and — in the eyes of Islamists — not of moral caliber.Abu Bilal al-Homsi, an activist connected to rebels in the besieged central city of Homs, said the FSA re-organization of brigades was targeted against the Islamist factions. He said the FSA wants to create Syrian "Sahwa" groups, referring to U.S.-allied groups of Sunni fighters in Iraq that battled al-Qaida."There is no FSA. It is a lie," he said in an interview through Skype. "These new weapons will be aimed at every brigade that raises the flag of 'There is no god but God.'" He was referring to the Islamic declaration of faith that serves as the insignia on black flags carried by jihadist groups.Much of the rebels' arsenal has come from weapons taken from the military in raids or bought from corrupt regime officials. Part of the strength of radicals like Jabhat al-Nusra has been that they were often the first to seize weapons, which they could distribute to win over other factions, said activist Rami Jarrah, who has traveled with rebels around Syria.Radical factions have also benefited from smuggled weapons provided by rich Gulf clerics and families who have vowed support for Islamist rebels as the conflict takes increasingly sectarian overtones, he said.Activist Hadi Abdullah coordinated among battalions on the ground during the recent battle for Qusair, which ended this month with regime forces capturing the town. His role also involved dealing with donors and financiers, including rich Arabs and exiled Syrians."I've developed a complex from donors." Some of them made incredible demands, he said, such as asking rebels to film their operations and call it by the donor's name. Others would say here is the money, buy weapons but don't use them yet. "Why store it? What is their aim? We refuse that."Alani said "different intentions" among international arms providers bring another complication."There is a big difference," he said. "The regional states, specially the Gulf states ... want the arm supply to help (rebels) to score a military victory. The Americans and the European Union want only to restore balance because they think once you restore balance both parties will be ready to come to the table."
BEIRUT — Syrian rebels said Friday they have received new weapons from friendly countries that could lead to changes on the ground and victories against President Bashar Assad's forces.The arms shipments arrived recently from Arab nations and other countries, a spokesman for the opposition fighters, Loay AlMikdad, told The Associated Press in a telephone interview.He did not elaborate on the shipments but insisted no weapons have come from the United States so far.AlMikdad's comments confirm earlier AP reporting that new weapons were recently delivered to the opposition from allies, enabling them to stall advances by regime forces in the northern city of Aleppo, Syria's largest, and elsewhere.Opposition members and experts had told the AP that Gulf countries delivered earlier this month new anti-tank missiles and some anti-aircraft missiles to rebel commanders.The U.S. announced earlier this month it had conclusive evidence that Assad's regime has used chemical weapons, including the nerve agent sarin, on a small scale against opposition forces. The White House said multiple chemical attacks last year killed up to 150 people.Following the announcement, which also coincided with a new aggressive push by the regime to drive rebels from strategic areas they held, U.S. officials said President Barack Obama has authorized sending weapons to Syrian rebels in a major policy shift.Obama has said the use of chemical weapons crosses a "red line," triggering greater American involvement in the crisis.Syrian rebels have long demanded they be supplied with anti-aircraft and anti-tank missiles but some Western nations are worried such weapons could end up in the hands of al-Qaida-linked groups that are fighting in Syria against Assad. The country's bloodshed has killed about 93,000 people since the crisis erupted in March 2011."You will see changes on the ground," said AlMikdad, the spokesman for the rebel Free Syrian Army, or FSA. "You will see victories by the Free Syrian Army and we will be able to repel attacks on civilian areas. We will be able to protect civilian areas in a better way."His comments came hours after the main rebel military commander of the Western-backed FSA first confirmed his fighters had received the new weapons, refusing to describe the weapons or where they came from.Gen. Salim Idris said they would give his forces more power against government troops and allied Hezbollah fighters from Lebanon."I would like to thank the brothers and the friends whom I don't want to name," Idris told the Qatar-based Al-Jazeera TV on Friday.Pressed to comment on weapons from the U.S., Idris only said: "We are waiting, and we urge them to hurry up in supplying us with weapons and ammunition."Obama pointedly refused to detail steps his government has recently taken to arm rebels. U.S. officials have confirmed that the administration has approved weapons and ammunition shipments to the opposition, giving little details."We believe that the United States will implement its commitments toward us very soon," AlMikdad said. "We are strong on the ground. We will regain the territories that were taken by the regime.""People will see that all the Free Syrian Army needed was weapons to bring down the regime," he added.Meanwhile, activists reported that troops pounded several areas around the country on Friday, including the Damascus neighborhood of Qaboun and Aleppo city.Amateur videos showed smoke billowing from Qaboun as it was subjected to shelling. The videos appeared genuine and corresponded to other AP reporting on the events depicted.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said a Syrian warplane carried out an air raid on Jobar, a key district on the edge of Damascus. It gave no word on casualties.Also Friday, the United Nations children's agency UNICEF said that soaring summer temperatures, overcrowding and worsening hygiene are the latest threats facing some 4 million children affected by Syria's civil war."Without enough safe water and sanitation, the likelihood that children in Syria and those living as refugees around the region will fall sick with diarrhea and other diseases is certain to rise," said Maria Calivis, UNICEF's director for Middle East and North Africa.In Syria, the availability of safe water is one third what it was before the crisis, UNICEF said. Of the more than 4.25 million displaced Syrians, many live in overcrowded shelters with insufficient access to toilets and showers. The agency also said the sewage systems are damaged or overwhelmed by the increase in displaced populations.
IDLIB PROVINCE, Syria — The villages that dot the valleys and terraced hills of Syria's northwest used to epitomise the country's diversity. Each one was dominated by a different religion or sect. The settlements coexisted - sometimes peacefully, sometimes less so - for centuries, a patchwork of distinct but interwoven communities that, for many Syrians, was central to the nation's identity.Over the past two years, that order has fallen apart.In Zambaki, a concrete-block village in a valley near the border with Turkey, Sunni families have moved into homes abandoned by Alawite owners; Sunni instructors teach in the Alawite elementary school; and Sunni religious slogans in black paint mark the walls.Mohamed Skafe, a 40-year-old Sunni maths instructor remembers how the Alawites began to flee nearly a year ago. As government troops withdrew and rebels took over, he phoned a friend in the village and pleaded with him to stay."He told me, 'Can you protect me?'" Skafe recalled, holding his hands out, palms upward. "I said, 'I have no guarantee.'"As the revolt against Bashar al-Assad that began as a mostly secular call for democratic reform descended into civil war, communities have split along religious and ethnic lines. Majority Sunnis have come to dominate the opposition, while Shi'ites and Alawites, the offshoot sect of Shi'ite Islam that Assad belongs to, have largely sided with the government. Other minorities, such as the Christians, Druze and Kurds, have split or tried to stay neutral.Across the country, violence and fear have emptied entire villages, forced millions of people to flee their homes, and transformed the social landscape.The involvement of Shi'ite power Iran on one side and the ascendancy of hardline Islamists, including groups linked to al Qaeda, on the other has accelerated the process. For some fighters, the war has taken on an apocalyptic overtone. For others, enmity is rooted in old resentments and suspicions.During a 10-day journey through rebel-held territory, Reuters saw first-hand how the sectarian divisions are transforming the country. Those splits, and the risk of large-scale communal retribution, are one reason Western powers have hesitated to intervene.Now, as the United States prepares to arm the rebels, it risks getting entangled in an intricate conflict that often pits neighbour against neighbour. As in Yugoslavia or in neighbouring Iraq, where conflicts were marked by sectarianism and ethnic cleansing, Syria is unlikely to go back to the way it was. Even when the war ends, the reordering of villages and towns will leave behind a very different country, a change which could reverberate through the region.In Zambaki, in a house once owned by Alawites, a Sunni family of 10 has moved in after fleeing their own homes outside Hama, in central Syria. "The whole village was completely empty. We were in a Turkish camp, but it was so crowded. We decided to come back," one man in the family said, asking not to be named."The regime is playing a big game, a very big game. We had Alawite neighbours and I swear we were living like brothers. But the regime played with their minds, and frightened them. We were neighbours."The Ammar bin Yassir mosque, a turquoise and white complex of Persian-style domes, minarets, arabesques and tile mosaics, stands out among the short brown-and-beige breezeblock buildings of Raqqa. The city is the largest held by Syria's rebels and the mosque was once a destination for Shi'ite Muslim pilgrims from Iran, Lebanon and Iraq.Now it is filled with Sunni fighters who call themselves al-Muntasereen Billah, or "God's Victors."Bearded men guard the front gate, next to what they say is the carcass of a Scud missile fired by President Assad's army. Inside, rebels in camouflage fatigues with Kalashnikov rifles walk through the tiled courtyard, laughing and chatting. When they enter the mosque's carpeted interior, they leave their shoes on, a sign of disrespect.The rebels took over the mosque in March and smashed open tombs said to contain figures revered by Shi'ites, said Abu Hazem, a tall, chain-smoking leader of one of the brigade's units. "They used to say there were important people in here," he said. "But there was nothing. They're empty."Raqqa, always overwhelmingly Sunni, is now all but empty of Alawites. Homsi al-Hamada, a 73-year-old Sunni Islamic law scholar, said recent developments, notably the intervention of Lebanese Shi'ite group Hezbollah on the government's side, had "stoked the flames of sectarianism." The feelings were always there, but they used to be "covered up," he said, sitting in his home lined with bookcases packed with religious texts."At the beginning of the game, the ball was freedom and democracy. The protesters and the regime were playing with this ball," Hamada said."Now there are two teams - the first is the regime, Russia, China, Iran, Hezbollah and the Shi'ites, the other is the rebels, the United States, Germany, France, Turkey, Saudi Arabia and the Sunnis. Syria has become the ball."Walking through Ammar bin Yassir, past rooms once used by pilgrims but now housing rebel fighters, Abu Ziad, a 23-year-old student at the university across the road, pointed to pictures of Sayyed Hassan Nasrallah, Hezbollah's leader, on the floor of the mosque's library.He disappeared for a moment and reemerged with a painting of a black-shrouded figure slumped dead over a white horse, a depiction of Imam Hussein, a central figure in Shi'ite history whose death 1,300 years ago at the battle of Kerbala in Iraq is commemorated with an annual day of mourning."All of these pictures came from Iran," Abu Ziad said.A Sunni fighter standing nearby chimed in: "And they are lies."The question of identity has always been heated in the Levant, the land at the heart of the Middle East that includes modern Syria, Lebanon, Israel, Jordan and parts of southern Turkey. French and British colonial administrators partitioned the region into nation-states after World War One and the collapse of the Ottoman Empire, which had ruled since the 16th century.The division was traumatic. After Damascus gained independence from France in 1946, many Syrian politicians spoke of creating a "Greater Syria." Egyptian President Gamal Abdel Nasser called for Arab states from the Atlantic Ocean to the Gulf of Aden to unite. Syria and Egypt briefly did.Modern Syria is an amalgam of diverse religious and ethnic groups. About three quarters of Syria's roughly 23 million people are Sunni Muslim; the rest are Christians, Shi'ites, Alawites, and smaller, sometimes overlapping communities such as the Druze, Ismailis, Kurds, Armenians and Palestinians.Historian Patrick Seale once wrote that the way Syria's communities coexist described one of the essential puzzles of the Middle East. "Is that world a mosaic, a bewildering babble of ancient communities each at odds with the other? Or is it a unit, essentially one in way of life, language and aspirations?" he wrote in his biography of Assad's father, Hafez, who was president from 1971 until his death in 2000.Like his father, Assad exploited the threat of a violent breakup of the country to justify the continuation of an authoritarian police state. An overtly secular Alawite, Assad married a Sunni woman. References to sect were not included in censuses in an attempt to foster an inclusive Syrian identity.When the revolt started, Sunni activists tried to reach out to minorities, framing the uprising as a collective move against oppression for all Syrians.Opposition figures blame the failure of those efforts on government propaganda characterising the rebels as violent extremists and on the use of Alawite paramilitary militias known as "shabbiha" to harass, maim and kill unarmed protesters.The threat of a sectarian war has been self fulfilling. Pro-government militias have massacred hundreds of Sunnis in villages from Damascus to the Mediterranean, which some analysts say could be intended to carve a corridor from the capital to the historical Alawite homeland near the coast.In rebel-held regions, radical insurgents have desecrated Shi'ite holy places and speak of war against "infidels" and "apostates". This month, Sunni rebels killed about 60 Shi'ites in an eastern town in the Deir al-Zor province. "This is a Sunni area, it does not belong to other groups," one fighter shouted in a video purportedly of the attack in the town of Hatla.The Sunni-led revolt has emboldened the Iraqi branch of al Qaeda, a radical Sunni militant group, to carry out attacks against Baghdad's Shi'ite-led government in recent months. Sunni insurgents in Iraq are reclaiming former strongholds in the desert near Syria. Shi'ites in Gulf Arab countries have started to worry they will be blamed and targeted for Syria's violence.Lebanon, with its intertwined history, huge population of Sunni Syrian refugees, and dysfunctional central government, has been particularly vulnerable to the spread of sectarian fighting. Dozens have died in clashes between Alawite and Sunni factions in the coastal city of Tripoli, and missiles have been launched at Hezbollah strongholds in Baalbek and Hermel in the Bekaa valley.Hezbollah's intervention has embroiled Lebanon in the war and nourished sectarian hatreds. As fighters from the Iran-sponsored Shi'ite group joined a campaign to capture Qusair, a Sunni town near Lebanon, Colonel Abdel-Hamid Zakaria, a Free Syrian Army spokesman, said on live television that Shi'ite and Alawite villages would be "wiped off the map" in retaliation if it fell."We don't want this to happen at all, but it will be out of everyone's control," he said. "It will be an open, bloody, global sectarian war until the end."Foreign fighters have arrived to aid both sides. Hardline Sunni Islamists have come from countries as far-flung as Tunisia, Saudi Arabia, Russia, Britain, Sweden and China. In government-held Damascus, young Lebanese men in fatigues have arrived to defend the shrine of Sayeda Zeinab, a site visited by Muslims of all sects, but particularly revered by Shi'ites. The fighters say rebels often shoot at the shrine, damaging minarets.Near the shrine, one man, speaking with a clear Lebanese accent, sat in his office surrounded by pictures of Hezbollah leader Nasrallah and Iranian Shi'ite clerics. When asked if he was a member of Hezbollah, he smiled and said he could "neither deny nor confirm" it.The man, who asked not to be named, described a proxy war of ideologies between Iran and Saudi Arabia playing out in Syria, and blamed the influence of ultraconservative ideologues like Saudi Arabia's Wahhabi school on violence against the shrine. "This is not a war between Sunnis and Shi'ites. It's a war against extremism," he said.Syria's Christians occupy an uneasy middle ground in the shifting political and military landscape. Some Christians have fled to government-held territory, while others have stayed to take their chances with the rebels. Some have bought guns and joined the insurgency.The dominance of al Qaeda-aligned Jabhat al-Nusra and other radical Islamist brigades has evoked memories of recent attacks on Christians in Egypt and Iraq. Still, there have been relatively few instances of violence by Sunni fighters against Christians, who the rebels see as less close to Assad than the Alawites and Shi'ites.In Yaqubiyeh, a village of a few hundred people in Idlib province, Yacoub, an olive farmer, smiled and waved as bearded rebels drove by. "We've been living together for hundreds of years," he said. "We have problems with theft. But what the media says about Jabhat al-Nusra is not true. They are good people. They are very religious, but that's fine."Abu George, a Christian from the nearby village of Jdeide who farmed plums and olives before the revolt, now works with the Sunni-led Liwa al-Hurra battalion, mostly in the town. He said there were about 15 other Christians in the brigade, accounting for around 5 percent of the fighters. "Many Christians participate in the revolution. When the army left we joined the revolution," he said.Others in Yaqubiyeh, where thousands of displaced Sunnis have settled in recent months, were more circumspect. One woman, a 40-year-old Catholic, said Christians were mostly left alone, but were still nervous."We're living normally, we go pray, we come back, no one bothers us," she said, then leaned closer to a visiting journalist. "There is some theft on our land. They come and go, and none of us knows who does it. We're afraid to talk. Christians can't speak out. You understand me."In war, such suspicions and resentments can harden quickly. Rebels do not always acknowledge acts of ethnic violence as such. Instead, some describe them as legitimate military actions, or righting historical wrongs.When Alawites flee insurgent-held areas, rebels and non-fighters alike often say the sect only settled in the area over the past few decades as the result of state favouritism. In Raqqa, a university student described the province's Alawites as "security families," who came to staff Syria's manifold intelligence and police agencies. In Idlib province, a doctor said Alawites were not "original residents," and came because of government land reforms that encouraged them to move into the plains from the coast.When asked about the destruction of the tombs at the Ammar bin Yassir mosque, Hamada, the Islamic law scholar, claimed Iran had set up Shi'ite centres with government help on what he called Sunni land and prevented Sunnis from studying their religion. "The economic and political interests of Shi'ites and Alawites require them to stand with the regime," he said.In Zambaki, the new arrangement has an air of permanence. Skafe, the maths instructor, teaches lessons to about a dozen Sunni children in the school, which doubles as a barracks for rebel fighters. Another man, the one living in the Alawite house, sells cigarettes, biscuits and soda out of the old pantry. Across the street, children play and a pregnant woman walks with a child.The man said he hoped the owners could return one day, and said a court should be set up to determine who worked with Assad and who did not."Some people should be allowed to return, the people who haven't worked with the regime. But if you are a criminal, how could you return?" he said.But Skafe says it would be impossible for any Alawite to come back soon. "Not now. If the circumstances change," he said. What exactly? "I don't know. Right now, I don't know."
BAGHDAD/BEIRUT — Neighboring Iraq warned that Syria's civil war is tearing the Middle East apart and Lebanon's president urged his country's Hezbollah movement on Thursday to pull its fighters out of the conflict.After two years of fighting that has killed more than 93,000 people, Syria's turmoil is dragging its neighbors into a deadly confrontation between Shi'ite Iran supporting President Bashar al-Assad and Sunni Arab Gulf nations backing the Syrian rebels.The insurgents have suffered a series of setbacks on the battlefield and are besieged in the outskirts of Damascus facing a slow but steady advance by Assad's forces, which have begun to regain the upper hand.In a sign of the devastation being wrought by the war, the United Nations cultural agency UNESCO put the six World Heritage Sites in Syria on its danger list of imperiled monuments on Thursday, urging international efforts to protect them.Both Iraq and Lebanon have suffered growing violence at home as the Syrian conflict turns increasingly into a proxy war along confessional lines."Iraq is in the most difficult position in this regional turmoil and the conflict in Syria has become a regional conflict by all standards," Foreign Minister Hoshyar Zebari told Reuters in an interview in Baghdad."We are doing our best to maintain a neutral position, but the pressures are enormous and for how long we can hold really is a matter of further developments in Syria."With Russia and Iran arming Assad's government forces, and Lebanon's Hezbollah fighters joining the war on his behalf, Western powers have agreed in the last week to step up aid to the mainly Sunni rebels, who were driven out of the strategic town of Qusair, north of Damascus.Foreign ministers of the "Friends of Syria" group of nations backing the opposition are to meet in Qatar on Saturday to discuss assistance to try to help the rebel Free Syrian Army defend the key northern city of Aleppo.Those countries include the United States, Britain, France, Saudi Arabia, Turkey, Egypt and Qatar.Rebel prospects for reversing Assad's gains in Damascus may now hinge on military support from Western and Arab backers."If the northern front were to receive enough material and non-material support quickly, it could soon be equivalent to thousands of men, or even tens of thousands," a Western diplomat involved in the talks said.In a further sign that violence is spreading in one of the most diverse countries in the Middle East, Islamist Arab rebels have clashed with Kurds in northeastern Syria, sources on both sides said. The death toll from fighting and assassinations in the last few days has reached at least 30 people, with dozens more held in tit for tat kidnappings.Russian President Vladimir Putin rebuffed Western pressure at a Group of Eight summit in Northern Ireland this week to stop arming Assad's government and warned the West against supplying Islamist rebels he said ate human organs.The rebels believe last week's U.S. decision to give them military support will re-open arms deliveries through Jordan that were curbed as the United States and Russia negotiated a planned "Geneva 2" peace conference.They seek anti-tank and anti-aircraft weapons to help them fight back against Assad's air force and armor.Lebanese President Michel Suleiman appealed to Hezbollah, the main Lebanese Shi'ite movement, to pull its guerrillas out of Syria, saying any further involvement in its neighbor's civil war would fuel instability in Lebanon."If they take part in a battle for Aleppo, and more Hezbollah fighters are killed, it will lead to more tension," Suleiman told the Lebanese newspaper As-Safir in an interview published on Thursday."This should end in Qusair, and (Hezbollah) should return home."Suleiman, a Maronite Christian, originally had Assad's backing to become president but has become increasingly assertive in criticizing Syria, which dominated its smaller neighbor militarily and politically for three decades.The Syrian conflict has aggravated Lebanon's own complex sectarian rivalry, triggering fighting between Alawite pro-Assad and Sunni anti-Assad gunmen in the northern city of Tripoli that has killed dozens.In Iraq, a wave of sectarian attacks in Shi'ite and Sunni areas aggravated by the Syrian fighting has put the country's fragile ethnic and confessional make-up under severe strain.Baghdad's Shi'ite dominated government says it supports no side in the war, calling for a negotiated settlement. Western powers say Iraq allows Iranian flights carrying weapons to Assad's forces through Iraqi airspace, a charge Baghdad denies.U.S. and European officials say Iraq is not doing enough to stop Iran using its airspace to ferry arms to Damascus.Asked about this, and the movement of Iraqi Shi'ite fighters across the border, Zebari said: "From our knowledge of the dynamics of the Syrian conflict, we have taken a more cautious position. Not for any love for the regime ... but out of serious concerns for Iraqi national interests."In Paris, UNESCO said its World Heritage Committee had decided to place the six historic sites in Syria on its list of World Heritage in Danger to draw attention to the risks they are facing because of the conflict in the country."The danger listing is intended to mobilize all possible support for the safeguarding of these properties which are recognized by the international community as being of outstanding universal value for humanity as a whole," UNESCO said in a statement.The sites concerned are the old city of Damascus; the Greco-Roman ruins at Palmyra; the old city of Bosra; the old city of Aleppo; the Crac des Chevaliers castle and Qal'at Salah El-Din; and the ancient villages of Northern Syria.
DOHA — Western and Arab countries opposed to President Bashar al-Assad agreed at talks in Qatar on Saturday to give urgent military support to Syrian rebels fighting for his overthrow, and to channel it through a Western-backed rebel military command.Ministers from the 11 main countries which form the Friends of Syria group agreed "to provide urgently all the necessary materiel and equipment to the opposition on the ground, each country in its own way in order to enable them to counter brutal attacks by the regime and its allies".They also condemned "the intervention of Hezbollah militias and fighters from Iran and Iraq", demanding that they withdraw immediately.Guerrillas from Lebanon's Shi'ite pro-Iranian Hezbollah organization spearheaded the recapture of the strategic border town of Qusair from mainly Sunni Muslim rebels two weeks ago.Hezbollah and Shi'ite Iraqi gunmen have also been fighting around the Shi'ite shrine of Sayyid Zainab south of Damascus, while Iranian military commanders are believed to be advising Assad's officers on their counter-offensives against the rebels.The ministers said the growing sectarian nature of the conflict and the foreign interventions "threaten the unity of Syria (and) broaden the conflict" across the region. They also expressed strong concern at the increasing presence of "terrorist elements" and growing radicalization in Syria.
BEIRUT — Syrian government forces stepped up their attack against rebel strongholds north of the capital, Damascus on Saturday, while opposition fighters declared their own offensive in the country's largest city Aleppo.The fighting in Damascus came as the Syrian government announced salary increases for state employees and members of the military, days after the Syrian currency dipped to a record low of 210 pounds to the dollar compared with 47 when the crisis began more than two years ago. The raise also covered pensions.Both sides intensified operations as an 11-nation group that includes the U.S., dubbed the Friends of Syria, began meeting in Qatari capital of Doha to discuss how to coordinate military aid and other forms of assistance to the rebels seeking to oust Syrian President Bashar Assad.The donors agreed on Saturday to do more to help the embattled rebels trying to overthrow Assad, U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry said. While he offered no specifics, Kerry said the assistance would help change the balance on the battlefield. Kerry also denounced Assad for inviting Iranian and Hezbollah fighters to fight alongside his troops, saying the Syrian president risked turning the civil war into a regional sectarian conflict.Activists, meanwhile, reported heavy shelling of many districts north of Damascus, apparently an attempt to cut links between rebel-held districts that have served as launching pads for operations against the capital. Three children, including two from the same family, have been killed in shelling of the outlying district of Qaboun since Friday, according to the Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which relies on an extensive network of activists in Syria.The Lebanese TV station Al-Mayadeen, which had a reporter embedded with Syrian government forces in the offensive, quoted a military official as saying that the operation aims to cut rebel supply lines, separate one group from another and secure the northern entrances to the capital. The regime's forces have struggled for months to regain control of these suburbs.The Observatory said the neighborhood was being attacked from several different sides, while the shelling has caused structural damage and started fires. Activists from Qaboun posted on Facebook that government forces had deployed new tanks to reinforce its positions outside the neighborhood, and the bombardment had brought buildings down.The Observatory said rebels targeted a police academy in the nearby Barzeh area Saturday, pushing back against a government attempt to storm the neighborhood. One rebel was killed in overnight fighting, it said.State news agency SANA said troops "inflicted heavy losses" among rebels in several suburbs of Damascus.The uprising against Assad began in March 2011 as peaceful protests but morphed into a civil war as rebels took up arms against a government crackdown. The Syrian regime has gained momentum in recent weeks with the help of Iran and its proxy group Hezbollah. The opposition is hoping the Obama administration's decision to begin supplying them with arms will help swing the tide in their favor.Rebels say they have already received new weapons from allied countries— but not the U.S. — that they claim will help them to shift the balance of power on the ground. Experts and activists said the new weapons include anti-tank missiles and small quantities of anti-aircraft missiles.It was not clear if any of the new weapons have made it to the Damascus area. A spokesman for one of the main groups fighting outside of Damascus, the al-Islam brigade, said his group had none of the new weapons. The spokesman, who declined to be named for fear of government reprisals, spoke to The Associated Press on Skype.He said government forces were shelling Barzeh from Qasioun mountain overlooking Damascus. Syria's main Western-backed opposition group said Thursday that 40,000 civilians in the two northern districts of Damascus are suffering from shortages of food and medical supplies.Rebels and government also clashed in and around the northern city of Aleppo, where government forces launched an offensive earlier this month. Activists reported clashes in southern and western neighborhoods.The Observatory also said rebels pounded a military academy in the area, causing a fire in the compound. No casualties were immediately reported. In Rashideen, rebel forces have pushed government forces out from parts of the neighborhood, according to the local Aleppo Media Center network and posts on Facebook.A statement by a coalition of rebel groups, posted on the Center's page, declared that the fighters are launching a new operation to seize control of the western half of Aleppo.Also Saturday, Syrian forces fired a dozen shells that landed in a northern Lebanese border town, causing a panic among residents, the Lebanese news agency reported.SANA said government troops were targeting a group of infiltrators across the border. It gave no further details.Rockets from Syria fall regularly into towns and villages near the border.In Damascus, a presidential decree said that the raise for the public sector could reach up to 40 percent depending on the salary of the civil servant. Pensions could rise by up to 25 percent, according to the decree.It said those who make 10,000 pounds ($54) a month will get a 40 percent raise, while those who make double that amount will get a 20 percent boost. People making 40,000 pounds a month will get a 5 percent raise, it said.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Suicide bombers targeted security compounds in Damascus and a car bomb exploded in a pro-regime district there Sunday, killing at least eight people, the latest in a surge of civil war violence in the capital.In northern Syria, a car bomb killed 12 soldiers in Aleppo, according to the Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which relies on a network of activists in Syria for information. It had no other details, and the government did not comment.In neighboring Lebanon, meanwhile, fierce clashes erupted between the Lebanese military and supporters of a hard-line Sunni Muslim cleric, in the latest spillover from Syria. Six Lebanese soldiers were killed, according to the army, which vowed to hit back with an "iron hand."Heavy fighting with machine guns and rocket-propelled grenades in Sidon caused panic in the southern coastal city, which until recently had been largely spared the violence hitting other areas. Many people who were spending the day on the beach hurried home, while others living on high floors came down or fled to safer areas. Gray smoke billowed over parts of the city and residents caught in the fire appealed for help.The fighting broke out in the predominantly Sunni city after supporters of Sheikh Ahmad al-Assir, a virulent critic of the powerful Shiite militant Hezbollah group, opened fire on an army checkpoint.The military issued a statement confirming that six soldiers died in the shooting, including three officers. It said the shooting was unprovoked.Syria's state-run news agency SANA said three suicide bombers blew themselves up while trying to break into the Rukneddine police station in northern Damascus, killing five people and wounding several others. SANA said three would-be suicide bombers also tried to break into the Criminal Security Branch in the southern Bab Mousalla area but were caught by security forces before they could detonate their explosives.SANA said a car bomb exploded in Mazzeh 86 district in the capital, killing three people, including a 3-year-old boy. Residents of the district are mostly Alawites, an offshoot Shiite sect that President Bashar Assad's family belongs to. The opposition forces fighting against Assad's regime are mostly Sunni Muslims.Nobody immediately claimed responsibility for the Damascus explosions, but they bore the hallmarks of al-Qaida-linked groups that have joined forces with rebels fighting to oust Assad.The attacks in Syria's two largest cities came as government forces pressed an offensive on the outskirts of the capital.SANA carried a statement by the Interior Ministry saying that the Damascus attacks were a "new escalation by terrorist groups," a term used by the government to refer to the rebels.More than 93,000 people have been killed in Syrian conflict that started in March 2011 as peaceful protest against Assad's rule. In the past year, the war has taken on sectarian overtones.The conflict has increasingly spilled across Syria's borders.The clashes in Sidon centered on the Bilal bin Rabbah Mosque, where al-Assir preaches. The cleric is believed to have hundreds of armed supporters in Sidon who fought back Sunday. Dozens of al-Assir's gunmen also partially shut down the main highway linking south Lebanon with Beirut.By Sunday evening, the army had besieged the mosque, sealing off access to it from all directions, and was going after al-Assir and his supporters, who have been agitating for months.The NNA report said Assir was believed to be hiding inside the mosque with several of his followers.The cleric and his followers support Sunni rebels in the Syria conflict, and he has threatened to clear apartments in Sidon where Hezbollah supporters live.Sunday's clashes in Sidon deepened tensions in Lebanon. on edge since the Syrian conflict began more than two years ago.Lebanese President Michel Suleiman called an emergency meeting of the security cabinet for Monday. NNA also reported sporadic shooting in the volatile city of Tripoli in the north, and the army announced additional force deployments in around Beirut.The violence came a day after an 11-nation group that includes the U.S. met in the Qatari capital of Doha to coordinate military aid and other forms of assistance to the rebels.Syria's al-Thawra newspaper, the mouthpiece of the government, assailed the Friends of Syria meeting."It's clear that the enemies of Syria are rushing to arm the terrorists to kill the chances for holding the Geneva conference," the newspaper said, referring to a U.S.-Russia initiative for bringing Assad's government and rebels together to negotiate an end to the crisis.The Syrian paper pledged that the army would "continue the showdown to eliminate terrorism and restore security and stability."Surk reported from Beirut. Associated Press writer Jamal Halaby in Amman, Jordan contributed to this report.
WASHINGTON — Samantha Power made her name as a writer, with a fierce, unsparing account of why the United States did so little to prevent genocide during the 20th century, a failure she attributed to a "ruthlessly effective" American political system.So when Ms. Power, 42, traded academia for a human rights post in the Obama administration in 2009, the question was how she would translate her moral outrage into policy.The answer lies in her signature project, the Atrocities Prevention Board, a high-level White House task force that Ms. Power urged President Obama to create in 2012 and then served as chairwoman of for its first year. As she faces confirmation hearings next month to be ambassador to the United Nations, the board offers a road map into her thinking — demonstrating both her zeal and the limitations of her approach.Meeting monthly in the White House Situation Room or the Old Executive Office Building, Ms. Power's board has wrestled with how to stop a wave of anti-Muslim violence in Myanmar, politically motivated clashes in Kenya and the terrorism campaign of Joseph Kony, the guerrilla leader in Central Africa accused of enslaving children.The board has prodded Mr. Obama to raise the issue of the treatment of Muslims with the president of Myanmar, Thein Sein. It pushed for war-crimes legislation that enabled the United States to offer a reward of up to $5 million for tips leading to the capture of Mr. Kony. And it took part in a decision to send civilian experts to Kenya before elections last March to help quell violence.What it did not do is change Mr. Obama's response to the biggest atrocity of the day, the Syrian civil war. He has steadfastly resisted deeper involvement, even as the death toll has surpassed 90,000. That has made the board an easy target for conservatives, as well as some genocide scholars, who condemn it as toothless."This is the first time you've had a point person to prevent atrocities in the U.S. government," said Mark Schneider, a senior vice president at the International Crisis Group, a research organization. "But sometimes you fail; sometimes you're not able to come up with alternative policies."Current and former administration officials said it was naïve to think that an interagency board could shift American policy on Syria, given the enormity and strategic sensitivity of the crisis and that it was already raging when the board was formed."It is unrealistic for a new entity that has no real authority to galvanize the government on Syria," said Lanny A. Breuer, a former assistant attorney general who represented the Justice Department on the board until earlier this year. "But what it can do is to raise awareness."Ms. Power, Mr. Breuer said, brought a "boldness and level of commitment that was impressive." She handpicked the board's members from 11 agencies including the Treasury Department and the C.I.A., and she led meetings that were unusually well attended, another member said, thanks to her intensity.With ties to Mr. Obama dating to his 2008 campaign, Ms. Power also got him to put his personal imprimatur on the effort. The president, announcing the creation of the board at the United States Holocaust Memorial Museum in April 2012, declared that preventing mass atrocities and genocide was a "core national security interest.""This is not an afterthought," he added. "This is not a sideline in our foreign policy."Friends of Ms. Power's say that as a senior director on the National Security Council, she argued for a more robust response to Syria — an argument that finally gained traction, months after she left, with Mr. Obama's recent decision to begin supplying small arms and ammunition to the rebels.For Ms. Power, the experience illustrates the frustrations that human rights advocates have long encountered in government. In her 2002 book, "A Problem From Hell," she noted that during the three months of genocide in Rwanda, the Clinton administration never held a top-level meeting devoted to it."You expect to lose these fights," said Gary J. Bass, a professor of politics and international affairs at Princeton University, who is a friend of Ms. Power's. "If public opinion doesn't stop you, a reluctant president will. If the bureaucracy doesn't stop you, the Pentagon will."Ms. Power has had one notable success, which predated the board: allying with Hillary Rodham Clinton, then the secretary of state, and Susan E. Rice, who is leaving her job as ambassador to the United Nations to be national security adviser, to persuade Mr. Obama to back a NATO-led military intervention in Libya. By all accounts, it halted a potential slaughter of rebels by Col. Muammar el-Qaddafi.
DAMASCUS, Syria — The decision by the United States and its allies to arm rebel groups in Syria is "very dangerous" and will prolong the violence and killing, Syria's foreign minister said Monday.The warning came as an artillery shell slammed into a village in central Syria and killed 11 people, including a woman and six of her children, activists said, and a leading human rights group charged that Syrian forces are abusing women in custody for supporting the opposition to President Bashar Assad's regime.Walid al-Moallem said sending more weapons to the opposition would also hinder efforts to convene a peace conference in Geneva to work on a negotiated solution. He said his country remains ready to take part but added that Assad will not step down. His resignation is a key opposition demand to be raised in any talks with Damascus.Al-Moallem spoke two days after an 11-nation group that includes the U.S. met in Qatar and agreed to step up military and other assistance to the Syrian rebels. He said all those who met in Qatar "have Syrian blood on their hands."U.S. Secretary of States John Kerry, who took part in the conference, would not disclose details of the aid, saying only that it would re-balance the fight between the rebels and the government. Assad's better-equipped forces are increasingly backed by fighters from Lebanon's Hezbollah militant group."They will not be victorious no matter how much they conspire," al-Moallem said. He said arming the rebels "is a dangerous decision because it aims at prolonging the crisis, prolonging the violence and killing and encouraging terrorism."President Barack Obama's change of policy was partly based on a U.S. intelligence assessment that Assad had used chemical weapons, but Kerry expressed deeper concern about Assad's foreign support. He said that Iranian as well as Hezbollah fighters had joined the war.Al-Moallem denied that any Iranian fighters were in Syria. Damascus acknowledges that Hezbollah is assisting government troops.The foreign minister said his regime was willing to take part in a peace conference, but would go to Geneva not to hand over power to the other side but rather to establish "a real partnership" and a national unity government that includes representatives of all Syrian society."President Bashar Assad will not step down," he said. "If anyone has such illusions on the other side, my advice to them is not to go to Geneva," he said, rejecting the opposition's demand that Assad's departure from power should top the agenda in at the peace conference.He insisted Syria will not accept any solutions or ideas dictated from the outside.Syria's main opposition bloc said the willingness of Assad's regime to attend the peace talks is not genuine and neither are the government's assurance it want to "build a real partnership" in Geneva."As it has done with all previous initiatives of the U.N. and Arab League missions, the Assad regime is stalling for time by attending Geneva," the statement by the Western-backed Syrian National Coalition said. "For Assad, this creates an opportunity for more destruction and for the Assad forces to gain more ground in Syria."Syrian government troops clashed with opposition fighters Monday in central provinces of Homs and Hama. An artillery shell slammed into the village of Tarfawi in Hama province, killing at least 11 people, including a woman and six of her children, the Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said. The group relies on the network of activists inside Syria. It said government forces fired the shell.More than 93,000 people have been killed in Syrian conflict that started in March 2011 as largely peaceful protest against Assad's rule. The uprising turned into a bloody insurgency in response to a military crackdown by regime forces on the protest movement. In the past year, the war has taken on increasingly sectarian overtones.Also Monday, a rights group said Syrian military and fighters recruited from Assad's Alawite sect have arbitrarily detained female opposition activists, female relatives and neighbors of opposition activists and fighters, abusing and torturing them in custody.Human Rights Watch said in a report that its activists interviewed 10 Syrian women who had been detained. Of the 10, eight were jailed because they were anti-government activists. All said they were abused by the security forces and the Alawite militiamen, known as shabiha, while in custody.The abuse included electric shocks, extended time in stress positions, and beatings with metal rods, wires and nightsticks, the U.S.-based group said in a report. In a number of cases, women were also subjected to torture and sexual abuse, it charged.The eight women were detained by the security forces at checkpoints or military raids on their homes. They were in custody for up to 14 months between February 2012 and April 2013, the group said.HRW has been documenting abuses on both sides of Syria civil war during the 27 months of conflict.The group said it has not received information about opposition forces detaining and mistreating female Syrian government supporters or relatives of those associated with government forces.Associated Press writer Zeina Karam in Beirut contributed to this report.
DAMASCUS, Syria — The Syrian information minister has lashed out at Saudi Arabia, saying Riyadh is responsible for his country's conflict.Omran al-Zoubi says Saudi Arabia is providing weapons and money to "terrorists," the government's term for rebels fighting to topple President Bashar Assad.Damascus has previously blamed Sunni Gulf states for its civil war. Al-Zoubi's remarks came after Riyadh said Syria faces a "foreign invasion" by Assad's allies.His comments were carried by the state-run SANA news agency late Tuesday after Saudi Foreign Minister Prince Saud al-Faisal discussed the conflict with U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry in Jiddah, condemning Assad for bolstering his army with fighters from Lebanon's Iran-backed Hezbollah group.Saudi Arabia is Washington's key ally and a foe of Iran. It's backing Syria's predominantly Sunni rebels. Tehran supports Assad.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — With shattered glass and bullet casings still littering the streets, businesses reopened and people went back to work in the coastal city of Sidon on Tuesday after a 48-hour battle between supporters of a radical Sunni cleric and Lebanese troops that left dozens dead. But in the aftermath of the battle, involving some of the worst mayhem since Lebanon's civil war, resentments simmered and political questions loomed.The army's crackdown on the cleric, Sheik Ahmad al-Assir, who had been amassing weapons and threatening Shiites, won broad support across the Lebanese political spectrum. But the intensity of the fighting and the intervention by the army gave rise to fears that the conflict would deepen. The army is one of the few guarantors of national stability under a weak caretaker government in a country divided over the civil war in neighboring Syria.Lakhdar Brahimi, the joint special envoy on Syria for the United Nations and the Arab League, expressed worries about the violence in Sidon on Tuesday at a meeting in Geneva aimed at laying the groundwork for a peace conference on Syria. Mr. Brahimi, a veteran Algerian statesman who helped to broker the end of Lebanon's 1975-90 civil war, told reporters at a news briefing that he supported Lebanon's president, Michel Suleiman, the Lebanese military and "all those who are acting to contain this very serious crisis in their country."The authorities and residents said that the only explosions in Sidon on Tuesday were those of the army blasting open doors as they secured Mr. Assir's mosque complex, riddled with bullets after the army — and, according to some eyewitness accounts, fighters from Hezbollah, the powerful Lebanese Shiite militant group — assaulted the compound for two days.But there was a sense that the conflict remained unresolved. The cleric was a fugitive, on the run with some of his armed supporters. Many Sunnis, barely concealing their resentment, said they felt that Mr. Assir's side had been provoked. According to the army, Mr. Assir's followers attacked soldiers at a checkpoint.Residents said Mr. Assir gave voice to Sunni anger over the dominance of Hezbollah and its decision to intervene militarily in Syria against an uprising that many Lebanese Sunnis support.Saad Hariri, the leader of Hezbollah's main Sunni political rival, the Future Movement, said Monday that Lebanon's greatest problem is militant groups — chiefly Hezbollah — that bear weapons outside the government's control.Mr. Hariri, a former prime minister and scion of a powerful Sidon family, said Hezbollah's weapons were no excuse for Sunnis to take up illegal arms. Mr. Hariri's party is part of the March 14 movement, which seeks to strengthen Lebanese state institutions, but its lack of a powerful armed wing has left many Sunnis feeling vulnerable to Hezbollah and open to supporting figures like Mr. Assir.Government officials said Mr. Assir had been a threat to all of Lebanon and praised the army, which lost 17 soldiers in the fighting, the largest toll in such a short period since the Syrian conflict started fueling sporadic clashes in Lebanon. The death toll among Mr. Assir's followers was unclear; medical workers said at least 100 people had been taken to hospitals.Neighborhoods across Sidon — from Abra, the hilltop area near the mosque, to the wealthy downtown — faced a long and expensive cleanup. Local officials put the damage at $20 million, a heavy toll for a city where the economy has already been dampened by security fears and the Syrian crisis.
BEIRUT — An explosion struck the Christian Bab Touma district in the Old City of Damascus on Thursday in what Syrian state television said was a suicide bombing. Opposition sources said it was a mortar attack.It was the first major blast reported inside the walls of the Old City, a UNESCO World Heritage site that is one of the oldest cities in Middle East, dating back some 4,000 years.At least four people were killed and several wounded, Syrian television said. News outlets close to rebels fighting to topple President Bashar al-Assad said a mortar bomb had exploded.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a pro-opposition monitoring group, said two mortar rounds had hit Amin Street, home to Shi'ite Muslim families who generally back Assad.It was unclear who was behind the attack, but there were many potential targets in the vicinity.One was the ancient Mariamite Cathedral, seat of the Greek Orthodox Church of Antioch, which like most churches has avoided announcing a stance on the 27-month-old struggle between President Bashar al-Assad and mostly Sunni Muslim rebels.The church is near the cobblestone Roman "Straight Street" that runs past many old buildings and a luxury restaurant once frequented by Assad and his inner circle.Syria's minorities, especially Assad's Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam, have generally stood behind the president during the conflict in which the Syrian Observatory says more than 100,000 people have been killed.Christians had tried to remain neutral but increasingly their young men have been joining pro-Assad militias blamed for some of the worst attacks against the opposition.The Old City is the historic heart of Damascus. Before the war, it drew crowds of tourists to its souks, monuments, religious sites, restaurants and craft shops.Syria has been in turmoil since an initially peaceful uprising against four decades of Assad family rule turned into a civil war increasingly fought on sectarian lines.
DAMASCUS, Syria — A suicide bomber blew himself up near the headquarters of Syria's Greek Orthodox Church in Damascus' Old City, killing at least four people Thursday, minutes after the patriarch had entered the cathedral, state-run TV and a church official said.The blast in the ancient quarter of narrow streets and historic buildings was the first reported suicide attack of the Syrian civil war inside the Old City, although other such bombs have struck the capital of Damascus during the conflict.The blast struck in the vicinity of the Virgin Mary Cathedral in the predominantly Christian neighborhood of Bab Sharqi, the broadcast said, although it was not clear if the church was the attacker's target.Several people also were wounded, the TV said.SANA, Syria's state-run news agency, said a nearby clinic run by a Muslim charity appeared to be the target. That was also the view of Bishop Ghattas Hazim, who spoke to The Associated Press from Lebanon.Lebanon's Al-Mayadeen TV, which has reporters in Damascus, said the target of the attack appeared to be a nearby post of the National Defense Forces, a paramilitary force fighting the rebels who are trying to topple President Bashar Assad.Residents also disagreed about the target, with some saying the bomber may have detonated the explosives prematurely. Pro-government gunmen were seen roaming the streets afterward.The blast occurred nearly 15 minutes after John Yazigi, the Eastern Orthodox Patriarch of Antioch and All the East, entered the church, but he was unhurt, according to Hazim, an aide.A government official told the AP that the bomber was wearing a belt of explosives and blew himself up near the church. Both the official, who spoke on condition of anonymity because he was not authorized to talk to the media, and state TV said at least four people were killed. SANA said eight people were wounded.An AP reporter who visited the area saw that the explosion occurred about 50 meters (yards) from the church and damaged several shops. An antiques shop suffered the worst damage, with its windows shattered and objects strewn about."I heard an explosion. Then glass started flying, and the place was full of dust," said shop owner Abdo Muqri, whose right arm and forehead were injured. "I was watching television inside. Had I been near the door, I would have been dead."About three hours after the blast, two shells struck the area. A wounded man and woman were seen being rushed away.Bab Sharqi and the nearby Bab Touma, two main areas of the Old City, were famous for their restaurants and cafes that used to be packed until late at night before the civil war began.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights estimated this week that more than 100,000 people have been killed since the start of the conflict more than two years ago. It began with peaceful protests against Assad's rule, then became an armed conflict after the regime used the army to crack down on dissent and some opposition supporters took up weapons to fight back.Churches have been targeted before in the civil war, mostly in the central city of Homs and Syria's largest city of Aleppo in the north.Yazigi divides his time between Damascus and the Balamand Monastery in northern Lebanon. Yazigi took the post of patriarch earlier this year replacing Ignatius Hazim, who died in December.One of the gravest attacks against Christians came in April when two bishops, including Yazigi's brother, Boulos, were kidnapped in a rebel-held area in northern Syria. He is still missing.Christians are one of the largest religious minorities in Syria, making up about 10 percent of the population of 23 million people. They have tried to stay on the sidelines of the conflict, although as Islamic militants have increasingly joined with the opposition, many Christians have been leaning toward the regime.As the bloodshed has intensified, hopes for an international conference to try to reach a political settlement between the regime and opposition have faded. Washington and its allies have said they will help arm the rebels.In Berlin, German Chancellor Angela Merkel warned against shipping weapons to the rebels, telling parliament that in her view, "the risks would be incalculable."She did not explain why, but critics fear that Western arms would only prolong the conflict without tipping the scales decisively. There are also concerns that the weapons, including anti-aircraft missiles, could fall into the hands of Islamic extremists who might use them against Western targets."Whether it would be successful or not is a different question, but in my view the risks would be incalculable," Merkel said. "But I think everyone who has a heart understands the wish to stop the killing in Syria and to remove the Assad regime."In Moscow, the Defense Ministry said that Russia has withdrawn all military personnel from its naval base in Syria and replaced them with civilian workers.The ministry did not say when the switch at the base at Tartus took place or how many personnel were deployed there. The minor facility is Russia's only naval outpost outside the former Soviet Union and consists of several barracks and depots used to service Russian navy ships in the Mediterranean.The ministry statement said that Tartus has continued to service the Russian navy ships.The ministry didn't explain why it was replacing military personnel with civilians, but the move could be part of efforts by Moscow to portray itself as an objective mediator trying to broker peace talks in the civil war.Russia has been Assad's main ally, shielding his regime from the U.N. Security Council's sanctions and continuing to provide it with weapons.Moscow also has an unknown number of military advisers in Syria who help its military operate and maintain Soviet- and Russian-built weapons that make up the core of its arsenal.Associated Press writers Robert H. Reid in Berlin and Vladimir Isachenkov in Moscow contributed to this report.
BEIRUT — Syrian rebels said they had overrun a major military checkpoint in Deraa on Friday and hoped it would allow them to capture the southern city, the cradle of their 27-month-old uprising.Activists uploaded video showing fighters blowing up two high-rise buildings that had flanked the army post, flattening the entire area in a cloud of dust.The Syrian conflict began in Deraa as a peaceful protest movement against President Bashar al-Assad's rule, but has spread across the country and degenerated into civil war.More than 100,000 people have died, according to the British-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which works with a network of activists across Syria.Rami Abdulrahman, the head of the Observatory, said the fall of the army post was strategically significant for Deraa, where protesters first marched against four decades of Assad family rule from the city's Omari mosque in March 2011."Now the army is under threat there. The rebels haven't liberated all of the old city. There are still two neighborhoods with soldiers, but this could change the balance of power there," Abdulrahman told Reuters.Local opposition activists were more upbeat, saying rebels had destroyed nearly all the military's 48 posts in the city and had forced soldiers to retreat."This means Deraa's old city is liberated. It is a big deal for all Syrians: the heart of the revolution has been freed," said an activist called Ammar, speaking by phone.The Omari mosque, which served as a gathering point and makeshift clinic when protests began, was also recaptured but has been nearly destroyed by tank and artillery fire, he said.Security forces had staged a bloody assault on the mosque from March 23-25, 2011, killing at least 31 people there.The capture of the Binayat post was one of the first major rebel victories in months in the south, where Assad's forces have been on the offensive, as they have in Damascus and Homs province.Before the government gains, Deraa, which is also the name of a province on the southern border with Jordan, had been an arms pipeline for rebels that stretched as far as Damascus.But army advances had cut several routes and rebels also complained that a U.S.-Russian proposal for a "Geneva 2" peace conference, as well as Western fears of a rising Islamist current among the rebels, had stalled weapons transfers.Prospects for the conference have dimmed since Assad's forces, spearheaded by Lebanon's Hezbollah fighters, captured the town of Qusair on the Lebanese-Syrian border this month.Gulf sources said they were given the green light to begin re-stocking rebels with heavy weapons after the United States announced it would provide the opposition with military support.Western powers are keen to ensure that only relatively moderate rebel units receive the shipments, as opposed to Islamist militant brigades, some linked to al Qaeda, that have become increasingly powerful among the armed opposition.Abdelrahman said Islamist fighters appeared to have led the latest battles in Deraa.There were no reports of the use of advanced weaponry such as shoulder-fired anti-aircraft missiles, which Saudi Arabia is now believed to be supplying to vetted rebel groups.
BEIRUT — Troops loyal to Syrian President Bashar al-Assad launched a military offensive on Saturday against rebel-held areas of Homs, the country's third-largest city and a centre of the two-year-old uprising against his rule.Activists said jets and mortars pounded rebel territory and soldiers attacked the district of Khalidiyah, where state television reported they were making "great progress".Video uploaded on the Internet showed heavy explosions and clouds of white smoke after what the activists said were air strikes on the adjacent neighborhood of Jouret al-Shiyyah.The attack on Homs city follows steady military gains by Assad's forces, backed by Lebanese Hezbollah militants, in provincial Homs villages and towns close to the Lebanese border.Those gains have consolidated Assad's control over a corridor of territory linking the capital Damascus with the traditional heartland of his minority Alawite sect in the mountains overlooking the Mediterranean.More than 100,000 people have been killed in the 27-month-old conflict in Syria, which pits mainly Sunni Muslim rebels against Assad, whose Alawite community is an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam.The civil war has also driven 1.7 million refugees to seek shelter in neighboring countries and is turning into a proxy conflict for Sunni and Shi'ite Muslim powers in the Middle East.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Rebel fighters in southern Syria claimed on Friday to be in control of most of the city of Dara'a, the cradle of the 2011 uprising against President Bashar al-Assad, after having battled his forces there for two weeks. The assertions, if confirmed, would represent a rare military victory for the insurgency, which has been struggling since it lost the stronghold city of Qusayr near the Lebanon border on June 5.A dispatch by the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an anti-Assad activist group in Britain with a network of contacts inside Syria, said "Islamic rebel battalions" had seized the Binayat checkpoint, an important military gateway into Dara'a, which had enabled them to then assert a strategic advantage over much of the city.Video posted on the Internet showed what the rebels claimed to be the destruction of a high-rise building at the checkpoint, along with proclamations of victory by fighters of the Nusra Front "and the Islamic battalions who participated in the operation."Rami Abdulrahman, the head of the Syrian Observatory, said the insurgents had not taken full control of Dara'a. But in remarks quoted by Reuters, he said the Syrian military's position in Dara'a was under threat and "this could change the balance of power there."An anti-Assad activist from Dara'a who is currently in Jordan agreed in a telephone interview that the seizure of the Binayat checkpoint was a setback for Syrian forces in Dara'a, but cautioned that the rebel claims of victory could be overstated. "The Islamic groups are trying to make a big deal behind this operation, a boasting attempt," said the activist, who identified himself only by his given name, Taysir, for security reasons.Dara'a is also near the border with Jordan, which anti-Assad activists say has emerged as a conduit for supplying rebels with weapons and supplies.Lebanon's Daily Star newspaper quoted residents of Dara'a as saying the rebels also had seized what was left of the Omari mosque, which was the gathering point for political protests that erupted in March 2011 against Mr. Assad and his family's four decades in power in Syria.The government's harsh repression of those protests began a cycle of conflict that has since turned into an insurgency that has been joined by Sunni jihadist fighters from other countries fighting to topple Mr. Assad's minority Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shiite Islam that is supported by Iran and Hezbollah, the Lebanese Shiite militant group.The Syrian Observatory said Wednesday that more than 100,000 people had been killed in the conflict. The United Nations has estimated that at least 93,000 people have been killed.
BEIRUT — Islamist rebels in Syria's northern city of Aleppo issued an order on Monday banning women from dressing in what it considered provocative styles, angering some locals who accuse the group of overstepping its powers.The Islamic law council of Aleppo's Fardous neighborhood issued a fatwa, or religious edict, banning all Muslim women from wearing "immodest" dress and announcing plans to apply such rules to all female inhabitants."Muslim women are banned from leaving the house in immodest dress, in tight clothing that shows off their bodies or wearing makeup on their face," the statement said. "It is incumbent on all our sisters to obey God and commit to Islamic etiquette".Hardline Islamist groups have increasingly taken the lead in the revolt against President Bashar al-Assad's rule. Many units, some of which are linked to al Qaeda, have stretched their influence beyond the battleground and established police and administrative councils in some rebel-held areas.But these groups' ascendance is stirring resentment among many Syrians, who are increasingly reporting incidents of Islamist councils silencing or even attacking groups with different views.It was not possible for Reuters to verify the council's fatwa, as access for foreign media in Syria is limited. But several residents of Aleppo confirmed the reports.The statement, which was published on the Fardous council's Facebook page, was condemned by some activists and applauded by religious supporters, who said it was necessary to prevent distractions for the rebels."Islam doesn't ban other religions but it does require certain etiquette in public," said one Facebook commentator, Ammar al-Kassem. "A girl can't go around dressed in a way that causes chaos and shame, no matter what her religion."Others insisted the fatwa was fake and spread by Assad's supporters to scare them away from the Islamist-led opposition.But most objectors used the announcement as a chance to take a swipe against Islamist rebel leaders.One post on the council's Facebook page, by Alaa al-Zouabi, said: "If you had any morals, you would go fight the regime, not the people ... Shame."
BEIJING — China announced rewards of up to 100,000 yuan ($16,000) on Tuesday for information leading the arrest of those responsible for the deadliest violence in four years in the vast far-western region of Xinjiang, dominated by Muslim Uighurs.The announcement by authorities in Xinjiang came less than a week after a marauding gang staged a series of attacks in a Xinjiang township that killed 35 people.China says that the attacks were carried out by a gang engaged in "religious extremist activities". Beijing has traditionally blamed violence in Xinjiang on Islamic separatists who want to establish an independent state of "East Turkestan".Many Uighurs in Xinjiang resent what they call Chinese government suppression of their culture, language and religion.About 100 Uighurs had gone to Syria to fight alongside Syrian rebels, with some of them returning to Xinjiang to carry out attacks in support of an East Turkestan, the Global Times, a tabloid owned by the Communist Party mouthpiece, the People's Daily, said on Tuesday.The rewards announced on Tuesday are "for those who provide clues of violent terrorist crimes, and those who play an important role in the solving violent terrorist crimes and the capturing of violent terrorist criminals," according to the Xinjiang government website.Those who failed to report information or who assisted such criminals would be held criminally responsible, the announcement said.
WASHINGTON — From Egypt to Syria to Iraq and beyond, the Obama administration is determined to show it will only go so far to help save nations in chaos from themselves.President Barack Obama has long made it clear that he favors a foreign policy of consultation and negotiation, but not intervention, in the persistent and mostly violent upheavals across the Mideast. And even as Egypt's military overthrew its Islamist government on Wednesday, Washington maintained a measured approach to nationwide turbulence in one of the United States' most important Arab allies.In a firmly worded statement, Obama called on the Egyptian military to relinquish power to a democratically elected civilian government and to resist arresting ousted President Mohammed Morsi and his supporters. He also said the U.S. will review whether Egypt is still eligible for $1.5 billion that Washington gives in economic and military aid annually.Calling himself "deeply concerned" about the turmoil, Obama nonetheless maintained "that, ultimately the future of Egypt can only be determined by the Egyptian people.""The longstanding partnership between the United States and Egypt is based on shared interests and values, and we will continue to work with the Egyptian people to ensure that Egypt's transition to democracy succeeds," Obama said.It was a muted response compared to the uproar that has for days gripped Egyptians, many of whom in turn have openly jeered the U.S. for appearing too close to Morsi, despite his hard-line Islamist policies. The White House has gamely struggled since Morsi's election more than a year ago to embrace his presidency, despite fears that his Muslim Brotherhood power base would revert to its anti-American and anti-Israel roots instead of taking a more moderate stance towards peace.It should come as little surprise that Obama, who is grappling with a recovering economy, a war-weary public at home and diminished U.S. status as a global superpower abroad, would not wade into foreign conflicts. Obama campaigned by promising to end the war in Iraq, which he did in 2011; he now plans to withdraw most, if not all, U.S. troops from Afghanistan by the end of next year and inevitably will face pitched pleas from Kabul to reconsider as the deadline nears.U.S. polls indicate that two-thirds of Americans have opposed the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan."The burdens of a young century cannot fall on American shoulders alone," Obama wrote in his 2010 National Security Strategy. "Indeed, our adversaries would like to see America sap our strength by overextending our power."Experts say the administration's Mideast strategy may be a not-so-subtle reminder that the U.S. is no longer willing — or able — to play either world policeman or peacekeeper. Such reluctance has been all too clear in the White House's policy for Syria, where Obama refused until last month to give weapons to Syrian rebels who have been battling for more than two years to overthrow Syrian President Bashar Assad.An estimated 93,000 people have been killed in the fighting in Syria, and Obama has been under intense pressure from some in Congress and allies abroad to give the rebels robust military aid. Instead, the White House agreed to give a tepid mix of guns, ammunition and shoulder-fired anti-tank grenades, and only did so after U.S. intelligence concluded that Assad had used chemical weapons against his own people.Other Sunni-dominated Mideast nations, most notably Qatar, have provided heavier weapons to help the rebels beat back Iranian forces and aid that is flowing to Assad's regime.Rebel commanders have been underwhelmed by the U.S. support, saying they need enough firepower to stop Assad from using chemical weapons again, and to stop his tanks and heavy artillery. The Free Syrian Army, which is made up of some opposition forces, also wants allies to establish a no-fly zone over Syria to prevent Assad's superior air power from crushing the rebels or killing civilians.The White House is, at best, highly reluctant to create such a territory over which warring aircraft are not allowed to fly. The U.S. and international allies have enforced them in several military conflicts over the past two decades.Even American officials say the help to Syria is not enough.The light weapons are "clearly not only insufficient, it's insulting," Sen. John McCain, a leading Republican proponent of taking a bigger military role in Syria, said recently.McCain and several other hawkish Republicans also have criticized Obama for withdrawing U.S. forces from Iraq, where violence has dramatically escalated since their departure 18 months ago.The Obama administration agreed to the longstanding 2011 withdrawal deadline, which was set by the Republican administration of President George W. Bush, after negotiations fell through to keep some U.S. forces in Iraq. But American officials involved in the negotiations have blamed the White House for making only a weak effort to keep troops in the country and being all too happy when the Shiite-led government in Baghdad refused to let them stay.Despite nearly nine years of war that aimed to stabilize Iraq — during which nearly 4,500 U.S. troops were killed and about $800 billion in taxpayer money was spent — near-daily bombings and other attacks continue. And the White House rarely, if ever, discusses Iraq except to pat itself on the back for leaving.In June alone, 761 Iraqis were killed and nearly 1,800 wounded in terror-related violence, the U.N. envoy in Baghdad said in a statement this week. Comparatively, that's about twice as many killed in the deadliest month of 2011 before the American troops left, according to data from the British-based Iraq Body Count.But in the case of Egypt, a former Obama-era senior diplomat said Wednesday the White House may no longer have enough sway to advise a political transition — even if it wanted to do so.Tamara Cofman Wittes, who served as deputy assistant secretary of state from late 2009 until early this year said the U.S. should be urging the new Egyptian government to stabilize its roiled economy quickly and prevent the country from plunging even deeper into political instability."There's a role for the United States to be weighing in," Wittes said. However, "for better or worse, we're in a position now where the United States has to some extent alienated the political opposition, and by not standing with Morsi, I suppose they've also alienated the Muslim Brotherhood.""So I don't think the U.S. finds itself with a lot of ready audiences," Wittes said.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syrian President Bashar Assad said in an interview published Thursday that his government had fended off everything his enemies had thrown at him and that the only remaining threat to his rule was a far-off — and improbable — foreign intervention.In comments to the state-run Al-Thawra newspaper, Assad rejected the idea that what has transpired in Syria for more than two years is a revolution. Instead, he reiterated his past claims that it is a conspiracy by Western and some Arab states to destabilize his country.He also praised this week's massive protests by Egyptians against their Islamist leader and said the overthrow of President Mohammed Morsi meant the end of "political Islam."In Syria, more than 93,000 people have been killed since the conflict erupted in March 2011. The crisis began with peaceful protests against Assad's rule, then morphed into civil war after some opposition supporters took up arms to fight a brutal government crackdown on dissent. Millions of Syrians have been forced to flee their homes.Throughout the crisis, Assad has insisted that his government is not facing a popular rebellion, but rather a Western-backed conspiracy against Syria, accusing the rebels fighting to topple his regime of being terrorists, Islamic extremists and mercenaries of the oil-rich Arab Gulf states that are allies of the United States."The countries that conspire against Syria have used up all their tools — moral, material and psychological — and they have nothing left except direct (military) intervention and this is too big for them to attain," Assad said in the interview.He did not elaborate, but the Obama administration is reluctant to mire the U.S. military in another unpredictable conflict and its allies are unwilling to engage military in Syria alone.The Assad regime says Qatar, Saudi Arabia, Egypt and Turkey, in addition to the U.S. and its European allies, are on the list of countries conspiring against Syria. These states have been chief supporters of the opposition fighting to overthrow Assad.The Syrian president's comments coincided with a crushing military offensive on the central city of Homs and a meeting of the Western-backed Syrian National Coalition in Istanbul. It was the second attempt in as many months by Assad's opponents to unify their ranks.The Western-backed opposition bloc is primarily composed of exiled politicians with little support from Syrians trying to survive the third summer of conflict in a country that has been devastated by the fighting.Homs, Syria's third-largest city, has been hard hit by fighting over the past two years. The government controls much of the city, while several neighborhoods in the center of town remain opposition strongholds. A military offensive in the area that is part of the country's heartland is now in its fifth day.Khaled Saleh, a SNC spokesman, said the situation in Homs has "deteriorated tremendously" and warned that the fall of the city will jeopardize any political solution for the country. Speaking to reporters in Istanbul, he said the Syrian regime "has its mind set on taking Homs even if that means killing tens of thousands of people."U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon has urged both sides to avoid harming some 2,500 civilians he said remain in the besieged, rebel-held parts of the Homs.The Syrian government asked the International Committee of the Red Cross Thursday to send relief aid to those trapped by the "terrorist groups" in Homs and evacuate them through safe passages to be provided by the government, according to a Foreign Ministry statement published by the state news agency.Sarah Karkour, a spokeswoman for the SNC, said that acting leader George Sabra and senior opposition figures Louay Safi and Mustafa Sabbagh are topping the list of candidates for the new leadership, including an interim government.In late May, the opposition leaders met for more than a week in Istanbul, but failed to elected new leaders or devise a strategy for possible peace talks that the U.S. and Russia have been trying to convene in Geneva.Assad has repeatedly dismissed his political opponents as foreign-directed exiles who don't represent the people of Syria. He has also shrugged off calls to step down, saying he will serve the rest of his term and could consider running for another one in next year's presidential elections.In recent weeks, the Syrian army has been waging an offensive to regain control of territory it lost to the opposition, particularly in Homs but also around the capital Damascus and in the country's north.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights reported heavy clashes between government troops and rebels on Thursday in the Khaldiyeh and Bab Houd districts of Homs, and said regime warplanes repeatedly hit targets there throughout the day. Rebels have held those districts for the past year.The Observatory said fighters from Lebanon's Hezbollah militant movement, which has sided with Assad's forces, have been battling rebels in Homs. Hezbollah fighters helped the Syrian army capture a key town near Lebanon's border last month, dealing a blow to opposition fighters who have been ferrying supplies and fighters over the border.SANA said the army struck rebels gathering in Palmyra and several other neighborhoods and took control of a number of buildings in Bab Houd, Jouret el-Shayah, Khaldiyeh and Talbiseh.Also Wednesday, a government official told The Associated Press that deputy Labor Minister, Rakan Ibrahimn, was seriously wounded in a bombing in Damascus. The official, who spoke on condition of anonymity in line with regulations, said a bomb was attached to Ibrahim's car, which was parked in the Baramkeh neighborhood of Damascus. It went off when he started the car, the official said, adding that the deputy minister was taken to a hospital.Rebels groups, particularly those affiliated with al-Qaida and other Sunni extremist groups, have frequently targeted Syrian government officials, regime loyalists and military installations with car bombs and suicide attacks.Associated Press writers Diaa Hadid in Beirut contributed to this report.
BEIRUT — Syrian state forces backed by the Lebanese militant group Hezbollah hammered the central city of Homs on Friday, activists said, sparking concern from United Nations officials over thousands of civilians trapped in the city.President Bashar al-Assad's forces have been using heavy air raids and artillery strikes to push their offensive around the capital and the strategically located Homs, which spans central Syria's eastern and western international borders.Syria's opposition also hit deadlock on Friday in talks in Istanbul to elect a new leader, as the toppling of Egypt's Muslim Brotherhood dealt a blow to its most influential faction.The stalemate is preventing the main players in the Syrian National Coalition from reaching a deal acceptable to their Saudi and Qatari backers, who want to strengthen the opposition to counter an onslaught by Assad's forces.Sources in the Arab- and Western-backed coalition said the fate of an agreement hinges on the Syrian Muslim Brotherhood, the only organised group in the opposition, which holds a balance of votes between a Saudi-backed and a Qatari-backed candidate.But the group is reeling from this week's political blow its mother branch in Egypt, where the armed forces intervened to topple Islamist President Mohamed Mursi after street protests."The atmosphere is subdued. The Brotherhood in Egypt, and by extension in Syria and elsewhere, took a blow, but even their opponents feel that the Middle East lost a historic opportunity to convince Islamists to embrace democracy," a coalition official said in Istanbul, where the opposition is meeting.Near Damascus, a well-known activist who went by the name Mohammed Moaz died of injuries from shelling in a rebel-held suburb on Friday.Moaz, whose real name was Fedaa al-Baali, was one of the first activists to let himself be filmed and recorded to try to give more credibility to his reports. He had suffered previous injuries while filming rebel operations around the capital.Syria's war has killed more than 100,000 people, the pro-opposition Syrian Observatory for Human Rights says. The two-year revolt began as peaceful protests but, under a fierce security force crackdown, degenerated into civil war.Homs city was the epicentre of the insurgency, and is the focal point of a new push by Assad's forces.Assad is trying to cement control of a belt of territory between his seat of power in Damascus and his stronghold on Syria's Mediterranean coast, a move which could sever the north and south of the country where rebels have a foothold.Video uploaded by activist groups in Homs showed fires blazing from destroyed buildings and grey smoke rolling down streets torn up by the clashes. Fighters fired rocket-propelled grenades and machineguns from battered apartment blocks.The United Nations Office of the High Commissioner for Human Rights said it was "extremely concerned" about the offensive, launched by Assad's forces on June 28."The number of civilians currently trapped due to the heavy fighting in and around Homs is believed to be between 2,500 and 4,000 people," chief spokesman Rupert Colville said."We call upon all parties to respect their obligations under international law, avoid civilian casualties and allow trapped civilians to leave without fear of persecution or violence."Some opposition sources reported small advances for Assad's forces, but others said the street-by-street battles meant the overall balance of power was unchanged after more than a week.Outside the city, Assad's forces fired on the nearby town of al-Hosn, a hillside rebel stronghold famous for its ancient crusader fortress, the Crac des Chevaliers. Rebels have been holed up for months in the massive castle, once a perfectly preserved UNESCO World Heritage site.Residents nearby said pro-Assad militias set fire to the forests surrounding the town, hoping to destroy potential cover for fighters trying to bring in supplies.According to residents, pro-Assad militias and Hezbollah operatives are leading the fight around Homs, which is likely to deepen the already deadly sectarian tensions in the area.Syria's Sunni Muslim population has led the revolt, while minorities have generally stood behind Assad-fearing Islamist groups that have joined the rebels. Assad himself is from the minority Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam.The intervention of Hezbollah, a Shi'ite group funded by Iran, has intensified regional Sunni-Shi'ite tensions already running high due to the growing participation of Sunni radical militants with the opposition.Many have warned that the fall of Homs city would give Assad de facto control of central Syria and are urging rebels from other parts of the country to send arms and reinforcements.But some rebels inside the city expressed confidence that rebel strongholds north of Homs would provide enough cover to prevent a total loss of control. That could mean months more of a bloody stalemate that has already levelled much of Homs, as well as other historic cities like northern Aleppo."We have been preparing for the regime to do this for months, and we have a plan ready when the time is right," said one rebel inside Homs's besieged Old City."Homs will not fall. Victory for either side right now though, that also seems unlikely."
ROME — Four million Syrians, a fifth of the population, are unable to produce or buy enough food, and farmers are short of the seed and fertilisers they need to plant their next crop, the United Nations said on Friday.The U.N. Food and Agriculture Organisation (FAO) and the World Food Programme (WFP) said Syria's domestic wheat production over the next 12 months is likely to be severely compromised and that it will need to import 1.5 million tonnes of wheat for the 2013/14 season."There is a limited window of opportunity to ensure crisis-affected families do not lose vital sources of food and income," the two agencies said.After more than two years of civil war that has killed more than 90,000 people, food shortages have escalated due to massive population displacement, disruption of agricultural production, unemployment, economic sanctions and high food and fuel prices.FAO has launched an appeal for $41.7 million (27.8 million pounds) to assist 768,000 people and has so far received $3.3 million.The two agencies said the funding must be secured by August to provide farmers with fertilisers and seeds to plant in October. Otherwise, the report said, many farmers will be unable to harvest wheat until mid-2015.Syria's livestock sector has also been seriously depleted by the conflict, with poultry production down by more than 50 percent compared with 2011 and significant declines in numbers of sheep and cattle, the report found.The agencies said domestic wheat output was seen at about 2.4 million tonnes in 2012/13, some 40 percent less than the average annual harvest of more than 4 million tonnes before the conflict.WFP said last month that Syrian families were increasingly resorting to begging for food to cope with shortages and high prices.The average monthly price of wheat flour has more than doubled between May 2011 and May 2013 in several areas, and there are serious bread shortages across the country.Food production has been hampered by high costs, damage to machinery and storage facilities and by the fact that many farmers have fled their land for fear of violence, the report found.Meanwhile, the conflict appeared likely to continue into a third year as the fractious opposition, trying to hold on to swathes of territory across Syria, struggled to unite.FAO and WFP also warned of a serious risk that livestock diseases could be transmitted to neighbouring countries and said farmers needed vaccines to prevent this from happening.A Syrian state buyer earlier this week issued a tender to buy 200,000 tonnes of flour on the international market and planned to pay with funds from bank accounts frozen by trade sanctions.Food is excluded from U.S. and European trade sanctions imposed on President Bashar al-Assad's government.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Syrian forces bombarded the city of Homs for a sixth day in a row on Friday, while government soldiers backed by Hezbollah fighters clashed with rebels on the outskirts of the city's besieged Khalidiya neighborhood amid warnings from international health officials that fighting was increasingly preventing humanitarian aid from reaching those most in need.Government forces have trained their sights on Homs and the northern city of Aleppo in recent weeks since they recaptured the strategic border town of Qusayr last month. Antigovernment activists have said the government was aided in the battles by fighters from Hezbollah, the Lebanese Shiite militant group.The group has not confirmed that, saying only that it would go where it was needed to fight off the insurgency against Syria's president, Bashar al-Assad, which Hezbollah leaders say threatens Lebanon and the region.On Friday, clashes intensified near the Khalidiya district, which the army has been trying to storm for weeks, according to the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a Britain-based watchdog group with a network of activists in Syria.While the Syrian Army holds large sections of Homs, rebels continue to hold out in a few central neighborhoods. The sustained violence has left the civilian population in dire need of humanitarian assistance, prompting the Syrian National Coalition, the main exile opposition body, to release a statement on Friday asking the United Nations to provide immediate aid."The areas under attack in Homs have been cut off from the rest of the world and suffer an urgent shortage of medicine and staple foods," the dispatch read.Restrictions put in place by the Syrian authorities have increasingly blocked delivery of medicine and medical supplies around the country, even to areas under government control and even as health needs are escalating for people trapped in two years of conflict, the World Health Organization warned on Friday."The main problems are to get medicines and medical supplies out from Damascus," the Syrian capital, Elizabeth Hoff, the agency's representative in Damascus, said in a telephone interview.Ms. Hoff, citing an acute lack of dialysis treatments for more than 5,000 patients and reports of doctors being forced to deliver babies by Caesarean section without proper anesthetics, said: "The situation is getting much worse. We are receiving requests from hard-affected governorates on a daily basis saying the hospitals are empty of medicines and medical supplies."The health agency's warning was one of several alarms sounded by United Nations organizations on Friday. The human rights office expressed concerns for the fate of several thousand civilians caught in parts of Homs, and it urged all parties to allow civilians to leave the area without fear of persecution or violence.The United Nations' Rome-based food agencies warned that Syrian crop production had slumped as a result of the disruption and population displacement caused by the war, leaving a quarter of the population unable to produce or buy sufficient food. The World Food Program said it was providing food support for 2.5 million people and was trying to reach four million people by October.Public health experts said the national health infrastructure was suffering under the conflict. The government has introduced cumbersome procedures requiring agencies to obtain "facilitation" letters to authorize movement of medical supplies, Ms. Hoff said. In recent weeks officials largely stopped issuing them, citing security concerns and fears the supplies would end up with the rebels, she said.Ms. Hoff said that the government had directed that all medical supplies be sent to the Health Ministry, and that its warehouses were brimming with supplies that had not been distributed.The humanitarian warnings came as members of the Syrian National Council met in Istanbul to elect new leaders and bridge internal divisions, part of an effort to convince Western backers that it can be trusted with distributing lethal aid to moderate elements in the insurgency.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Even as the Syrian war took bigger and bigger bites out of his life, Fidaa al-Baali never stopped trying to document the conflict — not when his brother, a rebel fighter, died in battle; not when security officials, trying to pressure him, arrested his father; not even when the rebel battalion he was embedded with unleashed a mortar attack that killed his fiancée.On Friday, Mr. Baali, a citizen journalist and an antigovernment activist known to many Syrians by the nom de guerre Mohammed Moaz, died of shrapnel wounds sustained weeks earlier as government forces shelled his neighborhood, Qaboun, on the outskirts of the Syrian capital, Damascus. Mr. Baali had remained in the working-class jumble of concrete houses during months of heavy bombardment, rushing with his video camera to the scene of attacks.When antigovernment demonstrations broke out in March 2011 and citizen journalists began documenting them on video, Mr. Baali, who was in his early 20s, was among the first who dared to show his face — a distinctive one, with deep-set eyes and a shock of dark hair flopping across his forehead. He looked straight into the camera, helping to embolden an army of young Syrians who, as protest turned to armed struggle, brought the war into the world's living rooms from front lines that international journalists could not always reach.For distant observers, the struggles and losses of Mr. Baali's own life regularly played out on camera, and in the many interviews he gave by phone and Skype. They punctuated the drumbeat of generic violence, injecting intimacy into the swelling numbers of casualties that the world had grown accustomed to. He did not arm himself, but lived in hiding like a fighter, moving from one friend's basement to another. Reporters who kept in touch with him on Skype often saw him in a windowless room, the thunder of shelling heard in the background.He did not speak much about his own history; conversations with him were rushed and focused on whatever he had just seen. But over time, his personal trajectory reflected the shift in the Syrian conflict, from an often idealistic protest movement to an insurgency that grew more violent in the face of a withering government crackdown and could not always claim the moral high ground.He began saying that he regretted demonstrating peacefully in the beginning. The only way to overpower the Syrian government, he said, was to use "bullets and Kalashnikovs."Mr. Baali evolved from a cheerful jokester who mispronounced his R's to a hardened man, retaining a sense of humor but sounding bitter and increasingly militant. A New York Times journalist who regularly spoke with him on the phone described his voice as getting deeper over time, his manner more gruff."We have no one but God and the Free Syrian Army," he would say.Mr. Baali obsessively sought out the scenes of shelling and airstrikes to report on civilian suffering, and was embedded with various battalions of the Free Syrian Army, the loose-knit rebel umbrella group, to document its tactics, and was wounded in the arm. He often helped foreign reporters with logistics as they traveled in Syria. And he left behind a string of videos and interviews that trace the contours of the conflict.Last year, on a visit by United Nations observers to assess the escalating crisis, Mr. Baali appeared in a brief clip, his arm in a sling, facing a group of observers. Their fatigues, flak jackets and blue berets contrasted with his rumpled polo shirt as he tried to convey a sense of impending catastrophe, pleading with them to try harder to get to restive areas where the government did not want them."When there's destruction happening, you're not coming here," he told them, making taut gestures with his unscathed hand, his voice alternating between plaintive and impatient. "You can communicate with the U.N.," he said. "There are people who can't."The observers appeared eager to move on. They became fidgety. As he continued — "We are dying here, my brother," he said — one of them walked over and kissed him on the forehead. Mr. Baali was briefly struck speechless, then continued his harangue. But the observer group, by then, was on its way.Not long after, Mr. Baali appeared in another clip, standing beside the body of a bearded man partly wrapped in a white shroud — his brother. Barely holding back tears, he stroked his brother's face and kissed his head.In the spring of 2012, security forces detained his father, a former businessman, in an apparent effort to intimidate the son into abandoning his activism. His father was held in Harasta, a suburb of Damascus, in a branch office of the air force intelligence, feared by many activists.After he was released, rebels launched an attack on the branch. Mr. Baali was there to cover it.But the indiscriminate nature of the war hit home for Mr. Baali in April. A group of fighters he had come to trust with his own life fatally wounded his fiancée. They launched a barrage of mortar shells on an area of Damascus where she was staying at the time. Rebels have increasingly tried to hit the center of the capital with shells, which are by definition indiscriminate, and have periodically killed civilians, fueling resentment.A few days after his fiancée's death, his zeal for describing the conflict, for a rare moment, faltered. "I almost died because I was in the same area that day," he said haltingly. "I can't continue the interview. I don't know what to say."About two months later, Mr. Baali was trying to cross from Qaboun to Jobar, another contested neighborhood, when he was hit by shrapnel from a mortar strike by government forces. He lingered in a hospital for weeks, finally slipping into a coma.On Friday evening, as news of his death emerged, social media buzzed with reminiscences from his friends and acquaintances.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, the group based in Britain that documents the conflict, congratulated his family on his "great legacy." Mr. Baali, it said, was "a brave young man who sacrificed his life to give voice to the pains of the Syrian people."
UNITED NATIONS — U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon appealed on Monday for forces loyal to Syrian President Bashar al-Assad and rebel fighters in Syria to put down their weapons during the Muslim holy month of Ramadan.In a statement, Ban said Ramadan is one of the four months on the Islamic calendar during which fighting is supposed to cease."For the sake of the Syrian people, therefore, I would like to call on all parties in Syria to respect this religious obligation for at least, at a minimum, one month," Ban said on the eve of Ramadan, which begins on Tuesday."I am calling for every military unit of the regular army and the Free Syrian Army, for every person holding a gun, to stop fighting and offer this month of peace as a collective present to their people - and to do so across Syria," he said.For more than two years, Assad's forces and rebels determined to oust him have been locked in a conflict that has escalated into an increasingly sectarian civil war. The United Nations estimates that at least 90,000 people have died since the uprising began in March 2011.The new president of the opposition Syrian National Coalition, Ahmad Jarba, said on Sunday he was prepared to offer Assad's forces a truce during the Muslim holy month."I am aware that some may see this call as unrealistic," Ban said. "Lasting peace will only come through serious negotiation. But I am convinced that the Syrian people have every right to ask this of all those who claim to be fighting in their name."Ban also called for the release of detainees by the government and opposition forces."Reliable reports speak of hundreds, if not thousands, of women and children who are detained in various official and non-official detention centers across the country," Ban said. "Armed opposition groups also have many detained people who are not prisoners of war."Russia and the United States have been trying since May to organize a peace conference involving representatives of the Syrian government and the rebels, but disagreements over issues such as who should participate and a reluctance by both sides have left the Russian-American plan looking increasingly unrealistic, U.N. diplomats say.
UNITED NATIONS — Syria's U.N. ambassador invited top international disarmament and weapons inspectors to Damascus for talks with the country's Foreign Ministry on investigating chemical weapons, but insisted Monday on limiting inspections to just one regime accusation of an attack by the rebels.Syrian Ambassador Bashar Ja'afari's government had previously asked for an investigation of the alleged chemical weapons attack on March 19 in the Aleppo suburb of Khan al-Assal, which it blamed on the rebels.But Syrian President Bashar Assad's regime has refused to allow a U.N. investigation team led by Swedish chemical weapons expert Ake Sellstrom in to conduct a broader investigation of other allegations raised by Britain, France and the United States.When asked Monday if Syria was now considering allowing investigations of Western claims of other attacks, Ja'afari promptly answered, "No, you wouldn't jump to this conclusion."U.N. spokesman Martin Nesirky said that Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon "remains seriously concerned about all allegations on the use of chemical weapons in Syria.""What is most urgent at this time is that the Syrian government allows access to the U.N. investigation mission without further delay and without any conditions. In this regard, the stated intent of the Syrian government to invite Dr. Sellstrom and (U.N. disarmament chief) Ms. Angela Kane is a move in the right direction," Nesirky said."We need to analyze the elements in the announcement by the Syrian permanent representative today. In the meantime, let me repeat the importance of having comprehensive access to the sites of allegations," Nesirky said.U.S. Ambassador Rosemary DiCarlo said Monday that it was crucial that the U.N. team be allowed "to enter Syria and to investigate any and all credible allegations of possible use of chemical weapons."The United States last month sent Ban a letter saying that Syria's government used the nerve agent sarin on two occasions in the embattled city of Aleppo in a March 19 attack on the suburb of Khan al-Assal and in an April 13 attack on the neighborhood of Shaykh Maqsud.The letter from then-U.S. Ambassador Susan Rice also said unspecified chemicals, possibly including chemical warfare agents, were used May 14 in an attack on Qasr Abu Samrah and in a May 23 attack on Adra.In March, Britain and France told the secretary-general they have reliable evidence that the Syrian government used chemical weapons near Aleppo, in Homs and possibly in Damascus.The British and French ambassadors told Ban Ki-moon in a letter on March 25 that soil samples and interviews with witnesses and opposition figures backed their belief that the government used chemical shells that had caused injuries and deaths, diplomats and officials said. They spoke on condition of anonymity because the letter has not been made public.On March 23, Britain and France asked the U.N. chief to investigate allegations of chemical weapons use in two locations in Khan al-Assal and the village of Ataybah in the vicinity of Damascus, all on March 19, as well as in Homs on Dec. 23.
BEIRUT — Syrian troops fought with rebels in Homs on Monday in a battle seen as crucial to the government's attempts to drive a wedge between opposition-held areas and establish links between the capital and President Bashar al-Assad's coastal strongholds.Assad's forces have been on the offensive in the central Syrian city for ten days, hitting rebel-held neighborhoods with air strikes, mortar bombs and tanks.Rebels control much of northern Syria but have been on the back foot against Assad's army further south since it retook Qusair last month, a town near the border with Lebanon, where victory marked a change in the government's fortunes.Homs, 140 km (90 miles) north of Damascus, lies at a strategic crossing linking the capital with army bases in coastal regions controlled by Assad's Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam that has dominated majority Sunni Syria since the 1960s.Assad is trying to cement control of this belt of territory, in a move that could drive a wedge between rebel-held areas in the north and south of the country.At a time when the army has made gains on the battlefield, Syrian state media announced that new leaders had been appointed in the ruling Baath Party in a reshuffle that will be seen as an attempt by Assad to put a new face on the political organization that has dominated Syrian politics for more than four decades."The Baath party must develop to strengthen a culture of dialogue ... and deepen interaction with citizens to overcome the negative effect of the crisis," Assad was quoted as saying by state media.In Istanbul, the newly elected head of the opposition Syrian National Coalition told Reuters that the rebels' military position was weak and proposed a truce for the Muslim holy month of Ramadan, which begins on Tuesday, to stop fighting in Homs.There was no sign that the government in Damascus, with its forces now grinding out advances following setbacks earlier in the war, was ready to accept such a ceasefire."We are staring at a real humanitarian disaster in Homs," said Ahmad Jarba, who was elected at an opposition conference on Saturday.He said he expected advanced weapons supplied by Saudi Arabia, the main opposition backer, to reach rebel fighters soon and strengthen their position on the ground.The Syrian National Coalition, a largely exile group, has little influence on rebel units in Syria. That could change if it succeeds in facilitating the supply of sophisticated weapons to the opposition, whose fighters say they need shoulder-launched missiles to take on Assad's air force.Coalition members told Reuters on Monday that provisional prime minister Ghassan Hitto had withdrawn from his position after being unable to form a government. Leadership meetings will recommence in two weeks, they said.Syria's two-year revolt began as peaceful protests but, under a fierce security force crackdown, degenerated into civil war. The conflict has killed more than 100,000 people, the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a British-based monitoring group, says.Clashes and bombardment were reported by activists in nearly every province on Monday, from the outskirts of the capital in the south to the northwestern farming province of Idlib to the eastern desert city of Deir al-Zor.The United States and Sunni Gulf countries say they are backing the opposition but Assad has made significant gains in recent months with military and financial support from Russia and Shi'ite Iran.Fighters from Lebanon's Shi'ite militant group Hezbollah have also played a significant role in helping Assad recapture border towns from Sunni rebels.The Syrian state news agency SANA quoted a military source as saying that the army had killed "terrorists" - a word it uses for insurgents - in several areas of Homs on Monday, including the Old City district of Bab Hood and some satellite towns around the country's third largest city.The Observatory said that Bab Hood and the al-Safsafa district were being hit with heavy artillery, mortar bombs and tank fire, resulting in several injuries."Violent clashes took place on Monday morning between rebels and army forces," the Observatory said in an email. It did not give casualty figures, which are hard to confirm due to media and security restrictions.The Observatory said that the army had retaken around a fifth of al-Khalidiya, a northern district that links the outskirts of the city with the center.It said that five people were killed and more than 30 people wounded in a car bomb in an Alawite district of Homs on Monday. State media blamed rebel fighters and said that there were injuries resulting from two car bombs.A local physician working in Homs with displaced families said she had heard constant bombardment over the past few days."What can we say? We've gotten so used to it we don't even want to think about it. God protects us," she said over the phone on condition of anonymity from the central neighborhood on Inshaat.Video uploaded by an activist group in Homs showed smoke billowing from damaged buildings and the near-constant echo of gunfire and explosions ringing through the narrow streets.The 13th-century Khalid ibn al-Walid mosque, a prominent central landmark, could be seen in the footage. Like many of Syria's historical treasures, the mosque, with its silver-colored domes, has been badly damaged.The United Nations has expressed alarm at conditions in Homs, Syria's third largest city, saying last week that between 2,500 and 4,000 civilians were trapped there amid shortages of food, water, medicine, electricity and fuel.Homs city was the epicenter of protests at the start of the revolt and the armed insurgency. Many districts have fallen in and out of government control during the past two years.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — The deadly clashes that raged between rival rebel factions in Syria over the weekend accentuated the divisions hampering opponents of President Bashar al-Assad as they try to halt his forces' recent gains on the battlefield and persuade the West to supply the insurgency with weapons.The fighting flared between members of a mainstream rebel group and a radical faction affiliated with Al Qaeda, according to local residents and an antigovernment watchdog group. The presence of the radicals and the failure to bring rebel forces under a unified military leadership have made the United States and its allies reluctant to arm the opposition.As foreign fighters continued to spill into Syria across the country's porous borders — committing atrocities against both supporters and opponents of the government and clashing with more moderate rebel groups — the prospects for unity among the rebels have seemed to grow more remote.Islamist fighters said recently that they had driven a rival rebel brigade out of Raqqa, a rebel-held provincial capital in northeastern Syria, because they had found some of its fighters drinking wine and consorting with women, and because they considered brigade reluctant to fight.And in the most recent confrontation, in Dana, a rebel-held town in Idlib Province near the Turkish border, members of an extremist Islamist group were accused of beheading two rival fighters and leaving their severed heads beside a garbage can in a town square.That grim discovery on Sunday followed a protest and clashes in the town, highlighting the antagonism that some Syrian fighters and civilians are beginning to feel toward some of the radical factions.Simmering tensions within the insurgency have intensified lately, especially between rebels affiliated with the Free Syrian Army, the loose-knit umbrella group backed by the West, and members of the Islamic State of Iraq and Al Sham, the new Syria-based affiliate of Al Qaeda, which includes the well-armed fighters of the Nusra Front.The disputes that have erupted in provinces like Raqqa, Idlib and Aleppo are often centered as much on individual egos and economic resources as on ideology. Still, the frictions inhibit the insurgency from functioning as a single fighting force, and as government forces have appeared to retake control of some rebel-held territory, they are threatening to deepen into a new conflict that would further weaken the rebels on the battlefield.According to residents, activists and fighters, popular resentment rose as radical factions, including foreign fighters, began sweeping into villages that had been under the control of the Free Syrian Army and trying to impose their strict conception of Islamic law, sometimes carrying out summary public executions.The Nusra and Free Syrian Army fighters have accused each other of profiting from the war, demanding bribes at checkpoints and selling oil from captured wells. The Qaeda-affiliated units are said to be buying up land in Aleppo and Idlib Provinces and trying to monopolize supplies of wheat and fuel, Reuters reported.The complaints run in both directions. In Raqqa, Abu Abdullah, a fighter with the Islamist brigade of Ahrar al-Sham, said his men, along with Nusra fighters, had ejected the Farouq brigade from the city for both military and moral reasons.He said the Farouq brigade was hoarding arms and had failed to go to the aid of allies in Qusayr, a city that government forces retook last month."We want real fighters," he said in an interview, "not lazy people who raise the revolution flag but spend time relaxing and getting money."In Idlib Province, residents of Dana staged a demonstration on Friday to demand that Qaeda militants leave their town, because the Qaeda fighters had been detaining, beating and in some cases executing teenage boys for trivial offenses, according to a published statement by Syrian activists who identified themselves with the phrase "Al Nusra Front does not represent me."It was not clear who had instigated the clashes, which claimed a number of lives, according to the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an antigovernment watchdog group that tracks violence in the country from a base in Britain.According to a local Free Syrian Army commander and the Observatory, the Qaeda fighters opened fire at the protesters, prompting return fire from more moderate fighters. The civilian demonstrators were caught in the middle, the Observatory said, and several civilians were killed, some of them children.But a local group calling itself the Union of Free Youths of Idlib said that the Qaeda fighters had blamed others for shooting first, and that the clashes had been between disreputable members of battalions whose more serious fighters were busy on the front lines.Those who fought in Dana "have nothing to do with jihad, except they like showing off," the group said on its Facebook page. "We wouldn't say one side is Islamic and the other is secular. Both sides are only fighting for personal gains and glory, while martyr after martyr is falling on the front lines."The local Free Syrian Army commander said that after the clashes in Dana, members of the Qaeda group had begun seizing people in the town, including Fadi al-Qesh, the leader of the Hamza Assad Allah brigade, a Free Syrian Army affiliate. The bodies and severed heads of Mr. Qesh and his brother were found later.In a video circulated by the Observatory, a man with his face obscured, identified as another Free Syrian Army commander, is heard to say ruefully that when the radical fighters first arrived in the town, "we warmly welcomed them — we opened our homes and even participated in battles with them." Now that camaraderie has apparently frayed.
BEIRUT — The road to Bashar al-Assad's palace on the edge of Damascus has four checkpoints manned by Republican Guards and plain-clothed police which guests must pass before they reach the main gate.Inside the People's Palace, in the hills overlooking the Syrian capital, visitors who have seen the Syrian president in the last month say security is surprisingly light for a man who has lost control of half his country to a rebel uprising.Assad's air of confidence - a constant through more than two years of conflict - appeared almost delusional when rebel mortars and bombs were tearing at the heart of Damascus and fighting closed its airport to foreign airlines late last year.But after weeks of counter-offensives by Assad's army in the south of the country - against rebel supply routes east of Damascus and most recently in the border town of Qusair - that optimism looks less irrational.The fall last week of President Mohamed Mursi and the Muslim Brotherhood in Egypt prompted a defiant Assad to proclaim the defeat of political Islam. The Brotherhood's Syrian branch, already under pressure from more radical opposition groups, was dealt a psychological blow that comes on top of delays to promised supplies of weapons from Washington.Congressional committees are holding up a plan to send U.S. arms to the rebels because they doubt the deliveries will be decisive in the war and they fear the weapons might end up in the hands of Islamist militants, U.S. national security sources have told Reuters.In an interview in May with Al-Manar, the television station of his Lebanese militant ally Hezbollah, Assad said the tide had turned on the battlefield and repeated an assertion he has made since protests against his rule first erupted in March 2011."We are confident and sure about victory," he said.The conflict has killed 100,000 of Assad's own people, driven a million and a half more abroad as refugees and left swathes of urban Syria in ruins.The 47-year-old president looks little changed since the conflict began apart from a graying of his moustache and deepening frown lines.From teenage protest in the southern city of Deraa, Syria's uprising against four decades of Assad family rule escalated into nationwide demonstrations, armed insurrection and finally an increasingly sectarian civil war drawing in regional powers.Throughout, Assad has blamed foreign terrorists for the violence, all the time ratcheting up his own use of force from gunfire to tank shells, helicopters to fighter jets, and from mortars to indiscriminate missile strikes. His Western and Arab foes suspect Assad's forces have also used chemical weapons.Dismissing suggestions of blame for the bloodshed, the man who trained as an eye doctor told parliament: "When a surgeon cuts a wound, the wound bleeds. Do we say to him 'Your hands are covered in blood'? Or do we thank him for saving the patient?"Preparing for possible negotiations on a political settlement - which now look unlikely given intransigence on both sides - he dismissed his rebel foes as slaves of foreign masters.Assad's crackdown on the protests against him two years ago drew inevitable comparisons with his father, Hafez al-Assad, who seized power in a coup in 1970 and ruthlessly put down an armed Islamist uprising in the city of Hama a dozen years later.Three decades after Hama, in the era of the Internet, camera phones and global media, conventional wisdom said no leader could crush an uprising in the way the elder Assad did in 1982, killing more than 10,000 people, and hold on to power.In Tunisia and Egypt, leaders were toppled within weeks by peaceful protests and when Libya's Muammar Gaddafi used military force against rebels, NATO forces provided support to help his opponents bring him down.But Assad, aided by powerful security forces dominated by his Alawite minority and shielded by international allies Russia and Iran, has proved far tougher.That stands in contrast to the mood in 2000 when Bashar inherited the presidency aged 34. He was seen then as a reformer. His marriage to a British-educated banker cemented the image of a 21st century couple who might lift Syria out of its Soviet-style political stagnation.But after flirting with political liberalization Assad abruptly closed the door on his 'Damascus Spring' experiment and within five years, relations with the West were in crisis over the assassination of Lebanese politician Rafik al-Hariri, which a United Nations-backed inquiry initially blamed on Damascus.In an early sign of his resilience, Assad weathered that storm, betting that Syria was too important to be ostracized if the West wanted to make any progress resolving decades of Arab-Israeli conflict or the turmoil in post-Saddam Iraq.He was right. In the summer of 2008 Assad was guest of honor at France's annual Bastille Day military parade capping his international rehabilitation.Neither the violence nor economic collapse has truly shaken a power base centered on a clan within the Alawite minority, intelligence services and an army bolstered by local militias.But defections have stripped away some of his entourage, including Manaf Tlas, son of the former defense minister, who grew up with the young Bashar."He was cheated by many of his friends," said one person who visited Assad in May. "He lost a lot of his friends and the one that upset him the most is Manaf."But Assad has lost more than friends. Despite his recent military gains, the north and east of the country, including the eastern oil fields, remain out of his control.Kurds in the north-east have enjoyed de facto autonomy for two years, much like their brethren in northern Iraq, and it is hard to see Assad ever regaining full control of a country whose Sunni majority is implacably opposed to being ruled by Assad's Alawite minority, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam.Assad has increasingly turned to Shi'ite Iran for support, evidenced by meetings with senior Iranian officials in the aftermath of a bomb attack last July that killed four of his inner circle.Iranian money has propped up Syria's economy, while Iranian officers have helped train the Syrian army and set its counter-insurgency strategy, regional security sources say.The Iranian-backed Lebanese militant movement Hezbollah was also largely responsible for Assad's forces regaining the town of Qusair in early June - their most symbolic military victory in two years of fighting."This is really the world upside down," said Peter Harling of the International Crisis Group, referring to Assad's reliance on Hezbollah. "It reflects such a change in the relationship between the regime and what used to be its proxy."
BEIRUT — Syria's governing Baath Party on Monday removed Vice President Farouk al-Shara from its top decision-making body, a shake-up that further sidelined the Syrian political insider who has ventured closest to publicly criticizing the government's handling of the two-year uprising.Mr. Shara, 74, a longtime associate and adviser of President Bashar al-Assad and his family, is no dissident. But he has kept a low profile since he made what in Syria's tightly controlled political scene passed for controversial statements. Also potentially leading loyalists to view him as a threat was the fact that he was mentioned as a possible replacement for Mr. Assad in any transitional government."There is a clear policy to get him out from the Syrian political scene," said a political analyst in Damascus, who spoke on the condition of anonymity for his safety. He added that Mr. Shara posed a political threat because "he has clean hands, is not corrupt and didn't participate in the bloody crackdown."What was unclear was why such a move had come now, when the government had been projecting greater confidence after retaking some rebel-held territory. Government forces are newly hammering rebel strongholds in the strategic central city of Homs, prospects for a negotiated settlement seem remote, and the opposition is suffering from new turbulence.On Monday, the prime minister of the opposition's still-notional interim government, Ghassan Hitto, resigned in what was a new setback for the main exile opposition group, the National Coalition for Syrian Revolutionary and Opposition Forces."The circumstances which have become known to all did not allow me to initiate work on the ground," Mr. Hitto said in a statement.Mr. Hitto, a naturalized American citizen from Damascus, struggled to start an interim government that could administer rebel-held territories and unify rebel fighters. He was hampered by the reluctance of the United States and its allies to fully support the opposition, and by rivalries within the movement.The coalition's new leader, Ahmad Assi al-Jarba, also holds few cards, he made clear in his first public statements on Sunday, his first day in office. The opposition's military position is weak, he told Reuters, saying it will not attend peace talks organized by Russia and the United States unless it improves.He called for a truce during the holy month of Ramadan, which begins this week, apparently to allow aid to reach Homs, where, he said, "we are staring at a real humanitarian disaster."The government says it is advancing into the old center of Homs to push out terrorists — part of what seems to be a recent strategy to double down on a push for military victory.Some analysts speculated that a hardening line might have been the reason for the ouster of Mr. Shara, the Syrian vice president, from the Baath Party's top ranks, known as the regional command.The official news agency, SANA, gave little explanation, issuing an opaque statement saying that the party "should develop itself through adhering to reality," and was "setting new restrictions" in selecting members.In December, Mr. Shara told a Lebanese newspaper that the government could not achieve a military victory over the insurgency.He called for an internationally monitored cease-fire and a national unity government, saying Syria was not fighting for "the survival of an individual or a regime."Mr. Shara is a Sunni Muslim from Dara'a, the southern city where the uprising began. But many in the armed opposition have been hostile to the prospect of even a nonmilitary figure like Mr. Shara remaining in power.Nonetheless, the political analyst said, Mr. Assad effectively kept Mr. Shara under house arrest. Mr. Shara has rarely been seen lately in his office in downtown Damascus, the analyst added.
DAMASCUS — As Ramadan began, the mood in Damascus was more festive than a year ago, reflecting perhaps a greater sense of security as government troops make gains against the rebel insurgency.Many Damascenes have returned from abroad to spend the Muslim holy month with loved ones. Food shops were abuzz with shoppers and butchers and bakers ran low on supplies.But many shoppers expressed frustration at food shortages and inflated prices.The Syrian pound has crashed to one sixth of its value two years ago. Although Syria has been self-sufficient in food, fuel shortages lead to a shortage of food in the cities.On the first day of Ramadan on Wednesday, Damascenes could not find staples such as yoghurt. The price of veal, if found at all, was twice what it was a few months ago. Pita bread, a daily staple, was now three times its price a year ago.Meanwhile, salaries for government workers have not risen. Merchants and private sector workers have seen their businesses come to a standstill, and many complain of a shortage of cash."It's a disaster, but somehow people are pulling through. Some share household expenses, some borrow, some just get by on very little and don't complain. That's how we're doing it these days," said Ayman, 42, an entrepreneur.The government has begun to address the food crisis. Last week it passed a law forbidding anyone from transporting food out of the country. Some Lebanese and many Syrians who live in Lebanon have been shopping for food in Damascus before taking it back to Lebanon, where everything costs slightly more.But despite financial troubles, Damascenes seemed keen to get into the festive mood.Although government forces are battling rebels on the outskirts of Damascus, and explosions and aerial bombardments can be heard throughout the city, Damascenes seem more confident and at ease than just a few weeks earlier.Some believe the government has taken back control of most of the capital's outskirts."I don't support the government, but let's face it. It's strong. It's winning. It's not going anywhere," said Ayman, echoing a common sentiment these days.Though there are hardly any statistics on kidnappings and the random disappearances that have plagued Damascus over the past year, people seem confident that such incidents have markedly declined in number.Perhaps evidence of the change in mood was the unusual sighting of President Bashar al-Assad's cousin, Nabhan, who showed up in a city mall with only a small security detail. He was overheard saying that it was his first time he had set foot there in over a year.The Kafar Souseh mall is located near government buildings, the site of several bomb and mortar attacks in the past months.On the eve of Ramadan, Damascenes crowded streets and coffee shops. They shopped for last-minute ingredients then raced home to prepare their final meal of the day before sunrise.The buzz was highly unusual, something the streets of Damascus had not seen in a while.For months now, the Syrian capital has gone quiet by sunset, as people scurry home for fear of kidnappings, shootings and hostile checkpoints.But Ramadan is traditionally a month of nocturnal activities, especially when falls in summer. During the day, fasting Muslims stay indoors to avoid the heat and to rest. At night, after they break their fast and spend time in prayer, people go out for a stroll and a late night meal, or visit family with all their children in tow.In 2010, these Ramadan festivities seemed to have reached a peak. Restaurants and private parties for the meal of Suhur - the final meal before sunrise - went on all night. The scene was so festive that it was near impossible to find a free table at a restaurant at 2 a.m. without a reservation.The atmosphere was in contrast to the eerie scenes of last Ramadan, which followed the assassination of Assef Shawkat, the president's brother-in-law. Many remember that killing as the arrival in the capital of the country's civil war.Last Ramadan, everyone scurried home before sunset. During the night, only heavy artillery and fighter jets could be heard. Damascenes said none had ever witnessed such a morose Ramadan.But in the days before this Ramadan, the streets of Damascus seem to have come to life, with cars blaring music and young people clapping along.Perhaps adding to the buzz is the fact that so many Syrians have returned home for the holy month.The Lebanese border was unusually crowded with Syrians on their way to Damascus.One 47-year-old grandmother, Lamia, said she and her husband and young daughter were returning home from Cairo via Beirut "for good"."We hear things are calm now, so here we are. We're back."Others flew direct from Cairo to Damascus just in time for Ramadan. Many arrived late at night, forcing family members to make the arduous trip to the airport to pick them up.One such passenger, Fatma, 70, said she was well aware of the risks, but she had to come home no matter the cost."I've had enough of exile. It's time for me to be home."The road from Damascus to its international airport has seen intense fighting. Though the airport never completely shut down most airlines have stopped flying to it, and most Syrians began to fly out of Beirut instead.Despite the newly festive atmosphere in Damascus, the sounds of shelling and bombardment continue day and night.Ironically, for as long as Syrians can recall, the traditional sounds of Ramadan normally include cannon fire, which announces the beginning and breaking of the fast."Just don't break your fast every time you hear a cannon blast," he said.
BEIRUT — Syrian rebels fired into the air to disperse a protest by civilians in a rebel-held district of Aleppo against a blockade preventing food and medicine reaching government-held areas of the northern city, residents said on Wednesday.Rebel fighters have stopped supplies entering western parts of Aleppo for weeks. The tactic is aimed at weakening the supply routes of President Bashar al-Assad's forces but thousands of civilians are now going hungry, residents say.Video footage posted on the Internet on Tuesday showed dozens of civilians in the rebel-held neighborhood of Bustan al-Qasr protesting at a rebel checkpoint which prevents supplies from entering the western section of the city, home to 2 million people and held by the army.Although insurgents and the army control different parts of the country, civilians are normally allowed to cross freely to shop or meet family members and friends.The footage, posted by the opposition Bustan al-Qasr Information Office, showed men at the protest chanting, "the people want an end to the blockade." A rebel fighter brandishes a pistol and then a gunshot is heard as the video ends.An opposition activist group called the Aleppo Martyrs said rebels fired at the protesters, killing one person and wounding several others. But a resident at the protest said the man was killed prior to the protest by army sniper fire as he tried the cross between rebel and government-held territory.Reuters was not able to confirm the report due to media and security restrictions in Syria.More than 100,000 people have died in Syria's two-year conflict. It started because Assad's force fired live ammunition against pro-democracy protests, leading to an armed revolt.Rebels who now control many parts of the country are blamed for similar abuses by rights groups, including torture and harsh punishments imposed by religious courts.Humanitarian aid organizations say their shipments have been blocked by both rebels and the army in many parts of Syria."We are facing challenges delivering assistance throughout the country, especially in contested areas," Jane Howard, a United Nations World Food Programme spokeswoman, said.Howard said that WFP has tried eight times since October 2012 to deliver aid to Moadamiyeh, a suburb of Damascus that has been pummeled by air strikes and artillery.Although the area is only five km (3 miles) from the WFP warehouse, Howard says convoys were "either turned back, did not get approval or came under fire."In Aleppo, the WFP has delivered rations to more than 250,000 people in the weeks leading up to the Muslim holy month of Ramadan."We have our fingers crossed that if Aleppo goes through a particularly difficult period, we've managed to get enough food into the city to tide people over for the next month," she said.At the rebel checkpoint in the Aleppo neighborhood of Bustan al-Qasr, a sign displayed by rebels read: "Food, medicine, oil, babies' products, milk, vegetables, meat, bread: completely forbidden (from crossing)."Residents in western Aleppo say food prices have jumped to more than ten times their original level and basics such as bread and flour have become harder to find.Civilians say they are stockpiling food, such as bulgur wheat and rice, which are still available. They say some vegetables are still being sold in markets.
DAMASCUS, Syria — In a story July 10 about Ramadan, The Associated Press, relying on a press release issued by the U.N.'s Department of Public Information, News and Media Division, reported erroneously that the World Food Program said it needed $27 million every month to deal with the growing ranks of Syrians made hungry because of the war and refugees crisis abroad. The World Food Program needed $27 million every week. The U.N. has corrected the error.A corrected version of the story is below:Syrians struggle to find festive mood this Ramadan as prices soar and war drags onDAMASCUS, Syria (AP) — As the Muslim holy month of Ramadan began Wednesday, many Syrians who observe the daily dawn-to-dusk fast that is broken with lavish family meals are struggling to find the usually festive mood and holiday warmth as the country's bloody conflict rages for a third year.In one rebel-held city, residents have resorted to begging for crumbs at a local soup kitchen, while in a refugee camp on the Jordanian border, Syrians hounded by the desert heat and dust break their fast separated from relatives back home.Reflecting the deprivation brought on by the war, the U.N food agency said that 7 million people were now reliant on food aid simply to eat. The fighting that has destroyed much of the country, combined with prices that have soared in recent months, have left many Syrians struggling to get by."People come by the kitchen just begging for scraps, it tears the heart," said an activist in the rebel-held northern Syrian city of Maarat al-Numan.He said activists were using a communal kitchen to distribute a simple Ramadan evening meal of rice, vegetable stew and soup to some 400 of the city's neediest families. He identified himself only by his nickname, Abu Anas, fearing for his safety.In the Zaatari refugee camp in the Jordanian desert, many of the 120,000 Syrians that live in the sprawling tent city home were homesick and miserable."Carrying out the Ramadan fast in this refugee camp is extremely difficult in every way imaginable," said Abu Qusai, a 32-year-old construction worker from the restive southern province of Daraa, where the Syrian uprising against President Bashar Assad began in March 2011. "It is as dry as a bone and the dust is kicking up ... we're thirsty, dirty and very uncomfortable. We're fed up."Ramadan is traditionally a time of reflection and prayer, and Muslims are expected to abstain during daylight hours from food, drink, smoking and sex to focus on spirituality, good deeds and charity. The fast presents a physical and spiritual challenge every year, but particularly when the holiday falls during harsh Mideast summer when the days are longest and temperatures soar in some places to 50 degrees Celsius (120 Fahrenheit).The Muslim lunar calendar moves back through the seasons, so Ramadan starts 11 days earlier each year under the Western calendar.For most Sunnis and Shiites, Ramadan started on Wednesday while others are expected to begin observing the holy month on Thursday — differences based on various interpretations of sightings of the new moon.Despite its apparent harshness, many Muslims eagerly anticipate Ramadan, the month when they believe God revealed the first verses of the Muslim holy book, the Quran, to the Prophet Muhammad. Streets are decorated with colorful lanterns, families gather at dusk to break their fasts with sumptuous feasts of meat and rice and sweets, the devout pray even more and regional cooking shows obsess over new takes on classic dishes for the Ramadan evening meal.But the hardships in Syria, where the civil war is now in its third year, have eroded much of the Ramadan joy.Even those considered lucky enough to have stayed in their homes found themselves cutting back on traditional Ramadan delights like sweets and meats as they awoke to their fragile currency falling once again, this time to 270 pounds to the U.S. dollar.It was likely to set off another rise in food prices that residents say has already increased five-fold.Still, residents in Damascus said the mood was better than last year, when rebels tried to overrun the capital. In the past few months, the military has gone on the offensive and has succeeded in clearing rebels from many areas on the edge of the capital as well as in the country's center. Encouraged, many Syrians abroad returned to visit relatives this Ramadan.Syria's conflict began as an Arab Spring-inspired uprising against Assad's regime. It descended into a civil war that has killed more than 93,000 people, displaced over 5 million and turned over 1.5 million into refugees, according to U.N. figures.On Wednesday, the World Food Program said it needed $27 million every week to deal with the growing ranks of Syrians made hungry because of the war and refugees crisis abroad.If the organization did not provide for them, "they simply will not eat," said Muhannad Hadi, WFP's emergency coordinator in Syria, speaking at a new conference in New York.The food crisis is partly caused by the rising price of fuel, a lack of imports and farmers abandoning their fields because it's unsafe to work.The Syrian currency fell further, to 280 pounds to the U.S. dollar on Wednesday, after recovering from a record low of 310 pounds to the dollar on Tuesday. The falling pound is likely to further push up prices.It made an average teacher's salary equivalent to some $70, a resident explained."Yesterday, I bought 2 kilograms of potatoes, one kilogram of beans and two kilograms of tomatoes with 1,000 pounds," said Qassem al-Zamel, a 37-year-old employee, ticking off once-cheap produce. "I stopped buying meat."Supermarket owner Adib Mardini, 62, said he was changing food prices by the hour on some days but there were few shoppers. "People have run out of money," he said.Across the region, governments took steps to help alleviate the 14-hour fast in the summer heat.In the West Bank and Gaza Strip, Palestinian local governments reduced hours in the working day, alongside Jordan, Iraq, Pakistan, Afghanistan and Bangladesh, allowing fasters to sleep in.But to ensure compliance, many countries also shutter bars, and fine people seen eating in public, including Jordan.The oil-rich Gulf Emirate of Abu Dhabi planned to distribute nearly 30,000 sunset meals to drivers at gas stations or traffic lights in an attempt to prevent traffic accidents by speeding motorists with rushing home for iftar, the meal that breaks the fast.In Iraq, Sunnis and Shiites both began fasting on Wednesday - a rarity in a country that has experienced some of its worst sectarian violence in years.Starting the holy month together, Baghdad resident Ibrahim Ali said, is "a good omen for a new Iraq."Tensions between the sects have spiked since December, when Sunnis started staging protests against the Shiite-led government over what they call second-class treatment.Echoing complaints from Jordan to Indonesia, Ali said food prices at local markets where he shops have soared by as much as 25 to 30 percent in the days before Ramadan."Prices have jumped with the temperature in Ramadan ... There is nothing worse than that," he said.Temperatures topped 41 degrees Celsius (105 degrees Fahrenheit) on Wednesday in Baghdad, where authorities struggle to provide electricity for even half the day in the hot summer months.The Gaza government promised it would ration fuel to allow every household to receive 12 hours a day of power.But there was little they could do to deal with rising prices, caused in part by neighboring Egypt moving to prevent the flow of food and fuel into the Gaza Strip in smuggling tunnels; one of the side effects of turmoil in Egypt.Hadid reported from Beirut. Associated Press writers across the Muslim world contributed to this report.
LONDON — Britain's parliament backed a motion on Thursday requiring Prime Minister David Cameron to give it a veto over any future move to arm Syrian rebels, in a symbolic vote the government said it would heed.Britain says it has not yet taken any decision to arm rebels fighting to topple President Bashar al-Assad, but its role in helping to lift a European Union arms embargo on Syria in May fuelled speculation it was planning to do just that.The lower house of parliament voted by 114-1 to back a motion requiring the government to seek its "explicit prior consent" for any future decision to provide lethal assistance.Though symbolic, the move is significant as it means Cameron will find it almost impossible not to give parliament a vote on the issue, something government sources say would amount to an effective veto over any decision to supply arms.Ministers expect the 650-member lower house to vote against sending arms if the issue arises, said one government source.Many lawmakers in Cameron's Conservative Party say they are worried a decision to arm the moderate opposition in Syria would escalate and widen the conflict and risk weapons falling into the hands of Islamist extremists."The government has discussed the option of arming the rebels. This would be a major policy change. This debate allows us to mark the government's card," said John Baron, a Conservative lawmaker who secured Thursday's vote.The uprising led by Syria's Sunni Muslim majority is increasingly rallying around Islamist appeals as Assad's forces notch up battlefield gains against the rebels in a conflict that has killed more than 100,000 people since 2011.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syria's main opposition coalition Thursday condemned a rebel blockade of government-held districts in the contested northern city of Aleppo, issuing a rare statement of criticism against fighters who reportedly caused severe food shortages at the start of the Muslim holy month of Ramadan.Residents of the Bustan al-Qasr neighborhood staged protests against the blockade by Islamic militant rebels, according to activists and a video posted to YouTube on Tuesday.The demonstration was one of three reported in Aleppo province in recent days against alleged abuses by al-Qaida-affiliated fighters, suggesting growing discontent in rebel areas toward the hard-line factions that are among the most organized of the rebel groups fighting President Bashar Assad."The people want to break the siege!" the residents shouted angrily during a demonstration at a checkpoint. The video appeared genuine and corresponded to other Associated Press reporting on Aleppo.The checkpoint known as Garage al-Hajz is the only link between rebel-held eastern districts of Aleppo and western districts controlled by the government. It was reportedly seized and closed several days ago by non-Syrian fighters from the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant, a merger of al-Qaida's branches in Iraq and Syria.Rami Abdul-Rahman, director of the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, said the fighters banned the transport of goods through the crossing to besieged regime-held neighborhoods of Aleppo, leading to shortages of food including baby milk and bread.He said that the checkpoint was reopened Thursday based on an order from the Sharia Council of Aleppo, the Islamic court governing rebel-held parts of the city.The main Western-backed opposition group issued a statement criticizing the siege and urging all rebel units "to help lift the siege imposed by groups not committed to protecting civilians, guaranteeing freedom of movement and facilitating the movement of staple foods to all areas."Protecting civilians in liberated areas as well as those under Assad's control and providing them with basic needs and ensuring their safety "are top priorities of the revolution," said the statement by the Syrian National Coalition. The group has previously criticized acts by various factions in the splintered rebel movement, but not frequently.Residents of rebel-held towns stage occasional protests against alleged abuses by fighters, often those affiliated with al-Qaida.Such demonstrations may be becoming more frequent. On Wednesday, residents of two towns in Aleppo province, Minbaj and Kondi Mazen, protested separate incidents in which fighters reportedly arrested local youths for alleged petty offenses, according to the Observatory and an activist in Aleppo who spoke on condition of anonymity.The Syrian civil war has killed more than 93,000 people, according to the United Nations, and displaced millions more. Aleppo, once Syria's commercial center, has been a main center of fighting since July last year.Also on Thursday, the Syrian government started buying up local currency and raising penalties for black-market deals to try to stop the fall of the pound, which has tumbled to record lows against the U.S. dollar, the state-run news agency SANA said.Syria's move Wednesday came as the currency hit a record low, reaching 310 pounds to the dollar compared with 47 pounds to the dollar when the country's crisis began 28 months ago.The record drop of the pound happened on the first day of the Muslim holy month of Ramadan, when observant Muslims fast from dawn to dusk. Many Syrians are struggling with soaring prices because of the weakening currency.SANA said the government approved a bill Wednesday that criminalizes business deals in currencies other than the pound, with penalties ranging from three to 10 years in prison.The bill also seeks to prevent manipulation of prices in the market and "curb exploitation of citizens' needs," SANA said.The currency began a sharp descent last month after the U.S. decision to arm Syrian rebels.Syria is believed to have relied heavily on Iran to support its economy. Private media in the region have reported that Iran has supplied Assad's regime with billions of dollars since the crisis began in March 2011, and Syria's SANA recently acknowledged $1 billion in aid.In an interview with a state-run newspaper Thursday, Assad said "Arab identity" was back on the right track after the fall from power of Egypt's Muslim Brotherhood, which he contends had used religion for its own political gain.Assad's comments to the Al-Baath newspaper, the mouthpiece of his ruling Baath party, came a week after Egypt's military ousted Islamist President Mohammed Morsi as millions took to the streets to urge his removal. Morsi was Egypt's first freely elected president.Assad calls the revolt against him an international conspiracy carried out by Islamist groups such as the Syrian Muslim Brotherhood — a branch of the Egyptian group with the same name to which Morsi belongs."The Muslim Brotherhood and those who are like them take advantage of religion and use it as a mask," Assad said. "They consider that when you don't stand with them politically, then you are not standing with God."Assad's comments mark the second time in a week that he has gloated publically about Morsi's fall. In an interview with another state-run daily last Thursday, he praised the massive protests by Egyptians against their Islamist leader and said Morsi's overthrow meant the end of "political Islam."Assad's father, the late President Hafez Assad, cracked down on a Muslim Brotherhood-led rebellion in the northern city of Hama in 1982. The Syrian forces, led by the then-president's brother and special forces from their minority Alawite sect, razed much of the city in a three-week air and ground attack, killing between 10,000 and 20,000 people."Arab identity is back in the right track," Assad said in the interview with Al-Baath. "It is returning after the fall of the Muslim Brotherhood and after these political trends that use religions for their narrow interests have been revealed."Earlier this week, Egypt restricted the ability of Syrians to enter the country, with officials citing reports that a large number of Syrians were backing the Muslim Brotherhood in the bloody standoff with the military over Morsi's ouster.
BEIRUT — Militants linked to al Qaeda in Syria killed a senior figure in the Western- and Arab-backed Free Syrian army on Thursday, an FSA source said, signaling a widening rift between Islamists and more moderate elements in the armed Syrian opposition.Kamal Hamami, a member of the Free Syrian Army's Supreme Military Council, known by his nom de guerre Abu Bassel al-Ladkani, was meeting with members of the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant in the port city of Latakia when they killed him, Qassem Saadeddine, a Free Syrian Army spokesman, told Reuters."The Islamic State phoned me saying that they killed Abu Bassel and that they will kill all of the Supreme Military Council," Saadeddine said from Syria."He met them to discuss battle plans," Saadeddine added.The Free Syrian Army has been trying to build a network of logistics and reinforce its presence across Syria as the U.S. administration pledged to send weapons to the group after it concluded that Syrian President Bashar al-Assad's forces had used chemical weapons against rebel fighters.U.S. congressional committees are holding up the plan because of fears that such deliveries will not be decisive and the arms might end up in the hands of Islamist militants, security sources have said.While Free Syrian Army units sometimes fight alongside Islamist militant groups such as the Islamist State, rivalries have increased and al Qaeda-linked groups have been blamed for several assassinations of commanders of moderate rebel units.
ELYAKIM, Israel — An Israeli soldier collapses onto the floor of a house in Lebanon, shot by Hezbollah fighters. As his squad mates clear out the second floor, a medic rushes over, pulling on latex gloves and digging into his first aid kit. Gunfire echoes down the stairs as he starts to work on the wound.The Israeli military experienced this kind of brutal house-to-house warfare during its inconclusive 2006 war with Hezbollah. As it trains in a mock village in its base in this northern Israeli town, it is recreating similar battle scenarios as it prepares for the next confrontation with the Lebanese militant group. Officials say such a conflict could erupt at any time.While the world has focused its attention on the turmoil in Egypt following the ouster of President Mohammed Morsi, Israel is keeping a close eye on its northern flank, where officials say the Syrian civil war, and Hezbollah's increasing involvement there, have created a combustible mix that could draw in Israel with little notice."They are more and more deeply embedded in their infighting and we have to be prepared, we have to watch the border and have the forces that will enable us to respond quickly and decisively," said Lt. Col. Peter Lerner, a military spokesman.Israel has been warily watching the Syrian conflict since it erupted in March 2011, fearing that sophisticated weapons could be transferred to Hezbollah during the chaos. Though they have not taken sides, Israeli leaders have said they would take military action to prevent "game-changing" arms from reaching the militant group.Israeli warplanes have carried out at least three airstrikes in recent months on what were believed to be advanced missiles on their way to Hezbollah. A pair of mysterious explosions over the past week, one at an arms depot in Syria and a second in a Hezbollah stronghold in Lebanon, has raised suspicions that Israel was involved.Israel has not confirmed involvement in any of the airstrikes or explosions, but even the perception of an Israeli connection raises the risk of a reprisal.On several occasions this year, mortar shells and tank rounds from Syria have landed inside Israeli-controlled territory, causing damage and spreading panic but causing no injuries. Israel says most of the attacks have been errant fire, but it has sometimes accused Syria of aiming at Israeli targets, and has briefly fired back across the border.In the wake of an Israeli airstrike in May, Syrian President Bashar Assad threatened to retaliate, while Israel's air force chief has warned that a "surprise war" could break out at any time.Conflict with Syria would almost certainly mean renewed hostilities with Hezbollah, Syrian President Bashar Assad's close ally, which battled Israel in a month-long war in 2006 that ended in stalemate. During the fighting, Hezbollah fired some 4,000 rockets and missiles into Israel. Defense officials believe Hezbollah has restocked its arsenal with tens of thousands of missiles, some capable of striking deep inside the Jewish state.The base in Elyakim, in northern Israel, plays a key role in preparing for any future confrontation. The military built the complex after the 2006 war to institutionalize the lessons of guerrilla warfare. The village complex features networks of tunnels and trainers frequently take hostages as part of battlefield scenarios like the one involving the wounded soldier and the frantic fight for control of the house.Lt. Archie Leonard, a spokesman for the school, said the experience of the last war gives the soldiers an important step up compared to 2006. He said intelligence keeps the trainers up to date on Hezbollah tactics."The next time that we'll go in, if we go in, we'll be much more forceful and more effective," he said. "I think the Hezbollah is getting better, but we're ahead of them and we'll always be a step of ahead of their abilities."Such training is only one step in a series of measures Israel has taken to boost security along its borders with Lebanon and Syria. The military has beefed up its physical defenses in the Golan Heights over the past two years, and officials say it has improved its intelligence operation to give early warning of potential attacks.Reflecting the high priority of the northern front, the military announced plans this week to create a new army division to oversee the Golan Heights, along the Syrian front, and "address emerging threats" like the one from Hezbollah.It approved the step even as defense officials slash their budget. The military is turning its forces away from heavy arms like tanks toward non-traditional forms of warfare like the guerrilla battle it faced in Lebanon. Defense Minister Moshe Yaalon said on Thursday that "army-to-army battles of the type we last saw 40 years ago in the Yom Kippur War are becoming less and less relevant," referring to the 1973 conflict in which Israeli forces confronted mass formations of Egyptian and Syrian tanks.For now, Israeli officials believe neither Syria nor Hezbollah is interested in war. Assad is preoccupied with rebels trying to oust him, and the Israeli military estimates that around 3,000 Hezbollah fighters have entered Syria to aid him. Officials believe the group has lost some 200 fighters.Such losses have may have weakened Hezbollah in the short term. But officials say Hezbollah's experience in the civil war may prove a valuable training ground. Officials point to the heavy Hezbollah involvement in the Syrian government's attack on the city of Qusair several weeks ago, and said that Israel has seen Hezbollah fighters operating tanks.On Friday, Hezbollah's deputy chief Sheik Naim Kassem said the group's involvement in Syria's civil war did not affect its capabilities to fight Israel. He said Hezbollah "is ready to confront any stupid act by Israel.""Hezbollah is ready even if the war breaks out this moment," Kassem told the group's Nour radio station. "They are training and we are training. They are arming and we are arming."In May, Hezbollah leader Hassan Nasrallah said that the group would help Syria retake the Golan Heights or accept upgraded arms from its military. "The resistance is prepared to accept any sophisticated weaponry even if it was to break the balance (of force)," he said.Yoram Schweitzer, a terrorism expert at the Institute for National Security Studies, a Tel Aviv think tank, said that even a weakened Hezbollah still can hurt Israel."In spite of its dire straits situation in Syria, mainly, the way it was equipped with very sophisticated armament and training by states is still posing a threat to Israel," Schweitzer said. No matter how many fighters Hezbollah loses, he argued, it maintains the ability "to send many rockets to Israel to devastate the country."Bassem Mroue in Beirut contributed to this report.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Before the Syrian economic crisis, Bashar and his wife, both doctors, lived with their three children in a three-bedroom apartment with a spacious living room.Bashar, 35, supplemented a modest salary from a government hospital with shifts at three private hospitals and a private clinic, where his wife also worked. They earned the equivalent of about $25,000 a year, making them wealthy by Syrian standards. Now, with parts of the city inaccessible and wealthy patients fleeing, his jobs have dwindled to one, and his wife is unemployed. When the collapse of the Syrian pound is factored in, he makes about $1,090 per year.His family's story is one of many that show how war, displacement and a currency crash have upended a professional class that was proportionally one of the Arab world's largest.To mention that he and his family ate meat or fish every day sounds strange, because they never thought twice about it. Now, they rarely eat meat and have had no fish for two months."I used to buy everything for my children and wife, the best food, meat, fruits, sweets and clothes," said Bashar, who did not want his last name published for fear of reprisal. "Now I am always asking the grocer what is the price today for this thing or that, because maybe the price increased in the last 24 hours."The family has been forced to move from one home to another. Its house in the Tadamon neighborhood of Damascus was bombed a year ago. The family moved to Yarmouk, a former Palestinian refugee camp, but the rebels seized much of it and then the government began bombing it.Now the family lives in a sparsely furnished apartment in a poor area in the jumbled concrete outskirts of Damascus, not far from the areas under bombardment."Doctors are considered rich or middle class, but today everyone is affected by the economic crisis," Bashar said. "The poor class is dying, the middle class is becoming the poor class, and the rich class has left the country."
BEIRUT — On Syria's front lines, al-Qaida fighters and more mainstream Syrian rebels have turned against each other in a power struggle that has undermined the effort to topple Syrian President Bashar Assad.After violent clashes and the assassination of two rival commanders, one of whom was beheaded, more moderate factions are publicly accusing the extremists of trying to seize control of the rebellion.The rivalries — along with the efforts by extremist foreign fighters to impose their strict interpretation of Islam in areas they control — are chipping away at the movement's popularity in Syria at a time when the regime is making significant advances on the ground."The rebels' focus has shifted from toppling the regime to governing and power struggles," said a 29-year-old woman from the contested city of Homs. "I feel that the lack of true leadership is and has always been their biggest problem." She spoke on condition of anonymity, fearing retaliation from the fighters and the regime.The infighting, which exploded into the open in the country's rebel-held north in recent days, is contributing to a sense across many parts of Syria that the revolution has faltered. It threatens to fracture an opposition movement that has been plagued by divisions from the start.The moderates once valued the expertise and resources that their uneasy allies brought to the battlefield, but now question whether such military assets are worth the trouble — not to mention the added difficulty in persuading the West to arm them."We don't want foreign fighters. We have enough men and we want them out of Syria," said Brig. Gen. Salim Idris, head of the Supreme Military Council of the Free Syrian Army, an umbrella group for dozens of brigades.In strikingly blunt comments in an interview with Al-Arabiya on Monday, Idris, a secular-minded army defector who has the backing of foreign powers, accused members of the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant of being regime agents and "criminals."That group, formed in April and made up of al-Qaida's branches in Iraq and Syria, has taken on an increasingly dominant role in the Syrian civil war. Many of its fighters are north Africans, Iraqis, Afghans and Europeans who have flocked to Syria to join the overwhelmingly Sunni uprising against Assad.Gunmen from the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant were behind the killings of the two rebel commanders, the highest-profile casualties of the growing tensions between jihadi fighters and Western-supported rebels.Kamal Hamami, known as Abu Basir, served in the Supreme Military Council. Activists say he was shot late Thursday in a clash that erupted after militants tried to remove a checkpoint he set up on the Jabal al-Turkoman mountain in the coastal province of Latakia. Two of his men were seriously wounded in the shooting.Also last week, members of the extremist group killed Fadi al-Qish, the local commander of a group affiliated with the mainstream Free Syrian Army, or FSA. The fatal attack took place in the village of Dana in the northern province of Idlib near the Turkish border. Activists say the militants decapitated al-Qish and another fighter and left their severed heads on the ground as a lesson to other rebels who challenge their rule in the area.The executions have enraged FSA commanders, who are demanding that the killers be handed over to stand trial.Activists also say extremists have recently been sweeping into villages previously controlled by the FSA, taking over crucial resources such as bakeries, oil wells and water pumps to secure people's loyalties. In several cases, the militants were said to seize weapons from army bases and keep them from other rebels.But what alienates the general population is the brutality. The extremists have carried out summary executions, public floggings and mass arrests, fueling the backlash against them.In one prominent case in Aleppo last month, al-Qaida-linked militants executed a 15-year-old boy, Mohammad Qattaa, accusing him of being an "infidel" for mentioning Islam's Prophet Muhammad in vain. Gunmen shot the boy dead in front of his parents near a stand where he sold coffee in a killing that sparked rare local protests against them.In many parts of Aleppo and Idlib and Homs, where a suffocating stalemate has been in place since last year, residents say their support and patience for the rebels is fraying.In Aleppo last week, residents staged a protest at a checkpoint against a blockade imposed by the militants on government-held districts, because the blockade created food shortages at the onset of Ramadan, the Muslim holy month. The protest led to a physical quarrel between supporters and opponents of the siege and ended with gunshots fired in the air to disperse protesters.Syria's uprising started in March 2011 as an Arab Spring-inspired revolt against the decades-long Assad family rule. It eventually transformed into an insurgency and civil war in response to a brutal government crackdown against the protests. More than 93,000 have been killed and millions uprooted from their homes.The rebels are a disparate mix of ordinary citizens who took up weapons, army defectors, moderates and hard-liners, and increasingly, jihadists who have trekked to Syria from all over the world. A shortage of weapons and the inability of external players to interfere in the conflict to tip the balance in favor of one side or another has worked against the rebels.Some FSA commanders are trying to tamp down the dispute with the al-Qaida militants, mindful of the damage the infighting has done to their cause."Their actions are despicable, but we will not be drawn into a fight with them," said one commander, who declined to be named so as not to aggravate the situation."I think they should come out in public and tell the Syrian people why they are in Syria. Is it to fight Bashar Assad or to impose a specific agenda on the Syrian people?" he asked."We never see them on the battlefield anymore," he said of the al-Qaida militants. "We only see them in liberated areas either next to oil wells or trying to impose specific agendas on territories."The dispute is not restricted to Islamic militants versus moderates. In the north, there has also been deadly infighting between Kurdish and Arab groups over control of captured territory along the border with Turkey."This infighting is very dangerous and is undermining our revolution," said Mohammed Kanaan, an activist based in the northern province of Idlib. "People are fed up and tired. ... They are starting to hate both sides," he said via Skype.Rami Abdul-Rahman, director of the U.K.-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, said the al-Qaida militants are working to entrench themselves and secure a place in a post-Assad Syria."They are trying to control everything, they have a lot of money," most of it from private donations, he said.Still, al-Mikdad ruled out a scenario similar to the Iraqi one, when U.S.-allied groups of Sunni fighters battled al-Qaida."Until now, the FSA does not consider itself in confrontation with these groups. Our weapons are directly only against Bashar Assad's troops," he said in a TV interview."But if a fight is imposed on us, we will defend ourselves," he said.
BEIRUT — Syrian government troops pounded rebel-held villages around the northern city of Idlib with rockets, artillery and airstrikes, killing at least 29 people, including six children, activists said Monday.After seizing the momentum in recent months in Syria's civil war, President Bashar Assad's forces are on the offensive against the rebels on several fronts, including in Idlib province along the border with Turkey. Government forces are in firm control of the provincial capital of same name, while dozens of rebel brigades control the countryside.The Britain-based Observatory for Human Rights said government shelling overnight targeted five villages near Idlib city. Eight women and six children were among the 29 people killed, according to the Observatory.The group, which relies on a network of activists inside Syria, said the deadliest attack took place in the village of Maghra, where a rocket slammed into a row of houses, killing 13 people. Three nearby villages — Bara, Basamis and Kafr Nabl — were hit by artillery shells that killed another 13 people. Three others died in an airstrike on the village Iblin, the Observatory said.In central Syria, a car bomb exploded outside a police headquarters in the town of Deir Atiyeh, some 80 kilometers (50 miles) north of Damascus, killing 13 people, including 10 policemen. One child was among the dead, the Observatory said.Syria's state news agency confirmed the attack late Sunday, but said a suicide bomber detonated an explosives-laden car in a residential area of the town, causing an unknown number of casualties. It said "terrorists" were behind the blast — a government term for rebels fighting to topple President Bashar Assad's regime.There was no immediate claim of responsibility, but radical Islamic groups, including those with links to al-Qaida, frequently target Syrian government institutions, security installations and troops with car bombs and suicide attacks.Last month, a Syrian branch of al-Qaida known as Jabhat al-Nusra claimed responsibility for multiple suicide attacks on security compounds in Damascus that killed at least five people.The Nusra Front and other Islamic extremist groups have been the most effective fighting force on the opposition side in the past year, spearheading many of the rebel offensives that have captured military bases, towns and villages.The U.N. estimates that more than 93,000 people have been killed in Syria since the revolt began in March 2011 with largely peaceful protests against the Assad regime. It turned into a civil war after opposition supporters took up arms to fight a brutal government crackdown.
LONDON — Britain is to give Syrian rebels equipment to protect themselves against chemical and biological weapons as "a matter of special urgency", saying it would allow them to potentially survive a sarin gas attack.In a written statement to parliament on Tuesday, Foreign Secretary William Hague said Britain would deliver 5,000 escape hoods, nerve-agent pre-treatment tablets and chemical weapons detector paper to the Syrian National Coalition on or after August 3."There is evidence of attacks using chemical weapons in Syria - including sarin," he said. "We believe that the use of chemical weapons is sanctioned and ordered by the Assad regime."Britain has repeatedly said it believes forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad have made limited use of chemical weapons, something the Syrian government denies.
BEIRUT — Gunmen loyal to President Bashar al-Assad shot dead at least six mediators sent to try to reconcile warring sectarian groups in the province of Homs, where people on opposing sides in Syria's war had until now been able to coexist, residents said on Tuesday.The negotiators were from the National Reconciliation Committee, which the government set up to foster talks in a two-year conflict that has taken more than 100,000 lives.The killings, which happened on Monday evening in the village of Hajar al-Abyad, highlight the growing challenge of mediating between towns held by rebel groups and those controlled by pro-Assad militias known as "shabbiha".Recent fighting in the rural territory of western Homs province, part of a strategic corridor between the capital Damascus and Assad's strongholds on the Mediterranean coast, has frayed relationships between neighboring communities and risks sparking a sectarian conflict in the area.Western Homs province is a combustible mix of towns from Syria's long marginalized Sunni Muslim majority, which has supported the revolt against Assad, and towns that are home to minority sects that have largely supported the president.Christians and Alawites, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam to which Assad himself belongs, often cite fears of the rising power of hardline Sunni groups among the opposition.Assad's forces, backed by Christian and Alawite militias, have been pushing a successful offensive in the area. Sunni rebels are now fighting back hard in order to maintain a foothold in the critical region.The six negotiators had been trying to set up talks between the Sunni town of al-Zara and the Alawite town of Qameira, which clashed for several days last week."The Alawite militias ambushed the men, who are Sunnis, when they arrived in a nearby town to try to start talks. They began to suspect the team was secretly working with the rebels, because Qameira was hit with a surprise attack last week, and many soldiers were killed," one local resident told Reuters.Most locals believed the team was killed with tacit approval from local government officials, the resident said, even though the men were from a state-sanctioned delegation.Video uploaded by the pro-opposition Syrian Observatory for Human Rights showed a row of corpses inside black body bags, riddled with bullets and covered in flowers.The western countryside was once a relatively calm region that served as a refuge for Syrians fleeing the fighting in larger cities and towns.Locals say reconciliation between different communities is growing increasingly difficult even in remote rural areas where locals had long been able to negotiate truces between residents, Assad's forces, and the rebels.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Little by little, the central Syrian city of Homs is losing its infrastructure and its landmarks. The national hospital lies in ruins. Rebel-held neighborhoods stretch for blocks without an intact building. Many government offices are closed. The silver-domed mosque of Khalid bin al-Waleed — named for an early Islamic warrior particularly revered by Sunnis — stands pockmarked and perforated.Homs was an early bellwether of what Syria would become. One of the first cities to rise up in rebellion, it was home to mass demonstrations. As protests turned to armed revolt, the city began to split, largely along sectarian lines, with much of the Sunni majority supporting the uprising and members of President Bashar al-Assad's Alawite sect joining pro-government militias. Now, after more than a year of siege, bombardment and clashes, which have intensified recently as the government has renewed its assault on rebel strongholds, Homs may well be the site of the most concentrated destruction in the country."For two years, the regime couldn't retake Homs," said a man who identified himself as Abu Nizar, 55, a resident of the Ensha'at district. "Now they want to retake it, but after changing its demographic and sectarian fabric."For many months, Homs has been a city divided. Several central areas have been gradually flattened as they have changed hands, with the army briefly retaking control, only to lose it again. Government-held areas continued to function, with shops and restaurants open, preserving a rhythm of daily life. But recently, the government sought to break what amounted to a stalemate. The army began raining rockets and shells onto rebel areas in and around the old city center as pro-government fighters vowed to retake control and open a route to the north.On a recent visit, the city seethed with fear and antagonism. "This time we will clean Homs completely and will not leave any germs behind us," said a pro-government fighter who called himself Abu Haidar. "Homs should be cleaned forever from all traitors."Mr. Haidar, a large, muscular man with a shaved head and a tattoo of an Alawite symbol, the sword of Imam Ali, said he led a unit of the National Defense Forces, one militia that the government has brought under a formal structure in recent months.He said he had clear orders and strong support from the leadership of the army's toughest unit, the Fourth Division, headed by Mr. Assad's brother, Maher, to rid Homs of what he called terrorists and Wahhabis, followers of a rigid Sunni ideology that the government broadly ascribes to rebels.He described a tough fight. Rebels, he said, are using churches and mosques, including the revered Waleed mosque, as bases, "so we have the right to attack them inside."In the narrow streets of the old town, he said, tanks cannot penetrate, and soldiers must go house to house. Rebels have dug tunnels and cut through walls, he said, popping out to shoot soldiers in the back."We will retake Homs," he said, "whatever the cost and whatever weapons we use."A persistent rumor among rebels — an indication of the sectarian fears pervading the city — is that government forces plan to spirit away the warrior's remains from the tomb inside the mosque. Lying in an underground makeshift hospital near the intensely contested neighborhood of Khalidiya, a fighter, Bilal, who like most people gave only his first name for safety, said he cried when he saw the damage at the Waleed mosque."Homs has two nicknames, the city of al-Waleed and the city of jokes," he said, his face sallow as he recovered from a leg wound. "The killer Bashar al-Assad killed the smiles and the jokes from Homs, and now he wants to destroy the mosque."The rebels have no trouble finding fighters, he said, but they have so little ammunition that some fighters have left because they have nothing to shoot with.
LONDON — The British government says that it has banned Syria's al-Qaida-linked Nusra Front, a move which makes membership in the extremist rebel group a criminal offense.Britain's Home Office says the Nusra Front, also known as Jabhat al-Nusra, had been added to its list of outlawed organizations, a U.K.-wide roster of foreign and domestic terror groups.The government said Friday that it considered the Nusra Front and Jabhat al-Nusra nothing more than alternative names for al-Qaida, which has long been outlawed. The ban takes effect immediately.Many Western governments have expressed concern that the Syrian conflict is serving as an incubator for Islamist terror.Last week senior British lawmakers warned that jihadists in Syria "currently represent the most worrying emerging terrorist threat to the U.K. and the West."
BEIRUT — Forces loyal to Syrian President Bashar al-Assad killed at least 13 members of a family in the Sunni Muslim village of Baida on Sunday, in what activists said was the second massacre there.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said four women and six children were among those killed in the village, which is in a coastal area of central Syria."A relative came to look for them today and found the men shot outside. The women and children's bodies were inside a room of the house and residents in the area said some of the bodies were burned," said Rami Abdelrahman, head of the Observatory.In May, pro-Assad militias killed more than 50 residents of Baida and over 60 locals in the nearby town of Banias. In those killings, some bodies, many of them children, were found burned and mutilated.Baida is part of a small pocket of Sunni Muslims in the Mediterranean province of Tartous, a stronghold for Assad's own minority Alawite sect.The two-year-old uprising against four decades of Assad family rule has been led by Syria's Sunni majority. Sectarian clashes and alleged massacres have become increasingly common in a conflict that has killed more than 100,000 people.The killings in Baida came a day after a rare eruption of clashes was reported in the area between Assad's forces and the rebels in the coastal enclave.The British-based Observatory, which has a network of activists across Syria, said all the victims had been executed.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Rafiq Lotof strode through the Syrian capital's Old City , past his father's shoe shop, past cubbyhole bars and antique shops, through streets that in normal times would buzz late into the evening with tourists and wealthy Damascus families. But on this recent night, the shops were shuttered, and Mr. Lotof's errand was a wartime one.At the entrance to a Shiite Muslim quarter, Mr. Lotof inspected a new checkpoint guarded by a baby-faced 18-year-old clutching a rifle nearly his height. Fresh from training in Iran, the teenager belonged to one of the growing neighborhood militias that Mr. Lotof is arming and organizing on behalf of the Syrian government — part of a nationwide effort to enlist more citizens in the fight against the rebels challenging President Bashar al-Assad.After volunteering to defend a Shiite shrine south of Damascus, the young man, Hussein Beydoun, said he was flown with 500 other Syrian Shiites to Iran, where Revolutionary Guards trained them to use rifles, rocket-propelled grenades and mortars. Proudly looking on, his mentor, Mr. Lotof, said the heavier weapons might come into play if rebels ever tried to breach the Old City's walls."If they come," Mr. Lotof said, "they might do anything."Mr. Lotof, a son of the Old City, has returned after years in America for what he sees as a mission to defend its ancient streets, relatively unscathed by two years of war. This area of Damascus, inhabited since at least the third millennium B.C., is for many Syrians the heart of the country.Mr. Lotof and many other government supporters believe the new militias prevent attacks, kidnappings and infiltration by rebel sleeper cells.But some residents fear the militias are bringing the war inside the Old City's bubble of relative security, creating a military target where there was none, projecting a new threat to those who dissent and empowering gunmen who, some say, have harassed merchants and residents."Once you give a man a gun, you will never get it back," said an Old City merchant who supports the uprising and, like many people interviewed, declined to be identified for his safety.Across Syria, the militias have been one of the chief controversies of a war that has killed more than 100,000 people. Early in the uprising against Mr. Assad, pro-government gangs known as shabiha attacked demonstrators. As the protest movement became an armed conflict, pro-government militias expanded, fighting alongside security forces, and were accused of massacring civilians and of intimidating even government supporters.Over the past year, the government has sought to formalize the militias under a structure called the National Defense Forces. Mr. Lotof and several government officials said they were now being armed and registered under the direct control of Mr. Assad's presidential office. The goal, Mr. Lotof said, is to curb abuses and tap Syrians who are unwilling to serve in faraway provinces but who want to defend their own neighborhoods.Some militias sprang up spontaneously to defend neighborhoods, he said. "Some of them started to do bad things," he said. "So they are being organized."Mr. Lotof and others close to the government confirmed what the rebels and American officials have long said: Mr. Assad's allies Iran and the Lebanese militia Hezbollah are providing training and logistical support for the militias.For critics, the support of those Shiite entities has bolstered a view that the militias are sectarian, pitting members of the president's Alawite sect — an offshoot of Shiism — as well as members of Syria's much smaller Shiite minority against the mostly Sunni uprising.Mr. Lotof, however, said that groups from different sects had signed up to defend against rebels they view as sectarian extremists and criminals. Indeed, several Sunnis whom Mr. Lotof had helped release from jail said they had recanted pro-opposition views that had landed them there, formed a militia with Mr. Lotof's help, and were now armed and patrolling a Sunni enclave of the Old City.
BEIRUT — Syrian rebels seized the northern town of Khan al-Assal on Monday, activists said, one of the last towns in the western part of Aleppo province that was held by President Bashar al-Assad's forces.An army build-up around the province in order to retake Aleppo city has been dogged by rebel counter-attacks, although a string of government victories elsewhere in Syria has shifted the battlefield tide in Assad's favor after more than two years of bloodshed.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an anti-Assad monitoring group, said army officers surrendered the town on Monday morning after rebels surrounded a southern district.Video footage posted on the Internet by rebel groups showed army tanks withdrawing from the town. Another video showed a dead commander who rebels said led the government resistance in the town, which has been besieged for weeks.Aleppo is part of a crescent of regions in northern Syria that have become a stronghold for rebels fighting to end four decades of rule by the Assad family.Insurgents have been blockading government-held areas in Aleppo city, Syria's largest urban center and once its commercial hub. Aleppo has been mired in a bloody stalemate since rebels launched an offensive in the province last year.Assad's forces have responded to the rebel advance on Khan al-Assal with a string of air raids in the area.The Observatory says more than 100,000 people have been killed in Syria's insurgency, which grew out of street protests in the southern town of Deraa in March 2011. Millions of people have been displaced and ancient buildings and artefacts have been destroyed across the major Arab state.
BEIRUT — A car bomb killed at least 10 people and wounded around 62 on Thursday when it exploded on the edge of the Syrian capital Damascus, state media said.State news agency SANA said the bomb hit the al-Siyouf Square in Jaramanah. It blamed the Islamic State of Iraq and Sham, an al Qaeda-linked group fighting alongside rebels in the two-year-old civil war against President Bashar al-Assad.Bombs have previously hit Jaramanah, a religiously mixed area that houses supporters and opponents of Assad but which is under army control.After rebel gains around the country, the army has pushed back in recent weeks and reinforced the capital while rebels hold outlying areas. The insurgents use mortars and car bombs to hit areas still held by the government.The United Nations says nearly 100,000 people have been killed in the war, which started with peaceful protests against four decades of family rule but turned violent in the face of a security crackdown.
DAMASCUS, Syria — The number of dead in Syria's civil war has passed 100,000, the U.N. chief said Thursday, calling for urgent talks on ending 2½ years of violence even as President Bashar Assad's government blasted the United States as an unsuitable peace broker.In the latest example of the relentless carnage, a car bomb killed at least 10 people and wounded 66 in a pro-regime, residential area near the capital.All international attempts to broker a political solution to the Syrian civil war have failed. Despite a stalemate that has settled in for months, both sides still believe they can win the war and have placed impossible conditions for negotiations.The international community has been unable — and some say, unwilling — to intervene sufficiently to tip the balance in favor of either the Assad regime or the rebels."There is no military solution to Syria," U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry told reporters at the United Nations. "There is only a political solution, and that will require leadership in order to bring people to the table."He spoke ahead of talks with U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon, who said the death toll had risen from nearly 93,000 just over a month ago to more than 100,000. Syrian opposition groups had made that same estimate a month ago.The uprising against Assad's rule began in March 2011 and deteriorated into an insurgency with growing sectarian overtones.Ban called on the Syrian government and opposition to halt the violence, saying it is "imperative to have a peace conference in Geneva as soon as possible."The U.S. and Russia are working to convene a conference, along with the United Nations, to try to agree on a transitional government based on a plan adopted in Geneva a year ago.No official date has been set because the opposition refuses to attend any talks that are not about Assad's departure. Syrian government officials say participation in the conference should be without preconditions, but add that Assad's departure before his term expires in 2014 is not negotiable. Assad has also said he has the right to run for elections again.Kerry said he talked to Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov on Wednesday and that both countries remained committed to bringing the warring parties together to further peace efforts."We will try our hardest to make that happen as soon as is possible," Kerry said.He said after a meeting with the leader of Syria's Western-backed opposition group that the talks were "very, very constructive." He said the opposition agreed to work over the next few weeks to pinpoint the conditions under which a Geneva conference "can work."Ahmad Al-Jarba, the Syrian National Coalition's newly elected president, called the situation in Syria "desperate" and urged the United States to quickly supply promised weapons to prevent a military victory by Assad.The U.S. government opposed providing any lethal assistance to Syria's rebels until last month but is moving ahead now with sending weapons to vetted rebels after securing the approval of the House and Senate Intelligence committees.President Barack Obama and his national security team have yet to say publicly what weapons they'll provide and when they'll deliver them. There has also been concern in the West that U.S. weapons could end up in the hands of al-Qaida-linked groups.Al-Jarba said the coalition "fully understands" those concerns but "we need American direct support to save democracy in Syria and to lead the world to force Assad at last to stand down."The U.S. decision to start sending arms to the rebels has further dimmed peace prospects and the comments at the U.N. appeared at odds with what was happening inside Syria.The Syrian government criticized the U.S. actions, saying Washington is unsuitable to act as a broker at any peace negotiations."Washington's decision to send arms to terrorists in Syria confirms that the American administration is not objective in efforts to find a political solution and hold an international conference in Geneva," Syrian state TV said, citing an unidentified Foreign Ministry official. Assad's government routinely refers to opposition fighters as "terrorists.""The American intentions seek to continue the cycle of violence and terrorism in Syria in order to destabilize ... the region," the statement said.The Syrian government has gone on the offensive and has succeeded, with the help of Lebanese Hezbollah militants, in pushing back rebels near Damascus and in central Homs province.The White House acknowledged that momentum has shifted as Hezbollah and Iran have helped Assad's forces.The rebels are lashing out with stepped up mortar attacks on Damascus, the seat of Assad's power, and with car bombs that target regime strongholds and security installations.Thursday's car bomb exploded in Jaramana, a suburb just few kilometers (miles) southeast of Damascus that is overwhelmingly pro-regime.The state news agency SANA reported that the blast caused heavy damage to nearby buildings and destroyed many cars. TV footage showed mangled cars and heavily damaged residential buildings. No group immediately claimed responsibility for the bombing.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights initially put the death toll at 10 but later raised it to 17, saying several of the wounded had died.Also Thursday, the Syrian National Coalition cast doubt on a mission by U.N. experts to investigate the alleged use of chemical weapons in the civil war.Both sides accuse each other of using the banned weapons. Swedish chemical weapons expert Ake Sellstrom and U.N. disarmament chief Angela Kane met with Syrian officials Tuesday in Damascus to try to hammer out terms for a possible probe.The coalition said it was worried the experts would be swayed by Assad, whom they predicted would try to restrict their movements.Ban said the U.N. team discussed with Syrian officials "the modalities of investigation.""Since they're coming out of Syria now, we'll get the report soon," he said.In Lebanon, a senior Hezbollah official warned European countries that there will be "repercussions" to their decision this week to place the group's military wing on the bloc's list of terrorist organizations.Hezbollah's participation in the Syrian war alongside Assad's forces was among the reasons for the EU decision earlier this week.Ammar al-Moussawi, head of Hezbollah's foreign relations department, spoke after meeting with Angelina Eichhorst, the EU ambassador to Lebanon. He suggested after the talks that she was not given a warm reception."No one can condemn me with one hand, then extend the other to shake hands," he told reporters in Beirut after the meeting.Lederer reported from the United Nations. Associated Press writer Zeina Karam contributed to this report from Beirut.
BEIRUT — Syrian rebels say they have overrun army positions in the north and south of the country this week, including an offensive in which a rights monitoring group said 51 soldiers were executed.Insurgents have focused on taking isolated army outposts, mostly in rural areas while forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad have made gains in recent months around the capital Damascus and the central city of Homs.One video, posted on YouTube on Wednesday by a rebel group calling itself the Supporters of the Islamic Caliphate, shows around 30 bodies of young men piled up against a wall. Blood is splattered on the wall and one corpse is smouldering."Tens of Assad's (militia) killed," says a man off camera. He said the footage was filmed in the area of the northern town of Khan al-Assal which was taken by rebels last week.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an anti-Assad monitoring group, cited activists on Friday in Khan al-Assal who said that more than 150 soldiers were killed on Monday and Tuesday in and around the town.The Observatory said that figure included 51 soldiers and officers who were executed.Another video, posted by a rebel group in the village of Hara in the southern province of Deraa, shows several dead soldiers in a room, lying in a pool of blood with head injuries."These are Assad's dogs," says a voice off screen.The United Nations says more than 100,000 people have died in the Syrian uprising since March 2011, which turned into an armed insurgency after the authorities used force to suppress peaceful street protests. Ancient buildings and artefacts across the major Arab state have been destroyed in the fighting.Assad's forces have been on the offensive since last month when the army, backed by militants from the powerful Lebanese guerrilla group Hezbollah, recaptured a border town near Lebanon straddling supply lines between Damascus and Syria's seacoast.Both sides are accused by rights groups of abuses, including executing enemy combatant, and the war - pitting Sunni majority rebels against Assad's own Alawite sect and Shi'ite Hezbollah - has descended into sectarian hatred.State news agency SANA reported on Thursday that "army units have made considerable headway in the battle against the armed terrorist groups in al-Khalidiya neighbourhood in Homs city."It said the army had killed scores of "terrorists" in Homs, where whole districts have been razed by two years of conflict, with neither side ever fully taking over the city.Assad's forces also clashed with rebels on the outskirts of the capital on Friday. A resident of Damascus said warplanes were targeting the northern Barzeh district."People close to Barzeh say the sonic booms and subsequent bombardment blasts have been unrelenting all day," she said.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syrian government troops gained ground in clashes Friday in two rebel-held neighborhoods in the central city of Homs, edging closer to a historic mosque and closing in on opposition fighters in the area, state television and activists said.The advance came amid a wide offensive by President Bashar Assad's forces and as Syria's Western-backed opposition group met for the first time with the U.N. Security Council.With about 1 million residents, Homs lies along a main artery linking the capital, Damascus, with regime strongholds on the Mediterranean coast to the west. Homs has played a key role in the country's civil war, now in its third year, and the struggle for control of the city also has underscored the conflict's increasingly sectarian undertones.Activists, who consider Homs "the capital of the revolution," say the regime wants to capture the entire city to include it in a future Alawite state — stretching from Homs to the coast — where Assad could possibly make his last stand. Assad is a member of the Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shiite Islam, while most of the rebels fighting to topple his regime are Sunnis.In recent weeks, Assad's troops have captured several nearby rebel-held areas, including the towns of Qusair and Talkalkh near the border with Lebanon.State TV said Friday that troops advanced in Homs' northern neighborhoods of Khaldiyeh and Jouret el-Shayah.The report said the government forces were getting close to Khaldiyeh's 13th-century mosque of Khalid Ibn al-Walid, famous for its nine domes and two minarets. On Monday, government troops shelled the mosque, damaging the tomb of Ibn al-Walid, a revered figure in Islam.An activist in the city who only identified himself as Abu Bilal for fear of government reprisals said the troops were now about 50 meters (yards) from the mosque. "Resistance cannot stand up to tanks, warplanes and mortars," Abu Bilal said, speaking from the city via Skype.In New York, the Western-backed Syrian National Coalition told the U.N. Security Council it is ready to attend a peace conference if the Syrian government commits to having Assad hand over power to a transitional government.The United States, which supports the opposition, and Russia, which supports the Assad government, are trying to convene a new conference in Geneva to try to get both sides to implement a plan adopted in the Swiss city a year ago. It calls for the establishment of a transitional governing body vested with full executive powers.However, the demand that Assad relinquish power has halted the talks. Ahmed al-Jarba, president of the Syrian National Coalition, later said that if Assad doesn't hand over power, "the regime will never step down, and its violent repression will continue."As the rebel leaders met at the United Nations, violence continued. In the Damascus suburb of Jaramana, a bomb exploded Friday evening, causing casualties, both the state-run news agency SANA and the pro-government television station Al-Akhbariya said. Neither the agency nor the station reported specifics about the attack. The blast went off in the same square where a car bomb exploded Thursday, killing 10 people and wounding 66.Officials also said pro-government troops were advancing in battles with rebel forces in the now mostly empty Yarmouk Palestinian refugee camp. Clashes in the camp, which has mostly been under rebel control since last year, broke out earlier this week.Since the start of the unrest, Syria's half-million Palestinians have struggled to remain on the sidelines but many were eventually split between pro-and anti-Assad groups. In particular, young Palestinian refugees joined the rebels in the fight against Assad's regime.Thousands of the camp's residents have fled to escape the fighting and have gone to other areas in Syria or to neighboring Lebanon.Meanwhile, the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said nearly 150 soldiers were killed on Monday and Tuesday after rebels stormed and seized the village of Khan al-Assal on the southwestern edge of the northern city of Aleppo. He said 51 of them were shot dead after they were captured alive and surrendered to rebels.The report could not be independently confirmed. Syria's official media does not release casualty figures for security forces and regime soldiers.Also Friday, Polish Prime Minister Donald Tusk said that Polish journalist Marcin Suder, who was kidnapped in the rebel-held town of Saraqeb in Idlib province this week, likely was taken by a dangerous and radical group seeking ransom. Tusk told journalists that Suder's abduction "probably has the character of a robbery."Suder was reporting from Syria as a freelancer, Suder's Polish agency, Studio Melon, said Wednesday.Another photographer, Jonathan Alpeyrie, was released after being held for 81 days by a Syrian milita, the New York-based agency Polaris Images said in a statement Friday. Polaris said Alpeyrie, of New York, had been abducted in April while working in Syria's Yabrud region, about 80 kilometers (50 miles) north of DamascusMore than 100,000 people have been killed in the Syrian civil war, the U.N. now says, up from nearly 93,000 just more than a month ago.Associated Press writers Bassem Mroue in Beirut, Cassandra Vinograd in London, Edith M. Lederer at the United Nations and Monica Scislowska in Warsaw, Poland, contributed to this report.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syrian government forces captured a historic mosque in the central city of Homs on Saturday, expelling rebel forces who had been in control of the 13th century landmark for more than a year and dealing a symbolic blow to opposition forces.State-run news agency SANA quoted an unnamed military official as saying that troops took control of the Khalid Ibn al-Walid Mosque in the heavily disputed northern neighborhood of Khaldiyeh.Syrian TV aired a report Saturday night with footage from inside the mosque, showing heavy damage and the tomb's dome knocked out. The footage showed debris strewn on the floor and a portion of the mosque appeared to have been burned.The mosque, famous for its nine domes and two minarets, has been a symbol for rebels in the city that is known as "the capital of the revolution." On Monday, government troops shelled the mosque, damaging the tomb of Ibn al-Walid, a revered figure in Islam.After capturing the strategic town of Qusair near the Lebanon border last month, government troops launched an offensive on rebel-held areas in Homs, Syria's third largest city, late in June. They have been pushing into Khaldiyeh and other neighborhoods in the Old City that have been under opposition control since 2011.A Homs-based activist who identified himself only by his nickname, Abu Bilal, for fear of government reprisals, said troops entered the mosque area from the east. He said regime forces now control more than 60 percent of Khaldiyeh."There are very fast developments in Khaldiyeh," Abu Bilal told The Associated Press via Skype. He said he had no further details from local rebel commanders.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights reported heavy fighting around the mosque, saying the government troops are backed by members of Lebanon's Hezbollah group.A journalist embedded with Syrian troops told the AP that a reporter for Iran's Arabic-language Al-Alam television station was wounded near the mosque. A sniper's bullet struck the thigh of journalist Roa al-Ali, the journalist said, asking his name not be made public as he wasn't authorized to give information to other media outlets.On top of its symbolic value, Homs is also a geographic lynchpin in Syria. The main highway from Damascus to the north as well as the coastal region, which is a stronghold of President Bashar Assad's Alawite sect, runs through Homs. Both rebels and the regime place a high strategic value on the city.And although Assad's forces have been on the offensive in recent months, activists say the regime wants to capture the entirety of Homs to include it in a potential future Alawite state — stretching from Homs to the coast — where Assad could make his last stand if the civil war swings against him.Assad is a member of the Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shiite Islam, while most of the rebels fighting to topple his regime are Sunnis.Khaldiyeh had a population of about 80,000 but only some 2,000 remain there today as residents fled the violence. The heavy fighting over the past two years has destroyed wide areas and knocked down entire buildings.Earlier Saturday, Syria's state media said talks between the Syrian government and a United Nations delegation tasked with investigating chemical weapons allegations in the nation's civil war have "resulted in an agreement on ways of moving forward."Assad's government invited a U.N. team to visit Damascus earlier this month after requesting that the world body investigate an alleged chemical attack in Khan al-Assal, a village in the north. The Syrian regime and the rebels fighting to topple it accuse each other of using chemical agents in the March 19 incident, which killed 31 people.Assad's government refused to have a possible inquiry include other alleged chemical attack sites in Homs, Damascus and elsewhere.A joint statement by the foreign ministry and the U.N. that appeared Saturday on SANA's website said the meetings were "comprehensive and fruitful and resulted in an agreement on ways of moving forward."It did not elaborate. The U.N. team couldn't be reached for comment.Saturday's announcement on the possible U.N. probe agreement on Khan al-Assal coincided with government allegations that the rebels committed "a massacre" in the village, killing 123 "civilians and military personnel," according to a SANA report. SANA said others are still missing.The report said "terrorists" were behind the recent killings in Khan al-Assal, a term the government uses for rebels. The Observatory previously said at least 150 government soldiers were killed on Monday and Tuesday there, some after they had surrendered.A statement released by al-Qaida-linked Jabhat al-Nusra — or the Nusra Front — said 150 soldiers, pro-government gunmen and Shiite militiamen were killed in Khan al-Assal. The statement said fighters captured 63 soldiers alive but 55 of them fled. Nusra Front said its members killed 15 of them before 40 surrendered. The statement did not say if the 40 were still alive.The conflicting claims could not be independently reconciled.In Aleppo, a rocket fired by government forces into a rebel-held district killed at least 29 including 19 under the age of 18 and four women, the Observatory said Saturday. The attack happened Friday during government shelling in the Bab al-Nairab neighborhood of Aleppo.Syria's conflict began in March 2011 largely as peaceful protests against Assad's rule. It escalated into a civil war after opposition supporters took up arms to fight a brutal government crackdown on dissent.More than 100,000 people have been killed in the conflict, according to the U.N.'s recent estimate.Associated Press writer Barbara Surk in Beirut contributed to this report. Mroue reported from Beirut.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syrian government forces backed by Lebanese Hezbollah militants forged ahead with their assault on a key rebel district in the central city of Homs Sunday, activists said, as President Bashar Assad's forces try to crush resistance in the few remaining opposition-held neighborhoods in the city known as the "capital of the revolution."The push on Homs is part of a broader government offensive on rebel-held areas that has seen regime troops retake some of the territory they have lost to opposition fighters in Syria's more than 2-year-old conflict. Assad's forces turned their sights on Homs, the country's third-largest city, after capturing the strategic town of Qusair near the Lebanon border last month.Government troops have made headway in Homs in recent days, capturing a 13th century landmark mosque in the contested Khaldiyeh neighborhood that had been in rebel hands for more than a year. Homs holds immense symbolic and strategic importance to both sides, and the ferocity of the fighting for control of it has left much of the city in ruins.The opposition accused the regime of pulverizing Khaldiyeh and said their victory was "hollow."On Sunday, Syrian state TV had live coverage from Khaldiyeh, which is located on the northern edge of the Old City, broadcasting footage that showed gaping holes in apartment blocks, shattered buildings with collapsed floors and blackened facades. Soldiers and reporters walked through rubble-strewn streets. The military took TV crews working for pro-regime media outlets deep into the neighborhood, suggesting the army was confident it had secured the area.An unidentified Syrian army commander standing before a destroyed building in Khaldiyeh told an embedded state TV reporter that the military expected to "liberate" the last part of the district within the next two days.Syrian government forces captured the ancient Khalid Ibn al-Walid Mosque in Khaldiyeh on Saturday. Syrian TV aired a report with video from inside the mosque, showing heavy damage. The video showed debris littering the floor and a portion of the mosque appeared to have been burned.Famous for its nine domes and two minarets, the mosque has been a symbol for rebels in the city, and the government takeover dealt a powerful symbolic blow to the rebellion. On Monday, government troops shelled the mosque, damaging the tomb of Ibn al-Walid, a revered figure in Islam. Video showed the tomb's roof knocked down.The Observatory and other activists said government troops are backed by members of Lebanon's Hezbollah, which has been fighting alongside regime forces in their assault on rebel-held territory in the central region.Syria's main exiled opposition group, the Syrian National Coalition, acknowledged that rebels had retreated from parts of Khaldiyeh, calling it a "tactical withdrawal.""After the heavy bombardment of the Khaldiyeh area of Homs, using thousands of rockets, explosive barrels and large amounts of heavy weaponry ... Assad forces have managed to overtake a few yards of the land that they have pulverized," it said in a statement.It said Assad was attempting the lift the sagging morale of his soldiers by exaggerating its victory in Homs, and vowed that rebels would soon retake the area.In addition to its symbolic value, Homs is a geographic lynchpin in Syria. The main highway from Damascus to the north and the coast, a stronghold of President Bashar Assad's Alawite sect, runs through Homs.An official in the Homs governor's office said a car bomb exploded near a checkpoint on the Homs-Tartous highway, killing three people and wounding 5 others. He spoke on condition of anonymity because he was not authorized to give official statements.In northeastern Syria, the death toll from nearly two weeks of clashes between al-Qaida-linked fighters and Kurdish militiamen rose to 120, according to the Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights activist group. It said the dead include 79 fighters from the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant and Jabhat al-Nusra, both al-Qaida-affiliated rebel groups. The Observatory monitors the Syrian war through a network of activists on the ground.The latest round of fighting flared in Ras al-Ayn on July 6 in the predominantly Kurdish province of Hassakeh in the northeast near the Turkish border. Kurdish gunmen are fighting to expel the militants, whom they see as a threat.Also on Sunday, the Coalition condemned the reported execution of scores of government soldiers by rebels in a northern Syrian village several days ago, and said "those involved in such crimes will be held accountable."The group, made up of exiled opposition leaders, said in a statement that it was forming a commission of inquiry to investigate the incident in Khan al-Assal.Syrian activists say rebels killed 150 government soldiers, some after they surrendered, on Monday and Tuesday in the village outside Aleppo, the country's largest city.State media said that 123 "civilians and military personnel" were killed in a "massacre" and others were still missing.The Coalition said initial reports showed "armed groups" not affiliated with the main rebel coalition were involved. It did not elaborate, but the al-Qaida-linked Jabhat al-Nusra says its fighters participated in the battle.Syrian Information Minister Omran al-Zoubi said the crime "will not pass without punishment," vowing that the perpetrators will pay a "dear price."In an interview with Syrian TV late Saturday, he said the "massacre" aimed to spread fear and panic among people at a time when the Syrian military was achieving significant progress on the ground.In a separate statement, the Coalition urged Egypt to release dozens of Syrians it said were arrested last week allegedly for violating residency regulations.It said Egyptian police arrested at least 72 Syrian men and nine boys at checkpoints on main roads in Cairo. Some had valid visas or residence permits but were arrested "on the pretext of not having residence permits," it said.The Coalition said regulations concerning Syrians' entrance into Egypt were changed. Since July 8, Syrians have been required to obtain entry visas and security clearance before they are allowed to enter Egypt.It urged the Egyptian government not to deport Syrians, saying Cairo has an "ethical and humanitarian duty to protect the Syrian people fleeing the tyranny" at home.Karam reported from Beirut. Associated Press writer Jamal Halaby in Amman, Jordan, contributed to this report.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — A missile attack by government forces on the city of Aleppo in northern Syria killed at least 29 people, including 19 children, Syrian monitors said Saturday.According to the monitors at the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, the Friday night attack struck the Bab al-Neirab neighborhood in the city's southwest, home to the headquarters of a number of rebel brigades, including the Islamic State of Iraq and Syria, which is linked to Al Qaeda. It was unclear how many of the dead were civilians, but the Syrian Observatory, which monitors the conflict from Britain through a network of contacts in Syria and which sympathizes with the opposition, said four women were among the dead.The forces of President Bashar al-Assad have stepped up the use of such missiles, which often reduce city blocks to rubble, a strategy that analysts say suggests that the military lacks sufficient infantry to accomplish its goals.In central Syria, government forces struck a powerful, if symbolic, blow against rebel forces by seizing the historic Khalid bin al-Waleed mosque in the city of Homs, which rebel forces had held since last year.Homs, Syria's third-largest city, was one of the principal launching sites of the anti-Assad uprising that turned into a civil war. The government has been eroding the rebels' grip on parts of the city since it seized the town of Qusayr near the border with Lebanon last month, cutting a key rebel supply line into Homs Province.The state news service, Sana, quoted an unnamed military official as saying government forces had seized the mosque and the area nearby, killing a number of fighters and defusing explosives planted in the area. The Syrian Observatory confirmed the mosque's capture, saying fighters from Hezbollah and Syrian militias had fought alongside the military.Also on Saturday, Syrian state news media reported that talks between government officials and a delegation from the United Nations over allowing access for investigators to the sites of suspected chemical weapons attacks during the war had resulted in "an agreement on the ways to move forward." The report gave no further details.Reports of small-scale attacks involving chemical weapons have surfaced a number of times in the past year, and the war's continued escalation has raised fears that Mr. Assad's forces could deploy chemical weapons on a wide scale or that those weapons could fall into the hands of extremists.Syria has yet to let the full team of United Nations investigators enter the country, and the delegation's visit last week sought to negotiate access. The government has wanted to limit the places the investigators can visit.One site the investigators hoped to visit was Khan al-Assal, a town west of Aleppo where both the government and the rebels reported a deadly chemical weapons attack in March, with each side accusing the other.Visiting the site could prove difficult because rebel fighters took it over on Friday, reportedly killing about 150 soldiers. The Syrian Observatory said about one-third of them had been executed by an extremist rebel brigade after surrendering.The Syrian state news agency said on Saturday that 123 people had been killed "in cold blood" in Khan al-Assal, some of them soldiers but most of them civilians. It accused "armed terrorist groups" — the government's blanket term for the rebels — for the killing and said it showed that "the only way to save all Syrians is to get rid of them, wherever they are."Neither version of the events in the town could be verified.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syria's beleaguered opposition forces suffered another blow Monday when government troops captured a key district in the embattled city of Homs that has been a rebel stronghold since the beginning of the country's uprising.The capture of Khaldiyeh is a setback for the rebels in the strategic central heartland, bringing President Bashar Assad's regime closer to its goal of capturing all of Homs, Syria's third largest city — including neighborhoods in its Old City that the rebels have held for more than a year.The opposition acknowledged the loss of Khaldiyeh, though some activists said there were still scattered clashes in northern sectors of the district where rebels were still putting up a fight. A senior member of the Western-backed Syria National Coalition said the regime's gains in Homs are not irreversible."It will be difficult, but not impossible to gain back what we've lost in Homs," Hadi Bahra, a member of the Coalition's political committee, told The Associated Press from Saudi Arabia.Syrian TV aired live video from the neighborhood, showing troops roaming deserted streets and waving flags in front of shell-scarred buildings.State news agency SANA quoted an unnamed army commander saying the fall of Khaldiyeh would significantly boost army operations aimed at dislodging rebels from central areas of Homs. Khaldiyeh is important because it links other rebel-held districts in the heart of the city through a network of tunnels the rebel dug to ferry weapons and other supplies, the commander said.The U.S. State Department played down the significance Monday."While it is true that regime forces backed by Hezbollah and Iran may have made some gains on the ground and taken control of some areas within Homs and the surrounding area, it remains to be seen whether it can hold them," State Department spokeswoman Jen Psaki told reporters.A month ago, the government launched a sweeping offensive to retake rebel-held areas of Homs. Its capture would be the second major setback to rebels in central Syria in as many months.In early June, regime forces captured the strategic town of Qusair in Homs province near the border with Lebanon. Troops have also captured Talkalakh, another border town in the province.The province of Homs is Syria's largest, running from the Lebanese frontier in the west all the way to the border with Iraq and Jordan in the east. The city of Homs serves as a crossroads between the main highway from Damascus and the road to the coastal region, a stronghold of Assad's Alawite sect.Khaldiyeh had a population of about 80,000, but only some 2,000 have remained there as residents have fled the violence, activists say. The heavy fighting over the past two years has caused extensive damage, with some buildings reduced to rubble.In a report on Monday, Syrian state TV said "the Syrian army has restored security and stability in the whole neighborhood of Khaldiyeh in Homs."A Syrian TV reporter embedded with troops in the area gave a live report standing in front of damaged buildings. He interviewed an army officer who said the troops fought a tough battle against rebels who mined buildings and fought from tunnels."As of this morning, our armed forces in cooperation with the (pro-government paramilitary) National Defense Forces have taken control of Khaldiyeh and are now cleansing the neighborhood," said the officer, surrounded by about a dozen soldiers and plainclothes security agents."The fate of terrorists will be under our feet," he said.The Observatory has said that government troops are backed by Lebanese Hezbollah militants.Hezbollah, which did not acknowledge whether its members are fighting in Khaldiyeh, played a major role in a battle last month in Qusair and lost scores of men there.Observatory director Rami Abdul-Rahman said regime forces have captured most of the neighborhood apart from some fighting on its southern areas.In the northern city of Aleppo, several rebel factions including the al-Qaida-linked Jabhat al-Nusra, or Nusra Front, attacked army posts in two neighborhoods in a an offensive titled "amputating infidels," the Observatory said.It said rebels captured the neighborhood of Dahret Abed Rabbo and several buildings in Lairamoun there, and that eight government soldiers were killed.Rebels have been on the offensive in Aleppo province and last week captured the strategic town of Khan el-Assal. Activists and state media said score of troops were killed there after their capture. The Western-backed Syrian National Council condemned the killings.In the southern region of Quneitra, on the edge of the Israeli-occupied Golan Heights, government troops captured the town of Mashara on Sunday night after intense fighting, the Observatory said.Mroue reported from Beirut. Associated Press writers Barbara Surk in Beirut and Deb Riechmann in Washington contributed to this report.
DAMASCUS, Syria — The Street Called Straight, long bereft of its bustle, was finally crowded again. Wall to wall, people shuffled forward in a slow procession. Shopkeepers had closed their wooden shutters, packing away the inlaid furniture and brocade shawls that no one had been buying anyway, to clear the sidewalks for a funeral parade.Trumpets and drums beat out the soaring refrain of Beethoven's Ninth Symphony. The white coffin, heaped with daisies, spun like a helicopter rotor above the crowd as the pallbearers danced past a mosque to a neighboring church, both centuries-old structures striped with light and dark stone.Women ululated and threw rice. The dead man, a Christian, was to have been married, but he and his Muslim driver were kidnapped and killed south of Damascus, two more victims of Syria's civil war, and the funeral was the closest thing he would have to a wedding."Syria! Syria!" the crowd called, hailing the young man, Fadi Francis, as "a martyr of the neighborhood."Straight Street, the most storied thoroughfare in Syria, huddles these days in a wary calm, marred now and then by mortar attacks, and every day by anxiety.The street has been known since at least the early years of Christianity for its ramrod course through the twisting alleys of the old city of Damascus. It contains along its cobblestoned stretch much of what many citizens see as the best of their country: ancient history, diversity, entrepreneurial spirit. But now, residents fear its very existence is in danger — though they disagree on who presents the greatest threat — the rebels, the government, or, as many see it, both."I'm tired of watching people wearing black," Leena Siriani said, looking down at Straight Street from her balcony. "Deep down, there is no longer anything that makes us feel happy."Many shops close early nowadays, and the foreign tourists are long gone. Shelling can be heard in the distance, and new militiamen guard the street. No more does President Bashar al-Assad stroll past on his way to dine with Damascus power brokers by the marble fountain at the restaurant Naranj.The Bible says that after the apostle Paul was struck blind on the road to Damascus, God directed him to "the Street Called Straight" to find a man who would baptize him, on a spot now marked by the nearby Hanania church.Along the street, remnants of a Roman colonnade, plastered in places with worn posters of Mr. Assad, testify to millenniums of habitation. Geometric stonework dates to the medieval Ummayad era, when Damascus was the seat of the caliphate ruling the Muslim world. For centuries, people of many faiths and ethnicities have rubbed shoulders daily here, if not always in complete harmony, then in common worship of urban life and commerce.Today, high-end antique shops alternate with cubbyhole workshops where carpenters and metalworkers make and sell their wares, much as they did centuries ago. Ottoman mansions and tiny swaybacked dwellings still shelter, respectively, the wealthy and the poor.Scarves and carpets spill onto the street, from the third-century arched gateway at Bab Sharqi to the Medhat Pasha Souq, where market stalls under an arched tin roof display spices, lingerie and toys. At night, from the window of Abu George's tiny and venerable bar, dim light still glows through colored liquor bottles, a kind of stained-glass beacon of religious diversity and neighborhood fellowship."If Muslims didn't drink," Abu George, a Christian, likes to say, "alcohol would be a lot cheaper."Abu Tony sat on the curb one recent morning in front of his antique shop, drinking coffee. There were no customers, but he and his merchant neighbors had opened up anyway, to pass the time. He surveyed the row of shops, which to him symbolized the spirit of the street. "I'm Christian," he said. "Next door, he is Sunni; the next one is a Shiite" — who, he said, rents his store from the Jewish owner, who left for America but stays in touch.To Abu Tony, the rebels were extremists, alien to Syria."It's the land of civilization," he said. "Christianity went out to the world from this street."
BEIRUT — Lebanon's defense minister has extended the term of the army commander, the latest sign of growing political turmoil and paralysis in a country consumed by the war in neighboring Syria.Defense minister Fayez Ghosn signed a decree Wednesday that would keep the country's army chief, Gen. Jean Kahwaji, in the post for two more years after politicians failed to agree on whether the parliament should meet to extend his mandate.The prime minister is expected to sign the decree later Wednesday to make the extension official.In May, the parliament extended its mandate by a year and a half by skipping scheduled elections largely because of the instability in the country.Politicians also have been unable to form a new government since outgoing premier Najib Mikati resigned in March.
ANKARA — The Turkish government must take concrete steps by September to advance a peace process with Kurdish militants or risk a return to hostilities, the co-head of the rebels' political wing was quoted as saying on Wednesday.The Kurdistan Workers Party (PKK) and the government opened peace talks last October with the goal of ending a conflict which has killed 40,000 people in three decades and stunted the development of Turkey's mainly Kurdish southeast.But the process has faltered in recent weeks, with Ankara complaining a withdrawal by PKK fighters into northern Iraq is happening too slowly. Its fragility has been highlighted by isolated militant attacks on military outposts."From now on, steps must be taken. September 1 is the deadline," Cemil Bayik, who was promoted earlier this month to become deputy to jailed PKK leader Abdullah Ocalan, told Firat News, a website with links to the militants."If there are no steps being taken by September 1, then it will be understood that the aim is not peace ... In that case, the freedom movement and Kurdish people will defend itself."The delicate process has taken on an additional urgency for Turkey as Kurdish militias fighting in neighboring Syria's civil war push for greater autonomy for parts of northern Syria, just over the border.Ankara is concerned that a violent struggle for greater Kurdish independence there could embolden the PKK on Turkish soil and jeopardize the peace process.Kurdish leaders have called on Prime Minister Tayyip Erdogan's government to launch reforms set out under peace talks with Ocalan, but Ankara has said the Kurds need to keep their side of the bargain by speeding up the withdrawal of their fighters to northern Iraq.The reforms include steps to boost the rights of the Kurdish minority, including abolishing an anti-terrorism law under which thousands have been imprisoned for links to the PKK. They would also grant full Kurdish-language education rights and lower the threshold of votes which parties need to enter parliament.The PKK issued what it said was a "final warning" to the government two weeks ago to take concrete steps or be responsible for the peace process grinding to a halt.
WASHINGTON — The United Nations' food agency said Tuesday that it might not be able to meet its goal of aiding three million Syrians in July.The agency, the World Food Program, had reached only 2.4 million people as fighting intensified in areas near Damascus and Homs, Elisabeth Byrs, the agency's senior public information officer, said Tuesday in an interview."Dispatches of food are slower because of the situation right now," Ms. Byrs said.Steve Taravella, a senior spokesman for the food agency in Washington, said that it had 700 trucks in the country, but that convoys had been unable to reach many distribution points in the past several weeks.Eight trucks carrying more than 300 metric tons of flour were attacked in June — it was unclear by whom — in Deir al-Zour, in northeast Syria, and only four were able to distribute food. The flour was intended to go to 13,600 families, Mr. Taravella said, but the agency could distribute aid to only about 6,700 of them. On May 29, another armed group in the village of Tal Menes seized a truck carrying flour that was headed to Aleppo.In June, the World Food Program provided about 2.5 million people with food inside Syria, aiding the greatest number of people in Aleppo. The group operates seven food warehouses and dozens of distribution points in Syria.A typical food basket from the agency contains rice, bulgur, wheat, sugar, pasta, vegetable oil and lentils, according to the group's Web site. The World Food Program also provides families with a monthly ration of 11 pounds of bread per person."We won't know for a few weeks whether we will reach our goal," Mr. Taravella said. "But we announced the findings because we want the humanitarian community to understand the scope of the need."Ms. Byrs said she was particularly worried about the people in Homs, where fighting has increased in the past several days. As of Monday, the agency had reached about 300,000 people there this month, but Ms. Byrs said she believed that more than 2,500 people were trapped in the Old City without access to any aid."The monthly distribution to Homs is still ongoing; 92 percent of the allocation has been dispatched, but the besieged areas of the Old City are out of reach for us," she said. "We cannot reach them because of the military operation."International aid groups have had difficulty delivering supplies since the Syrian war began more than two years ago. At the start of the fighting, the Syrian Arab Red Crescent was the only organization delivering aid and providing medical care to civilians. President Bashar al-Assad blocked all other groups from establishing operations.Since then, organizations like the World Food Program and the United Nations Refugee Agency have found ways to deliver aid in rebel-held regions, but they still have difficulty reaching areas controlled by Mr. Assad's government. And when aid does arrive there, it does not always go to those most in need."There are thousands of examples of this, where civilians are in need of care but have no access to it because the regime continues to take advantage of directing it only to supporters," said Alexander Page, a Syrian activist living abroad.Médecins Sans Frontières, also known as Doctors Without Borders, runs five hospitals in northern Syria in areas controlled by the rebels but has not received official authorization to work in the country. It said last month that a measles epidemic was sweeping through northern Syria and that its medical teams had vaccinated more than 75,000 children in Aleppo, Raqqah and Idlib Provinces. But the fighting has hampered the vaccination campaign, the group said in a statement. People have avoided standing in line for the vaccinations for fear they might attract airstrikes or rocket attacks, it said.Ms. Byrs said it costs the World Food Program $29.3 million to $30 million each week to finance aid operations. The organization is seeking $763 million in contributions through the end of the year to help up to seven million Syrians, including four million people in Syria and almost three million refugees in neighboring countries.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Rebels sent a wave of rockets slamming into regime strongholds in the central city of Homs on Thursday, triggering a succession of massive explosions in a weapons depot that killed at least 40 people and wounded dozens, an opposition group and residents said.The attack — one of the most potent against pro-government districts in the area — overshadowed a rare trip by President Bashar Assad to a former opposition bastion outside the capital, Damascus, during which he defiantly vowed in front of troops to defeat the rebels fighting to topple him.The huge explosion in the Homs district of Wadi Dahab delivered a jolt to Assad's regime, which for weeks has been boasting of achievements against the rebels in the strategic Homs region and the suburbs of Damascus."The achievements on the ground speak for themselves," Assad told soldiers in Daraya, a few kilometers (miles) south of the capital. "Without you we would all be slaves to the countries that want to subjugate us. But the Syrian people will never be slaves. Not in the past, present or future," he said.The attack in Homs targeted the neighborhoods of Zahra, Akrama and Wadi Dahab, which are all populated mostly by Alawites, the same sect as Assad.It showed that rebels fighting to oust Assad are still able to strike back despite significant advances by the military that have bolstered the confidence of the regime.The blasts sent a massive ball of fire and a black mushroom cloud into the sky and caused widespread damage and panic among residents, many of whom are supporters of Assad. Firefighters struggled for two hours to put out the flames."The first explosion knocked people off their feet," said one Homs resident, adding that successive smaller explosions lasted for over an hour. He declined to be named, fearing retaliation.He said the blasts were so strong they cracked the walls of some buildings and blew doors and window frames off their hinges. The slum area of Wadi Dahab houses mostly one- or two-story buildings.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which closely monitors the fighting via a network of activists on the ground, said at least 40 people were killed and 120 were wounded — some critically — when rockets struck the arms depot in the southern part of Wadi Dahab and ignited the fire.Activists in the city corroborated that account, saying at least 40 were killed and many others wounded. They said the regime is known to keep arms depots in those areas.An official at the governor's office in Homs said six people were killed and 145 wounded when about 10 rockets slammed into the neighborhood of Zahra and the nearby sports stadium. He said one rocket struck a civil defense center, referring to the Wadi Dahab area, although he did not directly address the weapons depot.He spoke on condition of anonymity because he wasn't authorized to release the information.Government officials often give conflicting figures than those provided by the opposition. There was no immediately explanation for the discrepancy, and state-run media did not report the incident.The attack was claimed on Facebook by the al-Haq brigade, one of a myriad of groups fighting in Homs that are loosely affiliated with the main rebel umbrella group, the Free Syrian Army. Homs-based activist Abu Bilal also said al-Haq brigade targeted the weapons depot with Grad rockets.Assad's visit to Daraya was his first known public trip outside the capital, his seat of power, in more than a year. On the previous trip he visited the battered Baba Amr district in Homs after troops seized it from rebels in March 2012.On Thursday, Syrian TV showed him walking among soldiers in the battered suburb, chatting and shaking hands with soldiers atop tanks who pumped their fists in the air and flashed the victory sign."I deliver to you today a message of thanks from every Syrian," he told the troops.The visit is the latest sign of confidence from Assad, whose troops have been on the offensive and scored significant gains in recent months.More than 100,000 people have been killed since the uprising against the Assad family's four-decade rule began in March 2011. The revolt later escalated into a civil war, which has uprooted millions of people from their homes.Daraya was held by rebels for months. It took the army weeks of heavy fighting to regain control of the area earlier this year.Before his trip to Daraya, Assad lauded his troops' accomplishments in the battle against opposition forces."You have stunned the entire world with your steadfastness and ability to overcome the difficulties and score achievements in the face of the fiercest barbaric war the modern history has ever witnessed," he said in comments released for Army Day and carried by the state news agency SANA. "Had we in Syria not been confident of victory, we wouldn't have been able to resist" for more than two years.In August 2012, activists reported that regime forces went on a dayslong killing spree after they seized Daraya from rebels.Reports of the death toll ranged from more than 300 people to as many as 600. It was impossible at the time to independently verify the numbers because of severe restrictions on media coverage of the conflict.The suburb switched hands between rebel forces and troops several times after August until regime forces recaptured it earlier this year.Assad's comments Thursday followed several major gains against the rebels, mostly in Homs province and near Damascus.The rebels suffered two major setbacks during a wideranging government offensive in central Syria. In June, Assad's army recaptured the strategic town of Qusair near the Lebanese border. Earlier this week, government troops took control of a district in the city of Homs that had long been an opposition stronghold.Also Thursday, five major aid agencies warned that the Syrian refugee crisis is stretching aid efforts to their limits.The agencies — including CARE International, Oxfam, Danish Refugee Council, Handicap International and World Vision — said they are increasingly concerned that the international response is failing to match the scale of the crisis.Their joint statement said more than 1.4 million Syrians — or 80 percent of all Syrian refugees — are now living in tents, temporary settlements, or over-crowded and expensive rented accommodations.
BEIRUT — At least two rockets slammed Thursday night into an area south of the Lebanese capital that houses the Defense Ministry and presidential palace, Lebanon's state-run news agency said.There were no casualties from the rockets which fell in Beirut's Fayadiyyeh area.It was not immediately clear who fired the rockets or from where. Eyewitnesses said one fell only a few meters from an entrance to the presidential palace.The blasts were the latest in a series of rocket attacks that have targeted areas just south of the capital in the past two months — a direct fallout from the civil war in neighboring Syria.Lebanon is deeply divided along sectarian lines and between supporters and opponents of Syrian President Bashar Assad.The attack comes on the same day that President Michel Suleiman gave a speech for Army Day in which he criticized the involvement of the militant Lebanese Hezbollah group in the Syrian civil war in support of Assad's forces.Suleiman called for Hezbollah's weapons to be folded under that of the Lebanese army's. The group has a formidable weapons arsenal that rivals that of the national army.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — President Bashar al-Assad of Syria lauded his troops and vowed that they would be victorious during a visit to a heavily damaged Damascus suburb on Thursday, while antigovernment activists said a rebel attack detonated a weapons depot in the city of Homs, killings dozens of people.Mr. Assad's visit to the city of Daraya, once an insurgent stronghold that his forces have largely retaken, was intended to honor the nation's soldiers and highlight the armed forces' progress against the rebels seeking to oust him.In video broadcast on Syrian state television, Mr. Assad walked among camouflaged soldiers and shook their hands as they pumped their fists and chanted. He told them their victories over the rebels would have historic value."I think that in the future, different armies are going to study this experience, and military studies centers have started analyzing this case in order to benefit from it," Mr. Assad said.He also took a jab at the rebels, who have repeatedly declared that "zero hour" in the final battle for Damascus was fast approaching but have never been able to threaten the heart of the capital. Mr. Assad told the soldiers that there had been 14 "zero hours" announced this year, "but at each zero hour, you turn them into zeros — them, their plans and those backing them."Momentum in the conflict has shifted in favor of Mr. Assad recently, as his forces have taken back rebel-controlled neighborhoods near Damascus and in the central city of Homs. More than 100,000 people have been killed since the conflict started with political protests in March 2011, and all international efforts to slow the violence have failed.Despite their setbacks, the rebels can still harm the government. A rocket attack in Homs detonated a government armory on Thursday, causing an explosion that shook the city and sent a fireball into the sky.Activists said the blast occurred after rebels had fired rockets at southern neighborhoods that are heavily populated with Alawites, the religious sect to which Mr. Assad belongs. Alawites play a leading role in his security forces.A Homs activist reached via Skype who gave his name as Abu Bilal said that civilians lived in the area before the war but that it had since become like a base for Mr. Assad's forces to launch attacks on the rebels.He said the blast was like "a volcano."Another activist, Samer Abu Adnan, said smaller explosions followed the big blast for about three hours."The rebels managed to target the hubs of the thugs and their armories," he said. "It was like a mountain of shells and weapons for the regime."Video posted online showed gray smoke rising from the area before a red ball of flame burst into the sky, followed by a smaller explosion.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which is based in Britain and monitors the conflict through contacts inside Syria, said the blast killed at least 40 people and wounded more than 100.
BEIRUT — Lebanon's state-run news agency says a Syrian warplane struck targets near the border with Lebanon, killing at least nine people and wounding nine others.A Lebanese security official in Lebanon's eastern Bekaa region confirmed Saturday's airstrike and said it targeted the rebel-held Syrian town of Yabroud just across the border from the Lebanese town of Arsal.The area is known to house many refugees from the Syrian town of Qusair, which was captured by Syrian forces in June following battles that destroyed much of the town.The official said those killed included six members of the same family. He spoke on customary condition of anonymity in line with regulations.
BEIRUT — Syrian rebels captured an ammunition depot north of Damascus from President Bashar al-Assad's forces on Saturday, activists said, seizing a hoard of anti-tank missiles and rockets which will strengthen their firepower after a string of defeats.Video footage of the raid showed delighted rebel fighters carrying out boxes of weapons from the arms cache in Denha, near the town of Yabroud, following an overnight attack.Still largely outgunned by Assad's forces, who have gained ground around the capital Damascus and Syria's third largest city Homs, the rebels have sought arms to tip the balance of power in the two-year conflict that has killed at least 100,000.Saudi Arabia and Qatar have sent weapons, although Western nations have not, and the rebels have also acquired a steady supply of weaponry, including anti-tank and anti-aircraft missiles, through their own raids on military bases.One video released last week showed rebel fighters firing what appeared to be a vehicle-borne anti-aircraft missile system captured from the army several months ago.Saturday's raid yielded French-made Milan anti-tank missiles, Russian Konkurs missiles and Grad rockets, according to video footage which showed the victorious rebels carrying off their haul through the dark corridors of the captured complex."Our return to Qusair just got closer," shouted one fighter, referring to the former rebel stronghold and border town which was captured two months ago by Lebanese Hezbollah guerrillas allied to Assad.Following their victory in Qusair, south west of Homs, Assad's forces took control of several nearby towns and villages and on Monday they seized the Homs district of Khaldiya after weeks of urban warfare, tightening their siege on the few remaining rebel bastions in the strategic city."God willing, we will liberate Homs completely," the fighter in Saturday's video said.Homs lies on the main north-south highway which links most of Syria's main cities, and also forms a link between Assad's capital in Damascus and the heartland of his minority Alawite community in the mountains overlooking the Mediterranean.A aerial picture, taken by a government drone shot down by rebels, showed the devastation of the city which was once at the heart of the anti-Assad rebellion. Street after street appeared empty and ruined, lined by shattered and abandoned buildings.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said government forces bombarded al-Qusour, one of the remaining rebel-held neighborhoods on Saturday.In the northwestern Homs district of Al Waer, the United Nations children's agency UNICEF warned that 400,000 civilians, who had moved their to seek shelter from the violence in central Homs, were in danger.UNICEF director Anthony Lake said clashes and rocket strikes in Al Waer meant the situation there had worsened in recent days and appealed to both the army and rebels to allow aid to get in."We call on all parties to facilitate immediate safe access to these families so we can provide life-saving assistance, and to allow those families currently trapped in Al Waer who wish to leave to do so in safety and in dignity," he said.The conflict, that started with mainly peaceful protests against Assad's authoritarian rule, descended into a sectarian war which has drawn in regional powers. Nearly two million have fled the country and four million are internally displaced.In the same border region near Yabroud where the missile stocks were seized, Syrian jets killed at least six people in an air strike, Lebanese security sources said. Some of the wounded had been brought into Lebanon for treatment.Also on Saturday, Syria's main opposition coalition appealed for the release of a prominent Italian Jesuit priest Father Paolo Dall'Oglio, a strong supporter of the rebels who went missing in the eastern city of Raqqa on Monday.Activists said the priest, who had worked to reconcile Kurdish fighters battling Islamist brigades, been abducted by al Qaeda-linked fighters.The coalition said in a statement it "urges any party which might be involved in his detention to free him immediately".
BEIRUT — Syrian traders who price goods in foreign currency will face up to 10 years in jail, the government announced on Sunday in a move aimed at stemming the increasing dollarization of an economy crippled by two years of civil war.A decree issued by President Bashar al-Assad "forbids the use of anything other than the Syrian pound as payment for any type of commercial transaction or cash settlement".Traders who violate the law face up to three years in jail and a fine equivalent to double the value of the payment. If the sum involved is over $5,000, punishment could rise to 10 years with hard labor, according to the decree published by state media.Bankers said Sunday's move reinforced existing prohibitions on pricing goods in dollars - a law which has been increasingly flouted after sharp falls and wild fluctuation in the Syrian pound - and said the penalties had been stiffened."It's to prevent people from fleeing to the dollar," said one Damascus banker, adding the decree would not have an impact on banking operations."It does not in any way affect the banking sector - the country needs foreign currency transfers," he said. "The idea is that people don't all think in dollar terms as if there is no local currency. It's more a psychological move with the currency crumbling."Sharp falls and fluctuations in the Syrian pound have led to increasing use of the U.S. dollar in all walks of life, by food sellers and manufacturers, taxi drivers and importers.Before protests against Assad's rule erupted in March 2011 the pound stood at 47 to the dollar. After two years of war and economic collapse, it now changes hands for around 200, and briefly fell as low as 300 last month, exchange dealers say.Devastation to the commercial and industrial cities of Aleppo and Homs, together with the loss of foreign currency earnings as oil exports and tourism dried up, have hit the economy hard. Damage is estimated in the tens of billions of dollars and this year's wheat crop is expected to fall by half.The weakness and volatility of the local currency has pushed up inflation and left many shopkeepers struggling to price their goods in local currency."Having dollars, depositing them and using them as a currency of savings has never been outlawed but even before the crisis, dealing with dollars in domestic commercial transactions was banned," said a chief currency dealer in a Damascus bank."This is a law that imposes more penalties," he said. "Syrians can get transfers in dollars and importers can still price their goods in dollar but they cannot put dollar price tags on goods sold," he said.
BEIRUT — Syrian rebels on Monday captured four villages in the heartland of President Bashar Assad's minority Alawite sect as they fought government troops for the second straight day in the mountains overlooking the country's Mediterranean coast.Opposition fighters also said they captured about 400 villagers and pro-government gunmen in battles in the area.Alawites, an offshoot of Shiite Islam, dominate Assad's regime. The capture of the villages in the coastal Latakia province was a symbolic blow to Assad, whose forces have been taking territory in recent weeks in central Syria.Syria's conflict has taken on an increasingly sectarian tone in the last year, pitting predominantly Sunni Muslim rebels against members of Assad's Alawite minority.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said rebels captured the villages after attacking government outposts in the Jabal al-Akrad hills on Sunday. The group, which relies on reports from activists on the ground, said at least 32 government troops and militiamen and at least 19 rebels, including foreign fighters, died in Sunday's fighting.Much of Latakia has been under the firm control of Assad's forces since the beginning of the conflict more than two years ago, but some areas, including Jabal al-Akrad, are close to rebel-held areas and have seen fighting.It was a rare success for the rebels on the battlefield in recent weeks. Assad's forces have been on the offensive since taking the central town of Qusair in June, and last week captured a key district in the central city of Homs, an opposition stronghold.A rebel in Latakia, who identified himself as Mohammed Haffawi, told The Associated Press that the rebels were getting closer to the town of Haffa, which was captured by Assad's forces in June last year, and had killed dozens in the fighting.Haffawi said the rebels captured about 400 Alawite villagers and pro-government gunmen on Monday."They are in a safe place now and under the protection of the Free Syrian Army," he said, referring to key rebel group.A Syrian activist also said the rebels had captured about 400 Alawites. He spoke on condition of anonymity for fear of government reprisals.Meanwhile, Syria's state-run news agency SANA said government troops forced rebels out of three villages in Latakia that they had stormed earlier. It wasn't clear which villages the report was referring to but SANA said government troops had "killed dozens of terrorists, including Libyans and Tunisians."Syria main's opposition bloc, the Western-backed Syrian National Coalition, hailed the rebel advance and said that Assad's troops had used the villages to attack rebel-held civilian areas.The SNC also charged that regime forces used toxic gas in a chemical weapons attack in the Damascus suburb of Adra on Monday and urged the international community to investigate the attack. The opposition has claimed more than a dozen such attacks across Syria and the latest purported attack could not be independently confirmed.Last week, the United Nations said chemical weapons experts would depart "within days" for Syria to investigate three specific allegations of chemical weapons use. The U.N. gave a green light for the investigation following an "understanding" reached between the Syrian government and a delegation from the world organization that visited Damascus last month.At the site of one of the regime's victories in Homs, Syrian Defense Minister Gen. Fahd Jassem al-Freij toured the ravaged district of Khaldiyeh on Monday, praising troops for what he told state TV was a "military miracle."Standing in front of the historic Khalid bin al-Waleed mosque in Khaldiyeh, al-Freij vowed the army will "triumph against this universally-backed terrorism which is being exported to us."Also Monday, rebels pressed on with their battle for the Mannagh military air base near the border with Turkey that they have been trying to capture for about a year. Syrian army warplanes carried out air raids to help troops defending the air base, activists said.More than 100,000 people have been killed since Syria's conflict started in March 2011 as largely peaceful protests against Assad's rule. After opposition supporters took up arms to fight a brutal government crackdown on dissent, it turned into an armed uprising and later escalated into a civil war.The Assad government claims it is not facing a popular revolt, but a conspiracy by Gulf Arab states and the West seeking to destroy Syria by supplying Islamic extremists with weapons and funds.Also Monday, Human Rights Watch said ballistic missiles fired by the Syrian army into populated areas have killed hundreds of civilians in recent months.The U.S.-based group said it has investigated nine apparent missile attacks that killed at least 215 people, half of them children, between February and July. The most recent attack HRW investigated occurred in the northern province of Aleppo on July 26, killing at least 33 civilians including 17 children.HRW activists visited the sites of seven of the nine attacks and found no apparent military targets nearby, the group said. Ole Solvang, a senior researcher with HRW, said it's impossible to distinguish between civilians and fighters when firing missiles with wide-ranging destructive effects into densely populated areas.The HRW called on Assad to stop indiscriminate attacks. Government officials could not immediately be reached for comment.
BEIRUT — At least 18 people were killed on Tuesday by a car bomb in the southeastern district of Jaramana in the Syrian capital, state media said.State news agency SANA said women and children were among those killed. It said a bus was also burned out in the explosion and several shops were damaged in a crowded street.It was not immediately clear who was behind the attack.Last month a car bomb ripped through Jaramana, home to many of Syria's Druze minority as well as Christians who have fled violence elsewhere, killing at least 10 people.Damascus residents say Jaramana is controlled by forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad, who is fighting an armed revolt against his rule.
LONDON — Satellite images have laid bare the suffering inflicted on Syria's largest city, a London-based rights group said Wednesday, cataloguing hundreds of damaged or destroyed houses and more than 1,000 roadblocks.Amnesty International said it had worked with the American Association for the Advancement of Science to analyze pictures of Aleppo taken by aerospace imagery providers DigitalGlobe and Astrium for signs of destruction in the metropolis, which has been the scene of months of vicious fighting between forces loyal to Syrian President Bashar Assad and the rebels fighting to topple him."Satellite images really speak for themselves," said Donatella Rovera, a senior Amnesty adviser who recently returned from a trip to Aleppo. "You can see really clearly buildings — groups of buildings — that were there a year ago that are no longer there today, and we're matching those with research on the ground so we know exactly the areas that were struck, when, by what kind of weapons."The siege of Aleppo has its roots in the largely peaceful protests against Assad's rule which broke out in early 2011. The regime responded with brutal force, and the protests morphed into an armed uprising and a civil war. The rebels launched an ambitious attempt to capture Aleppo last year, but they have been unable to solidify their hold on the commercial hub, which has since become the object of a bloody tug of war.Many of the photographs released by Amnesty show a general view of the city, with red dots meant to indicate damage and destruction. The rights group said in a statement that the damage was "emblematic of the relentless bombardment."Rovera said analysis of high-resolution pictures showed more than a thousand roadblocks and hundreds of housing units affected by the damage. She said more precise estimates weren't possible, in part due to the difficulty of picking out fire or structural damage from space. But she said it was clear from the photographs that rebel-held areas were far worse affected than government-held neighborhoods."That has been a pattern not just in Aleppo but throughout Syria," she said. "Wherever a village or a part of town comes under control of opposition forces it then gets pounded mercilessly by government forces."The damage was obvious in close-up images which Amnesty said showed the aftermath of the Assad government's ballistic missile strikes. "Before" photographs from Aleppo neighborhoods of Ard al-Hamra, Tariq al-Bab, and Jabal Badro showed tightly-packed houses casting late afternoon shadows over streets and parkland. "After" photographs showed block-wide patches of destruction where the rights group said missiles had slammed into residential areas.From space, the bright white of the rubble against the dark outlines of the houses looked like small mounds of crushed chalk on an open newspaper. Up close, Amnesty said the devastation had been catastrophic.In Jabal Badro, a missile killed scores of people when it hit on the evening of Feb. 18, the rights group said. In Ard al-Hamra and Tariq al-Bab, it said twin missile strikes on Feb. 22 left at least 117 residents dead.Another set of images, from March and May of this year, showed what the rights group said was part of the widespread damage within the Old City of Aleppo, home to a massive medieval citadel, and various venerable religious schools, palaces, baths, and trading posts.The one taken in March showed the famous leaning minaret of Aleppo's Great Mosque casting a long shadow over an adjoining plaza.In the image from May the shadow was gone; the 11th-century architectural treasure had been obliterated.Raphael Satter can be reached at: http://raphae.li/twitter
BEIRUT — Syrian troops ambushed a large group of rebels Wednesday trudging through what once was a secret route through a desert road northeast of Damascus, killing more than 60 fighters in a barrage of machine gun fire and leaving their bodies in the sand.State television claimed those killed came from an al-Qaida-linked group that has joined the battle against President Bashar Assad, whose troops are trying to drive opposition forces from areas surrounding his seat of power in the capital.There were conflicting reports on the attack in Adra, which lies on a supply route between Damascus and rebel-held areas to the east that is often the scene of heavy clashes between the two sides. The dawn attack dealt another heavy blow to opposition troops following a string of recent regime successes.Syrian troops have been on the offensive in the past few months in an attempt to clear out Damascus suburbs held by opposition fighters.Syrian state-run media showed footage of bloodied corpses lying on the ground, some wearing camouflage gear with their weapons scattered around in the sand. One picture showed gas masks next to the weapons.The state-run SANA news agency said "dozens" of rebels were killed in the ambush as they were on their way to attack an army post near Damascus. SANA identified the dead as members of the al-Qaida-linked Jabhat al-Nusra, and said some were foreign fighters.Broadcaster Al-Ikhbariya also showed a Tunisian passport, Islamic headbands and automatic rifles apparently carried by the rebels.Some activists disputed the account, saying those killed were Syrian fighters from a mix of brigades delivering aid to besieged areas.Mohammed Saeed, an activist based near Damascus, told The Associated Press that 65 rebels were on their way from Damascus' eastern suburbs to Qalamoun nearby. Saeed said rebels walked the 30-kilometer (19-mile) route because it is dangerous to drive in the area as it is watched by Assad's forces."It seems that the regime discovered the secret road that the rebels were using," Saeed said via Skype. "The regime forces riddled them with heavy machine gun fire."He said 62 died and three escaped to Qalamoun.Another activist said the rebels were on their way to deliver medicine, flour and other foodstuffs to the Eastern Ghouta region, which has been besieged for months. He said the rebels were a "mix of fighters," including some from Nusra Front. He spoke on condition of anonymity out of fears of retribution.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said at least 62 rebels died in Wednesday's ambush. It did not report any government casualties.In the north, a missile struck the rebel-held city of Raqqa, killing three people and wounding dozens including children, the Local Coordination Committees activist group said. The Observatory said that two children were among the three killed.Amateur videos showed at least three children who suffered wounds and were rushed away in a pickup truck.A boy, with minor wounds to his mouth, knees and feet, screamed as he was held by a man in the pickup truck and shouted "Dad!" The man holding him tried to calm him down, saying: "Dad will come soon."The videos appeared genuine and corresponded to other AP reporting on the events depicted.Wednesday's missile attack came after Human Rights Watch said missiles fired by the Syrian army into populated areas have killed hundreds of civilians in recent months.Meanwhile, the Observatory said that Kurdish gunmen captured about 70 government troops Wednesday who fled the air base of Mannagh in the northern province of Aleppo. The base was captured by rebels Tuesday after months of fighting.The Observatory also reported fighting and shelling in the mountains of the coastal province of Latakia, an Assad stronghold. Rebels captured 11 Alawite villages in an offensive earlier this week and troops launched a counterattack to retake it.Syria's conflict has taken on an increasingly sectarian tone in the last year, pitting predominantly Sunni Muslim rebels against members of Assad's Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shiite Islam.Syria's crisis started as a largely peaceful uprising against Assad's rule in March 2011. It turned into a civil war after opposition supporters took up arms to fight a brutal government crackdown. More than 100,000 people have been killed in the violence.The scale of that destruction could be seen in satellite images released Wednesday by Amnesty International. The images showed hundreds of damaged or destroyed houses and more than 1,000 roadblocks around the northern city of Aleppo, which has seen months of vicious fighting."Satellite images really speak for themselves," said Donetella Rovera, a senior Amnesty adviser who recently returned from a trip to Aleppo. "You can see really clearly buildings — groups of buildings — that were there a year ago that are no longer there today."
BEIRUT — Sixty-two rebel fighters were killed in a Syrian army ambush at dawn on Wednesday near the town of Adra, east of Damascus, the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a monitoring group opposed to President Bashar al-Assad, said.The state news agency SANA did not give a death toll for the ambush but said the rebels were from the al Qaeda-linked al-Nusra Front. It said all the rebels were killed and machineguns and rocket-propelled grenades confiscated.SANA said the "terrorists" included non-Syrians and the Observatory said that eight rebels were still unaccounted for after the attack, which happened west of an industrial area east of Adra.Assad's forces have been on the offensive around Damascus after rebels pushed into towns and suburbs on the outskirts of the capital last year. Adra is in the Eastern Ghouta region, which has been besieged by the army for months.More than 100,000 people have died in Syria's civil war and millions have been displaced. Protesters took to the streets in March 2011 to call for democratic reforms but were fired on by security forces, leading to an armed uprising.The army has made efforts to secure the capital and its links to the western coast while the rebels have overrun much of the north and east.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — The Syrian Army attacked a large group of insurgents near the capital, Damascus, on Wednesday, killing more than 60, according to monitors and state media.SANA, the state news agency, also reported that 18 civilians, including children, died when a car bomb exploded at an intersection in Jaramana on the eastern approaches to Damascus. And in the north, a missile attack in the rebel-held city of Raqqa killed three and wounded dozens, The Associated Press reported.The rebels killed near Damascus belonged to the Nusra Front, and some were foreigners, SANA said. It published a series of photographs showing bloodstained bodies in olive drab uniforms lying on what seemed to be open sandy, desert ground. The Nusra Front is an extremist group that the United States has designated a terrorist organization.In recent months, government forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad have been seeking to clear areas around Damascus of rebels threatening the capital, the center of Mr. Assad's power.State media said the rebels had been trying to attack a government position. But a rebel fighter, who identified himself only as Nouriddine, disputed that, saying the rebels were carrying food "but not weapons" to people besieged by government forces.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which monitors the conflict from Britain through a network of contacts in Syria, said that 62 rebels had been killed and that 8 more were missing.Opposition fighters said that the attack took place between the Adra industrial area on the northeastern fringe of Damascus and surrounding rural areas, and that only three insurgents survived.Mohammed Saeed, an activist based near Damascus, told The A.P. that 65 rebels were walking along what they thought was a secure, hidden road."The regime forces riddled them with heavy machine-gun fire," Mr. Saeed said, speaking via Skype, The A.P. reported. "It seems that the regime discovered the secret road that the rebels were using."Syria's civil war grew from peaceful, antigovernment protests in March 2011. A ferocious government crackdown led to a confrontation that has killed an estimated 100,000 people.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — The commander of the Free Syrian Army, whose forces claim to be leading the insurgency but have been overshadowed by the gains of their tactical jihadist allies, has visited the coastal province that is home to President Bashar al-Assad, according to a video circulated by activists on Monday.Antigovernment fighters who are not part of the Free Syrian Army, many of them from extremist brigades that are linked to Al Qaeda, have recently seized a number of villages in the mountains on the eastern side of Mr. Assad's home province, Latakia.The visit by the Free Syrian Army commander, Gen. Salim Idris, appeared intended to show that he and his fighters were also involved in the Latakia seizures as part of a new front in the civil war.In the video, General Idris said that he was visiting the area to see the "accomplishments" of rebels and to rebut accusations that he had ordered fighters to leave the area."There were no orders to anyone to withdraw from the battlefield," General Idris said, wearing a black polo shirt and dark cap, with a pistol holstered under his left arm.The video did not indicate his precise whereabouts in the province, specify when he was there or provide any other information about the visit.General Idris's group was intended to be the moderate pathway for military aid to the Syrian opposition, but he has been increasingly marginalized as aid has remained limited and more radical fighters have grown stronger on the battlefield.Jihadist groups fighting in Syria now include more than 6,000 foreigners, and they have been pouring into the country at an accelerated pace, according to counterterrorism officials.
BEIRUT — Al-Qaeda-linked rebels in Syria have killed an Italian Jesuit priest who disappeared in the east of the country late last month, the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said.The British-based monitoring group cited local activists in the city of Raqqa with close links to the priest, Paolo Dall'Oglio, saying he was "killed in the jails of the Islamic State in Iraq and the Levant (group)."It was not immediately possible to confirm the report.
UNITED NATIONS — After months of negotiations, the United Nations announced Wednesday that U.N. experts will depart imminently for Syria to investigate alleged chemical weapons use.Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon gave the green light after the Syrian government accepted arrangements for the investigation.The team is expected to visit three sites where chemical weapons attacks allegedly occurred, but diplomats and chemical weapons experts have raised doubts about whether they will find anything since the alleged incidents took place months ago.The mandate for the investigation is also limited: The team will report on whether chemical weapons were used, and if so which ones, but it will not determine the responsibility for an attack. This has led some commentators to question the value of the investigation.President Bashar Assad's government initially asked the U.N. to investigate an alleged chemical weapons attack on March 19 on the village of Khan al Assal outside the embattled city of Aleppo, which was captured by the rebels last month. The government and rebels blame each other for the purported attack which killed at least 30 people.Britain, France and the U.S. followed with allegations of chemical weapons use in Homs, Damascus and elsewhere. U.N. Mideast envoy Robert Serry told the Security Council last month that the U.N. has received 13 reports of alleged chemical weapons use in Syria.On June 13, the United States said it had conclusive evidence that Assad's regime had used chemical weapons against opposition forces. That crossed what President Barack Obama had called a "red line" and prompted a U.S. decision to send arms and ammunition to the opposition.But agreement on a U.N. investigation was delayed for months because Syria wanted to limit the probe to Khan al-Assal and the secretary-general, backed by the U.S., Britain and France, insisted on a broader investigation.The U.N. gave approval for the probe on July 31 following an "understanding" reached with Syria during a visit to Damascus by U.N. disarmament chief Angela Kane and Swedish expert Ake Sellstrom, the team's leader, that three sites where chemical weapons were allegedly used would be investigated.One site is Khan al Assal, but the locations of the other two incidents are being kept secret for safety reasons.For the past two weeks, the Syrian government and the U.N. have been trying to agree on arrangements for the investigation.The U.N. team completed preparations for the visit over the weekend in The Hague, Netherlands, but its departure was delayed because of differences over details of the investigation.Following Wednesday's agreement, U.N. deputy spokesman Eduardo del Buey said "the departure of the team is now imminent," but he provided no specific date.Under the agreement with Syria, the team will remain in the country for "up to 14 days, extendable upon mutual consent" to "conduct activities, "including on-site visits," del Buey said.He said U.N. Secretary General Ban Ki-moon is pleased that agreement has been reached "to ensure the proper, safe and efficient conduct of the mission."The secretary-general believes an effective investigation of allegations can serve as "an important deterrent" against the use of chemical weapons, del Buey said."Our goal remains a fully independent and impartial inquiry," he said.Del Buey said "the overwhelming support of the international community for this investigation makes clear that the use of chemical weapons by any side under any circumstances would constitute an outrageous crime."The investigation team includes about 10 experts from the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons, which is based in The Hague, and the World Health Organization, based in Geneva.Del Buey said Ban expressed appreciation to the Syrian government for its cooperation and to the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons for its support of the mission.
Nearly two weeks after Syria said it would allow United Nations experts to investigate three sites where chemical weapons may have been used in that country's civil war, their visit has been further delayed because an agreement has yet to be reached with Syria on measures to ensure their safety, Secretary General Ban Ki-moon's office reported on Tuesday.In a statement, the office said Angela Kane, the high representative for disarmament affairs, remained engaged with the Syrian government in the hope of agreeing "as soon as possible" on ways "to ensure the proper, safe and efficient conduct of the mission."As soon as that agreement is reached, the statement said, "the mission will depart without delay."The statement apparently was issued in response to a raft of queries to Mr. Ban's office about the status of the panel's investigation, which is led by Ake Sellstrom, a Swedish scientific expert appointed by Mr. Ban. United Nations officials said on July 31 that Syria had consented to the panel's visiting three sites, and that the panel would be traveling to Syria as soon as possible.Pressed about the precise reasons for the delay, and whether Mr. Ban was concerned that the panel's credibility might be at risk, a spokesman for the secretary general, Eduardo del Buey, told reporters at a regular daily briefing, "The devil is in the details, and the details are being worked out."The Syrian government had originally insisted that the panel investigate only one site, Khan al-Assal, near the northern city of Aleppo, where an attack was reported on March 19, but the government later agreed to expand the inquiry to two other locations. Neither Syria nor the United Nations has disclosed the identity of those sites.United Nations officials have said that Dr. Sellstrom's panel has received unconfirmed evidence that 13 sites in Syria have been subjected to the use of chemical weapons. His panel's purpose is to ascertain whether such weapons were used, not who used them.President Bashar al-Assad of Syria and the country's opposition have accused each other of deploying chemical weapons in the conflict, which is now well into its third year and has left more than 100,000 Syrians dead.
WASHINGTON — Top U.S. and Iraqi diplomats warned Thursday of a rising threat in Iraq from al-Qaida, which is carrying out suicide and car bombings with greater frequency nearly two years after U.S. troops withdrew from the country.Secretary of State John Kerry and Iraqi Foreign Minister Hoshyar Zebari also discussed how to stop Iraqi airspace from being used to ferry weapons and illicit cargo from Iran to the embattled Syrian government and how to stem the flow of weapons and extremist fighters into Iraq from neighboring Syria."It's a two-way street. It's a dangerous street," Kerry said.The two met on the same day that a wave of car bombs hit the Iraqi capital, killing 33 people and wounding dozens. More than 3,000 people have been killed during the past few months, including 69 who died last weekend in a series of car bombings targeting those celebrating the end of Ramadan."Iraq sits at the intersection of regional currents of increasingly turbulent, violent and unpredictable actions," Kerry said. "Sunni and Shia extremists on both sides of the sectarian divide throughout the region have an ability to be able to threaten Iraq's stability if they're not checked."And al-Qaida, as we have seen, has launched a horrific series of assaults on innocent Iraqis, even taking credit for the deplorable bombings this past weekend that targeted families that were celebrating the Eid holiday. And this al-Qaida network, we know, stretches well beyond Iraq's borders."In 2011 and 2012 there was an average of five to 10 suicide bombings a month, according to a senior administration official familiar with Kerry's talks with his Iraqi counterpart. They have averaged about 30 in each of the past three months and it's suspected that the suicide attackers are mostly coming from Syria, indicating a fairly sophisticated al-Qaida network, said the official, who spoke on condition of anonymity because he wasn't authorized to speak publicly about the meeting.The official said the U.S. wants to share intelligence and help the Iraqis map the network and disrupt its financing. Also, the U.S. is encouraging Iraq to make precision attacks against perpetrators to avoid aggravating the fragile security situation in the country by rounding up too many people or targeting the wrong person.The overflights in Iraq, which is sandwiched between Iran and Syria, long have been a source of contention between the U.S. and Iraq.Iraq and Iran claim the flights are carrying humanitarian goods, but American officials say they are confident that the planes are being used to arm and support Syrian President Bashar Assad's fight against U.S.-backed opposition forces.In 2012, then-Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton secured a pledge from Iraq to inspect the flights, but until March when her successor, Kerry, visited Baghdad, only two aircraft had been checked by Iraqi authorities, according to U.S. officials.Kerry said some progress has been made since then to curtail the movement of weapons but that he and Zebari agreed that "there is very significant progress yet to be made."Congress recently was notified that a $2.6 billion air defense system was being sold to the Iraqis to help them better control their airspace, but it won't be operational for some time, the administration official said. The Iraqis also are getting a shipment of F-16 aircraft from the U.S. in the fall.The official said that since March there has been a disruption in the overall frequency and number of what the U.S. suspects is illicit cargo transfers, but that much work is needed to curb the problem. The official said, however, that no illicit cargo or weapons had been intercepted.Zebari emphasized that Iraq was neutral on the Syrian crisis. He said Iraq had not provided arms, money or oil to the Syrian regime and said Iraqis were not going into Syria to fight with the consent of the Iraqi government."Iraq is a reliable, a dependable ally and partner for the United States," Zebari said.Violence has been on the rise across Iraq since a deadly crackdown by government forces on a Sunni protest camp in April, and attacks against civilians and security forces notably spiked during Ramadan. The surge of attacks has sparked fears that the country could see a new round of sectarian bloodshed similar to that which brought the country to the edge of civil war in 2006 and 2007.Zebari acknowledged the upswing in violence, but said the nation was not undergoing a civil or sectarian war.Kerry said he and Zebari talked about Iran and Hezbollah's efforts to fuel conflict in the region."We agreed that we cannot allow them to play on the sectarian divides to recruit young Iraqis to go fight in a foreign war, the same way that we cannot allow al-Qaida and other extremists to recruit young men from Iraq and elsewhere to join into their twisted version of jihad," Kerry said.
BEIRUT — Al-Qaida militants in northern Syria shot dead two Shiite teenagers whom they accused of being pro-government gunmen, filming video of the killing that was later posted to the Internet, an activist group said Thursday.It's the latest apparent shooting of captives in a war that has increasingly taken on sectarian tones. Many Syrian Shiites are allied with the regime of President Bashar Assad, whose Alawite sect is an offshoot of Shiism, and who is challenged by mostly Sunni rebels. Both Sunni extremists among the rebels and Alawite gunmen have been blamed for the deaths of scores of people from different sects.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said the two youths who were shot dead came from the besieged Shiite-majority towns of Nubul and Zahra in Aleppo province. Rebels currently surround the towns and have been fighting against troops and pro-government gunmen in the area for months.An amateur video posted online showed two blindfolded males sitting in front of a masked gunman. The Observatory said they were both under the age of 18.The masked gunman reads a statement by the al-Qaida-linked Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant saying the two "Nubul and Zahra shabiha," or pro-government gunmen, are to be killed after two attempts to exchange them with rebel prisoners held in the towns failed. He says pro-government forces in the villages did not abide by deals that could have led to the two men's release."It is our duty to execute them," the man says in the statement.After the finishing the statement, the man steps aside as others can be heard chanting, "God is great." Bullets rip into the bodies of the two blindfolded youths and they slump to the ground.It was not clear when the shooting occurred. The videos appeared genuine and corresponded to other AP reporting on the events depicted.Also in Aleppo province, the Observatory said, gunmen shot dead preacher Mohammed Dibo in the rebel-held town of Manbij early Thursday while on his way to the mosque to perform dawn prayers. It said Dibo was the imam of the town's main mosque.It was not clear why the cleric was killed, but assassinations have been common in rebel-held areas as rival factions fight for power.Unrest in Syria began in March 2011 and later exploded into a civil war. More than 100,000 people have been killed in the conflict.
(Reuters) - A U.N. mission to investigate alleged use of chemical weapons in Syria's civil war tentatively plans to enter the country on Sunday, officials said on Friday.The team, consisting of weapons experts from the Organisation for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons, plans to look into claims of use of sarin gas and other toxic nerve agents.U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon said on Wednesday details of the trip had been worked out with the Syrian government and that the team's departure was imminent.An official told Reuters on Friday the team would cross into Syria on Sunday, assuming security conditions permitted. A diplomat in the region confirmed the timetable.One site to be visited by the U.N. experts is Khan al-Assal in Aleppo, where the Syrian government says rebels used chemical weapons in March.Two other locations have not yet been identified and may be too dangerous for the team to visit, the official said.The Syrian government and the opposition have accused each other of using chemical weapons during the two-year conflict, and both have denied it. The U.N. inquiry will try to establish only whether chemical weapons were used, not who used them.The United States said in June it had concluded that Assad's forces used chemical weapons against rebel fighters.
WASHINGTON — The spiraling conflict in Syria has provided a sanctuary for leaders of Al Qaeda 's Iraq affiliate who are orchestrating attacks in Baghdad and other cities, posing a fresh challenge for efforts to maintain security there, American officials said Thursday."They are flush with jihadi recruits, which are coming into Syria, and we think they are sending a number of them into Iraq," a senior administration official told reporters.In 2011 and 2012, suicide bombings in Iraq averaged 5 to 10 a month. But over the past 90 days, the number has approached about 30 a month, the official added.Concerns that the chaos in Syria may destabilize Iraq were at the top of the agenda on Thursday when Secretary of State John Kerry met with Hoshyar Zebari, Iraq's foreign minister, for consultations on security, political and economic issues."Sunni and Shia extremists on both sides of the sectarian divide throughout the region have an ability to be able to threaten Iraq's stability if they're not checked," Mr. Kerry said.The leader of Al Qaeda's Iraq affiliate, Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi, and other senior members of the group are operating from Syria, according to the State Department. "Al Qaeda, as we have seen, has launched a horrific series of assaults on innocent Iraqis," Mr. Kerry added, referring to an attack on Sunday that killed more than 60 people during the holiday that marks the end of Ramadan.Hours before Mr. Kerry spoke, another string of car bombs were detonated across Baghdad during the morning commute, killing at least 30 people and wounding more than 60. Among the targets were a hospital and a cafe. Immediately after the bombings, the army and the police tightened security across the capital, bringing traffic to a halt in many areas."We have seen the new violence or terrorist attacks by Al Qaeda more frequently, and it has cost many, many lives," Mr. Zebari said.Throughout the Iraq war, Syria was a gateway for Sunni suicide bombers who sought to undermine the Shiite-led government and to attack American troops. When the last of the United States forces left Iraq at the end of 2011, Obama administration officials said they believed that the country would be able to cope with terrorist attacks largely on its own.But the upheaval in Syria, which has attracted a stream of Sunni extremists, has called that assumption into question.With none of its own military forces in Iraq, the ability of the United States to train and help the Iraqis fight Al Qaeda is limited. But the United States is trying to assist on several fronts, including the sharing of intelligence to help the Iraqis uncover terrorist cells and avoid indiscriminate wide-scale dragnets that fuel Sunni resentment. During the war, Iraq's counterterrorism forces depended heavily on American military intelligence, which used sophisticated reconnaissance systems and had the ability to locate terrorist threats by intercepting communications.The Obama administration has also notified Congress in recent weeks that it plans to sell Iraq more than $4 billion in arms, including Stryker armored vehicles and other military systems that are suited for internal security operations.The country's prime minister, Nuri Kamal al-Maliki, has pressed the United States to sell Apache attack helicopters to his government. The Obama administration has been considering a number of options, leasing some Apaches to the Iraqis that they could field quickly. Some American lawmakers have been anxious about providing the helicopters for fear they might be used by Mr. Maliki to intimidate political opponents."They certainly would help with internal security, but they can also be used to crack down on the population." said Nora Bensahel, a senior fellow at the Center for a New American Security. "The more the terrorist threat increases, the more likely the sale is to go through."The Obama administration has also been trying to broker a meeting between the Maliki government and the moderate Syrian opposition. The United States hopes such a meeting will ease the Iraq prime minister's concerns that if President Bashar al-Assad of Syria is ousted, his government will be replaced by a hostile Sunni-dominated government on Iraq's doorstep. It is also hoped that such a meeting would encourage Iraq to be more cooperative in pressing for a transition to a post-Assad administration.As he did during his visit to Baghdad in March, Mr. Kerry urged the Iraqis to inspect Iranian flights that have been flying weapons to Damascus through Iraqi airspace.Those deliveries have strengthened Mr. Assad's military position and, critics say, have been quietly tolerated by the Maliki government.Mr. Zebari insisted that Iraq is not taking sides in the Syria crisis. In a joint statement issued on Thursday, Iraq restated its commitment to prevent "the transit of weapons through its territory.""There has been some progress in this area since my visit to Iraq in March," Mr. Kerry said. "There is very significant progress yet to be made."
Visitors to some articles on The Washington Post's Web site Thursday morning were being redirected to the site of the Syrian Electronic Army, a hacker collective that supports the Syrian president, Bashar al-Assad.The Post said on Thursday afternoon the episode was over and under control. "We have taken defensive measures and removed the offending module," Emilio Garcia-Ruiz, The Post's managing editor, wrote in an editor's note on the site. "At this time, we believe there are no other issues affecting the Post site."The paper reported that the Syrian collective had said in a Twitter post that it had also attacked Time magazine and CNN, suggesting it had tried to carry out a coordinated attack on American news outlets.Mr. Assad has faced intense media scrutiny for the government's role in the long, bloody civil war taking place in Syria, but the collective did not make it clear whether it targeted The Post because it was displeased with its coverage. An article in the newspaper indicated that it was mostly foreign coverage affected by the breach.In the editor's note, Mr. Garcia-Ruiz said the Syrian Electronic Army had said in a tweet that it gained access to the site by hacking one of its business partners called Outbrain. A third-party content recommendation service, Outbrain works by embedding a widget on Web sites filled with sponsored links. Time and CNN also use the service.A spokeswoman for Time, Jane Lehman, said the company's sites were not hacked and the security was not compromised. "The content on some of our sites provided by Outbrain was impacted by the hacking activity at Outbrain," she said.CNN also said its sites were not directly penetrated. "The security of a vendor plug-in that appeared on CNNi.com was briefly compromised today," it said in a statement. "The issue was quickly identified and plug-in disabled."According to The Atlantic Wire, which also employs Outbrain, the recommendation service sent a statement to its business partners saying in part: "This morning, the Outbrain service was attacked, and as a result, we have taken the service down temporarily as a precautionary measure."Mr. Garcia-Ruiz's post provided this background on the security breach: "A few days ago, The Syrian Electronic Army, allegedly, subjected Post newsroom employees to a sophisticated phishing attack to gain password information. The attack resulted in one staff writer's personal Twitter account being used to send out a Syrian Electronic Army message. For 30 minutes this morning, some articles on our Web site were redirected to the Syrian Electronic Army's site. The Syrian Electronic Army, in a tweet, claimed they gained access to elements of our site by hacking one of our business partners, Outbrain."On Wednesday, The New York Times's site was down for several hours. The Times cited technical problems and said there was no indication the site was hacked.
BEIRUT — Syrian rebels killed at least 11 people, including civilians, in an attack on a checkpoint west of the city of Homs on Saturday that official state media described as a massacre.Most of those killed were Christians, activists and residents said. Some were from the National Defense Army, a militia which fights alongside President Bashar al-Assad's soldiers, and others were civilians, they said."Terrorists today committed a massacre, killing 11 people ... in Homs countryside," the state news agency SANA quoted an official as saying.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said rebel gunmen had attacked the checkpoint, killing five militia fighters and six civilians, including two women. It said the rebel fighters had also sustained losses.A resident who visited the site of the overnight attack said he saw the remains of a destroyed checkpoint and two civilian cars nearby, whose passengers may have been caught up by chance in the fighting.He said the checkpoint had been used as an artillery base to bombard the rebel town of Hosn, about 2 km (1 mile) away, which lies below the towering Crusader castle Crac des Chevaliers.Many Christians fleeing the violence in Homs city over the past two years have settled in the Christian villages around the area where Saturday's attack took place.Some have joined the pro-Assad forces, fearing for their future were the president to be toppled by rebel forces increasingly led by radical Islamist brigades, some with links to al Qaeda.More than 100,000 people have been killed in Syria's civil war, which grew out of a 2011 uprising against 40 years of dynastic rule by the Assad family, and nearly 2 million more have fled the country as refugees.
DAMASCUS, Syria — After months of drawn-out negotiations, United Nations experts arrived in Damascus on Sunday to begin their investigation into the purported use of chemical weapons in Syria's civil war.The rebels, along with the U.S. and other Western powers, have accused President Bashar Assad's regime of carrying out the alleged chemical attacks, while the Syrian government and Russia have blamed the opposition. Nearly six months after the weapons of mass destruction were first allegedly employed on the battlefield, definitive proof remains elusive.The U.N. team that arrived in Damascus on Sunday is tasked with determining whether chemical weapons have been used in the conflict, and if so which ones. But the mission's mandate does not extend to establishing who was responsible for an attack, which has led some observers to question the overall value of the probe.The 20-member U.N. delegation, led by Swedish chemical weapons expert Ake Sellstrom, checked into a five-star hotel upon arrival in central Damascus. Plainclothes police officers immediately whisked them away from a crush of reporters and cameraman waiting in the lobby.U.N. spokesman Martin Nesirky said the team will begin its work on Monday.The investigators are expected to visit three sites where chemical weapons attacks allegedly occurred: the village of Khan al-Assal just west of the embattled northern city of Aleppo and two other locations that have not been disclosed.Syria is said to have one of the world's largest stockpiles of chemical weapons, including mustard gas and the nerve agent sarin. There are concerns that the Assad regime might use them on a large scale, transfer some of them to the Lebanese militant Hezbollah group or that the chemical agents could fall into the hands of al-Qaida-affiliated militants and other extremists among the rebels.Ahead of the experts' arrival, Syrian Deputy Foreign Minister Faisal Mekdad told The Associated Press that the government will offer the U.N. inspectors its full assistance."I assure you, on behalf of the Syrian Arab Republic, that we will fully cooperate with this team and provide it will all information we have and all facilities to reach a rational conclusion," he said."Our basic target is for this team to find facts on ground, especially about what happened in Khan al-Assal, because we, as a government, do not know about any other cases other than the case where chemical weapons were used by terrorists there," he added. Syria's government refers to rebels fighting its rule as terrorists.A spokesman for the Western-backed Syrian opposition's military wing, Loay al-Mikdad, also welcomed the U.N. mission, but was skeptical about how fruitful the investigation will be."We hope that this delegation will be able to reach all areas where unconventional weapons have been used," al-Mikdad said. "However, we're absolutely sure that this regime that has done everything from changing signs with the names of areas to fabricating evidence with past delegations will do the same with this one. Therefore, we doubt they will be able to uncover truthful results."Al-Mikdad said the rebels, if asked, will facilitate a visit by inspectors to opposition-held areas, and that no restrictions would be placed on their movements.The Syrian government initially asked the U.N. to investigate an alleged chemical weapons attack on March 19 in Khan al Assal, which was captured by the rebels last month. The government and rebels blame each other for the purported attack which killed at least 30 people.Britain, France and the U.S. followed with allegations of chemical weapons use in Homs, Damascus and elsewhere. U.N. Mideast envoy Robert Serry told the Security Council last month that the U.N. has received 13 reports of alleged chemical weapons use in Syria.Speaking to the AP, Mekdad insisted that Syria "will never use chemical weapons against its people.""We said that these weapons were used in Syria, and Syria was the first to inform the United Nations that armed groups used these weapons in Khan al-Assal," the Syrian deputy foreign minister said. "We had wished that the United Nations had conducted the investigation immediately at the time so the team would not find difficulties gathering evidence."In June, the U.S. said it had conclusive evidence that Assad's regime used chemical weapons against opposition forces. That crossed what President Barack Obama called a "red line," prompting a U.S. decision to begin arming rebel groups, although that has not happened yet.The alleged chemical attacks are just one facet of the bloody conflict in Syria that has killed more than 100,000 people and spilled over into neighboring countries.On Sunday, three rockets fired from Syria landed on the Lebanese border town of Hermel, causing damage but no casualties, security officials said. They spoke on condition of anonymity because they weren't authorized to brief the media.Associated Press writer Jamal Halaby in Amman, Jordan, and Ryan Lucas and Yasmine Saker in Beirut contributed to this report.
UNITED NATIONS — Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon called Monday for U.N. experts to have "full access" to the sites of alleged chemical weapons in Syria.He said that access must include interviews and examination of witnesses, victims and medical personnel and the conduct of post-mortem examinations.After months of negotiations, a 20-member U.N. team led by Swedish chemical weapons expert Ake Sellstrom arrived in Damascus on Sunday to investigate three sites where chemical weapons attacks allegedly occurred: the village of Khan al-Assal just west of the embattled northern city of Aleppo and two other locations being kept secret for security reasons.Diplomats and chemical weapons experts have raised doubts about whether the experts will find anything since the alleged incidents took place months ago.The mandate for the investigation is also limited: The team will report on whether chemical weapons were used, and if so which ones, but it will not determine the responsibility for an attack. This has led some commentators to question the value of the investigation.Ban said if the U.N. team reports that chemical weapons were used, it is up to the international community "to determine what course of action should be taken to prove this, first of all, (determine) accountability, and what needs to be done."The secretary-general reiterated that "if confirmed, the use of chemical weapons by any side under any circumstances must be held accountable and would constitute an international crime."He told reporters the serious security situation in Syria "will undoubtedly affect the mission's activities in Syria" and stressed that the government and others must ensure their safety. He expressed appreciation for the assurances he has received on their safety and security.At the same time, Ban reiterated that "in order to credibly establish the facts, the mission must have full access to the sites of the alleged incidents ... to undertake the necessary analyses and to collect samples."Syria is said to have one of the world's largest stockpiles of chemical weapons, including mustard gas and the nerve agent sarin, though it has never admitted possessing such weapons.Ban stressed the ground-breaking and historic nature of the investigation."This is the first probe of allegations of the use of weapons of mass destruction in the 21st century," Ban said. "I firmly believe that an effective mechanism to investigate allegations of the possible use of chemical weapons will help deter their future use."The Syrian government initially asked the U.N. to investigate an alleged chemical weapons attack on March 19 in Khan al Assal, which was captured by the rebels last month. The government and rebels blame each other for the purported attack which killed at least 30 people.Britain, France and the U.S. followed with allegations of chemical weapons use in Homs, Damascus and elsewhere. U.N. Mideast envoy Robert Serry told the Security Council last month that the U.N. has received 13 reports of alleged chemical weapons use in Syria.
BEIRUT — An Italian Jesuit priest who disappeared last month in eastern Syria may still be alive, the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said on Monday, almost a week after it said he had been killed by al Qaeda-linked rebels.The British-based monitoring group cited sources close to the Islamic State in Iraq and the Levant (ISIL) disputing assertions by local activists - and reported by the observatory - that Father Paolo Dall'Oglio had been killed while in the custody of the Islamist ISIL rebels.Dall'Oglio, who supports the uprising against Syrian President Bashar al-Assad, disappeared in the rebel-held city of Raqqa on July 29. Activists initially said he was kidnapped by ISIL fighters, although some later said he had met them to negotiate a truce with Kurdish brigades.It was not immediately possible to confirm Monday's report. The Observatory called on those holding Dall'Oglio to produce evidence that he is alive.Dall'Oglio served for three decades at the Monastery of Saint Moses the Abyssinian, or Deir Mar Musa, before being expelled from the country in 2012. A Western diplomat said Dall'Oglio crossed into Syria from Turkey last month.He has been an advocate of reconciliation for Syria's myriad religious and ethnic sects, especially between Kurds and Arabs. Dall'Oglio blamed Assad for provoking sectarian mayhem and called his forces "thugs."
ISTANBUL — Turkey's foreign minister said on Wednesday it was clear from television footage that chemical weapons had been used in an attack near the Syrian capital Damascus and telephoned U.N. chief Ban Ki-moon to urge an immediate investigation.Syria's opposition accused government forces of gassing hundreds of people near Damascus by firing rockets that released deadly fumes over rebel-held suburbs, killing men, women and children as they slept. The Syrian government dismissed the allegation."Use of chemical weapons in Syria is evident from the footage coming from there," Turkish Foreign Minister Ahmet Davutoglu said in an interview on Kanal 24 television. "We have called for an immediate investigation by the U.N. teams."The foreign ministry said in a statement Davutoglu had called U.N. Secretary General Ban Ki-moon to urge the Security Council to "carry out its responsibilities".What would be the world's most lethal chemical weapons attack since the 1980s prompted an emergency meeting of the U.N. Security Council set for 1900 GMT."If these allegations are found to be true, it will be inevitable for the international community to take the necessary stance and give the necessary response to this savagery and crime against humanity," the foreign ministry said.Ankara, once an ally of Syrian President Bashar al-Assad but now one of his fiercest critics, has long been concerned about the possible use of chemical weapons across its southern border.Turkey began stepping up tests on casualties arriving from Syria for treatment earlier this year to determine whether they were victims of chemical weapons , but no details have been released publicly on the results of those tests.
UNITED NATIONS — The U.N. Security Council will hold an emergency meeting at 3 p.m. EDT (3:00 p.m. EDT) to discuss an alleged deadly gas attack in Syria that, if confirmed, would be the world's worst chemical weapons attack in decades, diplomats said.Western and regional countries have publicly called for U.N. chemical weapons investigators, who arrived in Damascus three days ago to look into previous allegations of such attacks, to be dispatched to the scene of what may be one of the deadliest incidents of Syria's two-year-old civil war.
BRUSSELS — The European Union called for a "thorough and immediate" investigation of an alleged chemical attack in Syria after Syrian rebels said hundreds of people were killed on Wednesday in a gas attack and shelling by President Bashar al-Assad's forces."We have seen with grave concern the reports of the possible use of chemical weapons by the Syrian regime. Such accusations should be immediately and thoroughly investigated," a spokesman for EU foreign policy chief Catherine Ashton said."The EU reiterates that any use of chemical weapons, by any side in Syria, would be totally unacceptable."
PARIS — French President Francois Hollande called on United Nations inspectors to visit the site of an alleged chemical attack near Damascus on Wednesday that opposition groups say killed hundreds of people, the government spokeswoman said."With regard to the information coming out of Syria, the president asks that the U.N. goes to the site," Najat Vallaud-Belkacem told a weekly news briefing.If confirmed, it would be by far the worst reported use of chemical weapons in the two-year-old Syrian conflict. A team of U.N. chemical weapons experts arrived in Syria three days ago.
BEIRUT — Syria's military command denied opposition reports that the army had used chemical weapons on Wednesday against districts east of Damascus, saying they were a sign of "hysteria and floundering" by President Bashar al-Assad's opponents.The denial was issued by an officer speaking on state television. Information Minister Omran Zoabi said the allegations were "illogical and fabricated".
LONDON — Britain's foreign secretary says the country will ask the United Nations Security Council to discuss claims of a chemical weapons attack near the Syrian capital, Damascus.Syrian opposition groups say at least 100 people were killed during a fierce government offensive against rebel-held areas, and some activists say regime troops used "poisonous gas."The Syrian government denied its troops used chemical weapons.Britain's Hague said Wednesday that "if verified, this would be a shocking escalation of the use of chemical weapons in Syria. We are determined the people responsible will one day be held to account."He said U.N. chemical weapons inspectors, who are currently in Syria, should be given access to the site.
BEIRUT — Syria denied reports on Wednesday that chemical weapons had been used in an attack on the eastern suburbs of Damascus which activists said killed more than 200 people.State television quoted a source as saying there was "no truth whatsoever" to the reports, which it said were aimed at distracting a visiting team of United Nations chemical weapons experts from their mission.
BEIRUT — Syrian activists accused forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad on Wednesday of using chemical agents during the heavy bombardment of rebel-held areas around Damascus.The reported use of the chemical agents could not be immediately verified. It coincides with a visit to Damascus by a United Nations team of chemical weapons experts.Activists from the grassroots Local Coordination Committee reported at least 30 bodies had been brought to one field hospital in Kafr Batna neighborhood a few miles (km) east of central Damascus.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said dozens of people were killed, including children, in fierce bombardment. It said Mouadamiya, southwest of the capital, came under the heaviest attack since the start of the two-year conflict.It called on the U.N. chemical experts and international organizations to visit the affected areas to ensure aid could be delivered and to "launch an investigation to determine who was responsible for the bombardment and hold them to account".Syrian authorities and rebels have accused each other of using chemical agents in the course of the civil war, in which 100,000 people have been killed.
UNITED NATIONS — Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon on Thursday called on the Syrian government to allow a U.N. team now in Damascus to swiftly investigate an alleged chemical weapon attack outside the capital that killed at least 100 people.U.N. deputy spokesman Eduardo del Buey said Ban remains "deeply troubled" by the alleged attack on the eastern suburbs of Damascus on Wednesday and believe it needs to be investigated "without delay."Syrian anti-government activists accused President Bashar Assad's regime of carrying out an attack using toxic gas and have reported death tolls ranging from 136 to 1,300. Even the lowest figure would make it the deadliest alleged chemical attack in Syria's 2 1/2-year civil war.The government has denied that it used chemical weapons, calling the allegations "absolutely baseless."Del Buey said the secretary-general "takes positive note" of the U.N. Security Council meeting Wednesday that backed his initial call for "a thorough, impartial and prompt investigation."He said the secretary-general has been in touch with world leaders since Wednesday and is sending U.N. disarmament chief Angela Kane to Damascus to press for a U.N. investigation.Under the terms of an agreement with Syria negotiated by Kane and chief weapons inspector Ake Sellstrom in July, the U.N. team can investigate three previous incidents of alleged chemical weapons use.A new agreement would need to be negotiated for the 20-member team to be able to go to the Damascus suburb of Ghouta.The U.N. team is scheduled to investigate an alleged chemical weapons attack that happened March 19 on the village of Khan al Assal outside the city of Aleppo, which was captured by the rebels last month. The government and rebels blame each other for the attack. The sites of the two other incidents to be investigated are being kept secret for security reasons.More than 35 countries signed a letter to the secretary-general Wednesday requesting the U.N. experts to launch "an urgent investigation ... as expeditiously as possible" into Wednesday's incident as well.Del Buey said the secretary-general is sending a formal request to the Syrian government to grant permission and access to the Ghouta area to the U.N. chemical weapons experts."He expects to receive a positive response without delay," del Buey said.U.N. Deputy Secretary-General Jan Eliasson, who briefed the Security Council on Wednesday, expressed hope that the Syrian government will give the team access to the site as soon as possible, though he cautioned that because of fighting "the security situation right now does not allow such access.""This represents, no matter what conclusions are, a serious escalation with grave humanitarian consequences and human consequences," Eliasson stressed.The secretary-general reiterated his call for an immediate cessation of hostilities so that humanitarian assistance can be urgently delivered to the area of the latest incident, del Buey said.U.S. State Department spokeswoman Jen Psaki said President Barack Obama has directed the U.S. intelligence community "to urgently gather additional information" on Wednesday's incident, saying the videos and photos "shock the conscience" and go "beyond the pale.""At this time right now, we are unable to conclusively determine CW (chemical weapons) use, but we are focused every minute of every day since these events happened yesterday on doing everything possible within our power to nail down the facts," she said.As part of this effort, she said, U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry has been coordinating and cooperation with his counterparts around the world.Associated Press Writer Deb Riechmann contributed to this report from Washington
LONDON — Britain said on Thursday its first priority was to verify the facts surrounding a reported chemical weapons attack in Syria, but said it could not rule out any option to end the bloodshed there.""We believe a political solution is the best way to end the bloodshed," a spokesman from the British Foreign Office told Reuters. "However, the Prime Minister and Foreign Secretary have said many times we cannot rule out any option ... that might save innocent lives in Syria."
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syria's deputy prime minister told The Associated Press that foreign fighters and their international backers are to blame for a purported chemical weapons attack near Damascus that the opposition says killed at least 100 people, the deadliest such attack in Syria's civil war.Government forces, meanwhile, pummeled the targeted rebel strongholds where the alleged attack occurred with airstrikes and artillery for a second day, violence that was likely to complicate any swift investigation into the mysterious circumstances surrounding the deaths.Deputy Prime Minister Qadri Jamil's comments were part of a government campaign to use the horror over the deaths to boost its narrative about the conflict — that Syria is under assault by foreign Islamic radicals. It is an argument that has powerful resonance with the Syrian public as the presence of militants fighting alongside Syria's rebels increases.Rebels blamed the attack on the Syrian military, saying toxic chemicals were used in artillery barrages on the area known as eastern Ghouta on Wednesday. Jamil did not directly acknowledge that toxic gas was used against the eastern suburbs but denied allegations by anti-government activists that President Bashar Assad's forces were behind the assault.The murky nature of the purported attacks, and the difficulty of gaining access to the sites amid the carnage of Syria's war and government restrictions on foreign media, has made it impossible to verify the claims.But they have fueled calls in the West for greater action against Assad's regime as amateur videos and photos showed images of the dead, including scores of lifeless children, wrapped in white cloths and lying shoulder to shoulder, while others struggled to breathe. Many pointed to the fact that their pale skin was unmarked by any wounds as evidence that it was a chemical attack.The U.S., Britain and France along with a host of other countries demanded that a team of United Nations experts already in Syria be granted immediate access to the site. The timing of Wednesday's attack — four days after the U.N. team's arrival — has also raised questions about why the regime would use chemical agents now.U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon added his voice to the calls on Thursday, urging the Syrian government to allow the U.N. team now in Damascus to swiftly investigate the alleged use of chemical weapons outside the capital.President Barack Obama has called chemical weapons a "red line" for potential military action, and in June, the U.S. said it had conclusive evidence that Assad's regime had used chemical weapons against opposition forces. But it has so far shown no inclination to intervene.State Department spokeswoman Jen Psaki said Thursday the administration was unable to conclusively determine the use of chemical weapons but added "we are focused every minute of every day since these events happened yesterday on doing everything possible within our power to nail down the facts."Syria is said to have one of the world's largest stockpiles of chemical weapons, including mustard gas and the nerve agent sarin, but the government has never confirmed that.Jamil said he was personally in favor of a fair, transparent international delegation to investigate the incident in Ghouta. But he said this requires a new agreement between the government and the U.N. and that the conditions for such a delegation would need to be studied."We don't want to be like Iraq, opening our territory up to all sorts of investigators, going through our homes and bedrooms. Syria is a sovereign nation and will preserve its sovereignty," he told the AP in an interview at the prime minister's offices in the Damascus district of Kfar Sousseh.Denying that it carried out the attack, the regime has turned blame around to boost its narrative about the conflict — that Syria is under assault by foreign Islamic radicals, an argument that has powerful resonance with the Syrian public as the presence of militants fighting alongside Syria's rebels increases.Jamil said foreign militants carried out the attack with the backing of Israel and supporters in the West in a bid to thwart efforts to hold an international peace conference to end the Syrian bloodshed."We can only say that extremist forces carried it out, linked to foreign forces, since no Syrian can do this against another Syrian," he said. "At the head of these forces are those who have promoted vengeance and hatred and spoke of ousting the regime by force over the past two years."The main state television news channel aired a documentary-style segment showing the pictures of the children's bodies lined up in their shrouds. "This is the brutality of the terrorists and those who have destructive plans for Syria," a voiceover intoned. "They trade in the lives of children, they use chemical weapons." The segment included an explanation of sarin gas, with diagrams of its effects on the body, though it didn't directly claim that sarin was used in Wednesday's attack.Jamil estimated there were now 30,000 to 40,000 foreign fighters on Syrian soil from 70 countries."There are forces that have lost their minds and are using the most extreme weapons in their hands to prevent the international conference. They're in a state of insanity, they have lost their senses. It's a political attack as much as it's a chemical attack," he said.Syrian opposition figures and activists have reported death tolls from Wednesday's attack ranging from 136 to 1,300. But even the most conservative tally would make it the deadliest alleged chemical attack in Syria's civil war.U.N. deputy spokesman Eduardo del Buey said the U.N. chief has been in touch with world leaders since Wednesday and is sending U.N. disarmament chief Angela Kane to Damascus to press for an investigation.A 20-member U.N. team led by Swedish chemical weapons expert Ake Sellstrom has been in Damascus since Sunday to investigate three sites where chemical weapons attacks allegedly occurred in the past: the village of Khan al-Assal just west of the embattled northern city of Aleppo and two other locations being kept secret for security reasons.The opposition decried what is said were restrictions placed on the U.N. team by Assad's regime."The (U.N.) investigators came to Damascus to sit in the hotel and drink coffee, go out only with the regime's permission, visit what the regime wants and see what the regime wants. We don't need them in Damascus if that's how it's going to be," Louay al-Mikdad, a spokesman for the Western-backed opposition's military wing told Al-Arabiya TV.The fighting raging in the Ghouta region — the distant thuds could be heard in the capital — as Syrian government forces pressed their offensive was likely to complicate even further the U.N. experts' visit to the area where they would need to cross between government and rebel-held territory.Warplanes conducted several air raids on the eastern and western suburbs of Damascus, including three that took place within five minutes, and regime forces shelled eastern Ghouta from the picturesque Qasioun mountain overlooking Damascus, activists said.Mohammed Abdullah, an activist in the suburb of Saqba, told the AP via Skype on Thursday that most of the dead were buried hours after the attack in collective graves in different areas in eastern Ghouta. The burials took place quickly for fear the bodies might decompose as in the heat, he said.France, meanwhile, raised the possibility of the use of force in Syria if it is proven that Assad's regime used chemical weapons, while Turkey said several red lines have been crossed."We need a reaction by the international community .... a reaction of force," said French Foreign Minister Laurent Fabius. He excluded soldiers on the ground as an option, though, and declined to be "more precise" on the type of force that could be used.The state news agency also reported that a suicide bomber attacked a sports facility in the northern city of Aleppo where a family was holding a party for a schoolgirl who passed her high school tests. Seven people were killed, including the girl and Hassan Mhanna, a journalist working for the state-run Al-Ikhbariya channel.The unrest in Syria began in March 2011 and later exploded into a civil war. More than 100,000 people have been killed, according to U.N. figures.
WASHINGTON — U.S. and allied intelligence agencies have made a preliminary assessment that Syrian government forces used chemical weapons to attack an area near Damascus this week and that the act likely had high-level approval from President Bashar al-Assad's government, according to U.S. and European security sources.The sources, speaking on condition of anonymity, cautioned that the assessment is preliminary and, at this stage, they are still seeking conclusive proof, which could take days, weeks or longer to gather.President Barack Obama on Friday called the alleged attack, which rebels say killed between 500 and 1,000 civilians, a "big event of grave concern." But he stressed he was in no rush to embroil Americans in a costly new war.
KUSAKLI, Turkey — Each night, a stream of beaten-up cars and trucks weighed down with blue jerry cans rumbles along the muddy lane, ferrying fuel smuggled into Turkey from over the border in Syria.The thousands of litres of diesel that make their way by cover of darkness to Turkey's southern Hatay province are a financial lifeline for Syria's rebels, as well as a source of income for Turkish middlemen.Much of the oil is sourced from Syria's eastern Deir al-Zor province, a region critical to the country's overall output, which largely fell under the control of a network of tribes and smugglers earlier this year.Fuel is heavily taxed in Turkey, meaning the black market for illegal imports from Syria, however crudely refined in makeshift facilities, is thriving and sends cash back to the rebels fighting against President Bashar al-Assad.Turkey has been a staunch supporter of the Syrian opposition throughout the uprising, now in its third year, sheltering an estimated half a million refugees and allowing the opposition to organise on its soil.But the booming illegal fuel trade has further destabilised the border zone in recent weeks, with the Turkish military exchanging fire with groups of smugglers trying to cross the frontier, sometimes numbering several thousand."They arrive in hundreds, sometimes thousands, so the army can't stop them," said Ismail, 36, a middleman selling jerry cans of smuggled fuel from his backyard in the village of Kusakli, which sits on the border."They don't need to hide. The soldiers know there is smuggling going on here," he said, breaking off to try to make a sale to the driver of a passing car.Turkey has maintained an "open-door" policy to refugees from Syria, and officials in Ankara insist that will not change despite conceding there may be smugglers intermingled with the refugees. It has, nonetheless, been forced to tighten security.The army said last week it had deployed armoured vehicles and a tank along the frontier after spotting up to 1,000 people on foot, a separate group of 150 people on horseback, and some 40 vehicles forming a line along the border near Kusakli.After rounds were fired from a pump action rifle among the crowd, soldiers returned fire, the latest in a series of such confrontations.However, it has yet to deter the illicit trade."Syrian rebels are doing this because they need the money. It's not even so much the money, they're hungry. Aid isn't really reaching them," said Hasan Cemiloglu, Kusakli's "muhtar", an elected local official."These guys end up pulling jerry cans at night through the border so that they can buy bread. Not because they are bad people," he told Reuters.Villagers say the oil flows through a network of middlemen inside Syria, who all charge a fee for handling the safe passage of the cargo through their territory and usually bring it to the Bab al-Hawa or Tel Abyad border posts.Mehmet, a middleman whose small truck can carry up to 50 jerry cans, shuttles back and forth from the border up to five times a night, picking up fuel and ferrying it to buyers in Kusakli on the Turkish side, where he can charge a premium.Pricing depends on where the fuel is delivered. The average price per jerry can right at the border is around 80 lira ($40), but rises to 125 lira once shipped into town, where hundreds of jerry cans sit in the yards in front of almost every house."I think they will shut this down soon. It's become too obvious, everyone is doing it now ... People are making the most of it because they think it will be stopped," Mehmet said, declining to give his full name.With its hilly terrain and thick vegetation, Hatay, the panhandle province that juts down into Syria in which Kusakli sits, makes a relatively easy crossing point for smugglers, as well as Syrian rebels and the refugees fleeing the fighting.In another border village, Hacipasa, there is a similar scene. Backseats of cars are filled with jerry cans, clumsily covered with cloth, sometimes spilling fuel as they drive.As violence has spilled over the border, Ankara has become increasingly concerned about the fallout of Syria's civil war and has periodically shut some of its border gates.Twin bomb attacks in Reyhanli, the nearest main town, killed 52 people in April, while a Syrian minibus exploded at the nearby Cilvegozu border post in February, killing more than a dozen people.But smuggling has long been part of life in the border regions and villagers who live off the illicit trade say neither the war, nor efforts to tighten security, will snuff it out."I have been doing this trade for years. After each bombing, it became more difficult. They closed one route, but people opened another," said Mehmet. "They had to."
LONDON — Britain said on Friday it believed forces loyal to Syrian President Bashar al-Assad were responsible for a chemical weapons attacks in the rebel-held suburbs of Damascus, saying it thought the Syrian government had "something to hide"."I know that some people in the world would like to say that this is some kind of conspiracy brought about by the opposition in Syria," said British Foreign Secretary William Hague. "I think the chances of that are vanishingly small and so we do believe that this is a chemical attack by the Assad regime."
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama said in an interview on Friday that the international community needs to find out more about whether chemical weapons have been used in Syria, and called on the Assad government to allow a full investigation."What we've seen indicates that this is clearly a big event, of grave concern," Obama said in a television interview with CNN. "The notion that the U.S. can somehow solve what is a sectarian complex problem inside of Syria sometimes is overstated"
BEIRUT — Syrian activists say they have prepared body tissue samples from victims of an alleged chemical weapons attack near Damascus and are trying to get them to a team of United Nations inspectors staying in a hotel a few miles away."The U.N. team spoke with us and since then we prepared samples of hair, skin and blood and smuggled them back into Damascus with trusted couriers," said activist Abu Nidal, speaking from the rebel-held town of Arbin.Several activists in the area who spoke to Reuters said they too had prepared samples to smuggle into the capital but were unable to find a way to access the monitors inside their hotel.
DAMASCUS, Syria — The signs would seem bad for President Bashar Assad. Blasts echo all day long over the Syrian capital as troops battle rebels entrenched on its eastern doorstep. The government admits the economy is devastated. Allegations of a horrific chemical attack have given new life to calls for international action against his regime.Yet the regime appears more confident than ever that it weathered the worst and has gained the upper hand in the country's civil war, even if it takes years for victory.Deputy Prime Minister Qadri Jamil traces a slow arc in the air with his hand to show how the country has reached a turning point in "the events" — the most common euphemism here for 2 1/2 years of bloodshed."If the previous trajectory was all negative, it is now on a new course of a gradual reduction of violence, until it goes back to zero," he told The Associated Press."The turning point changes the course of things, but it will take a while," he said. "I don't think the path downward will take as long as the path of escalation did."There are multiple reasons for the new sense of assurance. The military scored a string of victories on the ground the past few months that blunted a rebel surge early in the year. Army offensives stalled or pushed back rebels in Damascus' suburbs. A rebel drive into a regime heartland in the western province on the Mediterranean coast was swiftly reversed over the past week. The bleeding of defections from the military to the rebellion appears to have slowed.The regime also believes it has shored up its most serious vulnerability: the economy. Prices for food and clothes have quadrupled in some cases, the Syrian pound has plunged in comparison with the dollar, and the war has crippled production and trade.But this summer, Syria's allies Russia and Iran effectively handed the government a lifeline, with credit lines to buy rice, flour, sugar, petroleum products and other staples. With that, the regime hopes it can keep an exhausted population clothed, fed, warm in the winter — and firmly on its side — enough to endure a long fight.When asked whether Syria would have to pay back the credit lines in the future, Jamil smiled, saying, "It's between friends."Also, the increasing presence of foreign jihadi fighters, many linked to al-Qaida, has played in the regime's favor. The Islamic militants' strength has made the United States and its allies wary of sending badly needed weapons to the rebels and of taking direct military action against Assad, for fear of what could come next if he falls.Those worries could overcome any sense of outrage over the alleged chemical attack Wednesday in a Damascus suburb that rebels say killed more than 100 people, including many children. The rebels blamed the attack on the regime, an accusation the government has denied, claiming that foreign jiahdis among the rebels were behind it.Fear of foreign radicals is also a powerful tool for keeping the population's support for the regime. State television gives a steady stream of reports of the "barbaric" nature of the jihadis. One station recently aired an interview with a purported "repentant" female rebel who spoke of jihadi sheiks issuing religious decrees allowing foreign fighters to rape Syrian women. Another station aired alleged audiotapes of a phone call between a Saudi extremist and a Syrian rebel about transporting sarin gas and planning other attacks.Every suicide bombing — the trademark of foreign jihadis — gets front-page coverage, like a blast that ripped through an Aleppo restaurant Thursday, killing a girl and six of her guests at a party celebrating her successful high school test scores.Revulsion at the jihadis also has a strong resonance with the public."People get infected by ideas. I'm a Sunni, I pray and I fast and I have faith in God. But I'm moderate. But there are people who listen to these lunatic ideas," said Abu Ahmed, who works at a dress store in Damascus' historic Hamidiya market.He contended that the extent of the bloodshed has disillusioned even some who supported the calls for reform when peaceful protests against the regime first began in March 2011, only to be met by a fierce crackdown."Some people thought, OK, we'll see some change. But they didn't think about the consequences and what would be unleashed. Now anyone who thought that is rethinking it," said Abu Ahmed, fled to Damascus from a rebel-held suburb, leaving behind his property. He spoke on condition he be identified only by his nickname for fear of reprisals against him."We never thought it would reach this point, that we would become like Iraq or Libya. It was unimaginable. No one could conceive of this sort of chaos and bloodshed."Syria's Sunni majority makes up the backbone of the rebellion against Assad's rule, which was dominated by members of the president's own minority Alawite sect. The mounting death toll in the conflict — at least 100,000 killed so far — and its relentless viciousness have stoked sectarian hatreds in the country. Still, the sectarian lines are not clean-cut. During his 13 years in power, Assad elevated some Sunnis to prominent positions. Others in the community prize the stability that his rule — while autocratic — ensured in the country.Adnan Dirkawi, a 67-year-old Sunni who runs a real estate office in an upper middle class Damascus neighborhood, enthusiastically lists what he bills as Assad's achievements: the spread of electricity and water facilities to villages around the country, free or cheap education and health care, new universities and growing business."The vast majority of the people, 90 or 95 percent, have nothing to do with the events. They didn't want this," he said. "All this is why I'm very confident that things can go back to normal. I'm totally at ease about that. People are just waiting for this to end so they can go back to their lives."He dismisses the sectarian hatreds enflamed by the war. "Syrians were never sectarian," he insisted, recalling carvings of a Jewish menorah, Christian cross and Muslim crescent on buildings in the historic Ottoman marketplaces of his northern city of origin, Aleppo.That picture is almost certainly rosy, reflecting Damascenes' relative isolation from carnage that has gone on in large swaths of the country. It also reflects a line pushed incessantly on state media — that once the "foreign terrorists" trying to destroy Syria on behalf of enemies like Israel are stopped, the country can return to what it was.Even if the regime is confident now that the danger of Assad's fall has passed, it has seemed unable to take back rebel-held territory in the north and east. The bitterness and sense of vengeance on both sides may never be resolved. And all bets are off if the West, prompted by the images of children killed in Wednesday's alleged gas attack, takes the dramatic step of direct military action.Jamil, who touts himself as a voice of dissent within the government since he heads of one of Syria's officially approved opposition parties, says there can be no outright military solution. It's an "illusion" to think the Syrian army can "crush completely" what he calls a foreign intervention."Just like the Syrian army can't achieve a complete military victory, the armed groups can't either," he said. So he backs a negotiated political solution "to stop the burning of Syria."
PARIS — Three hospitals near Damascus reported 355 deaths after an alleged chemical attack last Wednesday out of around 3,600 admissions with nerve gas-type symptoms, the medical charity Medecins Sans Frontieres (MSF) said on Saturday.The Syrian opposition has accused government forces of gassing hundreds of people on Wednesday by firing rockets that released deadly fumes into rebel-held Damascus suburbs, killing men, women and children as they slept.Opposition estimates for the death toll have ranged from 500 to well over double that number, but, with U.N. observers unable to visit the site, there has been no independent verification.MSF has no staff of its own in the Damascus region, but has been supporting hospitals and medical networks there since 2012."The reported symptoms of the patients, in addition to the epidemiological pattern of the events — characterized by the massive influx of patients in a short period of time, the origin of the patients, and the contamination of medical and first aid workers — strongly indicate mass exposure to a neurotoxic agent," MSF director of operations Bart Janssens said in a statement."This would constitute a violation of international humanitarian law, which absolutely prohibits the use of chemical and biological weapons."Janssens said MSF could not confirm the cause of the symptoms or say who was responsible for the attack, but that it had sent 7,000 vials of atropine - an antidote against nerve agents.
DAMASCUS, Syria — The Syrian government accused rebels of using chemical weapons Saturday and warned the United States not to launch any military action against Damascus over an alleged chemical attack last week, saying such a move would set the Middle East ablaze.The accusations by the regime of President Bashar Assad against opposition forces came as an international aid group said it has tallied 355 deaths from a purported chemical weapons attack on Wednesday in a suburb of the Syrian capital known as Ghouta.Syria is intertwined in alliances with Iran, Lebanese Hezbollah guerrillas and Palestinian militant groups. The country also borders its longtime foe and U.S. ally Israel, making the fallout from military action unpredictable.Violence in Syria has already spilled over the past year to Lebanon, Turkey, Iraq and the Israeli-occupied Golan Heights. Battle-hardened Hezbollah fighters have joined the combat alongside Assad's forces.Meanwhile, U.S. naval units are moving closer to Syria as President Barack Obama considers a military response to the alleged use of chemical weapons by Assad's government.U.S. defense officials told The Associated Press that the Navy had sent a fourth warship armed with ballistic missiles into the eastern Mediterranean Sea but without immediate orders for any missile launch into Syria. The officials spoke on condition of anonymity because they weren't authorized to discuss ship movements publicly.Obama emphasized that a quick intervention in the Syrian civil war was problematic, given the international considerations that should precede a military strike.After Obama met with his national security team Saturday, the White House said U.S. intelligence officials are still trying to determine whether Assad's government unleashed the chemical weapons attack earlier this week.The White House statement said Obama received a detailed review of the range of options he has requested for the U.S. and the international community to respond if it is determined that Assad has engaged in deadly chemical warfare.Obama spoke by telephone with British Prime Minister David Cameron about Syria, the White House said.A statement from Cameron's office at No. 10 Downing St. said the prime minister and Obama are concerned by "increasing signs" that "a significant chemical weapons attack" was carried out by the Syrian government against its people. Obama and Cameron "reiterated that significant use of chemical weapons would merit a serious response from the international community," according to the statement.Syria's Information Minister Omran al-Zoubi dismissed the possibility of an American attack, warning that such a move would risk triggering more violence in the region."The basic repercussion would be a ball of fire that would burn not only Syria but the whole Middle East," al-Zoubi said in an interview with Lebanon-based Al-Mayadeen TV. "An attack on Syria would be no easy trip."In Tehran, Iran's Foreign Ministry Spokesman, Abbas Arakji, warned that an American military intervention in Syria will "complicate matters.""Sending warships will not solve the problems but will worsen the situation," Arakji said in comments carried by Iran's Arabic-language TV Al-Alam. He added that any such U.S. move does not have international backing and that Iran "rejects military solutions."In France, Doctors Without Borders said three hospitals it supports in the eastern Damascus region reported receiving roughly 3,600 patients with "neurotoxic symptoms" over less than three hours on Wednesday morning, when the attack in the eastern Ghouta area took place.Of those, 355 died, the Paris-based group said.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said Saturday that its estimated death toll from the alleged chemical attack had reached 322, including 54 children, 82 women and dozens of fighters. It said the dead included 16 people who have not been identified.The group said it raised its death toll from an earlier figure of 136, which had been calculated before its activists in the stricken areas met doctors, residents and saw medical reports. It said the dead "fell in the massacre committed by the Syrian regime."Death tolls have varied wildly over the alleged attack, with Syrian anti-government activists reporting between 322 and 1,300 killed.Al-Zoubi blamed the rebels for the chemical attacks in Ghouta, saying that the Syrian government had proof of their responsibility but without giving details. "The rockets were fired from their positions and fell on civilians. They are responsible," he said.With the pressure increasing, Syria's state media accused rebels in the contested district of Jobar near Damascus of using chemical weapons against government troops Saturday.State TV broadcast images of plastic jugs, gas masks, vials of an unspecified medication, explosives and other items that it said were seized from rebel hideouts Saturday.One barrel had "made in Saudi Arabia" stamped on it. The TV report also showed medicines said to be produced by a Qatari-German medical supplies company. Qatar and Saudi Arabia are strong supporters of the Syrian rebels. The report could not be immediately verified.An army statement issued late Saturday said the discovery of the weapons "is clear evidence that these gangs are using chemical weapons against our people and soldiers with help from foreign sides."The claims could muddy the debate about who was responsible for Wednesday's alleged gas attack, which spurred demands for an independent investigation and renewed talk of potential international military action if chemical weapons were used.Just hours before the state media reports, the U.N. disarmament chief arrived in Damascus to press Assad's regime to allow U.N. experts to investigate the alleged Wednesday attack. The regime has denied allegations it was responsible, calling them "absolutely baseless" and suggesting they are an attempt to discredit the government.The U.S., Britain, France and Russia have urged the Assad regime and the rebels fighting to overthrow him to cooperate with the United Nations and allow a team of experts already in Syria to look into the latest purported use of chemical agents. The U.N. secretary-general dispatched Angela Kane, the high representative for disarmament affairs, to push for a speedy investigation into Wednesday's purported attack. She did not speak to reporters upon her arrival in Damascus Saturday.The state news agency said several government troops who took part in the Jobar offensive experienced severe trouble breathing or even "suffocation" after "armed terrorist groups used chemical weapons." It was not clear what was meant by "suffocation," and the report mentioned no fatalities among the troops."The Syrian Army achieved major progress in the past days and for that reason, the terrorist groups used chemical weapons as their last card," state TV said. The government refers to rebels fighting to topple Assad as "terrorists."State TV also broadcast images of a Syrian army officer, wearing a surgical mask, telling reporters wearing similar masks that soldiers were subjected to poisonous attack in Jobar. He spoke inside the depot where the alleged confiscated products were placed."Our troops did not suffer body wounds," the officer said. "I believe terrorist groups used special substances that are poisonous in an attempt to affect this advance."Al-Mayadeen aired interviews with two soldiers hospitalized for possible chemical weapons attack. The two appeared unharmed but were undergoing tests."We were advancing and heard an explosion that was not very strong," a soldier said from his bed. "Then there was a strange smell, my eyes and head ached and I struggled to breathe." The other soldier also said he experienced trouble breathing after the explosion.Al-Mayadeen TV, which has a reporter embedded with the troops in the area, said some 50 soldiers were rushed to Damascus hospitals for treatment and that it was not yet known what type of gas the troops were subjected too.In Turkey, top Syrian rebel commander Salim Idris told reporters that opposition forces did not use chemical weapons on Saturday and that "the regime is lying."For days, the government has been trying to counter rebel allegations that the regime used chemical weapons on civilians in rebel-held areas of eastern Damascus, arguing that opposition fighters themselves were responsible for that attack."All the information we have is converging to indicate there was a chemical massacre in Syria, near Damascus, and that Bashar Assad's regime was behind it," Fabius told reporters during a visit to the West Bank city of Ramallah. He did not elaborate.France has suggested that force could be used against Syria if Assad's regime was proven to have used chemical arms.The new talk of potential military action in in the country has made an independent investigation by U.N. inspectors critical to determine what exactly transpired.The U.N. experts already in Syria are tasked with investigating three earlier purported chemical attacks in the country: one in the village of Khan al-Assal outside the northern city of Aleppo in March, as well as two other locations that have been kept secret for security reasons.It took months of negotiations between the U.N. and Damascus before an agreement was struck to allow the 20-member team into Syria to investigate. Its mandate is limited to those three sites, however, and it is only charged with determining whether chemical weapons were used, not who used them.Leaders of the main Western-backed Syrian opposition group on Saturday vowed retaliation for the alleged chemical weapons attack.From Istanbul, the head of the Syrian National Coalition, Ahmad Al-Jarba, also criticized the lack of response to the attack by the United Nations and the international community, saying the UN was discrediting itself."It does not reach the ethical and legal response that Syrians expect," he said. "As a matter of fact we can describe it as a shame."Mroue reported from Beirut. Associated Press writers Jamey Keaten in Paris, Desmond Butler in Istanbul and Bradley Klapper in Washington contributed to this report.
DAMASCUS — U.N. High Representative for Disarmament Affairs Angela Kane arrived in Syria on Saturday to push for access to a suspected chemical weapons attack site for U.N. inspectors, who are already in Syria to investigate previous accusations.Kane arrived at the Four Seasons hotel in Damascus at midday(0900 GMT), a Reuters reporter at the scene said.
WASHINGTON — Any U.S. response to the alleged use of chemical weapons in Syria must be part of an international action, a senior U.S. Democratic senator, Jack Reed, said on Sunday."This has to be an international operation, it can't be a unilateral American approach," Reed said on CBS television's Face the Nation show. "It has to have support internationally, not just politically, but militarily," he said, adding that Washington could not get into a "general military operation in Syria."
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syria agreed Sunday to a U.N. investigation into last week's alleged chemical weapons attack outside Damascus — a deal a senior White House official dismissed as "too late to be credible," saying the United States has "very little doubt" President Bashar Assad's forces used such weapons.The hardening of the U.S. position came as calls for military action grow. In a sign the U.S. may be a step closer to an armed response, naval forces have already been dispatched toward Syria's coastal waters, although President Barack Obama has cautioned against a hasty decision.With France, Britain, Israel and some U.S. congressmen urging swift military action against Assad's regime if the use of chemical agents is confirmed, the U.N. team's conclusions could have a dramatic impact on the trajectory of the country's civil war.The agreement struck in Damascus calls for U.N. experts already in the country to begin an investigation Monday into the suspected chemical attack on rebel-held areas in the capital's eastern suburbs.Anti-government activists and Doctors Without Borders say that more than 300 people were killed in an artillery barrage by regime forces Wednesday that included the use of toxic gas. The government calls the allegations "absolutely baseless."The suburbs hit in the suspected chemical strike, collectively known as eastern Ghouta, are under the control of rebel fighters, and regime artillery and warplanes have pounded the area for days. The U.N. inspectors will have to traverse through both government-held and opposition-controlled turf to conduct their probe. Rebels have said they will help facilitate the visit.Under Sunday's agreement with the U.N., the Syrian government "affirmed that it will provide the necessary cooperation, including the observance of the cessation of hostilities at the locations related to the incident," U.N. spokesman Martin Nesirky said in a statement.In Washington, a senior administration official said the U.S. has "very little doubt" that regime forces used chemical weapons in Wednesday's attack, an assessment that was "based on the reported number of victims, reported symptoms of those who were killed or injured" as well as witness accounts and facts gathered by the U.S intelligence community.The official, who insisted on anonymity because of lack of authorization to speak publicly about the developments, was dismissive of the Syrian government's agreement to grant access to the U.N. team, saying it was "too late to be credible."The regime's continuing shelling of the site would have "significantly corrupted" any available evidence of chemical weapons, the official said.The U.N. team was in Syria to look into three earlier suspected chemical attacks, with a mandate to determine whether such weapons were used, not who was responsible for unleashing them. There was no indication that the mission's brief had been expanded to assess who was behind Wednesday's attack.Even as the pressure mounts for a strong international response, there is no guarantee that foreign powers will take action if the U.N. confirms chemical agents were used. But the scale of the attack makes this instance far harder to ignore than previous suspected cases.A senior State Department official, not authorized to comment publicly by name, said U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry spoke with the top diplomats of Britain, France, Canada and Russia as well as U.N. Secretary Ban Ki-Moon.The official said Kerry stressed that if the Syrian regime wanted to prove to the world that it had not used chemical weapons in this incident, it would have stopped shelling the area and granted immediate access five days ago.U.S. Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel offered no hints Sunday about likely U.S. responses, telling reporters traveling with him in Malaysia that the Obama administration was still assessing intelligence about Wednesday's attack."When we have more information, that answer will become clear," he said when a reporter asked whether it was a matter of when, not if, the U.S. will take military action against Syria."There are risks and consequences for any option that would be used or not used — for action or inaction," he told reporters. "You have to come to the central point of what would be the objective if you are to pursue an action or not pursue an action. So all those assessments are being made."The U.S. has about a dozen F-16 jets, a Patriot missile battery and as many as 1,000 American troops in Jordan, which all could also be used in any military action. U.S. administration and defense officials in recent days have said the most likely military move would be the launch of Tomahawk missiles off ships in the Mediterranean.U.S. senators John McCain and Lindsey Graham, who have criticized the Obama administration's hands-off approach to Syria, said in a joint statement that in light of the latest suspected chemical attack, "now is the time for decisive actions.""The United States must rally our friends and allies to take limited military actions in Syria that can change the balance of power on the ground and create conditions for a negotiated end to the conflict and an end to Assad's rule," the statement said.In Paris, French President Francois Hollande said a "body of evidence" suggests that chemical weapons were used during last week's attacks, and "everything" leads France to believe that the Assad regime was behind it.Conveying new urgency about the situation, Hollande's office said he spoke about Syria by telephone Sunday with Obama, as well as prime ministers David Cameron of Britain and Kevin Rudd of Australia. The White House said in a statement the two leaders discussed "possible responses by the international community and agreed to continue to consult closely."Just over a year ago, Obama called the use of chemical arms in Syria a "red line" that would carry "enormous consequences." Since then, U.S. intelligence believes that such weapons have been used on a small scale several times, but that has precipitated no major shift in American policy or substantial action against the Assad regime.So far, the U.S. has largely limited its support for the rebels to non-lethal supplies. In June, Washington said it would begin sending weapons to the rebels, although there's no indication that has happened yet.Russia, a close ally of the Assad regime, welcomed Syria's decision to allow a U.N. probe, and said the U.S. should await the findings and realize that a unilateral use of force would be a mistake.Foreign Ministry spokesman Alexander Lukashevich said Washington and European partners shouldn't take a "gamble" that could have "catastrophic consequences" for Syria and the region as a whole.In Damascus, Syrian Information Minister Omran al-Zoubi said the United States was using allegations of chemical attacks as an "excuse" to intervene in Syria, accusing Washington and Europe of turning a blind eye while Saudi Arabia and Turkey — both backers of the anti-Assad rebellion — provide chemical weapons to foreign jihadi fighters in Syria."The materials are coming from Saudi Arabia and Turkey," al-Zoubi said in an interview with The Associated Press in the Syrian capital, adding that foreign fighters were carrying out chemical attacks to implicate the Syrian government in hopes of prompting international military intervention."Instead of the Americans searching for the source of these chemical weapons in Saudi Arabia and Turkey, they wait for them to be used to give a pretext to intervene in Syria," he said.Iran, a close ally of the Assad regime, warned against a possible U.S. military move against Syria. The semi-official Fars news agency quoted Gen. Masoud Jazayeri as warning that "trespassing over the red line in Syria will have severe consequences for the White House." He did not elaborate.Doctors Without Borders said that three hospitals it supports in the area of the attack reported receiving roughly 3,600 patients with "neurotoxic symptoms" over a three-hour period Wednesday. Of those, 355 died, the Paris-based group said.That roughly coincided with the death toll given by the Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which tallied 322 killed. Casualty figures have varied widely over the alleged attack, from just over 300 to around 1,300 killed.Rebels on the ground outraged by the images coming out of the Damascus suburbs have also threatened to take forceful action.On Sunday, the head of an al-Qaida-linked Syrian rebel group vowed to target villages inhabited by members of Assad's minority Alawite sect to avenge the purported chemical weapons attack.In an audio recording posted on a website frequently used by Islamic extremists, Jabhat al-Nusra leader, Abu Mohammed al-Golani, said: "Revenge for the blood of your children is a debt to be paid back ... 1,000 rockets will be fired at them in revenge for the massacre of Ghouta."The authenticity of the claim could not be immediately verified.Lucas reported from Beirut. Associated Press writers Jamey Keaten in Paris, Jamal Halaby in Amman, Jordan, and Kimberly Dozier, Lolita C. Baldor and Matthew Lee in Washington contributed to this report.
LONDON — Britain said on Sunday that evidence of a chemical weapons attack in the suburbs of Damascus could have already been destroyed ahead of a visit to the site by U.N. inspectors.Earlier in the day Syria agreed to let experts from the United Nations on Monday visit the site of the reported poisonous gas attack which killed hundreds of people on Wednesday of last week."We have to be realistic now about what the U.N. team can achieve," Foreign Secretary William Hague told reporters."The fact is that much of the evidence could have been destroyed by that artillery bombardment. Other evidence could have degraded over the last few days and other evidence could have been tampered with," he said, referring to opposition activists' reports that the army has shelled the area in the last few days.Hague said that all evidence pointed towards the use of chemical weapons by the Syrian government, and that such attacks demanded a strong international response."We cannot in the 21st century allow the idea that chemical weapons can be used with impunity," Hague said. "We believe it's very important that there is a strong response and that dictators ... know that the use of chemical weapons is to cross a line and that the world will respond when that line is crossed."
PARIS — Three hospitals near Damascus reported 355 deaths after an alleged chemical attack last Wednesday out of around 3,600 admissions with neurotoxic symptoms, the medical charity Medecins Sans Frontieres (MSF) said on Saturday.The Syrian opposition has accused government forces of gassing hundreds of people on Wednesday by firing rockets that released deadly fumes into rebel-held Damascus suburbs, killing men, women and children as they slept.Opposition estimates for the death toll have ranged from 500 to well over double that number, but, with U.N. observers unable to visit the site, there has been no independent verification.MSF has no staff of its own in the Damascus region, but has been supporting hospitals and medical networks there since 2012."The reported symptoms of the patients, in addition to the epidemiological pattern of the events - characterized by the massive influx of patients in a short period of time, the origin of the patients, and the contamination of medical and first aid workers - strongly indicate mass exposure to a neurotoxic agent," MSF director of operations Bart Janssens said in a statement."This would constitute a violation of international humanitarian law, which absolutely prohibits the use of chemical and biological weapons."Janssens said MSF could not confirm the cause of the symptoms or say who was responsible for the attack, but that it had sent 7,000 vials of atropine - an antidote against nerve agents.
WASHINGTON — Secretary of State John Kerry laid the groundwork on Monday for possible military action against the Syrian government over a chemical weapons attack, implicating President Bashar al-Assad's forces in a "moral obscenity."In the most forceful U.S. reaction yet to last week's gas attack outside Damascus, Kerry said President Barack Obama "believes there must be accountability for those who would use the world's most heinous weapons against the world's most vulnerable people."Kerry spoke after U.N. chemical weapons experts interviewed and took blood samples from victims of the attack in a rebel-held suburb of Syria's capital, after the inspectors themselves survived sniper fire that hit their convoy."What we saw in Syria last week should shock the conscience of the world," Kerry told reporters. "Let me be clear: The indiscriminate slaughter of civilians, the killing of women and children and innocent bystanders by chemical weapons is a moral obscenity."Kerry's tough language marked an increased effort by the administration not only to point the finger at Assad's government but to prepare the war-weary American public for a potential military response.He accused the Syrian rulers of acting like they had something to hide by blocking the U.N. inspectors' visit to the scene for days and shelling the area."Our sense of basic humanity is offended not only by this cowardly crime, but also by the cynical attempt to cover it up," Kerry said.Information gathered so far, including videos and accounts from the ground, indicate that the use of chemical weapons in Syria was "undeniable," Kerry said, adding that it was the Syrian government that maintained custody of the weapons and had the rockets capable of delivering them.There were mounting signs that the United States and Western allies were edging closer to a military response over the incident, which took place a year after Obama declared the use of chemical weapons a "red line" that would require strong action.Obama, who withdrew troops from Iraq and is winding down U.S. involvement in Afghanistan, has been reluctant to intervene in two and a half years of civil war in Syria.A Reuters/Ipsos poll published on Saturday showed about 60 percent of Americans opposed U.S. military intervention, while only 9 percent thought Obama should act.However, with his international credibility seen increasingly on the line, Obama could opt for limited measures such as cruise missile strikes to punish Assad and seek to deter further chemical attacks, without dragging Washington deeper into the war.The United States has started a naval buildup in the region to be ready for Obama's decision, and an administration official said Obama's aides were continuing a series of high-level meetings to determine a course of action.Kerry stopped short of explicitly blaming the Syrian government for the gas attack but strongly implied that no one else could have been behind it and said the United States had "additional information it would provide in the days ahead.White House spokesman Jay Carney said there was "very little doubt" that the Syrian government was to blame but that Obama had not yet decided how to respond.The administration has not set a timeline for responding but officials are preparing options for Obama with a sense of urgency, the State Department said.Kerry said the administration, which has reached out to foreign allies to coordinate a response, was "actively consulting" members of Congress, though some lawmakers said they had not been fully informed. Republicans in particular have long pressed Obama to act more forcefully against Assad.A spokesman for John Boehner, the Republican Speaker of the House of Representatives, said Boehner had not been consulted before he had "preliminary communication" with the White House about the situation in Syria on Monday afternoon. Boehner told the White House it must present "clearly defined objectives."A U.S. security source said that as of Monday, Washington and its allies still did not have conclusive scientific evidence that the attack involved chemical weapons, and that such proof could take days or weeks to gather.But sources said while the evidence may be "circumstantial," U.S. intelligence has "high confidence" that chemical weapons were used by Assad's forces."Intelligence agencies are still analyzing data and information related to the attack and are preparing a final assessment for the president," an intelligence official said.
UNITED NATIONS — The United Nations said on Monday it was still possible for a U.N. team of chemical weapons experts to gather evidence necessary to investigate last week's alleged gas attack in suburbs east of Damascus, despite the lapse of time."Despite the passage of a number of days, the Secretary-General (Ban Ki-moon) is confident that the team will be able to obtain and analyze evidence relevant for its investigation of the 21 August incident," U.N. spokesman Farhan Haq told reporters. The U.N. team visited the site on Monday.Britain said on Sunday that evidence of the attack, which is believed to have killed hundreds of people, could have already been destroyed ahead of a visit to the site by U.N. inspectors.
BEIRUT — Four mortar shells hit the historic Old City of Syria's capital Damascus on Monday, wounding several people and damaging an Armenian church, state news channel El Ikhbariya reported.Damascus's Old City, a world heritage site, has escaped the worst of the fighting, but has been damaged by a number of clashes and stray shells. Many other historic sites have been looted or destroyed during the country's 2-1/2-year-old civil war.
DAMASCUS — A team of United Nations chemical weapons inspectors returned to their hotel in Damascus on Monday after visiting one of the sites of an alleged poison gas attack, a Reuters witness said.The six-car convoy went to the Damascus suburb of Mouadamiya where the inspectors visited wounded people and took samples.
BEIRUT — United Nations chemical weapons experts entered a Damascus suburb hit by an apparent chemical weapons attack and are now testing the victims, a doctor in the rebel-held town of Mouadimiya said on Monday."I am with the team now, we are in the Rawda Mosque and they are meeting with the wounded. Our medics and the inspectors are talking to the patients and taking samples from the victims now," Abu Karam, speaking from his mobile, told Reuters.
BEIRUT — Syria blamed rebel forces for the attack on a U.N. team trying to enter the site of an alleged poison gas strike, state television said on Monday, after the United Nations said the inspectors were fired at by unidentified assailants.Syria TV, citing an Information Ministry source, said the international experts were shot at by "terrorists", a term it commonly uses to describe rebels trying to topple President Bashar al-Assad."The Syrian government will hold the armed terrorist groups responsible for the safety of the members of the United Nations team," the source added, according to state television.
PARIS — The French foreign minister says there will be a "proportionate response" to the alleged chemical weapons attack in a Damascus suburb that he blamed on Syria's government."It will be negotiated in coming days," Foreign Minister Laurent Fabius told Europe 1 radio on Monday. Fabius acknowledged that the lack of a U.N. blessing was problematic. "All the options are open. The only option that I can't imagine would be to do nothing."Syria's government agreed to allow U.N. experts already in the country to begin an investigation Monday into the suspected chemical attack on rebel-held areas in the capital's eastern suburbs. Anti-government activists and Doctors Without Borders say that more than 300 people were killed in an artillery barrage by regime forces Wednesday that included the use of toxic gas.
DAMASCUS, Syria — U.N. experts collected samples and testimony from Syrian doctors and victims of an alleged chemical weapons attack Monday following a treacherous journey through government and rebel-held territory, where their convoy was hit by snipers.As U.S. officials said there was very little doubt that Syria used chemical weapons and Western powers stepped up calls for swift military action, President Bashar Assad's government vowed to defend itself against any international attack, warning that such an intervention would ignite turmoil across the region.It also would bring the U.S. closer to a conflict that has killed more than 100,000 people since Assad cracked down on Arab Spring-inspired protesters in March 2011.Syria's civil war has been increasingly defined by sectarian killings between the Sunni-led rebellion and Assad's regime, dominated by Alawites, an offshoot of Shiite Islam.It would essentially pit the U.S. and regional allies Saudi Arabia, Turkey and Qatar in a proxy war against Iran, which is providing weapons to the Syrian government's counterinsurgency, along with Hezbollah, the militant Lebanese group that also has aided Assad's forces militarily.Deputy Foreign Minister Faysal Mikdad told The Associated Press in an interview in Damascus that such an attack would trigger "chaos in the entire world.""If individual countries want to pursue aggressive and adventurous policies, the natural answer ... would be that Syria, which has been fighting against terrorism for almost three years, will also defend itself against any international attack," he added.Assad told a Russian newspaper that any military campaign against his country was destined to fail.It's also unclear what U.S. action would mean for relations with Russia, which warned Monday against the use of force not sanctioned by the U.N. Security Council, calling it "a crude violation of international law."Support for some sort of international military response was likely to grow if it is confirmed that Assad's regime was responsible for the Aug. 21 attack in the Damascus suburbs that activists say killed hundreds of people. The group Doctors Without Borders put the death toll at 355.U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry said chemical weapons were used in Syria and he accused Assad's regime of destroying evidence. He said the U.S. has additional information about the attack and will make it public in the days ahead."The indiscriminate slaughter of civilians, the killing of women and children and innocent bystanders by chemical weapons is a moral obscenity. By any standard, it is inexcusable and — despite the excuses and equivocations that some have manufactured — it is undeniable," said Kerry, the highest-ranking U.S. official to confirm the attack."This international norm cannot be violated without consequences," he said.Assad has denied launching a chemical attack, blaming the rebels instead, and has authorized a U.N. team of experts currently in Syria to investigate, although the U.S. said it was a step that came "too late to be credible."Snipers opened fire on the U.N. convoy, hitting one of the vehicles carrying a team on its way to investigate the Aug. 21 incident.Martin Nesirky, a spokesman for U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon, said one of the U.N. vehicles was "deliberately shot at multiple times" in the buffer zone between rebel- and government-controlled territory, adding that the team was safe.Nesirky said the car was "no longer serviceable" after the shooting, forcing the team to return to a government checkpoint to replace the vehicle. U.N. spokesman Farhan Haq said the tires and windshield were hit, but the window was not shattered, and the team plans to go out again Tuesday to do more sampling.Ban said he had instructed U.N. disarmament chief Angela Kane in Damascus "to register a strong complaint" with both the Syrian government and opposition representatives for the convoy attack.The Syrian government said its forces provided security for the team until they reached a position controlled by the rebels, where the government claimed the sniper attack occurred. The main Syrian opposition group in exile, the Syrian National Coalition, said members of a pro-government militia known as the Popular Committees fired at the U.N. team to prevent them from going in.The rebel coalition said the shots occurred near the final checkpoint between rebel and regime-controlled areas, calling it an attempt "to intimidate the U.N. team and prevent it from discovering the truth about Assad's chemical weapons attack against civilians."Activists said the inspectors eventually arrived in Moadamiyeh, a western suburb of Damascus and one of the areas where the alleged chemical attack occurred.Wassim al-Ahmad, a member of the Moadamiyeh local council, said five U.N. investigators spent three hours at a makeshift hospital meeting with doctors and victims still suffering symptoms from the alleged chemical attack, taking blood, hair and tissue samples before returning to Damascus."They are late. They came six days late," said al-Ahmad, referring to the time it took the U.N. team to arrive. "All the people have already been buried," he added via Skype, after returning from the hospital where he witnessed the U.N. visit.The sounds of explosions could be heard in the background. Al-Ahmad said heavy shelling resumed as soon as the U.N. experts left the area following a lull.In videos uploaded by the Moadamiyeh media office, U.N. inspectors in blue helmets and body armor were seen interviewing hospital patients."After the shells landed, I went downstairs and ... felt dizzy. I fell down, nauseous. Everything became distorted," one bearded man was seen telling the U.N. official.One video showed a man lying on a stretcher in the presence of U.N. experts and doctors in the room, his legs twitching uncontrollably. In another, a U.N. expert was seen conducting tests on a missile.The U.S., France, Britain and Israel said a military response against the Syrian regime should be an option. Germany suggested for the first time it may support the use of force if a chemical weapons attack is confirmed."The suspected large-scale use of poison gas breaks a taboo even in this Syrian conflict that has been so full of cruelty," according to Steffen Seibert, a spokesman for Chancellor Angela Merkel.U.S. Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel, speaking to reporters after meeting with his Indonesian counterpart, said the Obama administration "is considering all different options," and that "if there is any action taken, it will be in concert with the international community and within the framework of a legal justification."French Foreign Minister Laurent Fabius said "all the options are open. The only option that I can't imagine would be to do nothing."Russia said Western nations calling for military action have no proof the Syrian government was behind any chemical attacks.Syrian activists and opposition leaders have said that between 322 and 1,300 people were killed in the alleged chemical attack.Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov said the countries calling for military action have assumed the role of "both investigators and the U.N. Security Council" in probing the incident.Lavrov likened the situation in Syria to the period before the U.S.-led invasion of Iraq in 2003. He said "the use of force without a sanction of the U.N. Security Council is a crude violation of the international law."Assad told the Russian newspaper Izvestia that accusations his troops used chemicals were "politically motivated.""This is nonsense," Assad was quoted as saying. "First they level the accusations, and only then they start collecting evidence."Assad said attacking such an area with chemical weapons would not make sense for the government, because there was no clear front line between regime and rebel forces."How can the government use chemical weapons, or any other weapons of mass destruction, in an area where its troops are situated?" he asked.Commenting on a possible strike by the U.S., Assad said: "They can start a war but they will not know where it will spread or how it will end. Superpowers can launch wars but they cannot win them."Asked what the U.S. would face in any intervention, Assad answered: "What it suffered in all its wars from Vietnam until now: Failure."Karam reported from Beirut. Associated Press writers Albert Aji in Damascus, Bassem Mroue in Beirut, Nataliya Vasilyeva in Moscow, Matthew Lee and Julie Pace in Washington, John Heilprin in Geneva, Robert Reid in Berlin, Peter Spielmann in New York contributed to this report
WASHINGTON — The White House ruled out any military effort to oust Syrian President Bashar al-Assad from power on Tuesday as President Barack Obama ponders options in response to last week's chemical weapons attack in Syria."The options that we are considering are not about regime change," said White House spokesman Jay Carney. "They are about responding to a clear violation of an international standard that prohibits the use of chemical weapons."Obama is considering cruise missile strikes against Syrian targets in response to the August 21 chemical weapons attack that U.S. officials are increasingly confident was launched by the Syrian government.Carney said the United States expects to release in coming days a public version of a formal report by the U.S. intelligence community on the use of chemical weapons. The report is expected to conclude the Syrian government was responsible for the attack.Any attempt at "regime change" by the United States would draw the United States deeply into a conflict that Obama has been determined to avoid. The president has already ruled out putting U.S. troops on the ground in Syria.The United States wants Assad to leave power, but as part of a negotiated political settlement with the Syrian rebels.Carney said the United States has a variety of options from which to use, not just military options. Most of the talk about Syria in recent days, however, has been about a limited cruise missile attack.Carney reiterated that Obama had not made a decision on how the United States will respond to what it believes was an attack on civilians by the Syrian government."When the president has an announcement to make, he'll make it," Carney said.
LONDON — British Prime Minister David Cameron said on Tuesday that any military action against Syria must be specific and not entail being dragged into a wider Middle East conflict."This is not about getting involved in a Middle Eastern war or changing our stance in Syria or going further into that conflict," Cameron told reporters in his first public comments on the matter. "It's about chemical weapons. Their use is wrong and the world shouldn't stand idly by."
LONDON — Prime Minister David Cameron is recalling members of Britain's lower house of parliament from their summer break to give them a chance to discuss how best to respond to a suspected chemical attack in Syria, a spokesman from his office said on Tuesday."There will be a government motion and a vote," the spokesman told Reuters, adding that parliament would convene on Thursday. Holidaying lawmakers had not been due to resume their work until Monday, September 2.
BEIRUT — Syria will press on with its military efforts despite any potential foreign strikes on its territory, the foreign minister said on Tuesday, adding that any strike would serve the interest of al Qaeda-linked rebel groups."The (government's) military effort will not stop around Damascus. If the purpose is to limit the victories of our armed forces, they will not be successful," Walid Moualem told a news conference.
BEIRUT — Any foreign strike on Syria to try to create a balance of power in the war between President Bashar al-Assad's forces and the rebels is "delusional", the foreign minister said on Tuesday."If the purpose of a possible (foreign) military strike is to achieve a balance of power ... it's delusional and not at all possible," Walid Moualem told a news conference.
WASHINGTON — Vice President Joe Biden said on Tuesday the Syrian government was clearly responsible for a chemical weapons attack against civilians last week and that it must be held accountable for the "heinous" action."There is no doubt who is responsible for this heinous use of chemical weapons in Syria: the Syrian regime," Biden said in a speech to the American Legion, a veterans' group, in Houston."Those who use chemical weapons against defenseless men, women and children should and must be held accountable," Biden said.The White House said on Tuesday that President Barack Obama had not yet decided how the United States would respond to the attack, which occurred in a suburb of Damascus that is held by rebels fighting to oust President Bashar al-Assad.
(Reuters) - Western forces could attack Syria within days, the United States and its allies have told rebels fighting President Bashar al-Assad, in order to punish the Syrian government for a deadly poison gas attack that killed hundreds of civilians.The Syrian government and the opposition have accused each other of using chemical weapons, and both have denied doing so. Activists say hundreds of civilians were killed in the rebel-held suburbs of Damascus on Wednesday, possibly by the nerve gas sarin or something similar.U.N. investigators, who arrived in Damascus on August 18 to investigate several previous allegations of chemical weapons use during the two-year civil war in Syria, visited the site of the latest attack on Monday to take samples and are due to return again on Wednesday.The U.N. inquiry, led by Swedish scientist Ake Sellstrom, is trying to establish only whether chemical weapons were used, not who used them. U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon appointed Sellstrom in March, but diplomatic wrangling and concerns over safety prevented his team from entering Syria until this month.Here are some facts about sarin, how it kills and what level of evidence it will take to prove definitively it was used on the Syrian people.Sarin is a man-made nerve gas that was originally developed as a pesticide in Germany in 1938. It is chemically similar to a class of pesticides known as organophosphates.Sarin, also known as GB, is part of a class of chemical weapons called G-series nerve agents that were developed during World War Two and were named for the German scientists who synthesized them. Other agents in the class include tabun, soman and cyclosarin.At room temperature, G-series nerve agents are volatile liquids, with sarin being the most volatile.Sarin is a clear, colorless and tasteless liquid that has no odor in its pure form. It is made up of four common chemical compounds: dimethyl methylphosphonate, phosphorus trichloride, sodium fluoride and alcohol.Exposure usually occurs when the liquid form comes in contact with the skin or the agent is released as a vapor.WHEN HAS IT BEEN USED?Sarin and other nerve agents may have been used in chemical warfare during the Iran-Iraq war in the 1980s.The Japanese cult Aum Shinrikyo used sarin in two attacks in Japan. In 1994, the group released sarin gas in Matsumoto in central Japan, in a failed attempt to kill three judges. In that attack, the group used a refrigerator truck to release the nerve agent and a wind dispersed the gas in a residential neighborhood. Eight people were killed and hundreds were hospitalized. The next year, the same group carried six newspaper-wrapped packages on to five subway trains, poked them with umbrella tips, releasing sarin. In that attack, 12 commuters were killed and more than 5,000 were injured.HOW DOES IT KILL?Sarin acts primarily by interfering with the neurotransmitter acetylcholine, which acts as an off switch for glands and muscles. Blocking that switch results in over-stimulation of muscles.The extent of poisoning depends on how much chemical a person was exposed to and for how long. Exposure to sarin vapors can trigger symptoms within a few seconds; exposure to liquid sarin can take a few minutes to as much as 18 hours to cause symptoms.Large doses of sarin can cause loss of consciousness, convulsions, paralysis and respiratory failure and death. Low doses can cause a range of symptoms, from a runny nose and watery eyes, to drooling, excessive sweating, nausea and vomiting.Because sarin evaporates quickly, it presents an immediate but short-lived threat. According to biosecurity expert Sean Kaufman of Emory University's Center for Public Health Preparedness and Research, its ability to disperse quickly makes it hard to trace, but sarin does leave remnants in the area where it was used.The use of sarin is extremely difficult to prove, said Charles Blair, a terrorism expert at the Federation of American Scientists and a columnist for the Bulletin of the Atomic Scientists. To get good evidence that sarin was used, investigators need soil, blood or hair samples directly from the area of attack or its victims, he said.Weapons inspectors reinforce that view. According to the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons, which works on inspections with the United Nations, inspectors will only determine whether banned chemical agents were used if they can gain access to sites and take soil, blood, urine or tissue samples and examine them in certified laboratories.Syria in July acknowledged for the first time that it had chemical and biological weapons, saying they could be used if the country faced foreign intervention. It said earlier this year it would not use chemical arms against its own citizens, or even against Israel.Since the early 1980s, Syria has made efforts to acquire and maintain an arsenal of chemical weapons following defeats in wars against Israel in 1967, 1973 and 1982 and the Jewish state's development of nuclear weapons.Syria is one of seven countries that have not joined the 1997 convention banning chemical weapons. Western countries believe it has stockpiles of undeclared mustard gas, sarin and VX nerve agents.According to Global Security, which collects published intelligence reports and other data, there are four suspected chemical weapons sites in Syria - one just north of Damascus; the second near the industrial city of Homs; the third in Hama, believed to be producing VX agents in addition to sarin and tabun; and a fourth near the Mediterranean port of Latakia.SOURCES: The U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; Center for Biosecurity at UPMC; www.medscape.com; Www.globalsecurity.org
DAMASCUS, Syria — Even in the capital of a country torn apart by civil war, Syrians have to find some way to enjoy themselves on a hot summer weekend.So the pool at a Damascus luxury hotel was packed on a recent afternoon. The children playing in the water paid no attention to the frequent thump of artillery and shells from fighting on the city outskirts."This part of Damascus, the center, is like Paris. But beyond that, you don't go," said a 26-year-old bank employee, lounging on the deck with his buddies, who took puffs from a thick cigar they passed among themselves. Like several others who spoke to The Associated Press, he talked on condition he not be identified, wary about drawing the attention of either side in the conflict.Not that the center is entirely safe. Just a day earlier, a mortar fired by rebels on the city edges landed just a block from the hotel, across the street from a church, knocking a chunk off the balcony of an apartment building. A few days later, on Monday, another mortar hit a neighboring mosque, cracking its minaret and killing a passer-by.The veneer of normalcy is thin in Damascus, the stronghold of President Bashar Assad's rule, at a time when a conflict that has dragged on more for than 2 1/2 years nears a potentially crucial juncture: possible U.S. and Western airstrikes against the Syrian military in retaliation for an alleged chemical weapons attack last week.Firmly in the hands of the state and the military, the capital has been spared the widespread destruction wreaked on battle zone cities such as Aleppo and the rebel-held districts on Damascus' outskirts. Instead, the city of around 2 million feels small and hemmed in.For much of the conflict, it has been cut off from its hinterland, the densely populated towns and villages that surround it in the area known as "Rif Dimashq," or "the Damascus Countryside." Rebels have controlled most of the Rif since last year, and regime forces have launched repeated assaults trying to dislodge them, devastating the area.Nearly daily last week, military artillery stationed on Qassioun Mountain, the plateau that overlooks the capital from the north, bombarded the rebel-held suburbs east of the capital, just a 20-minute drive from downtown.The shelling sent booming echoes across the city, raising the occasional plume of smoke in the east. Rebels in the Rif responded with rounds of mortars that fell into Damascus's eastern neighborhoods.In the middle-class district of East Tijara, a 70-year-old retired government employee looked glumly at the burned-out husk of his 1993 Volvo, which took a direct mortar hit only a half-hour earlier. A hole in the crumpled roof showed the impact, the interior was mangled and charred."We'll have to throw it out," he sighed. "It's the only car I have."The rebel-held area of Jobar is only a few blocks away, on the other side of a main boulevard. Beyond it stretches the East Ghouta region, where last week's alleged chemical attack took place, killing hundreds. There, the destruction is far more extensive.Once, the Rif Dimashq was intimately linked to the capital. Farms in Ghouta provided much of Damascus' produce and dairy products. Many Damascenes would go on days off to Ghouta for family barbeques in its gardens and fields.Now, residents of the capital talk of it like a zone of death, where no one dares to go."We used to have the life of princes and kings. Better than princes and kings," said Abboud Mardini, who runs a grocery store in East Tijara. "We would go out at 10 p.m., come home at 2 or 3 in the morning. ... Not anymore."Hanging over everyone are the country's economic woes — the Syrian pound has dropped in value, to nearly 200 to the dollar in the black market, compared to 50 before the conflict.That's just one factor fueling inflation. Officials have said industrial and agricultural production has been cut in half because of fighting. Transport around the country has become more difficult, with roads cut off.Mardini said he used to get the yoghurt he sells from the northern city of Aleppo, but that source has been cut off by the months-long battle for control there between government forces and rebels.So now he only gets a trickle of supplies from the central city of Hama. And yoghurt that used to go for 60 pounds a canister now goes for 225.Still, the city maintains a determined liveliness. Damascenes still go out at night to sit at the city's outdoor cafes, particularly in the upper-class districts, which are nestled in central areas more insulated from the outskirts.But they head home around 10 p.m., cautious of staying out too late.During the day, traffic is heavy. But in a sign of the conflict, checkpoints are set up on most major intersections and at entrances to each neighborhood, manned by soldiers or civilian defense groups. They search through the lined-up cars, popping open hoods and checking IDs to prevent weapons smuggling or car bombs, which have struck repeatedly in the city's heart.At one checkpoint at an intersection near the outer district of Qusaa, a young soldier said their position came under fire several weeks ago from rebels who infiltrated into the city, using a building on the other side of a nearby graveyard to shoot down at them. They stormed the building and drove them out, but were unable to catch the rebels, he said.The soldier, who refused to be identified in accordance with military rules, was a member of Syria's Shiite minority, and said his home village up in the northern province of Idlib, by the Turkish border, was surrounded by rebels.The city has also been swamped by an influx of Syrians fleeing from war-torn parts of the country, particularly the Rif. Some move in with relatives, while others search for apartments, causing a spike in rents. The poorest set up tents in highway medians and city parks. With little to do, displaced families wander through the city's historic Souq al-Hamediya market."They just look, they never buy," said Hassan al-Qadi, a gold-seller in the Souq. His business has plunged as residents concentrate on buying the essentials and avoid luxuries. His main clients now are people who have some extra money they want to protect — but they buy raw gold from him, not anything with workmanship, so his profit margins are lower."It used to be that people bought gold when they got married. But now they just buy the fake stuff," al-Qadi said. "At most they'll buy a ring."
LONDON — British Foreign Secretary William Hague said on Wednesday the motion on how to respond to an alleged chemical attack in Syria to be considered by parliament on Thursday was consistent with the approach adopted by the government so far."This motion, that we're putting to the House of Commons tomorrow, endorses the government's consistent approach that we must be prepared to take action against the use of chemical weapons by the Assad regime, to deter the future use of chemical weapons," Hague told the BBC.
WASHINGTON — The Obama administration is considering military options that include multi-day strikes on Syrian government targets in response to last week's chemical weapons attack, a senior U.S. official said on Wednesday."The options are not limited to just one day," the official said, speaking on condition of anonymity, as the prospects for a U.S.-led air and missile assault on Syria looked all but certain.Though the White House said President Barack Obama had yet to make a final decision on exactly how to respond, U.S. security officials have said that any air campaign would likely involve cruise missiles fired from U.S. warships in the Mediterranean.But the United States does not intend to act unilaterally should it choose to go forward with military action, the senior official said. "We're talking to a number of different allies regarding participation," the official said.Obama, who has long been wary of any intervention in Syria's civil war, has been consulting allied leaders to lay the groundwork for action aimed at punishing Syrian President Bashar al-Assad's government for last Wednesday's gas attack near Damascus.U.S. intelligence agencies were assembling what they are sure to say is final confirmation of the Syrian government's culpability for the chemical weapons attack, and the White House said their report would be completed this week. Assad's government has denied responsibility.A second administration official said the United States was still defining its objectives but that strikes to deter Assad from using chemical weapons in the future and degrade his ability to do so were under consideration.White House spokesman Jay Carney said on Tuesday that a U.S. response would not have the goal of "regime change" in Syria, suggesting that Obama remains cautious about getting too deeply involved in the conflict. Polls show most Americans oppose U.S. intervention.Republican U.S. Senator John McCain, a harsh critic of Obama's Syria policy, rejected that limited goal."This conflict cannot be contained within Syria, and we have to understand that and that's why we've got to help these people get rid of Bashar al-Assad, to get the momentum back on their side," he said on MSNBC.
DAMASCUS — Syrians in the capital Damascus are racing against time to prepare for a foreign strike, with many hoarding supplies and others scrambling to find accommodation further away from potential military targets.In a city where dozens of military sites are mixed in among the civilian population, many worry Damascus could become an especially dangerous place should a Western-led strike come in response to the apparent use of chemical weapons last week that killed hundreds in the suburbs.At grocery stores, shoppers loaded up on bread, dried goods and canned foods, fearing they may face shortages if a strike hits the city. The items most in demand were batteries and water.Nearby, a nurse idled in a clinic - empty as nearly no one showed up for their appointments on Wednesday - and raised the question on the mind of so many locals."We live in the capital. Every turn, every street, every neighborhood has some government target. Where do we hide?"Syrians have faced daily bloodshed and the constant threat of shelling and car bombs in their country's 2-1/2-year civil war, which began as peaceful protests against President Bashar al-Assad and has since killed over 100,000 people.Now those who did not leave worry they have no place to hide."I'm starting to see the fear in people's eyes," said one resident named Rula, speaking by phone. "People have been in the habit of stocking extra food since the conflict began, but now people are buying huge amounts of food and water."Around Damascus, many banks were crowded with people, and dozens queued at cash machines.Amid the gloomy mood, some Assad loyalists tried to stir a sense of patriotism. Hummers drove around the neighborhoods of central Damascus blaring nationalist songs. Young people painted cement road blocks with the Syrian flag.On the capital's outskirts, residents living in districts such as Hameh, Jumraya and Qudsiya were especially nervous - they are the site of several military research facilities and weapons caches, in addition to military bases.Areas surrounding Jumraya have been hit twice by Israeli strikes in the past year. The second, in May, triggered dramatic orange-flamed blasts in the night sky.Zaina, from Hameh, said her family and many of their neighbors were packing their bags and looking to rent houses."They're trying to get as far as they can from military sites. People are going to places like Mashrou Dummar or the Old City - anything that is more of a civilian area," she said.Residents say it is already getting harder and harder to find a place to rent. Zaina said her family got lucky - a friend who had already emigrated lent them his house in a safer area."But what about my friend?" she wondered. "Her whole family lives in this neighborhood. There is no place for them to go."
LONDON — Britain's National Security Council unanimously backed action against Syria in response to a suspected chemical weapons attack, Prime Minister David Cameron said on Wednesday, a day after he set out the case for a targeted military strike."The NSC (National Security Council) agreed unanimously that the use of chemical weapons by (Syrian President) Assad was unacceptable - and the world should not stand by," Cameron said on his official Twitter feed after a meeting of the high-level security body.A spokeswoman from Cameron's office said the NSC had agreed on a specific recommendation that would be put to government ministers on Thursday morning before parliament debated and voted on Britain's response.Cameron's office declined to say what the recommendation was, but a government source said a military strike was one of the options being considered by the NSC. A spokesman for the prime minister said on Tuesday that plans for a possible military response were being drafted.Unusually, every government minister who attended the NSC had spoken, the same government source said, adding that the attorney general had offered advice on the legality of any action, Britain's top soldier on the military aspect, and that a senior civil servant had supplied an intelligence briefing."There was discussion about what it would mean for the UK's role in the world if others acted and we didn't," the source told Reuters. "Ministers spoke about the need to be clear about the risks of inaction," the source added, saying there was an awareness that any action carried certain risks.
PARIS — The French parliament will hold an extraordinary session on Wednesday to discuss the situation in Syria, government spokeswoman Najat Vallaud-Belkacem said."The president has taken the decision to summon parliament on Wednesday to assess the situation in Syria," she said following a cabinet meeting.President Francois Hollande said on Tuesday that parliament would be informed as soon as possible about decisions on any action in Syria.
LONDON — The Archbishop of Canterbury has urged British Prime Minister David Cameron not to "rush to judgment" over military action in Syria, warning it could have unforeseeable consequences across the Muslim world.Justin Welby's comments were published in the Daily Telegraph newspaper before meeting of Britain's National Security Council on Wednesday which Cameron will chair.Parliament will debate Britain's response to chemical weapons attacks in Syria on Thursday after Cameron cut short his holiday and recalled lawmakers (MPs) to address the issue.Welby, leader of the 80-million-member Anglican church, said members of parliament must be sure about the facts before acting in what is a "really delicate and dangerous situation."The things MPs will have to bear in mind in what is going to be a very very difficult debate is firstly: are we sure about the facts on the ground?" he said."Secondly: is it possible to have a carefully calibrated response, including armed force, if you are sure about the facts on the ground, that does not have unforeseeable ramifications across the whole Arab and Muslim world?"He acknowledged that people outside government, including himself, did not know what the true situation in Syria was."The government and the Americans are seeing intelligence nobody else sees - I just think we have to be very careful about rushing to judgment," he said.Adding that the situation is enormously complex, he reflected on the mood of Christians across the region."I think the overwhelming sense is of a really moving and terrible sense of fear about what might be happening in the next few weeks," he said.The impact on people not directly involved in the fighting is "beyond description and horrible".
BEIRUT — A team of United Nations inspectors reached rebel-held territory outside Damascus on Wednesday, opposition activists said, and would soon begin a second day of investigating the sites of an alleged chemical weapons attack that killed hundreds of people."They have reached the town of Maleiha and are now with the rebel escorts, soon they will head to towns where the strikes happened and begin their inspections," said activist Salam Mohammed, speaking via Skype.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Fears of a possible U.S. strike against Syria's regime over an alleged chemical weapons attack rippled across the region Wednesday, as about 6,000 Syrians fled to neighboring Lebanon in a 24-hour period and Israelis scrambled for gas masks in case Damascus retaliates against them.U.N. chief Ban Ki-moon pleaded for more time for diplomacy and to allow U.N. investigators to complete their work. The experts, wearing flak jackets and helmets, collected blood and urine samples from victims during a visit to at least one of the areas hit in last week's attack.Seven days after chemical weapons were purportedly unleashed on rebel-held suburbs of the Syrian capital, momentum grew toward Western military action against President Bashar Assad's regime. At the same time, Syria's chief allies, Russia and Iran, warned of dire consequences for the region if any armed intervention is undertaken.U.S. leaders, including Vice President Joe Biden, have charged that Assad's government was behind the Aug. 21 attack that Doctors Without Borders says killed at least 355 people. The White House says it's planning a possible military response while seeking support from international partners.The U.S. has not presented concrete proof of Syrian regime involvement in the attack, and U.N. inspectors have not endorsed the allegations, although the U.N. envoy to Syria, Lakhdar Brahimi, said evidence suggests some kind of "substance" was used that killed hundreds.Two senior Obama administration officials said U.S. intelligence agencies are drawing up a report laying out the evidence against Assad's government. The classified version would be sent to key members of Congress and a declassified version would be made public.One of the officials said the administration is considering more than a single set of military strikes and "the options are not limited just to one day" of assault."If there is action taken, it must be clearly defined what the objective is and why" and based on "clear facts," the senior administration official said on condition of anonymity because he wasn't authorized to discuss internal deliberations publicly.President Barack Obama is weighing a limited response that focuses on punishing the Syrian government for violating international agreements that bar the use of chemical weapons. Any U.S. military action, officials say, would not be aimed at toppling the Assad regime or vastly altering the course of Syria's civil war, which has already claimed 100,000 dead.As the U.S., France and Britain push for military action, the U.N. secretary-general urged restraint to give U.N. inspectors time to finish their investigation, which began Monday."Let them conclude ... their work for four days and then we will have to analyze scientifically" their findings and send a report to the U.N. Security Council, Ban said. The U.N. said the analysis would be done "as quickly as possible."Syria's Ambassador to the U.N., Bashar Ja'afari, said he sent Ban a letter demanding that the inspectors extend their investigation to what he described as three chemical weapons attacks against Syrian soldiers in the Damascus suburbs. He said the attacks occurred on Aug. 22, 24, and 25, and that dozens of Syrian soldiers are current being treated for inhaling nerve gases.Ja'afari also blamed the rebels for any chemical weapons attack, saying "the Syrian government is innocent of these allegations."Ban pleaded for more time to give diplomacy another chance to end Syria's conflict. Marking the centenary of a venue for peaceful conflict resolution in The Hague, Netherlands, he said: "Here in the Peace Palace, let us say: Give peace a chance. Give diplomacy a chance. Stop fighting and start talking."But with many seeing Western intervention no longer a question of if but when, there were signs of growing fears across the wider region.At least 6,000 Syrians crossed into Lebanon in a 24-hour period through the main Masnaa crossing, including an estimated 4,000 on Wednesday, according to Lebanese security officials in the country's Bekaa Valley near the border. The normal daily influx is 500 to 1,000 refugees, depending on the level of fighting. The officials spoke on condition of anonymity in line with regulations.Long lines of packed cars — some with suitcases strapped to roofs — were backed up at the frontier post, witnesses said. A security official said about 2,000 also crossed into Syria, but many of them said they were going in to evacuate relatives.One woman, Um Ahmad, entered Lebanon with her five children, saying she fearing U.S. strikes on Damascus."Isn't it enough, all the violence and fighting that we already have in the country, now America wants to bomb us, too?" the 45-year-old said, declining to give her full name for security concerns.Her husband said they know no one in Lebanon but came anyway because of their children. "What will we do here, where will we go? I don't know, but hopefully we'll be safe," he added.Nearly 2 million Syrians have fled the country since the crisis began in March 2011, and millions more are displaced inside Syria.Effects were also evident in Israel, where large crowds lined up at gas-mask distribution centers. Maya Avishai of the Israeli postal service, which oversees gas mask distribution, said demand has tripled in recent days. About 5 million Israelis, roughly 60 percent of the population, now have gas masks, she said.The Israeli government ordered a "limited" call-up of reserve units to bolster civil defense preparations and to operate air-defense units near the border. Officials said the call-up is anticipated to bring in hundreds of troops.While Israeli officials believe the chances of a Syrian strike remain slim, there are concerns that Damascus may respond to any U.S.-led military action by attacking the Jewish state, a close American ally.On Wednesday, the U.N. inspectors visited the eastern Damascus suburbs of Mleeha and Zamalka, activists said. Amateur video showed a convoy of five cars with U.N. markings, followed by armed rebels in pickups.The video showed the inspectors visiting a clinic and interviewing a man through a translator. Two inspectors were present as a nurse drew blood from a man on an examination table. One of the experts was heard in the video saying he and his team have collected blood, urine and hair samples.The videos appeared consistent with other reporting by The Associated Press, including Skype interviews with anti-regime activists.One activist said the team took hair and skin samples of five suspected victims in Zamalka during a 90-minute visit. He spoke on condition of anonymity for fear of regime reprisals.At the U.N., the five permanent members of the Security Council failed to reach an agreement on a British-proposed resolution that would authorize the use of military force against Syria.The draft resolution — were it to be put to a vote — would almost certainly be vetoed by Syria ally Russia as well as China, which have blocked past attempts to sanction the Assad regime. The document was being sent back to governments for consultations, according to a Western diplomat, who spoke on condition of anonymity because the discussions were private and he was not authorized to speak to reporters.Foreign Minister Wang Yi said in a statement that China was deeply concerned about the latest developments in Syria but reiterated China's position that "a political resolution is the only realistic solution."A French diplomatic official acknowledged that the British resolution has virtually no chance of passing, but is being introduced to show that all diplomatic steps were being exhausted. He spoke on condition of anonymity because he was not allowed to disclose details of the deliberations.French President Francois Hollande convened his top defense advisers about Syria, and was to meet Thursday with the head of Syria's main opposition group.In London, Prime Minister David Cameron held a meeting on Syria and said the military and security chiefs at Britain's National Security Council "unanimously" backed his call for action. Parliament was expected to convene Thursday to discuss the matter and possibly vote on whether Britain would participate.Jordan, meanwhile, said it will not be used as a launching pad for attacks on Syria and favors a diplomatic solution. A U.S.-led strike would involve cruise missile attacks from the sea, which would not need to cross or make use of Jordanian territory.The remarks underlined the U.S. ally's efforts to avoid further friction with its larger neighbor for fear that Assad or his Iranian backers could retaliate.Two of Syria's staunchest backers, Iran and Russia, warned that an attack by U.S. and its allies against Syria would set the region alight.Such strikes "will lead to the long-term destabilization of the situation in the country and the region," said Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov.Iranian Supreme Leader Ayatollah Ali Khamenei said attacking Syria would be catastrophic for the entire Middle East."Intervention of foreign and extra-regional powers in a country has no result other than sparking fire," Iran's state TV quoted Khamenei as saying. "Waging a war is like a spark in a gunpowder store ... its dimensions and consequences can't be predicted."Lucas reported from Beirut. Associated Press writers around the world contributed to this report.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — As President Bashar al-Assad of Syria faces the increasing likelihood of an American-led missile strike, his detractors and defenders alike are asking, Why would he launch a deadly chemical attack on a scale not yet seen in his country's civil war — as American and allied officials assert his loyalists did last week — when he seemed to be holding his own in the stalemated conflict, and just as international weapons inspectors arrived in the country?Mr. Assad's allies have tried to cast doubt on the allegations by saying there would have been no logical benefit for his government in launching the attack. And even some of those advocating a military response have expressed puzzlement over why he would take one of the few actions that could push a reluctant American government to respond.If the Syrian government is responsible for the attack, which it denies, the reasons for it are known only to Mr. Assad's inner circle. But military analysts say that he and his loyalists may have had ample reasons that made sense to them: further terrorizing rebel supporters, projecting confidence by defying the international community, or simply wanting to raise the military pressure on some of the most stubborn and strategic pockets of rebel fighters and their backers."What makes military and strategic sense to Assad may not make military and strategic sense to us," said Emile Hokayem, a military analyst at the International Institute for Strategic Studies. "Assad is fighting his own fight on his terms and on the timing of his choosing. He may have made a mistake this time — perhaps he didn't mean to kill that many, or assumed the international community had become less sensitive — but it doesn't mean that it didn't make sense from his perspective."The attack, which killed hundreds of people in heavily bombarded suburbs east and southwest of Damascus, the capital, appears to have been by far the most widespread and deadliest use of chemical weapons in Syria, where toxic gases have been used in several smaller attacks over the past year, with each side accusing the other of using the internationally banned weapons.Yet in some ways, the episode may represent more of a continuity with the conduct of this war than a departure from it. During two and a half years of conflict, Mr. Assad has slowly increased the intensity of attacks on civilian neighborhoods where rebels have found support. Mr. Hokayem calls it a strategy of "gradual escalation and desensitization" of the public in Syria and abroad.Government forces have used blunt and imprecise conventional weapons, firing Scud missiles and unleashing artillery bombardments and airstrikes on neighborhoods, in attacks that seem aimed more at sowing fear and punishing populations than at specific tactical gains. While last week's killings appear to have been the largest mass slaughter of the war, conventional weapons have killed many times more people than chemicals.Even after Western governments declared that Syrian government forces had used banned chemical weapons like the nerve agent sarin, crossing what President Obama had once called a "red line," the attacks provoked little visible response.And in recent weeks, with the United States and its allies increasingly queasy about Islamic extremists among Mr. Assad's fractious opponents and the prospect that his fall would bring even greater chaos to the country and the region, Mr. Assad could watch Egypt's generals preside over the killing of more than 1,000 Islamist protesters, also with few international repercussions.Some analysts say that a growing sense of impunity may have led Mr. Assad to believe that he could get away with an attack much larger than past ones. Others say they suspect that he intended only an incremental increase in the use of chemicals and that a tactical error led to last week's much higher death toll, and to the pictures of children's bodies shrouded in white that provoked a new level of international outrage.On the eve of last Wednesday's attack, Mr. Assad's forces had consolidated gains around the central city of Homs, aiming to secure the heavily populated corridor running from Damascus through the government's coastal strongholds to the divided northern city of Aleppo. But the capital remained ringed by restive suburbs where by some estimates half the population stayed despite relentless shelling, and where the government has been unable to decisively dislodge rebels.
LONDON — Prospects for a Western-led military strike on Syria increased on Tuesday as the American defense secretary said United States forces were ready for any contingency, the British and French leaders spoke with an aggressive new tone and the Arab League joined in accusing the Syrian government of a mass killing last week with a chemical munitions attack.The developments came as United Nations weapons inspectors in Syria postponed a second visit to suspected attack sites on the outskirts of the capital, Damascus, after having failed to secure assurances of their safety, the United Nations and Syrian officials said.Even without the evidence that the inspectors are collecting, the United States and other Western powers have concluded that the Aug. 21 attack, which killed hundreds of people, was caused by banned chemical munitions and that President Bashar al-Assad's forces were responsible, crossing a threshold that required a forceful response.Chuck Hagel, the United States secretary of defense, said in an interview with the BBC that American forces had "moved assets in place to be able to fulfill and comply with whatever option the president wishes to take." Asked how soon these forces could be ready, Mr. Hagel said, "We are ready to go."Mr. Hagel would not specify the type of action envisioned, but Obama administration officials have suggested that any military response would be limited — cruise missiles launched from American warships in the Mediterranean that would strike specific Syrian military targets, for example — and not a sustained bombing campaign intended to topple Mr. Assad, who is seeking to defeat an insurgency well into its third year.The White House press secretary, Jay Carney, told reporters in Washington there was no doubt Mr. Assad's side was responsible and that the only debate was over the proper response. "We believe that a careful review of the facts leads to the conclusion that the regime was behind this," Mr. Carney said.In coming days, Mr. Carney said, the White House would provide further evidence, drawn from American intelligence, on the Syrian government's culpability. But he said President Obama had still not made a decision on military action.In Britain, Prime Minister David Cameron, who cut short his vacation, said Parliament would be recalled early from its summer recess to deal with the Syrian crisis. British media said fighter aircraft had been dispatched to Cyprus, where Britain maintains an air base that could be used as a launching area against Syria, 100 miles away.Mr. Cameron told the BBC that Mr. Assad's side was responsible for a "massive use" of chemical weapons, called it "morally indefensible" and said that the world could "not stand idly by."President François Hollande of France said that "everything leads us to believe that it is the Syrian regime that committed this abject act" and said France would now seek to establish "the most appropriate retaliation.""The chemical massacre in Damascus cannot go without a response," Mr. Hollande said in an address to an annual meeting of French ambassadors at the presidential palace in Paris. "France is prepared to punish those who took the vile decision to gas innocent people." He gave no specifics, however.Previously, French officials had said firmly that France would not act militarily without an authorizing resolution from the United Nations Security Council, which seems doubtful because of Russian and Chinese opposition.Mr. Cameron said no decision had been made about military action, but it would have to be proportionate and legal. He, too, did not define what the legal basis would be for military intervention. He said that any military response would be limited to the effort to "deter and degrade the further use of chemical weapons."The British deputy prime minister, Nick Clegg, told reporters that "we're not considering an open-ended military intervention with boots on the ground like we saw in Iraq," which his Liberal Democrats had criticized, or "regime change." He added: "This is about taking proportionate, legal and carefully circumscribed steps" so the world understands "that we will not stand idly by when chemical weapons are used in complete breach of international law."
WASHINGTON — U.S. House of Representatives Speaker John Boehner urged President Barack Obama on Wednesday to make the case personally to Congress and the American people for potential military action in Syria.In a letter to Obama that was released to the media, Boehner said Obama must explain the legal basis for any use of force in Syria and the "intended effect of the potential military strikes."A growing number of U.S. lawmakers - including many from Boehner's Republican Party - have been complaining they have not been properly consulted on the situation in Syria."I have conferred with the chairmen of the national security committees who have received initial outreach from senior Administration officials, and while the outreach has been appreciated, it is apparent from the questions above that the outreach has, to date, not reached the level of substantive consultation," Boehner said.Syrians stocked up on supplies and some left homes close to potential targets on Wednesday as U.S. officials sketched out plans for multi-national air strikes a week after an apparent poison gas attack by Syrian President Bashar al-Assad's forces that residents say killed hundreds of people.Boehner said he was "mindful" of the importance of the situation in Syria to the U.S. national interest. But he warned of risks, including Assad losing control of his chemical weapons, or organizations tied to al Qaeda winning more territory, and said it was essential Obama communicate with the public and Congress."Now, having again determined your red line has been crossed, should a decisive response involve the use of the United States military, it is essential that you provide a clear, unambiguous explanation of how military action - which is a means, not a policy - will secure U.S. objectives and how it fits into your overall policy," he wrote.Boehner included a list of 14 questions he wanted Obama to answer, including whether the administration intended to ask Congress for more money if the military action ended up being longer and more involved than expected.
WASHINGTON — Weapons analysts are poring over new videos from Syria that purport to show U.N. chemical weapons experts examining a recovered rocket fragment.The rocket may have been used in the suspected nerve agent attack a week ago near Damascus. Analysts said the fragment appears to have come from a short-range artillery rocket commonly used by Syria's army. That could complicate the goals of a U.S. missile strike because there are many such rocket launchers scattered across Syria.The video shows inspectors measuring and photographing the rocket fragment. British analyst Eliot Higgins said it could be from a Russian-made BM-14 140 mm rocket, capable of carrying explosives or chemical payloads.Australian weapons expert Nic Jenzen-Jones said Syria's army deploys so many short-range rockets it would be hard to destroy them all.
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama has briefed House Speaker John Boehner on Syria in a conversation in which the Republican leader pressed the president to make the case to the nation and Congress for military action.A spokesman for Boehner, Brendan Buck, said in a brief statement on Thursday that the speaker questioned the president about issues he raised in a letter on Wednesday.Among Boehner's concerns are the legal justification for any military strike, the overall policy and precedent and the objective.Buck said only Obama can answer those questions, and it was clear that additional conversations, consultation with Congress and communication with the nation were necessary.
PARIS — Looted artifacts turning up on the black market, plundered archaeological sites and the collapse of the minaret of an 11th century mosque that was the ancient heart of Aleppo's walled Old City.UNESCO, the U.N.'s cultural organization, is applying lessons learned the hard way from the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, hoping to stem the havoc Syria's civil war has caused the country's cultural heritage.But the destruction has already taken a steep toll — among landmarks destroyed is the 11th-century minaret of the Umayyad Mosque, which collapsed during fighting in April between government troops and rebels.The mosque, a UNESCO world heritage site, was the centerpiece of Aleppo's Old City, along with the medieval marketplace that burned up in an inferno sparked by clashes in September 2012."The humanitarian crisis is catastrophic. So is the situation at the level of cultural heritage of Syria," said Lakhdar Brahimi, the U.N. special envoy to Syria, who attended the gathering along with the Syrian government's director of antiquities."Few countries are as rich culturally, have had such a glorious past, are so important for what we are, all of us, for all the things that make, have made, human civilization," Brahimi said.Irina Bokova, director general of UNESCO, said Thursday the U.N.'s cultural organization has learned from the pillaging and destruction that accompanied wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, and is trying to prioritize sites and encourage residents to protect them.Maamoun Abdulkarim, Syria's antiquities chief, said the government stashed away the most valuable artifacts from museums around the country, mindful of the looting that followed the U.S. invasion of Iraq in 2003. He said Syrians, regardless of their politics, were becoming increasingly aware of the importance of protecting their heritage.He said 10,000 archaeological sites and 40 museums needed protection from what he called "the painful events" — a common euphemism in Damascus for 2 ½ years of bloodshed."The local populations are playing a vital role. Everyone understands that we need to protect our heritage," he said.But Bokova, acknowledging the destruction plainly evident in satellite photos, said at this point appealing for people to safeguard the sites and scouring black markets for looted artifacts was the best hope for preserving Syria's history.
WASHINGTON — The U.S. and its allies have "no smoking gun" proving Syrian President Bashar Al-Assad personally ordered his forces to use chemical weapons to attack a rebel-held Damascus neighborhood, U.S. national security officials said on Thursday.In secret intelligence assessments and a still-unreleased report summarizing U.S. intelligence on the alleged gas attack on August 21, U.S. agencies express high confidence that Syrian government forces carried out the attack, and that Assad's government therefore bears responsibility, the officials said."This was not a rogue operation," one U.S. official said.However the evidence does not prove that Assad himself ordered that chemical munitions be used, according to the officials, who spoke on condition of anonymity.Evidence that forces loyal to Assad were responsible goes beyond the circumstantial to include electronic intercepts and some tentative scientific samples from the neighborhood which was attacked, officials said.U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry, Secretary of Defense Chuck Hagel and Admiral James A. Winnefeld Jr, Vice Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, are among senior U.S. officials who will brief senior members of Congress on Thursday about the situation in Syria and related intelligence assessments, congressional aides said.President Barack Obama's national security adviser, Susan Rice, and Director of National Intelligence James Clapper will also participate in the briefing. With many members of Congress out of Washington during the summer recess, the briefing will be held in a telephone conference call at 6 p.m. EDT (2200 GMT), according to the aides.They said the briefing had originally been meant to be classified, but too many members of Congress were unable to get to secure telephone lines for it to include top secret material.While Obama has not yet announced a decision on military action, he has left little doubt the choice was not whether but when to punish Assad's government for the attack, in which hundreds of people died.Some Republican lawmakers and even some of Obama's fellow Democrats have complained that they have not been properly informed.Thursday's briefing is for leaders of the Senate and House of Representatives as well as the chairmen and ranking members of national security committees, including foreign relations, intelligence and armed services.During the week, U.S. government spokespeople have made increasingly emphatic statements declaring that chemical weapons were used and that Assad's government, rather than rebel forces, were responsible for using them."This was a massive, large-scale ... multiple-faceted attack against a wide swath of area using very sophisticated rockets, very sophisticated delivery systems that were armed with chemical weapons. There is one party in Syria who has the capability to do that, and it's the Assad regime," State Department spokeswoman Marie Harf said on Wednesday.Harf added that U.S. officials "ultimately, of course, hold President Assad responsible for the use of chemical weapons by his regime against his own people, regardless of where the command and control lies."U.S. security sources and sources close to allied governments say evidence suggests that the initial decision to use chemical weapons may have been made by a field commander rather than in an order from the highest level of the Syrian government.In a paper published on Thursday, the British government's Joint Intelligence Committee said: "Permission to authorize CW (chemical weapons) has probably been delegated by President Assad to senior regime commanders, such as, but any deliberate change in the scale and nature of use would require his authorization."The name of the commander or commanders was redacted from the public version of the paper.According to a former U.S. official who is an expert in the region, one possibility is that the Syrian ground commander in charge of clearing out the area which was attacked, under heavy pressure from superiors, may have made the initial decision to use chemical weapons before sending in ground troops. The official spoke on condition of anonymity.U.S. intelligence did intercept communications discussing the attack between officials in central command and in the field. But these do not clearly implicate Assad or his entourage in ordering the use of chemicals, sources familiar with the material said.While U.S. experts say the most likely chemical agent used in the attack was the nerve gas sarin, scientific evidence proving this still remains incomplete, one of the sources added.
LONDON — The following are excerpts of an assessment by the British government's Joint Intelligence Committee of a suspected chemical weapons attack in Syria last week.The assessment was supplied by the British government and can be found at"A chemical attack occurred in Damascus on the morning of 21 August, resulting in at least 350 fatalities. It is not possible for the opposition to have carried out a chemical weapons attack on this scale. The regime has used chemical weapons on a smaller scale on at least 14 occasions in the past. There is some intelligence to suggest regime culpability in this attack. These factors make it highly likely that the Syrian regime was responsible."Extensive video footage attributed to the attack in eastern Damascus (which we assess would be very difficult to falsify) is consistent with the use of a nerve agent, such as sarin, and is not consistent with the use of blister or riot control agents."There is no obvious political or military trigger for regime use of chemical weapons on an apparently larger scale now, particularly given the current presence in Syria of the UN investigation team. Permission to authorize chemical weapons has probably been delegated by President Assad to senior regime commanders, such as, but any deliberate change in the scale and nature of use would require his authorization."There is no credible evidence that any opposition group has used chemical weapons. A number continue to seek a chemical weapons capability, but none currently has the capability to conduct a chemical weapons attack on this scale."Letter from Chairman of Joint Intelligence Committee, Jon Day, to Prime Minister David Cameron:"It is being claimed, including by the regime, that the attacks were either faked or undertaken by the Syrian Armed Opposition. We have tested this assertion using a wide range of intelligence and open sources, and invited HMG (Her Majesty's Government) and outside experts to help us establish whether such a thing is possible. There is no credible intelligence or other evidence to substantiate the claims or the possession of chemical weapons) by the opposition. The Joint Intelligence Committee has therefore concluded that there are no plausible alternative scenarios to regime responsibility."We also have a limited but growing body of intelligence which supports the judgment that the regime was responsible for the attacks and that they were conducted to help clear the Opposition from strategic parts of Damascus. Some of this intelligence is highly sensitive but you have had access to it all."Against that background, the Joint Intelligence Committee concluded that it is highly likely that the regime was responsible for the chemical weapons attacks on 21 August. The Joint Intelligence Committee had high confidence in all of its assessments except in relation to the regime's precise motivation for carrying out an attack of this scale at this time."
DAMASCUS, Syria — President Bashar Assad vowed Thursday that "Syria will defend itself" against Western military strikes over a suspected chemical weapons attack, and the U.N. said inspectors will leave within 48 hours carrying information that could be crucial to what happens next.British Prime Minister David Cameron argued strongly for military intervention in Syria but was rejected in a preliminary vote in Parliament, while French defense officials said openly for the first time that their military is preparing for a possible operation. The Obama administration was briefing congressional leaders about its case for attacking Syria.The U.S., Britain and France blame Assad's regime for the alleged chemical weapons attack Aug. 21 on rebel-held suburbs of Damascus. The Syrian government denies the allegations, saying rebels staged the attack to frame the regime.At the United Nations, a meeting of the permanent members of the Security Council on the Syrian crisis ended after less than an hour after being convened by Russia, a staunch ally of the Assad regime.As Western leaders made their case at home for intervening in Syria's 3-year-old civil war, Assad remained defiant."Threats to launch a direct aggression against Syria will make it more adherent to its well-established principles and sovereign decisions stemming from the will of its people, and Syria will defend itself against any aggression," he said in comments reported by the Syrian state news agency.It's not clear whether Assad would retaliate against any attacks or try to ride them out in hopes of minimizing the threat to his continued rule. The U.S. has said regime change it not the objective of any military action it may carry out.The U.N. experts have been carrying out on-site investigations this week to determine whether chemical weapons were used in the attack that the group Doctors Without Borders says killed 355 people. Inspectors visited the eastern suburb of Zamalka, where they interviewed survivors and collected samples.Amateur video posted online showed U.N. inspectors in gas masks walking through the rubble of a damaged building. One inspector scooped pulverized debris from the ground, placed it in a glass container and wrapped the container in a plastic bag. The video corresponded to other AP reporting of the events depicted.U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon urged Western powers to hold off on any military action until the experts can present their findings to U.N. member states and the Security Council. Speaking in Vienna, Ban said the U.N. team is to leave Syria on Saturday morning and will immediately report to him. He also said that he spoke to President Barack Obama about ways to expedite the U.N. probe.Some of the experts will take samples to laboratories in Europe after leaving Damascus, according to U.N. spokesman Farhan Haq, adding that the team's final report will depend on the lab results and could take "more than days."The mandate of the U.N. team is to determine whether chemical agents were used in the attack, not who was responsible. But Haq suggested that evidence collected by investigators — including biological samples and interviews — might give an indication of who was behind the attack."Their mission is to determine whether chemical weapons were used. It's not about attribution. At the same time, I would like to point out that they will have large number of facts at their disposal — they have collected a considerable amount of evidence through samples, evidence through witness interviews — and they can construct from that evidence of a fact-based narrative that can get at the key facts of what happened on the 21 of August," Haq said.British and American leaders — who have put the blame for the attack squarely on the regime's shoulders — faced pushback against possible punitive military strikes, particularly before the investigators release their conclusions.In a stunning defeat Thursday night, Cameron's government lost a preliminary vote calling for military strikes. Although nonbinding, the rejection means Cameron's hands are tied and he released a terse statement to Parliament saying it was clear to him that the British people did not want to see military action.The vote lost 285-272 and the prime minister said he would respect the will of the House of Commons.At the start of the week, Cameron had seemed ready to join Washington in possible military action against Assad. But the push for strikes against the Syrian regime began to lose momentum as Britain's Labour Party announced its opposition to the move.Cameron promised to give the U.N. inspectors time to report back to the U.N. Security Council and try to secure a resolution there. He also promised to give lawmakers a second vote in a bid to assuage fears that Britain was being rushed into an attack on Assad.It wasn't enough, however. Suspicions lingered that what was billed as a limited campaign would turn into an Iraq-style quagmire.Obama also was trying to shore up political support for a move against Syria. The administration planned briefings for leaders of the House and Senate and national security committees, U.S. officials and congressional aides said.Obama, although still reportedly weighing his options, signaled Wednesday the U.S. was moving toward a punitive strike, saying he has "concluded" that Assad's regime is behind the attacks and that there "need to be international consequences."U.S. intelligence officials said the intelligence linking Assad or his inner circle to the Aug. 21 attack is no sure thing, with questions remaining about who controls some of Syria's chemical weapons stores and doubts about whether Assad ordered the strike.The administration has signaled that it would act against the Syrian government even without the backing of allies or the U.N.French defense officials said publicly for the first time that their military is preparing for a possible operation in Syria — but President Francois Hollande stopped short of announcing armed intervention.Unlike Obama and Cameron, he has a freer hand to decide how to deal with the crisis — Hollande does not need parliamentary approval to launch military action that lasts less than four months.French Defense Minister Jean-Yves Le Drian said "the armed forces have been put in position to respond" if Hollande commits French forces to an international intervention.France has a dozen cruise missile-capable fighter aircraft at bases in the United Arab Emirates and the Horn of Africa nation of Djibouti. France's military was at the forefront of the NATO-led attacks on Libyan dictator Moammar Gadhafi in 2011, and led an intervention against extremists in Mali earlier this year.The U.S. has already dispatched naval forces toward the eastern Mediterranean toward Syria's shores. If Obama decides on military action, U.S. administration and defense officials in recent days have said the most likely move would be the launch of Tomahawk missiles off ships in the Mediterranean.Syrian officials have urged the U.N. inspectors to extend their mission to investigate what the regime alleges are three chemical attacks against Syrian soldiers this month in the Damascus suburbs.Haq, the U.N. spokesman, said the U.N. team will leave despite the government's request, although the appeal is being given serious consideration and that the experts intend to return to Syria to investigate other incidents.The brief meeting of the Security Council permanent members was the second time in two days they had met on Syria.In a tension-filled meeting Wednesday, the U.S., Britain, France, China and Russia discussed a resolution proposed by Britain to authorize the use of military force against Syria. Moscow firmly opposes military action.Lucas reported from Beirut. Also contributing reporting were Associated Press writers Yasmine Saker and Karin Laub in Beirut, Gregory Katz and Raphael Satter in London, Sylvie Corbet and Jamey Keaten in Paris, Alexandra Olson and Peter James Spielmann at the United Nations, and George Jahn in Vienna contributed reporting.
BEIRUT — The United Nations team of chemical weapons experts in Syria reached rebel-held territory outside Damascus on Thursday, activists said, and was preparing to start a third day of investigations into an apparent poison gas attack in the area.Activists said the team had arrived in the eastern suburb of Douma and were going to examine the sites where activists say rockets loaded with chemical weapons struck. The team will also run more tests and interviews with the wounded, they said.
WASHINGTON — A grim-faced secretary of state reading a bill of charges against a rogue Arab leader. The White House promising intelligence that will provide proof about weapons of mass destruction. Frenetic efforts to piece together a coalition of the willing. Breathless news reports about imminent bombing raids.The days since the deadly chemical weapons attack last week in Syria carry an eerie echo of the tense days leading up to the American-led invasion of Iraq in 2003. Some veterans of that period are expressing qualms that this time, too, the war drums are beating too loudly."There's some risk," said Thomas Fingar, a fellow at Stanford University's Institute for International Studies. "Political pressure is a factor. It appears to me that the situation has crossed a tipping point." In short, he said, the case for military action has moved so rapidly that it has become difficult for those counseling restraint.Mr. Fingar has firsthand experience of these situations. He was the head of the State Department's intelligence bureau, which dissented from the Bush administration's intelligence reports on Saddam Hussein's nuclear weapons program. Not properly scrutinized or challenged, that faulty intelligence paved the road to war a decade ago.In the case of Syria, there is little doubt that chemical weapons were used on a large scale on the outskirts of Damascus on Aug. 21. But Mr. Fingar and other experts predicted that it would be difficult, if not impossible, for the administration to produce definitive evidence that President Bashar al-Assad ordered the attack.There are other possible situations, analysts said, like a rogue military commander who went beyond his orders, or a military unit that intended a smaller attack but miscalculated."The Syrian case involves the empirical issue of whether chemical weapons were used and an analytical judgment about who used them," Mr. Fingar said. "It's very different than Iraq."There are other differences, of course. The most obvious is that President Obama is a reluctant warrior, while his predecessor, George W. Bush, was anything but. The Obama administration has so far sketched out a war plan that is most remarkable for how narrowly it is drawn.It would most likely take the form of one or two days of cruise missile strikes from ships in the eastern Mediterranean, not a sustained air campaign, let alone the imposition of a no-fly zone that would require many aircraft over many weeks or months. The administration's goal is not to oust Mr. Assad, but merely to punish the government for using poison gas on its own population and to try to stop it from happening again.Nor would a strike be aimed at altering the course of Syria's two-year-old civil war. White House officials said Mr. Obama remained convinced that intervening more broadly in the conflict would cause more problems in the region than it would solve.Unlike Iraq in 2003, the triggering event in Syria a decade later is not a shaky argument that the government possesses weapons of mass destruction, but a huge rocket assault that left hundreds of victims convulsing and gasping for breath, glassy-eyed and foaming at the mouth — all classic symptoms of a reaction to poison gas. Video images of the carnage were posted on YouTube, while the aid group Doctors Without Borders issued a report based on firsthand accounts from medics at the overwhelmed hospitals."These all strongly indicate that everything these images are already screaming at us is real, that chemical weapons were used in Syria," Secretary of State John Kerry said on Monday.Mr. Kerry did not show any of those pictures, unlike his predecessor Colin L. Powell, who in February 2003 displayed satellite photographs, played intercepts of conversations between Iraqi officials, and brandished a vial of white powder in his futile effort to persuade the United Nations Security Council to coalesce behind the invasion of Iraq.Such an elaborate campaign is not necessary in this case, administration officials argued, because the evidence is already overwhelming and the scope of the proposed response is more limited.
DAMASCUS — The team of U.N. chemical weapons inspectors left their Damascus hotel early on Saturday, a Reuters witness said, and appeared to be leaving the country.The witness saw the team's convoy of vehicles head onto a highway that leads to neighboring Lebanon.
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama discussed Syria in phone calls with British Prime Minister David Cameron and French President Francois Hollande on Friday, a senior administration official said.The calls came as Obama seeks the broadest diplomatic support possible for a military strike to retaliate against a Syrian chemical weapons attack on August 21 that U.S. intelligence says killed 1,429 people.
WASHINGTON — A summary of the Obama administration's case that the Syrian regime is responsible for a chemical weapons attack Aug. 21 on the Damascus suburbs that it says killed 1,429 people:WHY: The Syrian government has been frustrated as it tries to clear rebels out of several Damascus suburbs. The government considers chemical weapons a normal part of its military arsenal, and it has carried out such attacks in the 2½-year conflict before.HOW: Troops from Syria's military unit that handles chemical weapons, the Syrian Scientific Studies and Research Center, prepared such weapons in the three days prior to the attack. Another Syrian military unit was detected preparing gas masks in readiness for such an attack.WHEN: On the morning of Aug. 21, at 2:30 a.m. local time, multiple streams of intelligence including satellite images show a barrage of rocket and artillery fire was launched from regime-controlled territory into the Damascus suburbs where the chemical weapons attacks reportedly occurred, approximately 90 minutes before reports of the attack started appearing in social media from affected areas.VICTIMS: Three Damascus area hospitals were flooded in a three-hour period by approximately 3,600 patients showing symptoms consistent with nerve agent exposure, according to an international humanitarian organization.KILLED: The chemical attack killed 1,429 people, including at least 426 children, according to U.S. intelligence and accounts from international and Syrian medical personnel, and nongovernmental organizations, and hundreds videos scoured from social media of the aftermath, posted from 12 different areas. The videos show large numbers of victims showing signs "consistent with, but not unique to, nerve agent exposure," including unconsciousness, foaming from the nose and mouth, constricted pupils, rapid heartbeat, and difficulty breathing. The videos also show large numbers of dead with no visible injuries, which points to death by chemical weapons, not small arms, high-explosive munitions or blister agents.GOVERNMENT LINKS: U.S. intelligence intercepted communications of a "senior official intimately familiar with the offensive" who confirmed that chemical weapons were used by the Syrian government, and was concerned that the U.N. inspectors might find evidence of the attack. Also, the U.S. has intelligence that Syrian chemical weapons personnel were directed to "cease operations" on the afternoon of Aug. 21, several hours after the attack. At the same time, the Syrian military intensified its conventional artillery barrage of the area, upping it to four times above the amount of artillery and rocket fired in the previous 10 days, and the U.N. inspectors were shot at as they tried to inspect the areas of where the suspected chemical attacks occurred.WHO ORDERED IT: Not important, the administration says. While officials would not discuss whether they had proof that Syrian President Bashar Assad himself ordered the attack, they said they believe the program is under his command and control, and therefore is his responsibility.WHO CONTROLS CHEMICAL WEAPONS: Administration officials have insisted they believe the supplies remain in Syrian government control, although other U.S. officials say some of those supplies may have been lost to rebel groups who overtook military storage areas in the last six months.NO REBELS SUSPECTED: U.S. intelligence officials say that is "highly unlikely" that Syrian rebels who would like to draw the U.S. into the war to draw on its firepower would be behind the chemical attack. Officials say the opposition has not used chemical weapons in the past, and intelligence sources in the Damascus area did not detect any indications before the attack that opposition affiliates were planning to use such weapons.
LONDON — British Prime Minister David Cameron said he had spoken to President Barack Obama and the two men had agreed British-U.S. cooperation would continue, after Britain's decision not to support military action in Syria.Cameron said Obama stressed his appreciation of the strong friendship between the two leaders and the "strength, durability and depth of the special relationship between our two countries"."They agreed that their co-operation on international issues would continue in the future and both reiterated their determination to find a political solution to the Syrian conflict by bringing all sides together," a spokesman for Cameron said in a statement.
WASHINGTON — An unclassified U.S. intelligence report released on Friday by the White House concluded there was "high confidence" that Syrian forces had used chemical weapons multiple times in the last year, including the August 21 attack in the suburbs of Damascus.The intelligence gathered for the U.S. report included an intercepted communication involving a senior official intimately familiar with the attack as well as other human, signals and satellite intelligence, the four-page report said.Following is a text of the report published by the White House on its website (http://www.whitehouse.gov):Government Assessment of the Syrian Government's Use of Chemical Weapons on August 21, 2013The United States Government assesses with high confidence that the Syrian government carried out a chemical weapons attack in the Damascus suburbs on August 21, 2013. We further assess that the regime used a nerve agent in the attack. These all-source assessments are based on human, signals, and geospatial intelligence as well as a significant body of open source reporting. Our classified assessments have been shared with the U.S. Congress and key international partners. To protect sources and methods, we cannot publicly release all available intelligence - but what follows is an unclassified summary of the U.S. Intelligence Community's analysis of what took place.Syrian Government Use of Chemical Weapons on August 21A large body of independent sources indicates that a chemical weapons attack took place in the Damascus suburbs on August 21. In addition to U.S. intelligence information, there are accounts from international and Syrian medical personnel; videos; witness accounts; thousands of social media reports from at least 12 different locations in the Damascus area; journalist accounts; and reports from highly credible nongovernmental organizations.A preliminary U.S. government assessment determined that 1,429 people were killed in the chemical weapons attack, including at least 426 children, though this assessment will certainly evolve as we obtain more information.We assess with high confidence that the Syrian government carried out the chemical weapons attack against opposition elements in the Damascus suburbs on August 21. We assess that the scenario in which the opposition executed the attack on August 21 is highly unlikely. The body of information used to make this assessment includes intelligence pertaining to the regime's preparations for this attack and its means of delivery, multiple streams of intelligence about the attack itself and its effect, our post-attack observations, and the differences between the capabilities of the regime and the opposition. Our high confidence assessment is the strongest position that the U.S. Intelligence Community can take short of confirmation. We will continue to seek additional information to close gaps in our understanding of what took place.The Syrian regime maintains a stockpile of numerous chemical agents, including mustard, sarin, and VX and has thousands of munitions that can be used to deliver chemical warfare agents.Syrian President Bashar al-Asad is the ultimate decision maker for the chemical weapons program and members of the program are carefully vetted to ensure security and loyalty. The Syrian Scientific Studies and Research Center (SSRC) - which is subordinate to the Syrian Ministry of Defense - manages Syria's chemical weapons program.We assess with high confidence that the Syrian regime has used chemical weapons on a small scale against the opposition multiple times in the last year, including in the Damascus suburbs. This assessment is based on multiple streams of information including reporting of Syrian officials planning and executing chemical weapons attacks and laboratory analysis of physiological samples obtained from a number of individuals, which revealed exposure to sarin. We assess that the opposition has not used chemical weapons.The Syrian regime has the types of munitions that we assess were used to carry out the attack on August 21, and has the ability to strike simultaneously in multiple locations. We have seen no indication that the opposition has carried out a large-scale, coordinated rocket and artillery attack like the one that occurred on August 21.We assess that the Syrian regime has used chemical weapons over the last year primarily to gain the upper hand or break a stalemate in areas where it has struggled to seize and hold strategically valuable territory. In this regard, we continue to judge that the Syrian regime views chemical weapons as one of many tools in its arsenal, including air power and ballistic missiles, which they indiscriminately use against the opposition.The Syrian regime has initiated an effort to rid the Damascus suburbs of opposition forces using the area as a base to stage attacks against regime targets in the capital. The regime has failed to clear dozens of Damascus neighborhoods of opposition elements, including neighborhoods targeted on August 21, despite employing nearly all of its conventional weapons systems. We assess that the regime's frustration with its inability to secure large portions of Damascus may have contributed to its decision to use chemical weapons on August 21.We have intelligence that leads us to assess that Syrian chemical weapons personnel - including personnel assessed to be associated with the SSRC - were preparing chemical munitions prior to the attack. In the three days prior to the attack, we collected streams of human, signals and geospatial intelligence that reveal regime activities that we assess were associated with preparations for a chemical weapons attack.Syrian chemical weapons personnel were operating in the Damascus suburb of 'Adra from Sunday, August 18 until early in the morning on Wednesday, August 21 near an area that the regime uses to mix chemical weapons, including sarin. On August 21, a Syrian regime element prepared for a chemical weapons attack in the Damascus area, including through the utilization of gas masks. Our intelligence sources in the Damascus area did not detect any indications in the days prior to the attack that opposition affiliates were planning to use chemical weapons.Multiple streams of intelligence indicate that the regime executed a rocket and artillery attack against the Damascus suburbs in the early hours of August 21. Satellite detections corroborate that attacks from a regime-controlled area struck neighborhoods where the chemical attacks reportedly occurred - including Kafr Batna, Jawbar, 'Ayn Tarma, Darayya, and Mu'addamiyah. This includes the detection of rocket launches from regime controlled territory early in the morning, approximately 90 minutes before the first report of a chemical attack appeared in social media. The lack of flight activity or missile launches also leads us to conclude that the regime used rockets in the attack.Local social media reports of a chemical attack in the Damascus suburbs began at 2:30 a.m. local time on August 21. Within the next four hours there were thousands of social media reports on this attack from at least 12 different locations in the Damascus area. Multiple accounts described chemical-filled rockets impacting opposition-controlled areas.Three hospitals in the Damascus area received approximately 3,600 patients displaying symptoms consistent with nerve agent exposure in less than three hours on the morning of August 21, according to a highly credible international humanitarian organization. The reported symptoms, and the epidemiological pattern of events - characterized by the massive influx of patients in a short period of time, the origin of the patients, and the contamination of medical and first aid workers - were consistent with mass exposure to a nerve agent. We also received reports from international and Syrian medical personnel on the ground.We have identified one hundred videos attributed to the attack, many of which show large numbers of bodies exhibiting physical signs consistent with, but not unique to, nerve agent exposure. The reported symptoms of victims included unconsciousness, foaming from the nose and mouth, constricted pupils, rapid heartbeat, and difficulty breathing. Several of the videos show what appear to be numerous fatalities with no visible injuries, which is consistent with death from chemical weapons, and inconsistent with death from small-arms, high-explosive munitions or blister agents. At least 12 locations are portrayed in the publicly available videos, and a sampling of those videos confirmed that some were shot at the general times and locations described in the footage.We assess the Syrian opposition does not have the capability to fabricate all of the videos, physical symptoms verified by medical personnel and NGOs, and other information associated with this chemical attack.We have a body of information, including past Syrian practice, that leads us to conclude that regime officials were witting of and directed the attack on August 21. We intercepted communications involving a senior official intimately familiar with the offensive who confirmed that chemical weapons were used by the regime on August 21 and was concerned with the U.N. inspectors obtaining evidence. On the afternoon of August 21, we have intelligence that Syrian chemical weapons personnel were directed to cease operations. At the same time, the regime intensified the artillery barrage targeting many of the neighborhoods where chemical attacks occurred. In the 24 hour period after the attack, we detected indications of artillery and rocket fire at a rate approximately four times higher than the ten preceding days. We continued to see indications of sustained shelling in the neighborhoods up until the morning of August 26.To conclude, there is a substantial body of information that implicates the Syrian government's responsibility in the chemical weapons attack that took place on August 21.As indicated, there is additional intelligence that remains classified because of sources and methods concerns that is being provided to Congress and international partners.
WASHINGTON — The United States is considering a military response that would be limited and "tailored" in response to the Syrian chemical attack, a senior administration official said on Friday.The United States is not contemplating taking any action for "regime change," the official told reporters after the release of a U.S. intelligence report on the August 21 attack outside Damascus.
WASHINGTON — A U.S. intelligence report disclosed on Friday that there was "high confidence" that Syrian forces had used chemical weapons multiple times in the last year, including the August 21 attack outside Damascus.The report said that 1,429 people were killed in the chemical weapons attack, including at least 426 children.
BEIRUT — Lebanon on Friday charged five men, including a Sunni Muslim cleric close to the Syrian government, over bomb attacks on two mosques in the northern city of Tripoli last week that killed at least 42 people, judicial sources said.They said a military court accused Sheikh Ahmad Gharib and Mostafa Houri of forming an armed group to attack government institutions, organizing a terrorist cell and preparing the bombs against the two Sunni mosques in Tripoli.Two other men, including a Syrian military officer, were charged in absentia with placing the bombs at the mosques. Sheikh Hesham Minkara, another pro-Syrian government Sunni cleric, was being held on charges of withholding information from investigators.The bombings, which also wounded hundreds, escalated sectarian strife that has spilled over from the civil war in Syria where President Bashar al-Assad, from the minority Alawite sect, is facing a largely Sunni-led insurgency against his rule.Syria had a military presence in Lebanon for 29 years before pulling out in 2005, during which it made allies from different Lebanese sects. But with sectarian tensions growing, only a few Lebanese Sunnis now remain supportive of Damascus.
LONDON — Prime Minister David Cameron said on Friday he regretted the failure of the British parliament to support military action in Syria but that he hoped President Barack Obama would understand the need to listen to the wishes of the people."I think the American public, the American people and President Obama will understand," Cameron said just hours after parliament voted against a government motion to authorize the principle of military action in Syria."I haven't spoken to him (Obama) since the debate and the vote but I would expect to speak to him over the next day or so. I don't think it's a question of having to apologize," Cameron said in an interview aired on British television channels.
LONDON — Prime Minister David Cameron's plans to join a potential military strike on Syria were thwarted on Thursday night when Britain's parliament narrowly voted against a government motion to authorize such action in principle.In a humiliating defeat for the British leader likely to damage Cameron's hopes of being re-elected in 2015 and set back traditionally strong U.S.-UK relations, parliament defied Cameron by 285 to 272 votes.Commentators said it was the first time a British prime minister had lost a vote on war since 1782, when parliament effectively conceded American independence by voting against further fighting to crush the colony's rebellion.Speaking immediately after the vote, Cameron told lawmakers he would not seek to go against parliament's will."It is very clear tonight that while the House has not passed a motion, it is clear to me that the British parliament, reflecting the views of the British people, does not want to see British military action - I get that and the government will act accordingly," he said.British Defense Secretary Philip Hammond later said he thought the United States, a key ally, would be disappointed that the UK "will not be involved.He added: "I don't expect that the lack of British participation will stop any action." But, he told BBC TV, "It's certainly going to place some strain on the special relationship," referring to ties with Washington.U.S. officials suggested President Barack Obama might be willing to proceed with limited action against Syria even without allied support, but that no final decision had been reached.Veto-holding members of the United Nations have held inconclusive debates on a draft Security Council resolution that would authorize "all necessary force" in response to the alleged gas attack by Syria's government.Cameron's defeat calls into question Britain's traditional role as the United States' most reliable military ally, a role that Cameron worked hard to cement."There will be a national soul-searching about our role in the world and whether Britain wants to play a big part in upholding the international system," finance minister George Osborne, one of Cameron's closest allies, told the BBC.When asked whether the parliamentary defeat would damage Britain's alliance with the United States, Osborne said: "There's a bit of hyperbole on this in the last twenty four hours. The relationship with the United States is a very old one, very deep and operates on many layers."Cameron's defeat also underscores how bitter the legacy of Britain's involvement in the 2003 Iraq war remains a decade later.On that occasion, Britain, under the leadership of then-Prime Minister Tony Blair, helped the United States invade Iraq after asserting - wrongly, it later turned out - that President Saddam Hussein possessed weapons of mass destruction.Already embroiled in Afghanistan, Britain was then sucked into a second quagmire in Iraq, losing 179 soldiers in eight years after the 2003 U.S.-British invasion that toppled Saddam.Speaking during an at times impassioned debate on Thursday that preceded the vote, Cameron acknowledged that painful legacy."I am deeply mindful of the lessons of previous conflicts, and in particular the deep concerns in the country caused by what went wrong with the Iraq conflict in 2003," he said."One thing is indisputable: The well of public opinion was well and truly poisoned by the Iraq episode and we need to understand the public skepticism."Cameron previously implored the world not to stand idly by over Syria's suspected use of chemical weapons but ran into trouble from skeptical lawmakers within his own party and from the opposition Labour party who demanded to see more evidence before voting in favor of military action.Although some commentators hailed his defeat as proof that British parliamentary democracy was alive and well, others said he had put his credibility on the line and lost.Earlier on Thursday, Cameron's government published legal advice it said showed it was legally entitled to take military action against Syria even if the United Nations Security Council did not approve such action.It also published intelligence material on the August 21 chemical weapons attack in Syria's civil war, saying there was no doubt that it had occurred and that it was "highly likely" Syrian government forces were responsible. The nerve gas attack killed hundreds of civilians in an embattled suburb of Damascus.The defeat was all the more galling for Cameron since he had cut his summer holiday short, recalled parliament for an emergency debate and held an extraordinary meeting of Britain's National Security Council as well as making numerous calls to Obama and other allies.Obama has set out the case for a limited military strike on Syria, but some U.S. lawmakers say they have not been properly consulted.Speaking after the vote, the White House said Obama would decide on a response to chemical weapons use in Syria based on U.S. interests, but that Washington would continue to consult with Britain.UK opposition Labour leader Ed Miliband, a man critics often impugn as being a lightweight political foe to the more statesman-like Cameron, played a big role in the prime minister's defeat.He had unexpectedly announced on Wednesday night that he wanted important amendments to the government motion before he could back it.Addressing parliament, Miliband struggled to find his composure but advised lawmakers not to rush to judgment "on a political timetable set elsewhere," a thinly disguised reference to the United States.Domestically, Cameron's authority looks dented. Part of his problem is that he governs as part of a two-party coalition because his Conservatives lack an absolute majority in parliament, exposing him to such impromptu revolts.Cameron's critics are already circling. Their main allegations: He is not a conviction politician and fails to prepare the ground properly for his policies.But public opinion was never on his side.A YouGov poll published on Thursday showed that 51 percent of the British public opposed a missile strike, with just 22 percent in favor of it.
Parliament Debates Action Against Syria: The British prime minister, David Cameron, and the Labour Party leader, Ed Miliband, led the discussion on possible military intervention in Syria, after chemical attacks last week.BEIRUT, Lebanon — Members of the Syrian Parliament issued an open letter to their British counterparts on Thursday, warning them that an international military strike on Syria would recklessly and illegally "plunge secular Syria, and indeed the whole region, into a cataclysm of sectarian mass murder" and inviting them to visit with their own chemical weapons experts to check the conclusions of the United Nations investigators now in the country.The letter, which the lawmakers asked be read at a British parliamentary session on Thursday on the proposed strike, was in keeping with a Syrian government strategy of stressing what it sees as values and goals it shares with the West, including secularism and fighting terrorism. The letter condemned the chemical attack last week "without reservation," without repeating the government's attempts to blame Syrian rebels for it, and promised Parliament's own investigation.The document, a copy of which was obtained from a Syrian businessman close to the government, was addressed to the Parliament speaker, John Bercow. "Mr. Bercow received the letter today and responded, saying that he has deposited it in the library of the House of Commons where it can be read by members of Parliament," said a spokeswoman for the House of Commons, who asked not to be named in line with standard parliamentary policy.The writers invoked the 1914 assassination that set off World War I and of the invasion of Iraq in 2003, declaring, "Local tragedies become regional wars that explode into global conflict because of breakdowns in communication."The letter noted that thousands of British soldiers had been killed and wounded in Afghanistan and Iraq, adding that the Iraq invasion was based on "the dodgy dossier" of evidence that Saddam Hussein possessed chemical weapons, which were later found not to exist. They also warned that British parliamentarians would be "held personally legally liable" for all damage, and promised to follow up with a letter to Britain's attorney general.Inviting the British lawmakers echoed a strategy that Hussein's government employed in Iraq, inviting foreign opponents of the American-led invasion to Baghdad to be a kind of voluntary human shield.The letter was signed by Jihad Allaham, the speaker of the Syrian People's Assembly, which was elected during the conflict in June 2012 in polling that the opposition regards as tainted by government restrictions on political parties.The communication comes on a day when American officials plan to present the intelligence evidence for their certainty that the government of President Bashar al-Assad was behind chemical attacks that killed hundreds outside Damascus last week.The writers addressed their counterparts "as fathers and mothers," and "as members of families and communities really not so different to yours." It praised Britain as "a very old and well-established democracy that is a model for us" — an assertion that contrasts with the lack of political freedoms and legal rights in Syria even before the current conflict, which began when the government violently suppressed a movement for political rights.The letter said an attack would be illegal because Syria is a sovereign state that poses no threat to Britain, because the United Nations has not sanctioned an attack and because the United Nations report has not been issued. It also reasserted Syria's allegations that chemical weapons were used by the Nusra Front, an extremist rebel group linked to Al Qaeda, in an earlier episode and said that the United Nations had concluded there was "strong evidence" for that — apparently a reference to unsanctioned remarks several months ago by Carla Del Ponte, a United Nations official not directly involved in the investigation.An attack on Syria, the letter said, would "strengthen our common enemy, Al Qaeda." It urged implementation of United Nations Security Council Resolutions 1373 and 1624 against terrorism and concluded, "Instead of being enemies, we should be allies, and walk the road to peace, truth and reconciliation together."
LONDON — The stunning parliamentary defeat on Thursday for Prime Minister David Cameron, which led him to rule out British military participation in any strike on Syria, reflected British fears of rushing to act against Damascus without certain evidence.By just 13 votes, British lawmakers rejected a motion urging an international response to a chemical weapons strike for which the United States has blamed the forces of the Syrian president, Bashar al-Assad.The vote, and Mr. Cameron's pledge to honor it, is a blow to President Obama. Like nearly all presidents since the Vietnam War, he has relied on Britain to be shoulder-to-shoulder with Washington in any serious military or security engagement.But Mr. Obama's efforts to marshal a unified international front for a short, punitive strike raised concerns about the evidence, reawakening British resentment over false assurances from the American and British governments that Saddam Hussein had weapons of mass destruction.Even on Thursday, a British summary of intelligence could say only that it was "highly likely" Mr. Assad's forces were responsible for the use of chemical weapons. And many questions were raised, both Thursday night and in the days before, about whether the American assurances could be taken at face value, whether the expected riposte would accomplish any serious strategic or policy aim, and whether it might set off a worse regional conflict.The government had seemed only days from joining the United States and France in cruise-missile strikes on Syrian targets, even though a United Nations Security Council resolution authorizing force was out of reach, because of Russia and China.Mr. Cameron had yielded to the opposition Labour Party's demands for a separate, second vote to authorize military force, to be held only after United Nations weapons inspectors finish their work in Syria. It was widely expected that Mr. Cameron would win Thursday night's relatively meaningless vote on a motion supporting the notion that the chemical attack required an international humanitarian response that could involve military action. Instead, it was rejected, 285 to 272.After the shocking defeat, Mr. Cameron was clear. "I strongly believe in the need for a tough response to the use of chemical weapons," he said. "While the House has not passed a motion, it is clear to me that the British Parliament, reflecting the views of the British people, does not want to see British military action. I get that, and the government will act accordingly."The defeat, a sign of Mr. Cameron's weakness, was also a tactical victory for the often-criticized Labour leader, Ed Miliband. But in larger terms, it is also a measure of Britain's increasing isolation from its allies — both inside the European Union and now with Washington.A strong anti-European wave on the British right led Mr. Cameron to promise a referendum on continued British membership in the European Union. And there is deep skepticism of Washington's foreign policy, especially after the long, costly wars in Iraq and Afghanistan."The prime minister knew that the well had been poisoned by Iraq, but I don't think he realized how much that was the case," a Conservative legislator said, asking for anonymity. "They trust Cameron but not necessarily the advice he is being given."The vote took Britain into new constitutional territory, the lawmaker added, with Parliament effectively vetoing military action. Political recriminations are likely. But there was little disguising the humiliation for Mr. Cameron, who recalled Parliament specifically for a motion that he first watered down, then lost.There is also a deep wariness here of using military force without the explicit backing of international law, expressed most clearly in a Security Council resolution, as was the case when Britain participated fully in the NATO campaign to unseat Col. Muammar el-Qaddafi in Libya.Mr. Miliband argued that, absent a resolution, the evidence should at least be put before the Security Council before any military action. The days of former Prime Minister Tony Blair, who cited "humanitarian intervention" as a casus belli, seem long gone in a country that now widely disparages him and his record.Mr. Cameron's troubles may not deter Mr. Obama from acting with the support of France, where legislative consultation is important but approval is unnecessary. But though President François Hollande appears ready, the French public, too, has doubts.In the British Parliament on Thursday, the theme of doubt was foremost.Paul Flynn, of Labour, said that prior uses of chemical weapons, as against the Kurds, had not drawn such a response. "Is not the real reason we are here today not the horror at these weapons — if that horror exists — but as a result of the American president having foolishly drawn a red line, so that he is now in the position of either having to attack or face humiliation?" he asked.Sir Edward Leigh, a Conservative, said Britain should not allow American assurances to influence its decisions. He was particularly concerned with "the fate of the Christians" in Syria should Mr. Assad fall. And he asked whether the impact of military action would be sufficient to justify the likely deaths.However, Malcolm Rifkind, a former foreign and defense secretary who is chairman of Parliament's Intelligence and Security Committee, said, "There is no guarantee that a military strike against military targets will work, but there is every certainty that if we do not make that effort to punish and deter, these actions will indeed continue."
BEIRUT — Syria said on Friday that accusations by U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry that it has used chemical weapons were "lies and baseless."The Syrian foreign ministry said in a statement that Kerry's charges were a "desperate attempt" to justify a military strike against Syria.
UNITED NATIONS — Any notion that the departure of the U.N. chemical weapons inspection team from Syria on Saturday opens a window for a U.S. attack is "grotesque," the top U.N. spokesman said.U.N. spokesman Martin Nesirky spoke at a news conference shortly after Secretary-General Ban Ki-Moon had met in New York with U.N. disarmament chief Angela Kane who had just returned from Damascus after days of tense negotiations with Syrian officials over a U.N. probe into an apparent poison gas attack on Aug. 21 in the Damascus suburb of Ghouta, a rebel stronghold.A U.S. intelligence assessment says the attack was carried out by Syrian President Bashar Assad's government and killed 1,429 civilians, including more than 400 children.Ban spoke to the head of the U.N. chemical weapons inspection team, Ake Sellstrom, on Saturday to thank him, and will be briefed further by Sellstrom on Sunday, Nesirky said.The U.N. chemical weapons inspection team is now in The Hague, Netherlands, Nesirky said. The samples they collected in Syria are expected to be repackaged and sent to laboratories around Europe to check them for traces of poison gas, Nesirky said.The spokesman said the evidence would have to be analyzed in the laboratories before any report is made to member states. There is no specific time line for how soon the analysis will be completed, Nesirky said.The inspectors left Syria and flew out of Lebanon early Saturday. The team carried out a fourth and final day of inspections on Friday as they sought to determine precisely what happened in the alleged chemical weapons attack.Nesirky said the departure of the U.N. inspection team should not be seen as any kind of a green light for military action."I've seen all kinds of reporting suggesting that the departure of the chemical weapons team somehow opens a window for military action of some kind," Nesirky said. "Frankly, that is grotesque, and it's an affront to the more than 1,000 staff, U.N. staff, who are on the ground in Syria delivering humanitarian aid and who will continue to deliver critical aid."He also said any attack would leave the Syrian population vulnerable to harm.Nesirky was pressed repeatedly on whether the inspectors would try to assign blame for the attack, and responded that the team's mandate is limited to determining whether chemical weapons were used, as agreed between Damascus and the United Nations.In recent days, another U.N. spokesman, Farhan Haq, has said the team would build an 'evidence-based narrative" of the alleged attack that seemed to hint that they might look at how the event began.The United States, however, has said it has gathered intelligence showing that the apparent gas attack was ordered by Assad's government, not the rebels, making the outcome of the U.N. inquiry moot if the United States launches an attack to punish Syria in the coming days.
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama says he has decided that the United States should take military action against Syria in response to a deadly chemical weapons attack.But he says he will seek congressional authorization for the use of force.He says congressional leadership plans to hold a debate and a vote as soon as Congress comes back in September.Obama says he has the authority to act on his own, but believes it is important for the country to have a debate.Military action would be in response to a chemical weapons attack the U.S. says Syrian President Bashar Assad's government carried out against civilians. The U.S. says more than 1,400 Syrians were killed in that attack last week.
BEIRUT — Opposition fighters across Syria are preparing to launch attacks that exploit anticipated U.S.-led military strikes, but there are no plans to coordinate with Western forces, a Syrian rebel commander said on Saturday.The United States said on Friday it was planning a limited response to punish Syrian President Bashar al-Assad for a "brutal and flagrant" chemical weapons attack it says killed more than 1,400 people in Damascus 10 days ago. Washington has five cruise-missile equipped destroyers in the region.Qassim Saadeddine, a former Syrian army colonel and spokesman for the rebels' Supreme Military Council, said the council had sent a selection of rebel groups a military plan of action to use if strikes took place."The hope is to take advantage when some areas are weakened by any strikes. We ordered some groups to prepare in each province, to ready their fighters for when the strike happens," he told Reuters, speaking by Skype."They were sent a military plan that includes preparations to attack some of the targets we expect to be hit in foreign strikes, and some others that we hope to attack at the same time."The Supreme Military Council is the armed wing linked to the National Coalition, an umbrella group considered to be the opposition's political leadership abroad.Saadeddine said the plans had been prepared without any help from foreign powers. He said no information had been offered to them by the United States or any other Western countries such as France, which has supported carrying out a strike on Assad."The United States considers us to be one of the two parties engaged in a civil war, they haven't spoken to the rebel leadership at large, though they have communicated to the political leaders in the Coalition," Saadeddine said. "There may have been consultations with the head of our council, Salim Idriss, but I cannot confirm this."Syria's two-and-a-half year old conflict began as a peaceful protests against four decades of Assad family rule but has become a civil war that has killed more than 100,000 people.Activists said rockets loaded with poison-gas killed hundreds of people in rebel-held areas outside Damascus, many of them children, on August21. The Syrian government blames rebels fighting to topple Assad for the attack, but Washington says its intelligence shows Assad's forces were responsible.Saadeddine said his forces assessed that a Western attack would happen in the coming days and would last about three days.Saadeddine said the rebels liaising with the council had drawn up a list of potential targets for any strike."We think it will be something among military sites such as the headquarters of military leadership, military airports, certain weapon storage areas, or launchpads and installations for large missiles such as Scuds," he said.Other sites seen by rebels as likely targets, Saadeddine said, were those belonging to elite forces believed most loyal to Assad - the Fourth Armored Division and the Republican Guard. The opposition blames those units for playing a role in the poison gas attack.Other rebels contacted, without links to the council, said they were also trying to prepare for a potential strike, but that they were struggling to come up with a plan of action.
PARIS — Most French people do not want France to take part in military action on Syria and most do not trust French President Francois Hollande to do so, a poll showed on Saturday.The United States said on Friday it would punish Syrian President Bashar al-Assad's government for a chemical attack that it says killed more than 1,400 people in Damascus last week, and Hollande said Britain's parliamentary vote against military strikes would not affect France's own actions.The BVA poll released by Le Parisien-Aujourd'hui en France, showed 64 percent of respondents opposed military action, 58 percent did not trust Hollande to conduct it, and 35 percent feared it could "set the entire region (Middle East) ablaze".Two other opinion polls published this week, and carried out after the gas attack, indicated lukewarm support among French voters for military intervention in Syria.Hollande, whose popularity has been hurt by economic gloom, showed unexpected military mettle when he dispatched troops to help Mali's government fend off Islamist rebels earlier this year, an intervention backed by two-thirds of the public.
DAMASCUS, Syria — The engraved plaque at the entranceway on a dark backstreet of downtown Damascus reads in English, "You welcome to Kertaj Hotel, with Arabic hospitality."It has proven very hospitable for more than a dozen families from among the hundreds of thousands of Syrians uprooted from their homes in war-torn parts of the country. The families have lived for months in the Kertaj, some for almost a year, crammed with their children in the rooms.Once total strangers hailing from far-flung parts of the countryside around Damascus, they have created a sort of communal family in the hotel's cramped quarters. They all live on the third floor, and the wives cook together in the kitchen of the restaurant on the top floor, to which the owner has given them free rein. Their kids play together, dashing around the hallways and up and down the narrow staircase. The husbands — those who still have jobs — come back in the evening and play backgammon together in the restaurant, where the TV is.In a gesture of support, the owner has cut room rates in half for them, to around $5 a day."This is the amazing thing, the camaraderie we have here," said Abu Rami, who moved in 11 months ago with his wife and five children. As he passed through the lobby, he greeted the receptionist, and one of his neighbors' little girls playing the stairs called out to him: "Uncle, tell my mama I'm down here.""In this hotel," Abu Rami added, "it's like we're living in an old-time 'hara.'""Hara" simply means an alley in Arabic, but it evokes far more than that. It harkens back to Medieval Arab cities, made up of tight mazes of tiny alleyways. In each alley, the neighbors knew each other for generations, and their lives were intermingled. Every night, they would close the gate at the alley entrance to keep out thieves. Few people still live that way, but the "hara" still raises feelings of warmth, intimacy and safety.The atmosphere has been recreated in the four stories of the Kertaj."These people are closer than family to me now. I don't even see my siblings anymore, but these people I see every day," said a government employee who fled fighting around his home outside Damascus in September. His 10 brothers and sisters are dispersed around various parts of the capital or fled abroad."Our wives are all now best friends and spend all their time together," he said. "You know how women are, they're social creatures. They need each other."Part of the restaurant has been sectioned off for the women if they want privacy — though often they are mingled with the men in the main part.He and other residents spoke on condition they remain anonymous or be identified only by their nicknames and that some details of their experiences not be cited, fearing reprisals against themselves, relatives or neighbors.Nearly 5 million people around this country of 23 million have been driven from their homes as regime forces and rebels battle in the 2 ½-year civil war. Around 2 million of those have fled abroad. The rest are scattered inside Syria, taking refuge wherever seems safe. Hundreds of thousands are in Damascus, though the exact number is not known. Those who can afford it rent apartments. Others stay in government shelters in schools or other facilities. Some of the poorest camp out in highway medians of the capital.The Kertaj is one of a number of cheap hotels full of displaced families around Damascus' Marjeh Square. In the late 19th century, Marjeh, just outside the old medieval quarters, was a main square of the newly rising modern capital, surrounded by Ottoman administration buildings. A pillar in the square commemorates the Ottomans' opening of the Middle East's first telegraph line, from Damascus to Medina. The heart of the city has since moved on to sparkling new neighborhoods, and Marjeh has declined into a faded glory, lined with cheap electronics shops and hole-in-the-wall restaurants.The hotel is cramped, but it's clean and neat. Plastic flowers decorate corners of the lobby, and a chintzy chandelier illuminates the deep purple wallpaper, wood paneling and mirrors. In the lobby and restaurant, the deceased father of the owner — posing in a dignified suit — looks down from black-velvet portraits on the wall.The 15 families' basic stories are the same: They abandoned homes, carrying what they could, to escape daily shelling, gunbattles and sniping in rebel-held areas. But each has their personal trauma. Some have had spouses or siblings arrested or kidnapped, others have survived shelling on their homes.Abu Rami said a man was shot to death in the garden of his apartment building in Jobar, on Damascus' eastern edge."We were gone by nightfall," he said. "We didn't flee because of shelling or shooting, we fled out of sheer terror."Abu Rami knew of the Kertaj because it's near his job downtown — a studio that designs signs for stores. He's lucky, he can continue working, unlike others whose jobs are inaccessible because of fighting. "It's saved me the commute," he said with a smile.Displacement brings strange coincidences, as communities dispersed by the upheaval wash up in unexpected places.One Friday a few months ago, Abu Rami went with his son for prayers at a mosque a few blocks from the hotel. To his surprise, the cleric delivering the sermon was his own local sheik from Jobar. The sheik had fled his home as well and the mosque had taken him in."We saw each other and both just broke down in tears of joy," he said. "You know how it is, when you see someone familiar, from your old life."Nearby in the restaurant, one of the women — dressed like the others in a black conservative headscarf — watches her daughter play on the floor. The 18-month-old girl was born a few months before the woman's husband disappeared. Soon after, she brought her six children here. Alone, she struggles to get by."Where am I supposed to get diapers and formula for her?" she said, motioning at her toddler. "The only bright point is this place. Everyone in the hotel helps me where they can."The bonds built in the close quarters run deep, even with the transient life. The government employee tells of how one of his daughters played every day with a girl whose family stayed for several months at the Kertaj.Then the family moved on. "She was shattered, weeping so much we almost had to take her to the hospital."His daughter, in her early teens, smiled shyly from behind the kitchen counter where she was washing tea glasses."Now they still talk every day by phone," he said. "We hosted the family here at the hotel once for dinner, and they stayed the night with us in our room. It was like a family reunion."
BEIRUT — The team of United Nations inspectors that was investigating the alleged chemical weapons attack in Syria arrived at Beirut International Airport on Saturday, a Reuters witness said.The team had crossed the land border from Syria into Lebanon earlier in the day after completing its four-day investigation.
BEIRUT — The United Nations team tasked with investigating alleged chemical weapons strikes in Syria arrived in Lebanon on Saturday, a Reuters witness said.The team crossed the land border into neighboring Lebanon after leaving their Damascus hotel earlier in the morning.
BEIRUT — U.N. chemical weapons experts have left Syria and crossed into neighboring Lebanon.An Associated Press crew saw the U.N. personnel cross into Lebanon from Syria through the country's Masnaa border crossing early Saturday.The team on Friday carried out a fourth and final day of inspection as they sought to determine precisely what happened in the Aug. 21 alleged chemical weapons attack near Damascus.The team took samples from victims for examination in laboratories in Europe.
WASHINGTON — The White House has sent Congress a draft of a resolution authorizing President Barack Obama to use military force against Syria.The draft follows through on Obama's decision, announced Saturday, to seek congressional approval for a strike against Syrian President Bashar Assad's regime.The resolution lays out the administration's claim that Assad's regime killed more than 1,000 last week in a chemical weapons attack. It says the objective of a U.S. military response would be to "deter, disrupt, prevent and degrade" the regime's ability to use chemical weapons going forward.The resolution authorizes Obama to use the military as he determines "necessary and appropriate" to serve that goal.The draft doesn't lay out a timeline for action. But it does say only a political settlement can resolve the Syrian crisis.
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama sent draft legislation to Congress on Saturday formally asking for approval to use military force in Syria to "deter, disrupt, prevent and degrade" the potential for further chemical attacks.
DAMASCUS — Syrians reacted with a mixture of relief, disappointment and scorn to U.S. President Barack Obama's decision to seek Congressional approval before any strike on their country.Some concluded an attack would never happen."I have to admit this morning was the first time I felt I could sleep in," said Nawal, a mother-of-five who works as a housekeeper in Damascus."I felt so relieved after hearing his speech. But I don't understand why he put us through all that suspense," she said.Washington had seemed to be gearing up for a strike against President Bashar al-Assad's forces over an August 21 poison gas attack that U.S. officials said had killed 1,429 people.After U.S. Secretary of Defense Chuck Hagel said the military was "ready to go", and U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry called Assad "a thug and a murderer" whose forces had committed a "moral obscenity", many Syrians expected cruise missiles to rain down on Damascus by Saturday night.Food prices soared, bread disappeared from bakeries and the streets of Damascus were deserted as people huddled around television screens beaming Obama's speech."THEY WANT US TO DIE"Instead Obama delayed an imminent strike against Syria to seek Congressional support, a move that could take at least 10 days, if it comes at all.State television in Syria, which has denied using chemical weapons, aired patriotic footage and music after the speech. Many Syrians were annoyed.In Mouadamiya, a rebel-held Damascus suburb, Abu Akram, a doctor who treated poison gas victims and helped escort a team of U.N. investigators, found Obama's speech frustrating."For days we've been waiting. We were so hopeful. Now it's back to waiting and waiting. It turns out every leader in this world is a liar ... It's as if they want us to die," he said.Obama's credibility has been called into question for not punishing Assad's government for earlier poison gas attacks, after the U.S. president had said use of chemical weapons would constitute a "red line" for the United States.But Obama, seeking to extricate America from conflicts in Iraq and Afghanistan, has been reluctant to intervene in a civil war which has killed 100,000 people over the past 2-1/2 years.Syrian state media described Obama's speech as the start of an "historic American defeat" while Assad said Syria was capable of confronting any external aggression.Rebel fighters on the ground said they still hoped for a U.S. strike and understood Obama's decision to go to Congress."I thought the president spoke well and I believe he really wants a strike, and will get it from Congress," said Col. Qassim Qassim Saadeddine, a rebel commander and spokesman for the Supreme Military Council, the military wing of the Syria's leading opposition group abroad."I'm optimistic and I believe this is going to start causing the psychological collapse of the regime," he told Reuters.The Syrian opposition coalition called on the U.S. Congress to support military intervention which it said should be accompanied by an effort to better arm rebels.Nizar al-Haraki, the Syrian National Coalition's ambassador in Doha, mocked Obama's characterization of chemical weapons being a "red line" that would change his calculus of the war."All the lines have been crossed, the red lines, the yellow lines, the purple lines and the world is still watching Syrians die everyday and doing nothing about it," he said in Doha.By Sunday morning in Damascus, bread had returned to the bakeries and state security forces appeared relaxed, drinking tea and chatting at their posts outside government buildings"We always knew there wouldn't be a strike. It's not going to happen. Anyway, we were never nervous about it. We were just worried for the civilians. But we're confident it's not going to happen," one of them said.But Fatima, the housekeeper, was not as confident that the delay in American action would keep her out of danger. Death could come from Obama's strike or another chemical attack."I'm worried about another chemical attack, some sort of retaliation ... there's no end in sight," she said."Anyway, the hardest thing about death is waiting for it."
DAMASCUS — U.S. President Barack Obama's statement that he would seek Congress approval for a military strike on Syria was full of hesitation and confusion, Syrian Deputy Foreign Minister Faisal Mekdad said on Sunday."It is clear there was a sense of hesitation and disappointment in what was said by President Barack Obama yesterday. And it is also clear there was a sense of confusion as well," he told reporters in Damascus.
PARIS — President Barack Obama's decision to seek congressional authorization for a military strike on Syria has sparked calls for the French parliament to get the same privilege.The French constitution doesn't require such a vote unless and until a French military intervention lasts longer than four months, as recently happened in the African country of Mali, where France's military campaign pushed Islamist rebels out of towns in the north and into remote hideaways.President Francois Hollande has backed Obama's call to conduct a military strike against the Syrian government in retaliation for a chemical weapons attack in a Damascus suburb on Aug. 21.Francois Fillon, France's ex-prime minister and leading figure in the opposition UMP party, said Sunday that parliament should vote on the issue, telling the Journal du Dimanche newspaper, "In the current circumstances, France cannot go to war without the clear support of parliament."France's parliament is scheduled to debate the issue Wednesday, but no vote is scheduled.Another French opposition figure, prominent centrist politician Francois Bayrou, said in an open letter published in Sunday's Journal du Dimanche that it would be "unthinkable" for Hollande to act without consulting parliament.Voices from within Hollande's own party agreed. The head of parliament's defense committee, Patricia Adam, told the newspaper that she favors the idea on a personal level, and that she "doesn't see any reason why parliament wouldn't get a say now when others do."In what looked like a nod to these calls for more parliamentary oversight, Prime Minister Jean-Marc Ayrault said Sunday he would meet with leaders of the parliament's defense and foreign affairs committees as well as parliamentary party leaders on Monday to discuss the Syria situation.Other Socialists, including Interior Minister Manuel Valls and the head of parliament's foreign affairs committee Elisabeth Guigou, took to Sunday's TV chat shows to reiterate the government's stance, backed up by the constitution, that it is Hollande's prerogative to take the decision for military action."We don't change the constitution based on someone's mood or on what's happening in the world," Valls said on I Tele.France has echoed U.S. calls for a strong international coalition to take action in Syria, and Valls reiterated Sunday that there is no question of France going it alone in the event the U.S. Congress rejects Obama's call for action.Should Hollande decide to heed the calls for a vote, experts said there are two possible scenarios.One would be for Prime Minister Jean-Marc Ayrault to make the question part of a confidence vote on his government. That was done in 1991, when parliament backed then-President Francois Mitterrand's decision to join the U.S-led coalition in the Gulf War. A no-vote, although unlikely given the Socialists' majority in parliament, would bring down the government.Another article of France's Constitution gives the government the option of holding a non-binding vote on any question proposed either by the government itself or by a parliamentary group.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — At the end of a nerve-racking day in the cross hairs of American gunships, Syrians gathered around televisions to watch President Obama announce the start of an expected American missile strike.When he instead declared that he would seek Congressional approval for the strikes — telling them, essentially, never mind, for now — Syrians were shocked. Also relieved, bewildered, confused, triumphant and angry.Mohammed, 24, who opposes the government, watched the speech with friends who support it — not an uncommon situation in Damascus, where, especially among the wealthy and educated, people on both sides still interact, and argue, freely."They all suddenly turned into political analysts," he said. "Some of them said he looked very scared in his speech, and some said he decided to backtrack because the decision was hasty, and others thought it's just a game he's playing and he's going to strike tonight.""I think there is a lot of fear among people," added Mohammed, who gave only his first name for safety reasons. "They are trying to hide it, but they are afraid."Umm Hana, 58, watched Mr. Obama's speech with her husband and children in the central city of Homs, where government opponents have faced some of the country's fiercest army shelling. She said she regretted wasting time on him."It is just so clear — they are playing us like puppets, but they all want him to stay," she said, referring to President Bashar al-Assad of Syria. "Obama is full of talk. He's so weak and useless."For another Homs resident, Abu Bassam, 31, the only possible response was black humor."Man, I wish Bush was the president," he said. "He would have reacted right away. He may have invaded Cyprus or Jordan instead of Syria by mistake, but you know he would have done something at least."But even some government opponents were relieved. Abeer Basal, a Damascus resident, had waited with clenched anxiety since word of an American strike began to circulate, along with reports that the government was moving political prisoners to military bases or leaving them in security offices that could be targets. Her brother was arrested eight months ago, and her family feared he could be killed, one of the many potential unintended consequences of a strike."While Obama was speaking," she said, "my mother didn't stop crying and praying that they decide against the military involvement in Syria."Many Syrians feel deeply ambivalent about a strike, hoping it curbs the government's indiscriminate use of force — by punishing Mr. Assad for deadly chemical attacks on Aug. 21 that American officials blame on his government — but also fearing it could unleash new chaos.Khalid al-Shami, a humanitarian aid worker in Damascus, summed up the quandary."I am against the military intervention in Syria if it will turn the country into the new Iraq," he said. "I stand for it if it will in any way help to save souls."He said Mr. Obama appeared to be trying to keep the promise on which he was elected, to avoid repeating the mistakes of the American invasion of Iraq by limiting the scope of the strike and seeking consensus. It made sense, he said, that Mr. Obama would conceal the "zero hour" of the strike, and that he would take care to ensure it did not "contradict his electoral program about keeping the U.S. away from further wars."But government supporters said Mr. Obama had backed down, either out of uncertainty over the evidence linking the government to the attacks, or out of fear.Amin, 29, a Damascus resident, called the president "a rational and intelligent man" who, he said, "won't get involved in a war when he's not certain the regime is behind the chemical attacks."He said Mr. Obama wanted to avoid the possibility of a deeper entanglement leading to regional spillover or American casualties, adding, "I won't mention their concern for civilians, because it is the least of their concerns."Most of all, Syrians realized that their emotional roller coaster ride would continue. The postponement seemed bound to lengthen the period of suspense that has lingered for days.Before the speech, Syrians spent the day discussing, debating and preparing for the attacks. They scoured corner shops for canned food, flashlights and candles; official news channels blasted patriotic music; and soldiers decamped to mosques and schools as the government tried to disperse its forces and arms into civilian buildings.In central Damascus, where families still gather on weekends in parks with neatly planted flowers and splashing fountains, some people were sure the attacks would bring new dangers — of what kind, they could not be sure — while others said that whatever came next could not be worse than what they were used to.One woman, a 29-year-old marketing executive, joked that the only difference would be the sounds: trading the thumps of both sides' mortars and the screech of the government's Russian-made MIG fighter jets for the thunder of Tomahawk missiles.Syria's state broadcast channels synchronized their programming, continuing the solemn wartime programming that had played all day. They had canceled movies and dramas, mixing triumphal montages of cheering crowds and military exercises with more sedate fare. A report about the government's plans to offer free feed to herders suffering from the war's economic effects lingered over images of fat sheep grazing in dusty fields.Across the country, rebels, government troops and civilians alike scurried to prepare. Fighters in the Free Syrian Army rebel coalition, who have long begged the United States to aid them more forcefully, honed plans to storm government bases, while their sometime allies in extremist Islamist groups — convinced they were as much a target as the government — scrambled for cover, taking down banners outside Shariah courthouses and headquarters and moving to new locations."We're very stressed here," said Abu Yoarob, a fighter with the Ansar al-Islam brigade in the northern province of Aleppo. "It's affecting our nerves."
PARIS — Senior members of France's ruling party rebuffed opposition calls for a parliamentary vote on whether to take military action against Syria, saying on Monday lawmakers should respect the president's constitutional right to decide on attacks.President Francois Hollande's demands for Syrian President Bashar al-Assad to be punished for an alleged chemical strike have left him out on a limb since Britain's parliament voted against taking part in any action and U.S. President Barack Obama said he would seek Congress approval before any assault.Hollande is the army's commander in chief under the French constitution and empowered to order an intervention. His sole obligation is to inform parliament within three days of action starting.Only if it were to last more than four months would he be obliged to seek parliamentary approval for it to continue.With opinion polls showing up to two-thirds of the public would oppose an intervention in Syria, several conservative, centrist and green politicians called over the weekend for France to hold a special parliamentary vote.Health and Social Affairs Minister Marisol Touraine told Reuters there was no reason to do that. "There is a framework and we must respect it," she said. "The issue is too serious to be opened up to political posturing.""In a complicated situation like this, we need to stick to principles, in other words the constitution, which does not oblige the president to hold a vote, nor even a debate," foreign affairs committee chief Elisabeth Guigou, a veteran of the ruling Socialist Party, told France Info radio."I don't see that holding a vote would make any sense politically," she said, noting France would be left in an impossible situation if parliament voted in favor of action and then the U.S. Congress voted against.Interior Minister Manuel Valls also said over the weekend that the constitution should be respected.But Alain Juppe, foreign minister under conservative ex-president Nicolas Sarkozy, said a vote was needed because the U.N. Security Council had not backed any attack on Syria."We're in a specific context here ... It would justify a vote in parliament," he said.Parliament is due to debate the Syria crisis on Wednesday.The last time parliament voted on military action was in 1991 when then-Socialist president Francois Mitterrand sought its support for his decision to join the U.S.-led coalition in the Gulf War.Guigou said doing nothing would signal to all authoritarian rulers that using chemical weapons against civilians can go unpunished. She acknowledged France would not act on its own."To give an intervention legality it would need to be carried out by a broad coalition," she said.Prime Minister Jean-Marc Ayrault told reporters he would show parliament leaders evidence in a meeting on Monday proving that Assad's forces used chemical weapons" on in an attack on August 21 which Washington says killed over 1,400 people.A declassified French intelligence document published by the weekly Le Journal du Dimanche and confirmed as authentic by a government official said Syria's chemical weapons arsenal included sarin, VX nerve agent and mustard gas.Syria had about 1,000 metric tons of chemical weapons, one of the world's largest such arsenals, it said. The agents could be delivered with long-range missiles, aerial bombardments or short-range artillery, it added.A BVA opinion poll released on Saturday showed 64 percent of respondents opposed taking military action in Syria, 58 percent did not trust Hollande to conduct an operation and 35 percent feared that strikes could set the Middle East "ablaze".
WASHINGTON — The U.S. military's decision to move an aircraft carrier into the Red Sea to help out with any "contingencies" underscores concerns a strike on Syria could evolve into another costly war as U.S. defense spending faces massive, mandatory cuts.Current and former military officials say the cost of firing cruise missiles at selected targets in Syria would be relatively easily absorbed, and analysts say the effect on U.S. weapons makers would be relatively minimal.But some U.S. lawmakers worry a strike against Syria could trigger a broader conflict.They are using that argument as another reason to avert more than $500 billion in military spending cuts facing the Pentagon over the next decade under the process known as "sequestration," on top of $487 billion in cuts that were already planned."We cannot keep asking the military to perform mission after mission with sequestration and military cuts hanging over their heads," Republican Buck McKeon, chairman of the House of Representatives Armed Services Committee, told CNN on Monday.Top military leaders have repeatedly warned lawmakers that further cuts will jeopardize the U.S. military's readiness to respond to crises like the one now playing out over Syria's suspected use of chemical weapons against its own citizens.President Barack Obama's administration says the Syrian government must be punished for the August 21 chemical weapons onslaught in the Damascus suburbs that killed over 1,400 people.But Obama halted plans for a strike against President Bashar al-Assad's forces until he receives congressional approval.Loren Thompson, chief operating officer of the Lexington Institute consultants' group, said the administration's proposed limited strike on Syria could buoy shares in major weapons makers such as missile maker Raytheon Co and Lockheed Martin, which builds the Aegis combat system used on Navy ships.Weapons makers are looking to foreign military sales and commercial markets to offset the downturn in U.S. military spending, but a new overseas conflict could increase demand for expendable items such as Raytheon's Tomahawk missiles."Any chance of military action tends to boost defense shares and bolster the case for defense spending," Thompson said, noting there was always the potential for escalation, despite the relatively small cost of cruise missile strikes.Obama has said he will not put U.S. soldiers on the ground in Syria, but military planners say they are preparing for all possible "contingencies," a fact reflected by the decision to reroute the USS Nimitz carrier strike group to the Red Sea, instead of letting it return home."The prospect of military action has to raise questions about whether sequestration should continue," Thompson said.A limited strike using Tomahawk missiles against Syrian command structures and chemical weapons delivery systems would not be an expensive mission by Pentagon standards.Tomahawk missiles cost an average of about $1.2 million each, so the overall price for a limited operation using missiles would depend on how many targets the administration decided to hit and the number of missiles it would have to use.Retired Navy Admiral Gary Roughead, who served as chief of naval operations during the allied strike on Libya in March 2011, said the cost of a limited strike on Syria was unlikely to require a supplemental budget submission, unless the Obama administration decided to launch a more protracted campaign."We did Libya and pretty much absorbed that out of the budget, he said."But the cost for strikes against Syria could rapidly escalate if the response prompted additional U.S. action, such as trying to destroy Assad's air defenses or establishing a no-fly zone with aerial patrols.The military says it will be prepared no matter what, but analysts said the budget cuts were affecting how the Pentagon was approaching the situation with Syria."You know ... what the impact has been on Air Force readiness. That's real. It does seriously limit the ability to quickly escalate. It does limit proficiency. You can't recover it without significant time," said Anthony Cordesman, a defense analyst at the Center for Strategic and International Studies.
WASHINGTON — Secretary of State John Kerry briefly opened the door on Tuesday to authorizing U.S. ground troops in Syria, but quickly slammed it shut and told Congress that any resolution approving military force would prohibit "boots on the ground."The exchange during the first public hearing in Congress on possible military action in Syria highlighted the worries of many lawmakers about authorizing U.S. military strikes to punish the Syrian government for using chemical weapons on civilians.Kerry initially told the Senate Foreign Relations Committee he would prefer not to bar the use of ground troops in Syria to preserve President Barack Obama's options if Syria "imploded" or there was a threat of chemical weapons being obtained by extremists."I don't want to take off the table an option that might or might not be available to a president of the United States to secure our country," Kerry told the committee.But when Senator Bob Corker of Tennessee, the top Republican on the committee, told Kerry he "didn't find that a very appropriate response regarding boots on the ground," Kerry quickly, and repeatedly, backtracked.Kerry said he was simply "thinking out loud" and raising a hypothetical situation, but he did not want to leave the door open to sending ground troops to Syria."Let's shut the door now," Kerry said. "The answer is, whatever prohibition clarifies it to Congress or the American people, there will not be American boots on the ground with respect to the civil war."The exchange came as Kerry, Secretary of Defense Chuck Hagel and General Martin Dempsey, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, visited Capitol Hill as part of the administration's push to persuade Congress to back Obama's plan to launch limited strikes on Syria for its alleged use of chemical weapons last month.Obama has asked Congress, which does not return in full from summer recess until next week, to authorize action in response to what the administration says was a sarin gas attack by the Syrian government that killed more than 1,400 people, hundreds of them children, near Damascus on August 21.Significant opposition to military force remains in Congress, where many lawmakers, including Obama's fellow Democrats, have said they are concerned the president's draft resolution is too open-ended and allow possible use of ground troops or eventual attacks on other countries.A Reuters/Ipsos poll released on Tuesday showed Obama has failed to convince most Americans of the need for a military strike in Syria. Some 56 percent of those surveyed said the United States should not intervene in Syria, while only 19 percent favored action, the online poll found.The hearing was interrupted several times by shouting protesters from the anti-war group Code Pink who were escorted away by Capitol police.NO SUPPORT FOR 'BOOTS ON THE GROUND'"I don't think there are any of us here that are willing to support the possibility of having combat boots on the ground," Corker said.The resolution proposed by the administration authorizes Obama to use military force as necessary to "prevent or deter the use or proliferation" to or from Syria of any weapons of mass destruction, including chemical weaponsOne of the leading hawks on Syria in Obama's cabinet, Kerry assured lawmakers it would be easy to word a resolution on military force to reassure Congress and the public that the door in Syria was not open to ground troops.But Kerry also urged senators not to limit U.S. authority to strike Syria to "one specific moment," saying the military had follow-on strike options should Syria's government use chemical weapons again.Senators Robert Menendez and Corker, the Democratic and Republican leaders of the committee, announced late on Tuesday that they had reached an agreement on a draft resolution authorizing force, paving the way for a committee vote on Wednesday.Among other things, the resolution sets a 60-day time limit for any engagement and bars the use of U.S. armed forces on the ground in Syria for combat operations.Two members of the House of Representatives, Democrats Gerald Connolly and Chris van Hollen, offered their own version of the legislation, which would also prohibit U.S. "boots on the ground" and limit any engagement to 60 days.The House must pass its own version of the authorization for the use of military force and the Senate and House versions must be reconciled before Obama can sign it.During their appearance, Kerry and Hagel told the committee that any military operation would be limited and specifically designed to degrade President Bashar al-Assad's chemical weapons capability.Hagel added that a failure to punish Syria for the use of chemical weapons would damage U.S. national security interests and American credibility."A refusal to act would undermine the credibility of America's other security commitments - including the president's commitment to prevent Iran from acquiring a nuclear weapon," he said. "The word of the United States must mean something."As Kerry and Hagel pressed their case for limited military strikes in Syria, Obama won support for action from two top Republicans in the House of Representatives - Speaker John Boehner and Majority Leader Eric Cantor."Only the United States has the capability and the capacity to stop Assad and to warn others around the world that this type of behavior is not going to be tolerated," Boehner told reporters. "I believe that my colleagues should support this call for action."Kerry, Hagel and Dempsey are due to appear before the House Foreign Affairs Committee on Wednesday.
WASHINGTON — Secretary of State John Kerry says the debate about military strikes against Syria is not about President Barack Obama's "red line" that weapons of mass destruction cannot be tolerated.Instead, Kerry told Congress Tuesday that "this debate is about the world's red line." He says it is "a red line that anyone with a conscience ought to draw."Kerry, Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel, and Joint Chiefs Chairman Gen. Martin Dempsey were dispatched to the Senate to help persuade lawmakers to support a resolution authorizing limited military strikes against Syria following a chemical weapons attack last month outside Damascus that left hundreds dead, including many children.Kerry said "This is not the time for arm-chair isolationism. This is not the time to be spectators to slaughter."
WASHINGTON — The chairman of the Senate Armed Services Committee said on Tuesday he was confident after talking with President Barack Obama that the United States would step up its support for "vetted" elements of the Syrian opposition.Senator Carl Levin said he urged the president, a fellow Democrat, to arm the Syrian rebels a day after two influential Republican senators, John McCain and Lindsey Graham, sought similar assurances from Obama, who is trying to persuade lawmakers to authorize limited U.S. military action in Syria."I am confident after being in the Oval Office with the president this morning and the vice president and others, that we are going to make more robust our support for the Syrian opposition that is vetted," Levin told reporters.Levin's reference to a "vetted" Syrian opposition reflects U.S. concerns about American weapons falling into the hands of certain rebel groups including those allied with the al Qaeda network responsible for the 2001 attacks on the United States. The rebels are seeking to topple Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.Levin, a prominent Democratic voice on military matters, said he told the White House that the United States should provide rebels with arms such as anti-tank weapons "which cannot be turned on us.""My plea to the president ... is that we facilitate a vetted opposition to help to degrade Assad's capability to use chemical weapons," Levin said.McCain and Graham emerged from a White House meeting on Monday saying they believed Obama was willing to do more than fire off cruise missiles, and that he wanted to bolster the Syrian opposition.Obama has been meeting with lawmakers as part of his attempt to secure congressional approval for a possible military strike in response to what the United States says was a sarin gas attack by the Syrian government that killed more than 1,400 people near Damascus on August 21.Levin said that it would be difficult for U.S. cruise missiles to effectively target the components of the Syrian military that had used the chemical weapons, such as their artillery and rocket launchers. He said it would be easier to provide Syrian rebels with the armed capability to go after those components."The opposition in Syria has the power - if we facilitate them having this power, if we provide the weapons or have others provide certain key weapons, including anti-tank capabilities - to go after the Syrian military that used the chemical weapons," Levin said.The White House said in June it had decided to provide military aid to Syrian rebels. But rebel sources have said no U.S.-provided weapons have arrived. U.S. officials have been concerned weapons could reach factions like the Nusra Front, one of the most effective rebel groups fighting Assad but one which is also seen as linked to al Qaeda.
JERUSALEM — Israel says it has carried out a joint missile test with the U.S. in the Mediterranean Sea amid heightened tensions as Washington weighs sea-launched strikes against Syria.The Defense Ministry said Tuesday that it, together with the U.S. Defense Department, had carried out a "successful test" in the Mediterranean and on an air force base in central Israel.Russian state-owned news agencies earlier said Russian radar systems had detected two "ballistic objects" fired from the central Mediterranean toward the eastern part of the sea.The United States, which has warships in the Mediterranean, is considering strikes against Syria for an Aug. 21 alleged chemical weapons attack in a Damascus suburb.
WASHINGTON — The World Bank is helping Lebanon prepare the ground to request an influx of international aid to offset the high costs of spillover from the Syrian civil war, the bank's president, Jim Yong Kim, said Tuesday.Kim said in an interview with The Associated Press that the Lebanese government asked the World Bank to take the lead in preparing a quick assessment of the social and economic impacts of the war in neighboring Syria. This analysis will be presented at a Sept. 25 meeting of an international support group for Lebanon at the United Nations General Assembly.Kim said the bank made a "very intensive effort" to finish the assessment in a few weeks, something that normally would take six to nine months.Lebanon is hoping the World Bank's stamp on the analysis will underpin its request for aid from individual donor countries as well as international agencies. It will look at the enormous strains the Syrian conflict is putting on Lebanese tourism, trade, health, education and the burden on ordinary citizens."We have been preparing the path so that the global community can support Lebanon," Kim said, adding that he hopes funds will begin to flow once the assessment is presented at the U.N. The analysis was prepared in cooperation with U.N. agencies and the European Union, potential donors, but the World Bank led the effort.The bank is looking for partners to provide grants to alleviate some of the strain on Lebanon's economy, government budget and infrastructure.Lebanon, a country of about 4 million people, is grappling with an influx of more than a million refugees from Syria.The World Bank said it could not provide a dollar figure for the aid Lebanon might request but the assessment is meant to help determine how much is needed now. It said the aid will augment help Lebanon gets from the U.N. refugee agency specifically to help with the costs of the refugees.However, the conflict is now permeating the fabric of Lebanese society and the country feels broader assistance is needed.The World Bank is already providing aid to Jordan, another Syrian neighbor, to help offset the costs of caring for hundreds of thousands more Syrian refugees. The bank provides loans and other assistance to developing countries with the goal of alleviating poverty.Kim also said he was concerned that an escalation of the Syrian conflict would cause even greater human suffering and could disrupt access to oil, increasing prices and hurting the world's poor.President Barack Obama is seeking the support of Congress for military action to punish the Syrian regime for alleging using chemical weapons on its own citizens."An increase in oil prices has very far reaching potential impacts on the well-being of especially the most vulnerable," he said."We would plead for all parties to really think hard about the human impact of any actions that are taken."
WASHINGTON — The Obama administration is now saying that the number of chemical weapons attacks by Syrian government forces is in the "teens" and that rebels put the number even higher.The figure cited by Secretary of State John Kerry is significantly higher than any previous public estimate from the United States. Before last month's suspected chemical attack in the Damascus suburbs, U.S. officials had spoken of several earlier incidents. But no one had put the total in double figures.Kerry told members of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee that Syrian President Bashar Assad's regime would definitely use chemical weapons again unless the U.S. takes military action.President Barack Obama is seeking Congress' authorization to retaliate against Assad by using force.
WASHINGTON — Senator Robert Menendez, chairman of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, said he hoped a Senate resolution on the use of U.S. military force in Syria would be written by the end of Tuesday, and it was likely the panel could vote on it on Wednesday.Menendez said during a hearing that committee leaders and staff were working on a text that would let President Barack Obama's administration pursue military action in Syria, but ensure that it is not an open-ended engagement "and specifically not with boots on the ground, American troops on the ground."Obama is asking Congress to back his call for limited U.S. strikes on Syria to punish President Bashar al-Assad for his suspected use of chemical weapons against civilians.At the end of the 3-1/2 hour hearing on Syria, Menendez told the 18 committee members that a business meeting to vote on a text of the resolution was "likely" after a classified hearing with top administration officials on Wednesday morning."It is likely that we could very well be in a business meeting sometime after the classified hearing tomorrow morning," Menendez said.
WASHINGTON — U.S. intelligence agencies did not detect the Syrian regime readying a massive chemical weapons attack in the days ahead of the strike, only piecing together what had happened after the fact, U.S. officials say.One of the key pieces of intelligence that Secretary of State John Kerry later used to link the attack to the Syrian government — intercepts of communications telling Syrian military units to prepare for the strikes — was in the hands of U.S. intelligence agencies but had not yet been "processed," according to senior U.S. officials.That explains why the White House did not warn either the regime or the rebels who might be targeted as it had done when detecting previous preparations for chemical strikes."We know that for three days before the attack the Syrian regime's chemical weapons personnel were on the ground in the area making preparations," Kerry said as he presented the evidence in a State Department speech last week. "We know that the Syrian regime elements were told to prepare for the attack by putting on gas masks and taking precautions associated with chemical weapons."But the Obama administration only uncovered the evidence after Syrians started posting reports of the strike from the scene of the attack, leading U.S. spies and analysts to focus on satellite and other evidence showing a Syrian chemical weapons unit was preparing chemical munitions before the strike, according to two current U.S. officials and two former senior intelligence officials.They spoke on condition of anonymity because they were not authorized to discuss the intelligence publicly.The spokesman for the director of national intelligence confirmed that U.S. intelligence did not detect the massive chemical weapons attack beforehand."Let's be clear, the United States did not watch, in real time, as this horrible attack took place," Shawn Turner said in a statement to The Associated Press on Wednesday. "The intelligence community was able to gather and analyze information after the fact and determine that elements of the Assad regime had in fact taken steps to prepare prior to using chemical weapons," Turner said.Turner offered no reason for the delay in processing the intelligence, but current and former intelligence officials said analysts were stretched too thin with the multiple streams of intelligence coming out of multiple conflict zones, from Syria to Libya to Yemen.In December, U.S. intelligence detected Syria's military was readying chemical weapons for use, and President Barack Obama warned the Syrian government publicly that such use was "totally unacceptable" and that the country's leaders would be held accountable.The White House is now asking Congress to approve a punitive strike against the regime of Syrian President Bashar Assad, which the administration blames for an Aug. 21 chemical weapons attack in a rebel-held suburb of Damascus.The administration says 1,429 died in the attack. Casualty estimates by other groups are far lower.Kerry and other officials are laying out the intelligence in open and closed sessions with lawmakers, explaining why the U.S. intelligence community last week issued a "high confidence" report implicating the Syrian regime — a conclusion echoed by British and French intelligence in similar reports made public since the attack.Senior administration officials explained last week that the U.S. intelligence community had reconstructed a picture of the attack, from satellite and signals intercepts that indicated to them that troops from Syria's military unit that handles chemical weapons, the Syrian Scientific Studies and Research Center, were readying such weapons. That conclusion was backed up, however, by a carefully written sentence that indicated the intelligence was somewhat circumstantial: "Syrian chemical weapons personnel were operating ... near an area that the regime uses to mix chemical weapons, including sarin."The report says U.S. intelligence intercepted communications after the attack by a "senior official intimately familiar with the offensive" who confirmed that chemical weapons were used by the Syrian government, and was concerned that the U.N. inspectors might find evidence of the attack. The report also says the U.S. has intelligence that Syrian chemical weapons personnel were directed to "cease operations" on the afternoon of Aug. 21, several hours after the attack.The U.S. officials briefed on the intelligence say such intercepts were in hand but waiting to be processed among hours of intercepted military communications.The CIA and the Defense Intelligence Agency have dozens officers on the ground in countries neighboring Syria, relying on a network of rebels and local agents to provide human intelligence on the goings on of both the regime and its opponents. The Pentagon also has satellites focused on the area, capturing images of the regime and rebel maneuvers, while various types of airborne platforms collect electronic transmissions such as military radio traffic or cellphone calls.
LONDON — Britain's opposition Labour leader Ed Miliband suffered a double blow on Wednesday when one of his party's biggest donors slashed its funding and an opinion poll exposed serious doubts over his authority.The survey, carried out early this week, suggested Miliband's standing had failed to benefit from the coalition government's historic defeat in the British parliament over military action in Syria.Miliband, whose opposition was crucial in Prime Minister David Cameron's shock defeat last week, is already under pressure from some in his centre-left party to improve his lackluster personal ratings and mount a stronger challenge before the next election, due in 2015.The latest survey gave more ammunition to Miliband's critics, suggesting voters see Cameron as stronger, more charismatic and more decisive. Just 2 percent thought Miliband is a "natural leader", compared to 13 percent for Cameron.The YouGov poll for the Sun newspaper gave Labour a four point lead over Cameron's Conservatives, well down from the 10 point advantage a separate poll on Monday gave Labour after last week's vote. Twenty YouGov polls in August put the Labour lead at between three and eight points.Labour lost power after 13 years in 2010 but Cameron failed to win an outright majority and was forced to enter a coalition with the Liberal Democrats.In a setback for Labour three weeks before its autumn conference, the GMB union said it would cut donations to party campaigns and pass on less money from members.The loss of an important source of income is the latest episode in a row between the unions and Labour over Miliband's plan to reform ties with the workers' groups that helped found the party more than a century ago.Miliband, who relied on union support to defeat his brother David in his party's 2010 leadership contest, angered unions in July when he said Labour must transform its links with the labor movement to make politics more transparent.The union said its decision reflected "considerable regret... that the party that had been formed to represent the interest of working people in this country intends to end collective engagement of trade unions in the party".The changes would see the GMB's annual fees to Labour sharply cut to 150,000 pounds ($233,000) from 1.2 million pounds. The union did not say how much it would cut from its campaign donations.Labour finance spokeswoman Rachel Reeves played down the cuts, saying it would raise more from individual members."Ed has spoken about the need for greater transparency and openness in that relationship," she told BBC radio.Labour's planned union reforms are part of a wider debate over party funding and whether donations should be capped.Cameron accuses Miliband of being in the unions' pocket, while his counterpart says the Conservatives are in the thrall of wealthy business leaders.
LONDON — British Prime Minister David Cameron said on Wednesday he believed the Syrian government would use chemical weapons against its own people again if the United States stepped back from taking military action against it.When asked by an opposition Labour party lawmaker whether he would push for a ceasefire in Syria rather than a "bombing raid", Cameron told parliament that U.S. President Barack Obama had issued a clear warning to Syrian President Bashar al-Assad on chemical weapons and was right to stick to it."I would just ask her to put herself for a moment in the shoes of the president of the United States," Cameron told the lawmaker during his weekly question and answer session in parliament."He set a very clear red line, that if there was large-scale chemical weapons use something had to happen. To ask the president of the United States, having set that red line, having made that warning, to step away from it I think that would be a very perilous suggestion to make because in response I think you would see more chemical weapons attacks from the regime."Cameron repeated that Britain would take no part in any military action against Syria after he lost what turned out to be a vital parliamentary vote on the issue last week, but said the world still needed to take a tough line on Assad's "revolting" use of chemical weapons.
The stock market rose modestly on Tuesday as renewed fears about an American military attack on Syria dampened an early rally.Stocks surged in the opening minutes of trading as investors felt that a military strike on Syria was not imminent after President Obama announced over the weekend that he would seek Congressional approval before taking action. That move is expected to delay any attack until at least next week, when Congress returns from its summer recess.But the early rally faded after the House speaker, John A. Boehner said he would support Mr. Obama's call for military action. Mr. Boehner said the United States needed to respond to the Syria's suspected use of chemical weapons. Representative Eric Cantor, the House majority leader, also voiced support.The Dow Jones industrial average closed up 23.65 points, or 0.16 percent, to 14,833.96. The index had climbed as much as 123 points in early trading.The Dow was also held back by Microsoft and Verizon, which both slumped after announcing deals.The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index gained 6.80 points, or 0.42 percent, to 1,639.77. The Nasdaq composite index rose 22.74 points, or 0.63 percent, to 3,612.61.The stock market also got an early boost from a report showing that manufacturing expanded last month at the fastest pace since June 2011. The report was better than economists had expected, according to estimates compiled by FactSet.In corporate news, CBS shares rose $2.40, or 4.7 percent, to $53.50, after the broadcaster and Time Warner Cable reached an agreement that ended a blackout of CBS and CBS-owned channels. Time Warner Cable shares rose $1.90, or 1.8 percent, $109.25.Other corporate news was disappointing. Microsoft stock fell $1.52, or 4.6 percent, to $31.88, after the software company said it would acquire Nokia's smartphone business and a portfolio of patents and services for about $7.2 billion.Verizon fell $1.37, or 2.9 percent, to $46.01, after the company agreed to pay $130 billion for Vodafone's 45 percent stake in Verizon Wireless.After a tough August, stocks may struggle to rally in September because of a string of events that could shake investors, said Randy Frederick, managing director of active trading and derivatives at the Schwab Center for Financial Research.The S.& P. 500 logged its worst performance last month since May 2012 as investors became increasingly concerned about when the Federal Reserve would cut its economic stimulus. The Fed's next meeting, which starts Sept. 17, is when many on Wall Street think it will begin winding down its bond-buying program.Lawmakers in Washington may also throw investors a curve ball. To keep the government running, Congress needs to pass a short-term spending bill before the fiscal year starts Oct. 1. Then there is the government's $16.7 trillion borrowing limit. Treasury Secretary Jacob J. Lew has warned that unless the debt ceiling is raised soon, the government would lose the ability to pay its bills by the middle of October.September has often been a losing month for the stock market. Since 1945, the S.& P. 500 has slumped nearly six out of every 10 Septembers, with an average loss of 0.6 percent.In government bond trading, the price of the 10-year Treasury note fell 20/32, to 96 28/32, while its yield rose to 2.86 percent, from 2.79 percent late Friday.
WASHINGTON — U.S. Democratic Senator Joe Manchin of West Virginia on Thursday opposed a White House-backed resolution that would provide congressional authorization of U.S. military strikes against Syria."A military strike against Syria at this time is the wrong course of action," Manchin said in a statement. "We must exhaust all diplomatic options and have a comprehensive plan for international involvement before we act."With the vote likely to be close in the Senate, the decision of each member of the chamber was being closed watched.
ROME — With tensions high in the Mediterranean over Syria, Italy has decided it's not the right time to send a Botticelli masterpiece on loan to Israel.Italy's culture ministry said Thursday it has decided against transporting the 15th--century "The Annunciation of San Martino alla Scala" from the Uffizi Gallery in Florence to the Israel Museum in Jerusalem, where it was supposed to go on display for several months starting Sept. 17. The ministry cited geopolitical and logistical considerations.The painting, with exquisite detail and dreamy colors, measures about 5.5 meters by 2.5 meters (17 feet by more than 8 feet).The ministry, citing the importance of Italian-Israeli relations, expressed hope that the Renaissance work would soon go on display in Jerusalem.
WASHINGTON — U.S. Senate Majority Leader Harry Reid is "guardedly optimistic" that his chamber next week will approve limited military strikes against Syria, a Democratic aide said on Thursday.The aide said the first Senate vote on a proposed use-of-force resolution requested by President Barack Obama will likely be held on Wednesday to overcome an anticipated Republican procedural roadblock.
WASHINGTON — U.S. President Barack Obama said on Thursday he and Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe shared the view that chemical weapons use in Syria was a violation of international law that must be addressed.Obama and Abe met on the sidelines of a Group of 20 summit in St. Petersburg as Washington sought to rally international support for a U.S. military strike on Syrian targets."I ... look forward to an extensive conversation about the situation in Syria and ... our joint recognition that the use of chemical weapons in Syria is not only a tragedy but also a violation of international law that must be addressed," Obama told reporters.Abe, who has refrained from speaking publicly about Japan's stance on Obama's push for military action against Damascus, said he looked forward to discussing with the U.S. president ways to improve the situation in Syria.
VATICAN CITY — Pope Francis urged the Group of 20 leaders on Thursday to abandon the "futile pursuit" of a military solution in Syria as the Vatican laid out its case for a negotiated settlement that guarantees rights for all Syrians, including minority Christians.In a letter to the G-20 host, Russian President Vladimir Putin, Francis lamented that "one-sided interests" had prevailed in Syria, preventing a diplomatic end to the conflict and allowing the continued "senseless massacre" of innocents."To the leaders present, to each and every one, I make a heartfelt appeal for them to help find ways to overcome the conflicting positions and to lay aside the futile pursuit of a military solution," Francis wrote as the G-20 meeting got under way in St. Petersburg.Francis has ratcheted up his call for peace in Syria amid threatened U.S.-led military strikes following an Aug. 21 chemical weapons attack near Damascus. But he has also been careful not to lay blame on any one side, exhorting world leaders instead to focus on the plight of Syrian civilians and the need to end the violence.Francis will host a peace vigil in St. Peter's Square on Saturday, a test of whether his immense popular appeal will translate into popular support for his peace message. It's the first time any such peace rally has been held at the Vatican, though Holy See officials have stressed it's a religious event, not a political protest.On Thursday, the Vatican summoned ambassadors accredited to the Holy See to outline its position on Syria, with Foreign Minister Archbishop Dominique Mamberti noting that the Aug. 21 attack had generated "horror and concern" around the world."Confronted with similar acts one cannot remain silent, and the Holy See hopes that the competent institutions make clear what happened and that those responsible face justice," Mamberti told the 71 ambassadors gathered.He didn't refer explicitly to the threat of military strikes to punish the Syrian regime for the attack. But he said the main priority must be to stop the violence which he said risked involving other countries and creating "unforeseeable consequences in various parts of the world."The Vatican, he said, wants a return to dialogue and for the country to not be split up along ethnic or religious lines.Minorities, including Christians, must have their basic rights guaranteed, including their right to profess their religion, he said. And he called for the opposition to distance itself from extremists, isolate them "and openly and clearly oppose terrorism" — a reference to the al-Qaida-affiliated rebels fighting against the government.The Assad family's four-decade iron rule over Syria long has rested on support from the country's ethnic and religious minorities, including Christians, Shiite Muslims and Kurds. As a result, the Catholic Church has toed a careful line on Syria, staying largely silent at the start of the civil war even after the regime's brutal crackdown on dissent.As the violence raged, Pope Benedict XVI and later Francis stepped up calls for dialogue. And amid the U.S. threat of military intervention, officials in the region and at the Vatican have warned that any outside military intervention will only exacerbate tensions, with Christians in the region bearing the brunt of the fallout.On Wednesday, the superior general of Francis' Jesuit order, the Rev. Adolfo Nicolas, told a Catholic news agency that military action by the U.S. and France would be an "abuse of power.""I cannot understand who gave the United States or France the right to act against a country in a way that will certainly increase the suffering of the citizens of that country, who, by the way, have already suffered beyond measure," he was quoted as saying in the interview, the text of which was released by a Vatican-affiliated spokesman.In the United States, the head of the U.S. bishops' conference, Cardinal Timothy Dolan, wrote a letter to members of Congress urging them not to resort to military strikes. He cited bishops in the region as warning that any outside military intervention would be counterproductive, particularly given the lack of international consensus.
WASHINGTON — It would hardly be a surprise to Syrian President Bashar al-Assad or his military if American missiles start hitting Syria soon.With weeks to prepare for an attack, Assad might benefit in some ways from the delay in any strike caused by President Barack Obama's decision to seek approval from a divided U.S. Congress.U.S. officials and defense experts say Assad's forces cannot take enough targets out of reach to blunt the U.S. military mission, especially since it is billed as having very limited objectives.Obama is calling for a limited military strike in response to a chemical weapons attack on civilians blamed by the United States on Assad's forces.Fixed targets, for example, cannot be protected no matter how much time elapses. "A building can't be moved, nor hid," one U.S. official said, speaking on condition of anonymity.Other fixed targets could include airfields, although not any storage facilities with chemical weapons in them.Defense analyst Anthony Cordesman of the Center for Strategic and International Studies think tank said if successful, hitting fixed targets would eliminate key assets to Assad that "can't easily be replaced, like command and control facilities, major headquarters.""These are lasting targets," Cordesman said.It is still unclear when any U.S. attack on Syria will happen but Assad already has had ample time to try to get ready. U.S. officials have been openly discussing the possibility of hitting Syria since shortly after the August 21 chemical weapons attack near Damascus.Even if Congress approves military action, a final vote would be unlikely before the middle of next week.A second U.S. official, also speaking on condition of anonymity, acknowledged that the delay added "complexities" to the planning efforts."It may change target sets," the official said. "We'll continue to refine our targeting options to conditions on the ground."Assad has already moved some military equipment and personnel to civilian areas and put soldiers whose loyalty to Assad is in doubt in military sites as human shields against any Western strikes, the Istanbul-based Syrian opposition has said.It cited movement of rockets, Scud missiles and launches, as well as soldiers to locations including schools, university dormitories and government buildings inside cities.That could complicate the ability of the United States to reach some targets.General Martin Dempsey, chairman of the U.S. military's Joint Chiefs of Staff, acknowledged publicly to Congress that Obama has ordered the military to develop plans that keep a lid on collateral damage - civilian deaths and damage to civilian infrastructure."Though they are in fact moving resources around - and in some cases placing prisoners and others in places that they believe we might target - at this point our intelligence is keeping up with that movement," Dempsey, the top U.S. military officer, told lawmakers on Wednesday.The question of whether losing the element of surprise makes a difference militarily became a bone of contention in the debate over congressional backing for Obama's attack plan.Senator John McCain, one of the Republicans who has pushed hardest for military action in Syria, said this week he was "astounded" when Obama said the military had advised him that an attack would still be effective in a month's time."When you tell the enemy you are going to attack, they are obviously going to disperse and make it harder," McCain said in Congress on Tuesday."It's ridiculous to think that it's not wise from a pure military standpoint not to warn the enemy that you're gonna attack," McCain said.The Obama administration says the planned attack is designed to strike a particular balance - being strong enough to deter Assad from using chemical weapons in the future while also degrading his ability to do so.But the Obama administration has said any attack would not be designed to topple Assad or necessarily shift the momentum in Syria's civil war to the detriment of government forces.U.S. objectives include targets directly linked to the Syrian military's ability to use chemical weapons, as well as missiles and rockets that can deliver them, Dempsey said.Air defenses that could be used to protect chemical weapons sites are also potential targets, Dempsey said."That target package is still being refined as I sit here with you," Dempsey told lawmakers.Despite the stated objective of deterring Assad, the U.S. military cannot guarantee its strikes will prevent Assad from using chemical weapons in the future.Even the objective to degrade - a military term that means "diminish" - his capabilities is vague. There has been no clear, public objective offered by the United States on how much it must damage Assad's capabilities.
The Syrian rebels posed casually, standing over their prisoners with firearms pointed down at the shirtless and terrified men.The prisoners, seven in all, were captured Syrian soldiers. Five were trussed, their backs marked with red welts. They kept their faces pressed to the dirt as the rebels' commander recited a bitter revolutionary verse."For fifty years, they are companions to corruption," he said. "We swear to the Lord of the Throne, that this is our oath: We will take revenge."The moment the poem ended, the commander, known as "the Uncle," fired a bullet into the back of the first prisoner's head. His gunmen followed suit, promptly killing all the men at their feet.This scene, documented in a video smuggled out of Syria a few days ago by a former rebel who grew disgusted by the killings, offers a dark insight into how many rebels have adopted some of the same brutal and ruthless tactics as the regime they are trying to overthrow.As the United States debates whether to support the Obama administration's proposal that Syrian forces should be attacked for using chemical weapons against civilians, this video, shot in the spring of 2012, joins a growing body of evidence of an increasingly criminal environment populated by gangs of highwaymen, kidnappers and killers.The video also offers a reminder of the foreign policy puzzle the United States faces in finding rebel allies as some members of Congress, including Senator John McCain, press for more robust military support for the opposition.In the more than two years this civil war has carried on, a large part of the Syrian opposition has formed a loose command structure that has found support from several Arab nations, and, to a more limited degree, the West. Other elements of the opposition have assumed an extremist cast, and openly allied with Al Qaeda.Across much of Syria, where rebels with Western support live and fight, areas outside of government influence have evolved into a complex guerrilla and criminal landscape.That has raised the prospect that American military action could inadvertently strengthen Islamic extremists and criminals.Abdul Samad Issa, 37, the rebel commander leading his fighters through the executions of the captured soldiers, illustrates that very risk.Known in northern Syria as "the Uncle" because two of his deputies are his nephews, Mr. Issa leads a relatively unknown group of fewer than 300 fighters, one of his former aides said. The former aide, who smuggled the video out of Syria, is not being identified for security reasons.A trader and livestock herder before the war, Mr. Issa formed a fighting group early in the uprising by using his own money to buy weapons and underwrite the fighters' expenses.His motivation, his former aide said, was just as the poem he recited said: revenge.In Washington on Wednesday, Secretary of State John Kerry addressed the issue of radicalized rebels in an exchange with Representative Michael McCaul, a Texas Republican. Mr. Kerry insisted, "There is a real moderate opposition that exists."Mr. Kerry said that there were 70,000 to 100,000 "oppositionists." Of these, he said, some 15 percent to 20 percent were "bad guys" or extremists.Mr. McCaul responded by saying he had been told in briefings that half of the opposition fighters were extremists.Much of the concern among American officials has focused on two groups that acknowledge ties to Al Qaeda. These groups — the Nusra Front and the Islamic State in Iraq and Syria — have attracted foreign jihadis, used terrorist tactics and vowed to create a society in Syria ruled by their severe interpretation of Islamic law.They have established a firm presence in parts of Aleppo and Idlib Provinces and in the northern provincial capital of Raqqa and in Deir al-Zour, to the east on the Iraqi border.
The Syrian rebels posed casually, standing over their prisoners with firearms pointed down at the shirtless and terrified men.The prisoners, seven in all, were captured Syrian soldiers. Five were trussed, their backs marked with red welts. They kept their faces pressed to the dirt as the rebels' commander recited a bitter revolutionary verse."For fifty years, they are companions to corruption," he said. "We swear to the Lord of the Throne, that this is our oath: We will take revenge."The moment the poem ended, the commander, known as "the Uncle," fired a bullet into the back of the first prisoner's head. His gunmen followed suit, promptly killing all the men at their feet.This scene, documented in a video smuggled out of Syria a few days ago by a former rebel who grew disgusted by the killings, offers a dark insight into how many rebels have adopted some of the same brutal and ruthless tactics as the regime they are trying to overthrow.As the United States debates whether to support the Obama administration's proposal that Syrian forces should be attacked for using chemical weapons against civilians, this video, shot in the spring of 2012, joins a growing body of evidence of an increasingly criminal environment populated by gangs of highwaymen, kidnappers and killers.The video also offers a reminder of the foreign policy puzzle the United States faces in finding rebel allies as some members of Congress, including Senator John McCain, press for more robust military support for the opposition.In the more than two years this civil war has carried on, a large part of the Syrian opposition has formed a loose command structure that has found support from several Arab nations, and, to a more limited degree, the West. Other elements of the opposition have assumed an extremist cast, and openly allied with Al Qaeda.Across much of Syria, where rebels with Western support live and fight, areas outside of government influence have evolved into a complex guerrilla and criminal landscape.That has raised the prospect that American military action could inadvertently strengthen Islamic extremists and criminals.Abdul Samad Issa, 37, the rebel commander leading his fighters through the executions of the captured soldiers, illustrates that very risk.Known in northern Syria as "the Uncle" because two of his deputies are his nephews, Mr. Issa leads a relatively unknown group of fewer than 300 fighters, one of his former aides said. The former aide, who smuggled the video out of Syria, is not being identified for security reasons.A trader and livestock herder before the war, Mr. Issa formed a fighting group early in the uprising by using his own money to buy weapons and underwrite the fighters' expenses.His motivation, his former aide said, was just as the poem he recited said: revenge.In Washington on Wednesday, Secretary of State John Kerry addressed the issue of radicalized rebels in an exchange with Representative Michael McCaul, a Texas Republican. Mr. Kerry insisted, "There is a real moderate opposition that exists."Mr. Kerry said that there were 70,000 to 100,000 "oppositionists." Of these, he said, some 15 percent to 20 percent were "bad guys" or extremists.Mr. McCaul responded by saying he had been told in briefings that half of the opposition fighters were extremists.Much of the concern among American officials has focused on two groups that acknowledge ties to Al Qaeda. These groups — the Nusra Front and the Islamic State in Iraq and Syria — have attracted foreign jihadis, used terrorist tactics and vowed to create a society in Syria ruled by their severe interpretation of Islamic law.They have established a firm presence in parts of Aleppo and Idlib Provinces and in the northern provincial capital of Raqqa and in Deir al-Zour, to the east on the Iraqi border.
Jeffrey P. Bezos, Amazon's founder and the prospective new owner of The Washington Post, assured newsroom employees on Wednesday that he was committed to preserving quality journalism, investing in news and making sure The Post adhered to his underlying philosophy about content: "Don't be boring."Over the course of the day, he gave some indication of the kind of journalism that interested him, answered questions about the Post's coverage of Amazon and did not disguise his interest at the intersection of his businesses, telling an afternoon meeting that "it should be as easy to get a subscription to The Post as it is to buy diapers on Amazon," according to one employee who attended the meeting.The two-day visit was Mr. Bezos's first trip to The Post since he agreed to buy the paper in early August for $250 million. Before the deal closes in October, Mr. Bezos made the visit to chat with employees from both the business and editorial sides about his plans for the company. By the end of his visit late Wednesday, Mr. Bezos seemed to have won over employees who posted photographs of him, speculated on how many electronic devices he had in his pockets, liberally quoted his thoughts on the news business on social media and gave him the hashtag #bezospalooza."He charmed the room of 20 hard-bitten journalists," said Jeffrey Leen, The Post's investigations editor, who attended a lunch meeting with Mr. Bezos. "He was a big supporter of investigative reporting, which warmed my heart. He already has a very good grasp of our business. It was, all in all, a very impressive performance."Mr. Bezos started the day Wednesday with an hourlong breakfast with Bob Woodward in the ninth-floor publisher's private dining room, where the two men dined on a fruit plate, poached eggs, spinach, coffee and orange juice. Mr. Woodward said in an e-mail after the meeting that through the breakfast, "Jeff Bezos explained the thinking behind his reasoned and careful step-by-step process in deciding to buy The Post."Mr. Woodward added, "I was struck by how wide-ranging and methodical he is. He voiced strong, even intense, optimism about the future of The Post, and I suspect he will be calling on everyone here to pitch in with extra amounts of energy, focus and creativity."Mr. Bezos then met for a little more than an hour for coffee with about 20 reporters in a neighboring ninth-floor conference room and talked about how he defined success."What's been happening over the last several years can't continue to happen," he said.Mr. Bezos told reporters that the paper should focus on delivering important, compelling stories to its readers. If it does that, advertisers will come, he said. Several reporters said that message left them upbeat after the meeting, convinced that Mr. Bezos was committed to high-quality journalism."You got the feeling that he is not here to just take The Washington Post brand name and turn it into something else," said one reporter who attended and spoke anonymously. "This is not somebody who is in a panic trying to make a profit for next year. He wants to solve it in a way that will endure for decades."For lunch, Mr. Bezos met with senior editors for a buffet of chicken, salmon, salad and cookies. Mr. Bezos mentioned that some of The Post's recent coverage that he had found especially intriguing included the articles "9 Questions about Syria you were too embarrassed to ask", and the obituary of a bouncer at The 9:30 Club, a well-known Washington club.In the late afternoon, Mr. Bezos met with the entire newsroom in the first-floor community room for a question-and-answer session that lasted an hour and 20 minutes. That was the most widely chronicled event, with employees posting Twitter messages and comments — or what they called "Bezosisms" — every few minutes. Mr. Bezos answered questions about why he decided to buy The Post and why he would be interested in buying a newspaper when Amazon had a reputation for being slow to answer reporters' questions.Erik Wemple, the Post's media reporter, quoted him on Twitter as saying, "I've always felt that the most powerful minds in the world can hold powerful inconsistencies."Toward the end of the session, Mr. Bezos addressed more difficult questions like the possible conflict of interest between The Post and Amazon's contract for computer work with the Central Intelligence Agency. One employee, who attended the session but did not feel comfortable speaking on the record about his future owner, said that while Mr. Bezos "danced around" his answer, he added that he expected The Post to aggressively cover this relationship.Mr. Bezos may have offered his most assuring comments when asked about his thoughts on journalism's future. In a post, Cara Ann Kelly, The Washington Post's Style Web producer, quoted him as saying, "If it's hopeless — I would feel sorry for you guys — but I wouldn't want to join you."
The stock market rose on Wednesday as investors were encouraged by a surge in auto sales in August and other signs of strength in the economy.Shares of General Motors, Ford Motor and Toyota Motor rose after the auto industry reported its best month in six years."Car sales were really impressive," said Peter Cardillo, chief market economist at Rockwell Global Capital, noting that they point to solid consumer spending and increased manufacturing. "It means the economy is holding up," he said.The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index rose 13.31 points, or 0.8 percent, to 1,653.08. The Dow Jones industrial average gained 96.91 points, or 0.7 percent, to 14,930.87. And the Nasdaq composite index rose 36.43 points, or 1 percent, to 3,649.04.Jim Russell, a senior equity strategist at U.S. Bank Wealth Management, said recent economic reports had drawn a brighter picture of the global economy, even as concerns over a possible American military strike on Syria have claimed much public attention.A trade group said on Tuesday that the nation's factories increased production last month at the fastest pace since June 2011, propelled by a sharp rise in new orders. Separate reports out on Monday showed stronger manufacturing in Europe and China."All of these add up to better economic growth on a global scale," Mr. Russell said.On Wednesday, G.M. said that its sales rose 15 percent last month compared with August 2012, while the Chrysler Group and Ford each reported 12 percent gains. Toyota posted the biggest increase as sales rose nearly 23 percent.G.M. rose $1.71, or 5 percent, to $35.85, one of the biggest gains in the S.& P. 500. Ford rose 57 cents, or 3.5 percent, to $16.91.The Nasdaq stock market ran into technical problems for the second time in two weeks. The exchange reported that its system for disseminating prices failed briefly, from 11:35 a.m. to 11:41 a.m., but it said trading was not affected. On Aug. 22, all trading in Nasdaq-listed stocks was halted for three hours because of a problem with the same quote-disseminating system.Investors are looking ahead to Friday, when the government will release the August employment report. Economists forecast that employers added 177,000 jobs last month and that the unemployment rate held steady at 7.4 percent, according to the data provider FactSet.Friday's jobs report is the last major piece of economic data the Federal Reserve will have to work with before the central bank considers when to begin winding down its economic stimulus program, which has kept interest rates abnormally low.Among the stocks on the move, Dollar General rose $2.51, or 4.7 percent, to $56.39 after the company reported profits that narrowly beat Wall Street analysts' estimates. In contrast to some of its competitors, Dollar General said sales at stores open more than a year climbed.Francesca's Holdings plunged $6.23, or 26 percent, to $17.79 after it reported results that fell short of Wall Street's estimates. The company, which operates the Francesca's retail stores, cut its forecast for full-year earnings, citing poor customer traffic.Ciena surged $2.86, or 14 percent, to $23.54. The company, which develops high-speed networking technology, reported earnings that exceeded Wall Street expectations, a result of higher revenue and lower costs.In the bond market, interest rates moved higher. The price of the 10-year Treasury note fell 9/32 to 96 19/32, while its yield rose to 2.90 percent from 2.86 percent late Tuesday.
WASHINGTON — Senate Majority Leader Harry Reid has formally introduced the resolution giving President Barack Obama the authority to use military force against Syria.Reid filed the measure on Friday during a brief Senate session. Lawmakers return from their five-week recess on Monday and will begin to debate the resolution.A vote to move ahead on the resolution is expected Wednesday.The Senate is deeply divided over whether to approve military strikes in response to chemical weapons attacks in Syria. Republicans and Democrats have expressed opposition to the measure, which the Senate Foreign Relations Committee narrowly approved on a 10-7 vote on Wednesday.
WASHINGTON — U.S. President Barack Obama does not intend to authorize U.S. military force in Syria if lawmakers vote against his proposal seeking action amid allegations of chemical weapons use by Syrian President Bashar al-Assad, a top aide said on Friday."The president of course has the authority to act, but it's neither his desire nor his intention to use that authority absent Congress backing him," deputy national security adviser Tony Blinken told National Public Radio.The comments come as lawmakers weigh whether to pass a resolution authorizing limited strikes against Syria. U.S. officials allege Assad's government used sarin nerve gas in a deadly attack on its civilians on August 21.U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry, appearing before lawmakers in both the Senate and the House of Representatives this week, has refused to say what he thought Obama would do if Congress did not agree to act on Syria in response to U.S. allegations of chemical weapons use.Lawmakers are divided over whether and how to respond, and many are still undecided despite efforts by Obama administration officials to build support, including calls from the president.The Senate Foreign Relations Committee approved a modified version of Obama's resolution on Wednesday, and the full Senate is likely to begin voting next Wednesday.The timing of a vote in the House remained unclear. Both chambers must approve the measure for it to pass.Worried about getting embroiled in Syria's civil war, many U.S. lawmakers have voiced concerns over using military force without backing from the United Nations or a broader coalition of other countries. Some have also said they want the United States to pursue other diplomatic and humanitarian options.But Blinken cited the severe sanctions imposed on Assad already, and said that the UN has failed to act on even more basic steps."At this point, we have unfortunately exhausted everything," he told NPR's "Morning Edition" program.
ST. PETERSBURG — Turkish Prime Minister Tayyip Erdogan said on Friday almost all leaders at the G20 summit accepted the need for intervention in Syria and repeated that a small coalition could be formed for a joint operation even outside the auspices of the U.N.Turkey has said previously it would be ready to take part in international action against Syrian President Bashar al-Assad, and has put its armed forces on alert to guard against threats from Syria, with which it shares a 900 km (560 mile) border."Almost all the leaders who attended the summit are closely following the massacre the Syrian regime carried out on its people and the leaders have expressed that an operation is extremely necessary against Damascus," Erdogan said."At the moment there is no such thing as a decision for a joint operation in Syria ... as there is no U.N. Security Council decision," he told a news conference in St. Petersburg. But he said a small group of countries could form a coalition."It could be three countries, five countries ... What will be the strategy of such an operation, what will be the tactics, they are separate issues ... But the necessity for such a thing to happen was emphasized (at the summit)," he said.
The National Security Agency is winning its long-running secret war on encryption, using supercomputers, technical trickery, court orders and behind-the-scenes persuasion to undermine the major tools protecting the privacy of everyday communications in the Internet age, according to newly disclosed documents.The agency has circumvented or cracked much of the encryption, or digital scrambling, that guards global commerce and banking systems, protects sensitive data like trade secrets and medical records, and automatically secures the e-mails, Web searches, Internet chats and phone calls of Americans and others around the world, the documents show.Many users assume — or have been assured by Internet companies — that their data is safe from prying eyes, including those of the government, and the N.S.A. wants to keep it that way. The agency treats its recent successes in deciphering protected information as among its most closely guarded secrets, restricted to those cleared for a highly classified program code-named Bullrun, according to the documents, provided by Edward J. Snowden, the former N.S.A. contractor.Beginning in 2000, as encryption tools were gradually blanketing the Web, the N.S.A. invested billions of dollars in a clandestine campaign to preserve its ability to eavesdrop. Having lost a public battle in the 1990s to insert its own "back door" in all encryption, it set out to accomplish the same goal by stealth.The agency, according to the documents and interviews with industry officials, deployed custom-built, superfast computers to break codes, and began collaborating with technology companies in the United States and abroad to build entry points into their products. The documents do not identify which companies have participated.The N.S.A. hacked into target computers to snare messages before they were encrypted. In some cases, companies say they were coerced by the government into handing over their master encryption keys or building in a back door. And the agency used its influence as the world's most experienced code maker to covertly introduce weaknesses into the encryption standards followed by hardware and software developers around the world."For the past decade, N.S.A. has led an aggressive, multipronged effort to break widely used Internet encryption technologies," said a 2010 memo describing a briefing about N.S.A. accomplishments for employees of its British counterpart, Government Communications Headquarters, or GCHQ. "Cryptanalytic capabilities are now coming online. Vast amounts of encrypted Internet data which have up till now been discarded are now exploitable."When the British analysts, who often work side by side with N.S.A. officers, were first told about the program, another memo said, "those not already briefed were gobsmacked!"An intelligence budget document makes clear that the effort is still going strong. "We are investing in groundbreaking cryptanalytic capabilities to defeat adversarial cryptography and exploit Internet traffic," the director of national intelligence, James R. Clapper Jr., wrote in his budget request for the current year.In recent months, the documents disclosed by Mr. Snowden have described the N.S.A.'s reach in scooping up vast amounts of communications around the world. The encryption documents now show, in striking detail, how the agency works to ensure that it is actually able to read the information it collects.The agency's success in defeating many of the privacy protections offered by encryption does not change the rules that prohibit the deliberate targeting of Americans' e-mails or phone calls without a warrant. But it shows that the agency, which was sharply rebuked by a federal judge in 2011 for violating the rules and misleading the Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Court, cannot necessarily be restrained by privacy technology. N.S.A. rules permit the agency to store any encrypted communication, domestic or foreign, for as long as the agency is trying to decrypt it or analyze its technical features.The N.S.A., which has specialized in code-breaking since its creation in 1952, sees that task as essential to its mission. If it cannot decipher the messages of terrorists, foreign spies and other adversaries, the United States will be at serious risk, agency officials say.Just in recent weeks, the Obama administration has called on the intelligence agencies for details of communications by leaders of Al Qaeda about a terrorist plot and of Syrian officials' messages about the chemical weapons attack outside Damascus. If such communications can be hidden by unbreakable encryption, N.S.A. officials say, the agency cannot do its work.
BEIRUT — Heavy government shelling of rebel positions near the Syrian capital killed 16 people on Saturday, activists said, as U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry lobbied European allies to back Washington's proposed military action against the ruling regime.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said the mortar and artillery fire on the Moldokhiya agricultural area south of Damascus killed 14 rebels. A child and another civilian also died in the shelling, it added.The group also reported heavy fighting between rebels and troops loyal to President Bashar Assad around the Christian village of Maaloula northeast of Damascus. The rebel advance into the area this week was reportedly spearheaded by al-Qaida-linked fighters, exacerbating fears among Syrians and religious minorities in particular that Islamic extremists are playing an increasingly important role in the rebellion.Fighters from the Western-backed Free Syrian Army also have participated in battles around Maaloula, destroying two government checkpoints near the town earlier this week, according to a statement by the main opposition coalition on Friday.The fighting comes as President Barack Obama's administration pressed ahead with efforts to win congressional backing and international support for military strikes against Syria over an alleged chemical attack in August outside Damascus. The U.S. says Assad's forces fired rockets loaded with the nerve agent sarin on rebel-held areas near the capital before dawn on Aug. 21, killing at least 1,429 people. Other estimates put the death toll from the attack at more than 500.Obama, back in Washington after a trip to Europe that included a two-day visit to Russia to attend a Group of 20 summit, will intensify his efforts to sell a skeptical Congress and a war-weary American public on a military strike against Syria.A passionate debate is already underway in Congress and the administration's lobbying campaign culminates Tuesday, the evening before a critical vote on the possible Syria action is expected in the Senate. Obama will address the nation from the White House that night to make his case for military action.In Lithuania, Kerry met with European leaders, who have been skeptical about whether any military action against Assad's regime can be effective.In a joint statement Saturday, European foreign ministers agreed with the U.S. that the Aug. 21 alleged chemical attack appears to have been the work of the Syrian regime. But, they added, any potential military attack against Syria should wait for a U.N. inspectors' report.EU foreign affairs chief Catherine Ashton said that the available intelligence "seems to indicate strong evidence that the Syrian regime is responsible for the attack."The report from the U.N. inspectors, who collected evidence in the suburbs hit by the Aug. 21 attack, is expected later this month, although some European officials are asking the U.N. to speed up the probe or issue an interim report.Later Saturday in Paris, Kerry pressed the administration's case further, saying "this is not the time to be silent spectators to slaughter."France, which firmly backs the Syrian rebels and has strategic and historic interests in the region, had been ready to take military action last week but held off after Obama declared he would seek the backing of Congress first.The prospect of a U.S.-led strike against Syria has raised concerns of potential retaliation from the Assad regime or its allies. On Friday, the State Department ordered nonessential U.S. diplomats to leave Lebanon over security concerns and urged private American citizens to depart as well.The Shiite militant group Hezbollah, an Assad ally that has sent fighters into Syria, is based in Lebanon.On Saturday, dozens of people protested outside the U.S. Embassy against military strikes on Syria. Some of the demonstrators carried placards reading "No War," and "Hands off Syria."Syrian officials have been trying to capitalize on reluctance in Europe and the U.S., and both the government and state media accuse Obama of "supporting terrorism.""Any US aggression against Syria has no explanation other than (that it's) supporting terrorism," Syrian Deputy Foreign Minister Faisal Mekdad said in an interview with state-run Al-Ikhbariya TV broadcast late Friday. He challenged the international community to present evidence that Syria had used sarin, and said military action against his country would be "dangerous and might affect America's friends and the entire world."At the Vatican, an estimated 70,000 people answered Pope Francis' call for a four-hour Syria peace vigil late Saturday, joining Christians as well as non-Christians in similar vigils around the world.The turnout in St. Peter's Square was believed to be one of the largest rallies in the West against proposed U.S.-led military action.Francis spent most of the vigil in silent prayer, but during his speech he issued a heartfelt plea for peace : "This evening, I ask the Lord that we Christians, and our brothers and sisters of other religions and every man and woman of good will, cry out forcefully: Violence and war are never the way to peace!"Associated Press writers Deb Riechmann and Raf Casert in Vilnius, Lithuania, Josh Lederman in Washington, Nicole Winfield in Vatican City and Albert Aji in Damascus, Syria, contributed to this report.
DAMASCUS — Hundreds of Syrian Christians gathered in Damascus on Saturday to pray for peace and protest against possible U.S. military intervention, responding to a call by Pope Francis for a day of prayer and fasting.During a six-hour service at the al-Zeitouna Church, an ornate Roman Catholic cathedral in the capital's ancient quarter, Syrian-born Melkite Catholic Patriarch Gregoire III Laham appealed to Christians to stay in Syria despite the war.Syria's conflict has grown increasingly sectarian since it started as a peaceful uprising in March 2011 and then evolved into an armed rebellion against President Bashar al-Assad.Majority Sunni Muslims dominate the uprising while minorities have generally stuck with the government, which is dominated by members of Assad's Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam.Pope Francis, who two days ago called a military solution in Syria "a futile pursuit", led the world's 1.2 billion Roman Catholics in a global day of prayer and fasting for peace in Syria, the Middle East and the world on Saturday.Syrian state television broadcast the ceremonies, billing them as a call for a "return to security and peace in Syria and to oppose any foreign military intervention," a reference to a bid by U.S. President Barack Obama to use military force to punish Assad's government for a chemical weapons attack last month.Television footage showed some worshippers holding Syrian flags and hand-written signs against military intervention. "Hands off Syria," one read.Clergy at the Damascus service also referenced the recent violence in Maaloula, a historic Christian town in the center of the country where some inhabitants still speak Aramaic, the language of Jesus."If Maaloula has been hurt, then it is a call for the world to hear: 'Look, this place, this heritage that you love so much, look what they have done to it'," Laham said as some worshippers wept. He implored Syrian clergy and Christians to resist the temptation to emigrate."I beg, beg, beg you, our dears, to remain here. We're staying. If you leave, we leave. So we beg you, stop coming to our priests asking for a visa. Young men, young women, remain here. If you leave, who will remain? Only our brethren the Muslims," he said."We shall remain. We shall remain. We shall remain. And as we remain, we shall build the new Syria. If we leave, who will build Syria?"Laham implored the Muslim majority not to consider Christians "a fifth column"."At this time in particular, we shall be as close as ever," he said.At the end of the service, one churchgoer held up the Syrian flag and a sign that said: "Jesus salutes the heroic Syrian Army".
WASHINGTON — Syrian President Bashar al-Assad denied that he was behind a chemical weapons attack on the Syrian people and said evidence was not conclusive that there had been such an attack, CBS reported on Sunday on its news program "Face the Nation.""There has been no evidence that I used chemical weapons against my own people," CBS reported Assad said in an interview conducted in Damascus.The full interview will air on the CBS network and PBS's "Charlie Rose" show on Monday. Rose said he met with Assad in Damascus. The CBS "Face the Nation" report was a summary of the interview and did not contain any audio or video of Assad.Speaking in London, U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry dismissed Assad's claim that there was no evidence of his use of chemical weapons on fellow Syrians. "The evidence speaks for itself," he told reporters.Obama administration officials gave public testimony and daily closed-door briefings on Syria last week to members of Congress, including video coverage of victims of the attack.Assad spoke as the Obama administration was pressing its case in the United States for congressional authorization of a U.S. strike against Syria in response to the August 21 sarin gas attack that Washington said killed more than 1,400 Syrians, including several hundred children.The Obama administration has accused Assad's forces of carrying out the attack. Assad has blamed the rebels.Passage by Congress of the authorization for use of force is by no means certain. Votes are expected this week.Rose, speaking by telephone, said Assad would neither confirm nor deny whether Syria had chemical weapons, but if Syria did have the weapons they would be under centralized control. The United States should produce evidence of his involvement, if it has the evidence, Rose reported Assad said.Assad warned, the CBS interviewer said, that if there was a military strike by the United States, there would be retaliation by those aligned with Syria. Syria was as prepared as it could be for an attack, Rose said he was told by Assad.Rose said he raised the question of whether Assad feared the attack might degrade the Syrian military and tip the balance in the 2-1/2-year-old civil war, and was told by Assad that he was very concerned about that.Rose said Assad had a message for the American people that they should not get involved in another Middle Eastern conflict.
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama's request for congressional authorization for military strikes against Syria is set to dominate the Congress this week and next, with the outcome in doubt.Obama is seeking backing for the strikes in response to an alleged chemical weapons attack near Damascus on August 21. Washington blames the Syrian government for the attack, which it says kills more than 1,400 people.Here are the important steps in Congress:- On Monday, Senate Majority Leader Harry Reid began moving to limit debate on the "motion to proceed" to a resolution authorizing the use of military force. The motion to proceed is the mechanism for bringing legislation before the full Senate.It is not yet clear whether opponents will allow a simple majority vote on this procedural step or insist on a more difficult 60-vote majority in the 100-member chamber, in which Obama's Democrats control 54 seats.This first test vote is now set for Wednesday.- On Monday evening, many members of Congress will receive a classified briefing from administration and military officials. For scores of lawmakers, this will be their first inside look at the Syria situation.- Reid, in consultation with Senate Republican leader Mitch McConnell, will likely decide how many and which amendments to the bill will be debated on the Senate floor.- Obama is due to lunch on Tuesday with Senate Democrats in an attempt to sway enough of them to support a military strike.- He then plans a speech to the nation on Tuesday night, which could be a defining moment. Many undecided members of the Senate and House are likely to make up their minds on how they will vote after that speech and into Wednesday.- If the Senate votes to debate the resolution itself, opponents could erect another procedural hurdle that would require 60 votes to limit this debate.Should those votes prove necessary and if Reid succeeds in rounding them up, a vote on passing the Syria resolution could come on Thursday or Friday. A simple majority vote in favor of the bill would send it to the House for consideration.- The House could simply vote for or against the Senate-passed bill. Or, it could amend the bill, pass it and send it back to the Senate for approval. Another option, though one that seems less likely now, is for a House committee to write its own bill for debate in the 435-member House. In any event, it could be next week before the full House takes action.
WASHINGTON — Senate Majority Leader Harry Reid is blaming the Syrian government for using deadly chemical weapons in what he calls a "clear violation of human decency."In remarks in the Senate on Monday, the Democratic leader said failure of the United States to respond would embolden hostile forces worldwide.Reid made the remarks as President Barack Obama faces stiff resistance from Democrats and Republicans to his request for the authority to use military force against Syria.The U.S. blames the Assad government for a chemical weapons attack that killed more than 1,400 civilians last month.Reid said the Senate will be voting to uphold a century-long tradition that chemical weapons have no place on the battlefield. Reid moved for a key test vote on Wednesday.
UNITED NATIONS — U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon is urging Syria to immediately agree to transfer chemical weapons and chemical precursors to a safe place within the country for international destruction.Ban said Monday he will also propose to the Security Council that it unite and demand an immediate chemical weapons transfer should U.N. inspectors conclude that such weapons were used in an attack Aug. 21 in a suburb of Damascus.He said he is also considering asking the council to demand accountability for an alleged chemical weapons attack.Ban spoke shortly after Moscow's surprise announcement that it was pressing its ally Syria on a similar proposal — to move its chemical weapons to areas under international control to avoid a U.S. military strike.
WASHINGTON — Syrian President Bashar Assad has warned there will be "repercussions" against any U. S. military strike launched in response to a chemical weapons attack in his country."You should expect everything," Assad said in an interview with CBS taped in Damascus. "Not necessarily from the government. It's not only the government ... in this region. You have different parties, you have different factions, you have different ideology."Asked if he was making a threat of a direct military response to any such attack, Assad was vague, saying at one point, "I am not fortune teller to tell you what's going to happen."President Barack Obama is seeking authorization from Congress to launch what the administration says would be a limited-scope attack against Syria in reprisal for Assad's purported use of chemical weapons. Assad has denied it and argued in the interview broadcast Monday on "CBS This Morning" that Washington has presented no evidence to substantiate its allegations. In London Monday, Secretary of State John Kerry reasserted Washington's argument and said that the evidence is sufficiently strong to be accepted as evidence in a court of law.In the CBS interview, Assad said his forces were not in the area of the chemical weapons attack Aug. 21, saying "our soldiers in another area were attacked chemically. ... But in the area where they said the government used chemical weapons, we only had video and we only have pictures and allegations. We're not there." Kerry said that Assad's denial is "contradicted by fact."Asked if chemical warfare could be one repercussion from an American intervention in Syria, Assad told anchorman Charlie Rose: "That depends if the rebels or the terrorists in this region or any other group have it. It could happen. ""You are going to pay the price if you are not wise with dealing with terrorists," he said.Assad also said the current incident brings to mind memories of the arguments for intervention that President George W. Bush's administration made over a decade ago in connection with President Saddam Hussein's Iraq.Assad said Kerry's statements reminded him about "the big lie" that Secretary of State Colin Powell said to the United Nations about Saddam's weapons of mass destruction.Assad also said the majority of Americans "don't want a war anywhere, not only against Syria." He said the first question the U.S. lawmakers should ask themselves is , "What do wars give America?" He said Washington's credibility is "at an all-time low."
The price of oil retreated from a two-year high Monday as the prospects of a U.S. attack against Syria remained unclear.Benchmark oil for October delivery fell $1.01 to close at $109.52 a barrel on the New York Mercantile Exchange. On Friday, oil gained $2.16 to close at $110.53, the highest closing price since May 3, 2011.President Barack Obama has called for military action against the government of Syrian President Bashar Assad in retaliation for what the White House says was a chemical weapons attack against civilians in suburban Damascus last month. But he has so far failed to win sufficient support for intervention both at home and abroad.Obama plans to address the nation from the White House on Tuesday about Syria.On a Monday, there was hope for a possible diplomatic solution when Syria's foreign minister welcomed a suggestion floated by U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry to move all the country's chemical weapons under international control.The White House said it was taking a hard look at Syria's statement even as it redoubled efforts to sell the notion of the strike to a skeptical Congress and divided nation and senators prepared for a key test vote on the strike authorization Wednesday.Meanwhile, at the gas pump, the average price for a gallon of gasoline remained at $3.57. That up a penny from a month ago, but down 25 cents from this time last year.Brent, the benchmark for international crudes, dropped $2.40, or 2.1 percent, to $113.72 per barrel on the ICE Futures exchange in London.In other energy futures trading on Nymex:Pamela Sampson in Bangkok contributed to this report.
President Bashar al-Assad of Syria, who has denied that his government attacked civilians with chemical weapons on Aug. 21, reiterated that denial to the American people on Sunday morning via the television interviewer Charlie Rose."He denied that he had anything to do with the attack," Mr. Rose said on the CBS program "Face the Nation," hours after interviewing Mr. Assad at the presidential palace in Damascus. "He denied that he knew, in fact, that there was a chemical attack, notwithstanding what has been said and notwithstanding the videotape. He said there's not evidence yet to make a conclusive judgment."No clips from Mr. Rose's interview were released on Sunday. The interview, which was arranged in the last few days amid a Congressional debate about whether to authorize a limited military strike against Syria, will be broadcast on Monday by CBS and PBS, the same day that President Obama is scheduled to make his case for the strikes in interviews with anchors for six American networks.CBS described Sunday's interview with Mr. Assad as his first with an American television network since December 2011, about nine months into the Syrian uprising and civil war, when he spoke with Barbara Walters of ABC. By agreeing to speak to Mr. Rose, Mr. Assad all but assured that his remarks would receive widespread attention from the American news media. The columnist Jeffrey Goldberg commented on Twitter that Mr. Rose "just got the biggest get of the year."Mr. Rose previously interviewed Mr. Assad in 2006 and 2010 for "Charlie Rose," which is broadcast on PBS stations. He and many other Western journalists have been lobbying Mr. Assad for an interview since the Syrian uprising started in early 2011.One of Mr. Rose's advantages this time was his combination of employers. "CBS This Morning," which he has co-hosted since early 2012, and his eponymous show have shared several of his prominent interviews in the past year. The Assad interview is probably the best affirmation of the strategy so far. Portions of the interview will be shown on the morning program on Monday, then the interview will be shown in its entirety in prime time on PBS, giving Mr. Assad a chance to lay out his case in full.While Sunday's interview was granted with relatively short notice, said David Rhodes, president of CBS News, "Charlie has been working on this for a long time."In a sign of the importance of the interview, Mr. Rose was accompanied to Syria by Jeffrey Fager, the chairman of CBS News and the top producer of "60 Minutes." The two men drove to Damascus after flying into neighboring Lebanon.In an e-mail Sunday evening, Mr. Fager said, "Charlie got more out of our hour with President Assad than could be expected. It is a tough, informative and fascinating interview."Mr. Fager added, "The security getting to him was intense, but we found Assad to be surprisingly relaxed and confident. He knows an attack could be coming and it seemed like he was trying hard in the interview to prevent it from happening."
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama is voicing some pessimism about the prospect of Congress approving a use-of-force resolution on Syria, saying, quote: "I wouldn't say I'm confident" about the measure passing.He also says he hasn't decided whether he would launch a military strike on his own if Congress votes down the resolution. He says he is taking the vote and what the American people are saying "very seriously."Obama says he knew there was a risk in asking Congress to approve a military strike. But he says he is confident that lawmakers are taking the issue seriously and "doing their homework."The president wants Congress to authorize a strike in retaliation for a deadly chemical weapons attack in Syria.Obama spoke Monday in an interview with NBC News.
WASHINGTON — Proposed U.S. strikes on Syria over its alleged use of chemical weapons should not increase refugee flows to neighboring Jordan, which is already under tremendous strain, U.S. Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel said on Tuesday."I think it's very unlikely that you would see any increase in refugees because of the nature of the kinds of very precise strikes that we're talking about," Hagel said at a hearing of the House Armed Services Committee.
WASHINGTON — The U.S. military sees a low risk of retaliation from proposed U.S. strikes against Syria over the alleged use of chemical weapons, General Martin Dempsey, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said on Tuesday."We assess that the risk of retaliation because of the limited nature of the strike is low. I can't drive it to zero," Dempsey told a hearing before the House Armed Services Committee."And I can tell you that we are postured in the region in order to deal with any miscalculation or retaliation."
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama is grasping all his tools of persuasion in trying to turn around public opinion and rally congressional support for a strike against Syria. He's got tricky ground to cover in his address Tuesday night and acknowledged on the eve of it that Americans don't back his course.A guide to weak spots in his case, and some opportunities, in advance of the speech:Until recent days, Secretary of State John Kerry was the point man both with Congress and the public in arguing that Syria's alleged use of chemical weapons on its people justifies a U.S. attack. Obama now has stepped up, with a series of TV network interviews Monday setting the stage for his White House remarks.He does so as a potential diplomatic breakthrough emerges, with Syria now suggesting it might surrender its chemical weapons to international control to avoid a U.S. strike. The president argues he needs to "maintain and move forward with a credible threat of military pressure" if that development is to come to anything, so congressional approval of military action is at least as important as before.To those who study the psychology of persuasion in public opinion and the marketplace, Obama still has opportunities to exploit. "I think people understand the danger of Syria using chemical weapons and the danger of looking the other way," says Eric Dezenhall, a crisis management consultant and author of "Damage Control." ''This is Obama's greatest leverage point."Marketing scholar Deborah Mitchell, who teaches product and brand management at Ohio State University, says demand for a product (the Syria plan) is best stirred by appealing to the consumer (the public), not the retailer (Congress), and says, "I'm shocked that he has hasn't been going straight to the American people" until now.She thinks Obama would improve his chances by calling up moral outrage over the Aug. 21 chemical attack near Damascus that the U.S. says killed more than 1,400 people, setting aside complex legal and diplomatic arguments and going hard for the gut. "It is in our DNA as Americans to be against crimes against humanity," she said. To play on that "would be like throwing seeds on fertile ground. People's minds are just waiting for it but he's not doing it. He's getting bogged down."The administration moved in that direction recently, releasing a DVD compilation of videos highlighting attack victims, shown earlier to senators in a classified briefing. "As a parent, I cannot look at those pictures — those little children laying on the ground, their eyes glassy, their bodies twitching — and not think of my own two kids," Susan Rice, Obama's national security adviser, said Monday.Andrew J. Polsky, political science professor at Hunter College and author of "Elusive Victories: The American Presidency at War," questions whether it's enough to reach for the high moral ground."There is just no sense here that American interests are directly implicated," he said, "so then you're forced to make arguments about the general humanitarian need to intervene. And the evidence that these general humanitarian needs will drive the public to support intervention is very small. The reason why there are permanent refugee camps dotting much of the world where civil strife has broken out is because, in fact, world opinion doesn't get moved by these kinds of tragedies."In short, he said: "This is not something that an advertising campaign solves for you. It's not a matter of finding the right package or the right jingle to sell it. The product itself is too suspect. If the goal is to sell intervention, then this is probably the best effort that they can make."In an Associated Press poll on the eve of the speech, 61 percent opposed congressional authorization of military strikes against Syria, including majorities of Democrats, Republicans and independents, while 26 percent favored a vote supporting such action."Right now, the American people are not persuaded," Obama said on Fox News during his round of interviews. On PBS: "I'm not sure that we're ever going to get a majority of the American people, after over a decade of war, after what happened in Iraq, to say that any military action, particularly in the Middle East, makes sense, in the absence of some direct threat or attack against us."The country has not been shown proof that President Bashar Assad or his inner circle was behind the chemical attack that crossed Obama's "red line" for action. So Americans have been left to take it on faith — or not — that the U.S. has the goods on Assad but can't share this sensitive intelligence. Or that the case is persuasive enough even absent proof."They don't know what I know," Sen. Dianne Feinstein, D-Calif., chairwoman of the Senate Intelligence Committee, said of the public.White House Chief of Staff Denis McDonough has conceded he could not offer "irrefutable, beyond-a-reasonable-doubt evidence" that Assad's government was behind the attack, because he said intelligence doesn't work that way. Instead, a "common-sense test" suggests Assad was to blame, he said.It's clear that presidential credibility is a problem in this debate. But which president? Obama, George W. Bush, or both?No one has forgotten the passionate, persuasive — and bogus — bill of particulars the Bush administration used to justify invading Iraq before it was discovered that Saddam Hussein did not possess weapons of mass destruction after all. Even among Obama's supporters, who trust him, there's a worry about being fooled again.To sway opinion in Congress and the country, U.S. officials have emphasized the deaths of children in the Aug. 21 attack, shared graphic video with lawmakers and cited video and images that are in public circulation and are purported to show the aftermath of gassing. Without establishing who was behind the attack, these images prompted visceral outrage in Congress — one effective example of going for the gut."This is the indiscriminate, inconceivable horror of chemical weapons," Kerry told lawmakers. "This is what Assad did to his own people."In recent days, though, The New York Times posted a video smuggled from Syria showing rebels executing seven captured Syrian soldiers and dumping their bodies in a well, in April 2012. Several subsequent acts of savagery by elements of the Syrian opposition have been similarly documented — and cited by critics of U.S. intervention to show that rogues are on both sides of the civil war."It's a powerful optic, and a bad one for Obama," Dezenhall said. "You want to help THESE guys?" The video feeds into the perception that Syria is "a mess that you can see your way into, but not out of, and that's top of mind right now."Polsky, the Hunter College professor, likens this period to the aftermath of the Korean and Vietnam wars, one of intervention fatigue."The kind of intervention the American people will tolerate now is one of virtually no possibility of blowback, no possibility of American casualties, of generating attacks on Americans elsewhere," he said. "But that kind of intervention is unlikely, and that's putting it generously, unlikely to yield any meaningful results in Syria today. So you are largely reduced to the claim that American credibility would be damaged seriously by the failure to respond."
LONDON — British Labour leader Ed Miliband, the main challenger to Prime Minister David Cameron in 2015 elections, has suffered a sharp slide in his personal ratings and his party's lead has been cut to a thin margin, a poll found on Wednesday.Miliband has faced criticism from inside and outside his party over his leadership style, his reform of Labour's historic links with trade unions and the tactics he used to effectively block Britain's involvement in possible strikes against Syria.Miliband, saw his rating plunge to its lowest point since research company Ipsos MORI started recording it, with six out of 10 saying they were not satisfied with his performance.Even among supporters of his center-left party, just over half (52 percent) said they weren't happy with him. That was Miliband's worst score among Labour voters ever recorded by Ipsos MORI.Senior Labour figures have said the party's lead should be much wider at this stage in the election cycle, given the economy's poor performance until recently, and the poll is likely to increase pressure on Miliband's leadership."There has been much discussion over the perceived softness of Labour's lead and this poll shows that clearly," said Gideon Skinner, head of political research at Ipsos MORI.Since beating his brother David to the party leadership in 2010, Miliband has failed to match Cameron's personal ratings.Former Cabinet minister Tessa Jowell called for an end to the criticism, saying it had created a "sense of toxic disunity" in the party that governed Britain for 13 years until 2010 under Tony Blair and Gordon Brown.The latest poll gave Labour a three point lead over the Conservatives, based on those certain to vote. Labour were down three points and the Conservatives up four since the last poll.The survey also measured the leaders' net personal ratings - the number of people who say they are satisfied with their performance minus the number who are dissatisfied.Miliband's stood at minus 36 percent, in line with lows recorded by former Conservative leaders Iain Duncan Smith and William Hague. Cameron's net rating stood at minus 20 percent.Cameron was seen as a more capable leader, better in a crisis and with more personality than Miliband.A run of upbeat economic figures helped push the economic optimism index to +23, its highest score since November 2009.Miliband led a successful parliamentary revolt last month against Cameron's bid to seek approval in principle for military action in Syria over an alleged chemical attack - saying he was not opposed to force in theory but unconvinced by Cameron's case.Critics accused him of acting out of political opportunism rather than principle.
WASHINGTON — American warships in the eastern Mediterranean Sea remain ready to strike Syria if ordered, but impending cuts in the defense budget will make that kind of operation far more difficult in the years to come, Navy Secretary Ray Mabus said Wednesday.Mabus said that even now fewer ships are going to sea, fewer Navy pilots are flying and fewer Marines are training because of the automatic, across-the-board cuts that would slash more than $50 billion from the 2014 defense budget and $500 billion over 10 years. And he warned that if those reductions continue, the military response could be compromised in future crises like Syria."Whatever course of action our nation decides to take on Syria, I do know this: The maritime options are flexible and they are significant and they are swift and they are sovereign," Mabus told an audience at the National Defense University. "But unless we act to address the damage of continuing resolutions and sequestration, they are options which may be limited or just not available in the future."His comments came on the heels of President Barack Obama's order Tuesday that the military must maintain its presence in the Mediterranean to keep pressure on Syrian President Bashar Assad and to be ready to strike if needed. The military decision is in conjunction with efforts to forge a diplomatic solution that includes putting Syria's chemical weapons under international control.The two-pronged U.S. strategy is aimed at deterring Syria's use of chemical weapons on its own people. The administration says that a chemical weapons attack launched by the Assad regime in the suburbs of Damascus last month killed more than 1,400 civilians, including at least 400 children.The Navy presence currently includes four warships armed with dozens of Tomahawk missiles, a Navy amphibious assault ship carrying Marines and two aircraft carrier strike groups — numbering as many as 10 ships — in the broader region.While the Navy has routinely kept warships in the Mediterranean, including as part of an effort to provide missile defense for allies and U.S. interests in the area. But, budget restrictions have already forced the military to cut the number of aircraft carriers permanently in the region to one. The second one is only there temporarily because of the ongoing tensions in Syria.Mabus said Wednesday that the persistent Navy presence in the Mediterranean gave Obama the flexibility to have forces ready quickly to launch strikes without having to move troops and ships in from distant bases. That flexibility, he said, "will almost certainly be compromised and diminished" as the budget cuts continue.
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama voiced his conviction Tuesday night that Syrian President Bashar Assad was to blame for deadly chemical attacks against civilians, but again he offered no proof.A look at his remarks to the nation, seeking support for a military strike against Syria, and how they compare with the facts as publicly known:OBAMA: "We know the Assad regime was responsible. ... The facts cannot be denied."THE FACTS: The Obama administration has not laid out proof Assad was behind the attack.The administration has cited satellite imagery and communications intercepts, backed by social media and intelligence reports from sources in Syria, as the basis for blaming the Assad government. But the only evidence the administration has made public is a collection of videos it has verified of the victims. The videos do not demonstrate who launched the attacks.Administration officials have not shared the satellite imagery they say shows rockets and artillery fire leaving government-held areas and landing in 12 rebel-held neighborhoods outside Damascus where chemical attacks were reported. Nor have they shared transcripts of the Syrian officials allegedly warning units to ready gas masks or discussing how to handle U.N. investigators after it happened.The White House has declined to explain where it came up with the figure of at least 1,429 dead, including 400 children — a figure far higher than estimates by nongovernmental agencies such as the British-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which has counted only victims identified by name, with a current total of 502. In his remarks, Obama more generally accused Assad's forces of gassing to death "over 1,000 people, including hundreds of children."OBAMA: "So even though I possess the authority to order military strikes, I believed it was right in the absence of a direct or imminent threat to our security to take this debate to Congress."THE FACTS: Obama's statement that he has the authority to launch military action is par for the course for presidents, and historically disputed by Congress. The issue never gets settled.The Constitution delineates power between the president, who serves as commander in chief of the armed forces, and Congress, which has the ability to declare war. Over time, however, questions arose over where the president's authority ends and where Congress' begins.The 1973 War Powers Resolution sought to end the debate, but it has only fueled arguments between Republican and Democratic administrations alike and those who consider themselves constitutional purists.The law gives the president the power to act without congressional approval in cases of national emergency for up to 60 days. In such a case, the president must consult with Congress. And if the deadline passes without congressional authorization, the president has 30 additional days to remove troops.But what constitutes a national emergency and what consultation means remain subjects of continued disputes.AP writers Kimberly Dozier and Bradley Klapper contributed to this report.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — For Syrian rebels fighting in recent days around the ancient Christian town of Maaloula, any gains made in battle could be wiped out in the war of perceptions.Their incursion into the town, led by extremist Islamists, reinforces the worst fears of Syrian Christians and could bolster President Bashar al-Assad's claims that he is the Christians' protector. It may also complicate President Obama's task as he struggles to convince Americans that a military strike against Mr. Assad will not strengthen Islamic extremists.Some of the rebels, apparently aware of their public relations problem, said in interviews that they meant Christians no harm. They filmed themselves talking politely with nuns, instructing fighters not to harm civilians or churches and touring a monastery that appeared mostly intact. They said they had withdrawn from most of the town, posted videos of shelling there by Mr. Assad's forces and argued that the government had given the fight a sectarian cast by sending Christian militiamen from Damascus to join in.But the damage was already done. Most of the town's residents have fled, and Maaloula, one of the last places where Aramaic, the language of Jesus, is still spoken by Christians and some Muslims, has become a one-word argument against Western support for the rebels — at the worst possible time for Mr. Obama and the opponents of Mr. Assad.Syrian-Americans lobbying against the proposed American missile strike flooded Congressional message boards with appeals for Maaloula. A common refrain was that Mr. Obama was throwing Syria's Christians "to the lions."It was a powerful accusation in a region where a decade of unrest and rising sectarianism, from Iraq to Egypt, has threatened and displaced large sectors of the Middle East's Christians, a population that had already shrunk significantly through emigration over the past century.Reached by telephone on Monday night, Mother Pelagia Sayaf, who is in charge of Mar Taqla, a monastery in Maaloula that is among the country's oldest, said that the 53 nuns and orphans staying there had not been harmed and that the principal damage was shattered windows. Another nun said some of the fighters were local men who promised to protect the monastery.But the encounter with the rebels had done little to reassure the nuns that in the long run Syria's Christians would retain the peaceful existence they had long enjoyed."If Maaloula survives, it will be a miracle," Mother Sayaf said. "Maaloula is empty. You see ghosts on the walls."The situation in Maaloula underscores the core problems that bedevil the movement against Mr. Assad: the opposition, rooted in Syria's Sunni majority, has failed to win over enough Christians, who make up 8 percent to 10 percent of the population, or other religious minorities. More than 450,000 Christians have fled their homes, church leaders say, during more than two years of war.On the battlefield, well-armed radical Islamist groups, including foreign fighters, show little inclination to coordinate with local battalions, and sectarian killings and references to non-Muslims as infidels further intimidate Christians. In Maaloula, according to fighters, the rebel attack was led by members of the Nusra Front, a group with ties to Al Qaeda in Iraq, even after local fighters affiliated with the Western-backed Free Syrian Army tried and failed to dissuade them.Last week, as the battle began, opponents of American military action in Syria circulated a recent video of a Syrian Christian woman accosting Senator John McCain, a proponent of military action, accusing him of abandoning Christians. "I could trace my family's name to the Bible," she said. "We refuse to be forced to leave."Maaloula has long symbolized Syria's history of diversity and coexistence. Legend has it that as an early Christian saint, Taqla, was fleeing persecution, the cliffs parted to help her escape, giving the town its name, which means entrance in Aramaic. More recent lore says a small Sunni population sprang up after a Christian man converted to marry a Muslim.Even after a movement for political rights morphed into a civil war, local Sunni and Christian leaders worked to maintain calm. Local groups of rebels have long occupied the Safir hotel on the edge of town. But until last week, Mother Sayaf said, residents moved unmolested between rebel and government territory."We don't have any problem with Christians, they are living among us for thousands of years," said Abu al-Majd, a rebel from nearby Yabroud who, like others, gave only a nickname for safety. "Before, with and after Assad."
RIYADH/DOHA — Washington's last-minute decision to call off military strikes against Syria deals a blow to Saudi Arabia and Qatar, but the states that arm rebels battling President Bashar al-Assad will not soon give up on a war that has already cost them billions.With Assad now looking unlikely to crumble soon and the West showing no desire to bomb him from power, the Gulf princes face few options beyond continuing to fund one side in a perpetual military stalemate that has already killed 100,000 people."If the U.S. doesn't launch an attack there's really no plan B drawn up yet by the GCC states," said an Arab diplomat, referring to the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) of six rich Arab countries. "What I'm telling you is simple: they have no plan."The Sunni Muslim Arab monarchs see defeating Assad as fundamental in their confrontation with the Syrian leader's main regional patron, Shi'ite Iran.Since 2011, Western leaders appeared to be on the same page, repeatedly demanding Assad be removed from power and insisting that no solution was possible unless he goes.But the West's latest diplomatic efforts have been focused on dismantling Assad's chemical weapons stockpiles, not on removing him from power, leaving the Arab states alone.Gulf watchers say Qatar, which began arming rebel units last year, and Saudi Arabia, which stepped in as the main supplier this year, will keep the weapons coming."There is no way that Qatar will let go of their support for Syria now. This is a very personal issue for Qatar as they feel a close connection with Syria," said a source close to the government in Doha.Abdulaziz al-Sager, head of the Gulf Research Centre in Jeddah, said the same was true of the Saudis."I would not be surprised to see much more open Saudi support for the rebels," he said, adding that the situation argued for closer coordination between Saudi Arabia, Qatar and Turkey, another ally of the rebels.The problem is: no matter how much they spend, it no longer seems possible for the Gulf rulers to purchase victory.There is already no shortage of light weapons, such as AK-47 rifles and rocket propelled grenades, which have poured into Syria for months. The Gulf countries have also been sending some more advanced weapons, like anti-tank and anti-aircraft missiles, but are reluctant to send too many for fear of them falling into the hands of rebel units allied to al Qaeda.A source close to Gulf governments said this meant they did not have plans to supply "game-changing weapons".Nor is it clear that weapons alone would be enough to turn the tide in a war that has gone Assad's way since the start of this year, when he won the backing of Lebanon's Hezbollah militants to reverse rebel gains in the center of the country.Some voices have begun arguing for the Gulf states to take direct military action on their own without Western support, something they have never really done despite arming themselves for decades with some of the world's biggest defense budgets."The United States was always there for us for the last 50 or 60 years. But after this incident it was not. Saudi strategists have to think about the new realities," said Jamal Khashoggi, who runs a television news channel owned by a Saudi prince and co-wrote an op-ed piece in the New York Times calling for Arab states to act without waiting for the West.But most observers see any direct action as unlikely."They will not launch a strike themselves of course: they don't have the forces or the numbers. And if they just keep providing the rebels with weapons that will not change the situation," said the Arab diplomat.Diplomats say the Gulf states have been counting on Western intervention of some kind to help the rebels, at least since the battle of Qusair in March, when Hezbollah fighters helped Assad's forces to a big victory and tipped the war's momentum in the Syrian leader's favor."They always wanted Western support. Partly from Britain and France. More importantly from the U.S. Until the start of this year they thought they could do it (bring down Assad) themselves. Now they think they can't," a diplomat in the Gulf said soon after that battle.The source close to Gulf governments said one big reason the monarchs had hoped for Western air strikes was that this would help level the military playing field without flooding Syria with the sort of heavy weaponry that would be hard to deal with after the war.Syrian rebels are still counting on Gulf support, even as international diplomacy is expected to shift towards promoting a peace conference in Switzerland to follow on an inconclusive meeting in Geneva last year."In front of everyone, the Gulf states will join the international community in going through with Geneva 2, but under the table they will still continue to provide all kinds of support to the opposition in Syria," said Nizar al-Haraki, the Syrian opposition envoy in Doha.Khashoggi, the Saudi news station director, said the lack of help from the West was proof that the Gulf states need to develop the capability to act militarily on their own."The message from the West is clear: we are not interested in your problems, your sectarian divisions, your infighting, your Arab Spring struggles," he said.But few think the issue is going to wean the Saudis and other Gulf states from their dependence on the United States to provide security, which limits their ability to act alone."You hear a lot of talk about not being able to rely on the U.S. But when it comes down to it, they continue to insist that it should be the U.S. that takes action," said Robert Jordan, Washington's ambassador to Riyadh from 2001-03."We still have a lot more in common than separates us. There's still a very strong convergence of national interests in resolving this crisis and we will continue to work together even though we don't see it exactly the same way," said Jordan.
BEIRUT — The death toll from an alleged massacre in an Alawite village in central Syria has risen to 22, including women, children and elderly men, a rights monitoring group said on Thursday.The minority Alawite sect to which President Bashar al-Assad and most of Syria's elite belong is an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam whose members have increasingly been targeted by radical fighters among the Sunni Muslim-dominated opposition in the 2-1/2-year revolt against Assad.Fighters from the al Qaeda-linked Nusra Front shot dead 16 Alawites and six Arab Bedouins on Tuesday after storming the village of Maksar al-Hesan, east of the city of Homs, according to the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which is opposed to Assad.The British-based Observatory said the victims included seven women, three men over the age of 65, and four children under the age of 16, citing residents and medics.Rami Abdelrahman, head of the Observatory, said the victims had been shot in their homes, and that they were not members of any pro-Assad militias. Activists in Homs had said on Wednesday that the dead were all from pro-government militias.Al Qaeda-linked groups have launched an "Eye for an Eye" campaign, which they say is to take revenge for an apparent chemical weapons attack in rebel-held suburbs of Damascus in which of civilians died. The opposition and Western powers blame Assad's forces for the strike.Most of the revenge attacks have targeted Alawite areas.Syrian state television reported that government forces had retaken the village on Wednesday, killing a number of rebels, who they said were mostly foreign fighters.
WASHINGTON — One of the most precise and dramatic details cited by the Obama administration as proof that Syrian forces used chemical weapons in an August 21 attack was the death toll, which an official U.S. government assessment put at 1,429 people, including 426 children.The number, first released by the White House on August 30, was underscored by Secretary of State John Kerry in a fiery indictment of Syrian President Bashar al-Assad, describing videos of what he said were victims of the attack, which Syria denies."Instead of being tucked safely in their beds at home, we saw rows of children lying side by side sprawled on a hospital floor, all of them dead from Assad's gas and surrounded by parents and grandparents who had suffered the same fate. The United States Government now knows that at least 1,429 Syrians were killed in this attack, including at least 426 children," he said.Some U.S. congressional sources are now casting doubt on those figures.Three congressional sources told Reuters that administration officials had indicated in private that some deaths might have been caused by the conventional bombing that followed the release of sarin gas in suburban Damascus neighborhoods. This disclosure undermined support for President Barack Obama's plan to strike Syria, they said.A White House spokeswoman referred all questions about the death toll numbers - including a request for comment on whether controversy about the numbers was undermining support on Capitol Hill for administration policy - to intelligence agency spokespeople."The Intelligence Community has a high bar for its assessments but it is virtually impossible to achieve 100 percent certitude," said Shawn Turner, chief spokesman for the Office of the Director of National Intelligence. "That's not the way intelligence works."We are extremely rigorous in our methodology and we are constantly challenging ourselves to be more exacting," said Turner. "We have been thorough in our discussions with Congress about our methodology and I'm not aware of any concerns."One of the congressional sources said that administration officials in closed door briefings said they could not rule out that some victims included in the U.S. death toll were killed either by conventional explosive parts of rockets which carried poison gas or in the artillery barrage the United States says followed the gas attack.A second source, who is sympathetic to White House policy, said caveats administration officials attached to the 1,429 death total were of sufficient magnitude to cause the source to avoid citing the figure.A third source said that administration officials confronted pointed questions from members of Congress about the accuracy of the numbers and acknowledged that they "couldn't be sure" about the cause of death for some people counted as victims of chemical poisoning.An administration official familiar with the briefings denied that there had been any doubts as to how the 1,429 bodies were counted; a second official asserted that Capitol Hill officials had heard what they wanted to hear because so many legislators were opposed to Obama's plan.Administration sources told Reuters that they relied on a valid intelligence methodology to make the death estimate. An official said that it involved analyzing video pictures of victims, then eliminating from the fatality total any live person, any dead body with visible injuries and shrouded bodies showing blood spots.Classified intelligence tools then were used to confirm the provenance of the videos and to ensure that bodies were not counted twice, the official said. The official noted that U.S. intelligence had more resources to gather information than human rights or other non-governmental groups, which had smaller death tolls."Nobody who has looked at the intelligence thinks this number is way off," a senior U.S. official said."That's what the number was that day. We know 1,400 people were killed. As we get new information, the number could change," the senior U.S. official added.French intelligence says deaths from the gas attacks could be as high as 1,500, but it reported confirmed deaths from video evidence of 281. Estimates of gas attack deaths by British intelligence, the London-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights and non-governmental group Doctors without Borders fall within a range of 322 to 355.The congressional sources said that some members of Congress asked to see raw intelligence gathered by U.S. agencies. But thus far, the administration has provided only reports summarizing intelligence from human informants, electronic eavesdropping and satellite images.The Syrian government has denied launching any gas attack, although it has acknowledged it has such weapons and is in talks to give them up.The United States first cited the 1,429 death toll in a four-page document released by the White House, calling it a "preliminary assessment." Administration officials said that estimate was based on intelligence analysis and never meant to be fixed in stone. Moreover, they expect the ultimate toll will be higher.In recent days, the administration has avoided the precise figures of the early days.On September 9, White House National Security Advisor Susan Rice also rounded down the figures, saying that "more than 1400" were killed, including "more than 400 children."In his speech to the nation on Tuesday night, Obama said that Assad's forces had "gassed to death over 1,000 people, including hundreds of children."A White House official called it a "stylistic thing". "It's accurate and not meant to signal any walking away from the assessment's figure," the person said.Paul Pillar, formerly the top Middle East expert for U.S. intelligence, told Reuters the United States should have rounded the figures from the start."The administration did not help its case by providing a number that misleadingly implied a degree of precision that would be nearly impossible to achieve amid a civil war," he said.
WASHINGTON — With Congress momentarily freed from the Syrian crisis, lawmakers plunged back into their bitter fiscal standoff on Thursday as Speaker John A. Boehner appealed to the Obama administration and Democratic leaders to help him resolve divisions in the Republican ranks that could lead to a government shutdown by month's end.In meetings with Democratic and Republican Congressional leaders on Thursday after a session with Treasury Secretary Jacob J. Lew on Wednesday, Mr. Boehner sought a resumption of negotiations that could keep the government running and yield a deficit-reduction deal that would persuade recalcitrant conservatives to raise the government's borrowing limit.Much of the federal government will shut down as of Oct. 1 unless Congress approves new spending bills to replace expiring ones, and by mid-October, the Treasury Department will lose the borrowing authority to finance the government and pay its debts."It's time for the president's party to show the courage to work with us to solve this problem," said Mr. Boehner, who argued that budget deals have been part of past agreements to raise the debt limitBut a bloc of 43 House Republicans undercut the speaker's deficit-reduction focus, introducing yearlong funding legislation that would increase Pentagon and veterans spending and delay President Obama's health care law for a year — most likely adding to the budget deficit. That bloc is large enough to thwart any compromise that does not attract Democratic support."Obamacare is the most dangerous piece of legislation ever passed in Congress," said Representative John Fleming, Republican of Louisiana. "It is the most existential threat to our economy" that the country has seen "since the Great Depression, so I think a little bit of additional deficit is nothing," he added.Just five scheduled legislative days stand between the House and a government shutdown that has loomed for months. As of now, Republican leaders appear to have no idea how to stop it. House members are preparing for the worst. A 14-page fact sheet on the impact of a government shutdown, originally written in 2011 by Representative Scott Rigell, Republican of Virginia, has gone back into circulation among House members.Mr. Lew and Congressional Democrats held firm that they would no longer negotiate on raising the debt ceiling, which they see as the duty of the party in power in the House. And they made it clear to the speaker that they would never accept Republican demands to repeal, defund or delay Mr. Obama's signature health care law. White House officials dismissed it as "a nonstarter.""I had to be very candid with him and I told him directly, all these things they're doing on Obamacare are just a waste of their time," said Senator Harry Reid, Democrat of Nevada and the Senate majority leader. "Their direction is the direction toward shutting down the government.""I like John Boehner," Mr. Reid added. "I do feel sorry for him."Earlier this week, Representative Eric Cantor of Virginia, the No. 2 House Republican, proposed a two-step resolution to the fiscal impasse that was temporarily pushed into the background by Mr. Obama's request for approval to initiate a military strike on Syria, since delayed.Under Mr. Cantor's plan, the House would have voted this week on a stopgap spending bill to keep the government operating through mid-December at the current level, which reflects the sharp across-the-board cuts known as sequestration. That bill would have a companion resolution to withhold all money for the health care law, but the Senate could simply ignore that resolution and approve the short-term spending bill.Then the House would vote to raise the debt ceiling enough for a year of borrowing, but demand a year's delay in carrying out the health care law.Within 24 hours, the House's most ardent conservatives revolted, declaring the defunding resolution a gimmick that fell well short of their drive to undo the health care law. House Democrats said they would oppose not only stripping the health care law of money but also a spending level that maintains sequestration.
The stock market slipped on Thursday, ending a seven-day winning streak for the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index, as a drop in precious metal prices dragged mining shares lower.Gold fell $33.50, or 2.5 percent, to $1,330.40 an ounce as traders remained hopeful that the Syria crisis would be resolved without an American military strike."Gold is a fear factor commodity, and so hope of a resolution is causing prices to go down a little bit," said Bryant Evans, portfolio manager at Cozad Asset Management.Gold prices also came under pressure from continued speculation that the Federal Reserve will begin to wind down its economic stimulus program when it meets next week.Economic data showed that first-time weekly claims for state unemployment benefits, the last major reading on the labor market before the Fed's meeting, fell to the lowest level since 2006, but the picture was incomplete because two states did not process all their claims.The S.& P. materials sector fell 1 percent, with Newmont Mining dropping $1.23, or 4.18 percent, to $28.23.The S.& P. 500 fell 5.71 points, or 0.34 percent, to 1,683.42. The index had risen about 3.4 percent over the previous seven sessions.The Dow Jones industrial average dropped 25.96 points, or 0.17 percent, to 15,300.64. The Nasdaq composite index was down 9.04 points, or 0.24 percent, at 3,715.97.Much of the focus of the financial markets has shifted to the Fed policy-making meeting, when a decision is expected about when to reduce its $85 billion-a-month purchases of Treasury and mortgage-backed securities.Economists at a majority of primary dealers expect the Fed to announce it will cut its bond purchases, according to a recent Reuters poll. But such a move would also indicate the Fed sees the economy in better shape than many think.Among the stocks on the move on Thursday, Lululemon Athletica slumped $3.73, or 5.4 percent, to $65.29, after the apparel retailer reported second-quarter results and trimmed its outlook.Shares of Walt Disney gained $1.55, or 2.42 percent, to $65.49, after the media giant said it would increase its stock buybacks.Also on the upside was NetSol Technologies, which jumped 97 cents, or 9.51 percent, to $11.17, after the software maker reported that its fiscal fourth-quarter earnings nearly doubled.In the bond market, interest rates were stable. The price of the Treasury's 10-year note rose 2/32, to 96 17/32, while its yield was unchanged at 2.91 percent.
BEIRUT — He is rarely photographed or even quoted in Syria's media. Wrapped in that blanket of secrecy, President Bashar Assad's younger brother has been vital to the family's survival in power.Maher Assad commands the elite troops that protect the Syrian capital from rebels on its outskirts and is widely believed to have helped orchestrate the regime's fierce campaign to put down the uprising, now well into its third year. He has also gained a reputation for brutality among opposition activists.His role underlines the family core of the Assad regime, though he is a stark contrast to his brothers. His eldest brother, Basil, was the family prince, publicly groomed by their father, Hafez, to succeed him as president — until Basil died in a 1994 car crash. That vaulted Bashar, then an eye doctor in London with no military or political experience, into the role of heir, rising to the presidency after his father's death in 2000. The two brothers — the "martyr" and the president — often appear together in posters.The 45-year-old Maher Assad, however, has resolutely stayed out of the limelight. Friends, military colleagues and even his enemies describe him as a strict military man to the core.The 15,000 soldiers in the 4th Armored Division that he leads are largely members of the Assad family's minority Alawite sect — who see the civil war as a battle for their very survival — and represent the best paid, armed and trained units of the Syrian military. In the past year, his troops have launched repeated offensives against rebels firmly entrenched on Damascus' outskirts, bombarding and raiding the impoverished suburbs they hold.Maher Assad is also believed to have led a bloody crackdown on dissent since the uprising began in March 2011 with largely peaceful protests against Assad's rule. In April, the Syrian rights group Violations Documentation Center reported interviews with several former detainees who described being crammed in crowded cells and undergoing beatings by guards in secret prisons on the 4th Division's bases around Damascus, where hundreds of suspected regime opponents have been held."He is known to be a merciless butcher," said Mohammed al-Tayeb, an opposition activist speaking by Skype from the rebel-held Damascus suburb of Douma, among the areas pounded by the 4th Division's assaults.Within President Bashar Assad's circle of trust, Maher Assad has advocated an uncompromising response throughout the uprising."From the beginning, Maher was convinced that the uprising must be put down before any talks take place," said Fawaz A. Gerges, director of the Middle East Center at the London School of Economics. "The life of the regime depends on Maher's ability to prevent the rebels from infiltrating Damascus and toppling his brother's government. ... If Damascus falls, the regime goes,"He also played a role in reshaping the Syrian military as the conflict dragged on. Once plagued by defections as rebels gained territory, the military has regained the upper hand this year with a series of powerful offensives, battling rebels to a standstill in cities and taking back some towns."The Syrian military has changed from a rusty institution, filled with passive and tired conscripts into an urban warfare fighting machine, filled with skilled and battle-hardened fighters," said Gerges.Maher Assad's importance has only grown. His brother-in-law, Assef Shawkat, who was deputy defense minister and a key figure in the intelligence apparatus, was killed along with the defense minister in a June 2012 bombing. Shawkat's wife, the Assads' older sister, Bushra, herself a major adviser to the Syrian president, is believed to have since left the country for the Gulf. Several of Bashar Assad's cousins hold significant security posts, but Maher Assad is by far the most prominent relative.Following the Aug. 21 alleged chemical attack near Damascus that killed hundreds, opposition activists charged that the rockets carrying the chemical agents were fired by the 4th Division's 155th Brigade, which commands large missile sites on the mountains overlooking the capital. However, the opposition could not produce proof.The United States blames the military for the attack but has not specified which units — though Maher Assad's are the ones that operate in the capital. The Syrian government has denied its troops carried out the attack, accusing foreign Islamic militants among the rebels.Maher Assad's relationship with his 48-year-old brother in some ways mirrors that of his father's to his own younger brother, Rifaat Assad, who commanded an elite military unit and was seen as the regime enforcer in the first decade after the Assads came to power in a 1970 coup. But Rifaat Assad fell out with Hafez Assad after he made his own bid for power in the mid-1980s, and he has lived in exile in Europe since.Maher Assad, a brigadier general, has shown no similar thirst for the presidency, and there's been no public sign of friction with his brother.Last year, when rebels were striking directly into the heart of Damascus, a few startling chants calling for Maher Assad to rule could be heard at pro-government protests: "Bashar to the clinic, Maher to the command." They underlined a perception that the military younger brother was more fit for power than his former doctor brother. But the chants were scattered, soon ended and never grew to a larger campaign.From behind the heavy secrecy, numerous reports of Maher Assad's ruthlessness and temper circulate — though few have been confirmed.Opposition figures and activists say Maher Assad was behind a July 2008 crackdown on a riot by mainly Islamist prisoners at the Saidnaya prison near Damascus, in which at least 17 prisoners were killed, according to Amnesty International. Others put the toll at several dozen.An online video of the scene shows a man activists claim is Maher Assad taking cell-phone pictures of the mangled bodies and severed limbs of the dead. The man resembles Maher Assad, though it has not been confirmed to be him.Hisham Jaber, a retired Lebanese army general who has studied the Syrian army and is in touch with officers from the 4th Division, said Maher Assad is known as a "brave ... and in some respects aggressive man, who has a lot of military experience." He is respected by his troops but also feared for his strictness, Jaber said.Like his brother, Maher Assad is married to a member of Syria's Sunni Muslim majority. He lives with his wife, Manal Jadaan, and their three children — two girls and an 18-month-old boy — in a villa near the presidential palace in Damascus. Maher Assad is a passionate equestrian and owns a ranch and horses in the Yaafour area, near Damascus, according to two family friends, who spoke to The Associated Press on condition of anonymity to give details of his private life.He also collects autographed jerseys from athletes and old motorcycles, they said.Qassem Saadeddine, a former Syrian army colonel and spokesman for the rebels' Supreme Military Council, counters that Maher Assad ensures loyalty among those close to him with largesse. "He gives them money, cars, houses and all means of entertainment.""He controls the country and its resources, that's what he does."
UNITED NATIONS — The United Nations on Saturday said it had received all documents necessary for Syria to join the chemical weapons convention and that Syria would come under the treaty starting on October 14."The Convention will enter into force for the Syrian Arab Republic on the 30th day following the date of deposit of this instrument of accession, namely on 14 October 2013," the U.N. press office said in a statement.
DAMASCUS — Thousands of Syrian school children started their academic year on time on Sunday after concern that schools would not open on schedule due to threats of a U.S. military strike.In Damascus, many school buildings had been transformed into barracks to house personnel fleeing military sites that could be targets in a strike that U.S. President Barack Obama said would be punishment for an alleged chemical attack on August 21.By Sunday morning most soldiers had moved out, in a sign that President Bashar al-Assad's government no longer fears strikes following a deal negotiated by the United States and Russia under which he would destroy his chemical arsenal.The streets of Damascus were busy again on Sunday after weeks of anticipation of military action. Some major roads were gridlocked with traffic.Hundreds of girls poured out of Satea al Hosari all-girls middle school in west Damascus at 1 p.m. (6:00 a.m. EDT), carrying their newly issued text books in white plastic bags and looking for their parents or school buses."It's been a long summer, and the kids have been cooped up at home for too long and I'm happy to have them out of the house and back into their routine," said Mayse, a mother of three, as she waited outside the school to pick up her daughter.When her daughter came out, she told her mother about friends who had not shown up to school because they had left town, and others whose families were considering leaving.Since talk of an imminent military strike against Syria last month, many families fled Syria to neighboring Lebanon and some decided to stay there for the school year.Reflecting the turmoil in the economy, school uniforms are now three to five times as expensive as they were before the revolt started.As Washington talked of a military strike in response to the August 21 incident, the conspicuous presence of soldiers and armed security men in densely populated residential neighborhoods left many Damascenes worried.Some complained that the military appeared to be taking shelter amid civilians to use them as human shields.At the start of the month, rebels situated on the edge of the city fired a mortar bomb at Hosari school but it hit a nearby apartment block, residents said.Nearby shop owners said the soldiers' presence made them vulnerable to attacks and that they were disconcerted by the men with guns in their neighborhood.Soldiers and state security housed in schools appeared to go to lengths to keep low profile and minimize engagement with local civilians, to avoid any antagonism.Groups of armed men could be seen behind school gates sitting about in the courtyard, sipping tea and playing cards with their assault rifles on the floor by their side.One janitor at an elementary school said the men were there until Saturday when "they packed up and left."
DAMASCUS, Syria — Russia insisted Tuesday that a U.N. Security Council resolution governing Syria's handling of its chemical weapons not allow the use of force, but it suggested that could change if Damascus reneges on the deal to give up its stockpile.The main Syrian opposition coalition, meanwhile, urged the international community to take swift action against the regime of President Bashar Assad in response to a U.N. finding that the nerve agent sarin was used in a deadly attack near the capital last month.Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov said his country "spoke clearly" about rejecting the use of force when the chemical weapons agreement was worked out Saturday in Geneva between Washington and Moscow. The plan calls for an inventory of Syria's chemical weapons within a week, with all components of the program out of the country or destroyed by mid-2014.But if signs emerge that Syria is not fulfilling the agreement or there are reports of further chemical weapons use, "then the Security Council will examine the situation," Lavrov said, suggesting the issue could be reconsidered.U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon said a resolution on the U.S.-Russia deal must be enforceable, telling reporters that the "most effective" way is under Chapter 7 of the U.N. Charter. That deals with threats to international peace and security and has provisions for enforcement by military or non-military means, such as sanctions.While in principle all Security Council resolutions are legally binding, Ban said, "in reality, we need clear guidelines under Chapter 7."Lavrov made his remarks at a news conference in Moscow with French Foreign Minister Laurent Fabius. France and the U.S. say a military option remained on the table, and they are pushing for the U.N. resolution to reflect that.Diplomats said the five permanent council members — the U.S., Russia, China, Britain and France — made little progress at a meeting Tuesday on a draft resolution and would meet again Wednesday.On Monday, U.N. inspectors submitted a report on the Aug. 21 chemical weapons attack near Damascus that deepened the Syrian crisis. It was the first official confirmation by impartial experts that chemical weapons were used in the attack, which killed hundreds.The report confirmed that chemical weapons were used but did not ascribe blame, and Lavrov and Fabius differed sharply on their interpretations."The report exposes the regime," Fabius said. "On the basis of the information of our external agents, we consider that the report proves the responsibility of the regime for the chemical weapons attack of Aug. 21."The U.S., Britain and France said evidence in the report — the type of rockets, the composition of the sarin agent, and trajectory of the missiles — showed that Assad's government was responsible. The report said surface-to-surface rockets containing sarin were fired from an area where Syria's military has bases, but said the evidence could have been manipulated in the rebel-controlled neighborhood that was hit.Russia, a staunch ally of the Syrian regime, disagreed with the West's conclusions. Lavrov said Moscow has "serious reason to suggest that this was a provocation" by the rebels.Ban called the report "the most significant confirmed use of chemical weapons against civilians since Saddam Hussein used them" against ethnic Kurds in Halabja, Iraq, in 1988.The main Syrian opposition group, the Western-backed Syrian National Coalition, said the report clearly shows that only the Syrian regime could have carried out the attack, and it urged the U.N. to refer Syria to the International Criminal Court."The Syrian coalition urges the Security Council to end the culture of impunity in Syria, and to stop the Syrian regime from carrying out further war crimes and crimes against humanity," the coalition said.SNC president Ahmad al-Jarba said the U.N. resolution should force the destruction of Syria's chemical weapons and also stop "the regime's war machine by banning the use of its air force, missiles and artillery."The Syrian Foreign Ministry slammed the U.S., Britain and France for demanding that Assad step down, denouncing "their frantic quest to impose their will" on Syria."Assad is the legitimate president chosen by the Syrian people and will remain so as long as the Syrian people want this," the statement said.Secretary-General Ban told the U.N. General Assembly Tuesday afternoon that the executive council that oversees the Chemical Weapons Convention, will meet Friday in The Hague, Netherlands to endorse the U.S.-Russia agreement. The Security Council is then expected to adopt a resolution early next week, he said.Russia's Deputy Foreign Minister Sergei Ryabkov traveled to Damascus to meet with Syrian Foreign Minister Walid al-Moallem. Russia's ITAR-Tass news agency said Ryabkov would discuss the plan to dismantle chemical weapons.Fighting in the civil war raged on, with a car bomb wounding more than a dozen people in northern Syria at a border crossing with Turkey.The blast at the Bab al-Hawa frontier wounded 19 people, according to activist Ahmad al-Khatib in Idlib. Rami Abdul-Rahman, who heads the Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, said 15 were wounded.In February, a car bomb at the border post killed 14 and two car bombs in May on the Turkish side killed 43.Syria accused Turkey of escalating tensions by shooting down a Syrian military helicopter Monday. The military said the helicopter was monitoring cross-border infiltration of rebels when it "mistakenly" entered Turkish airspace.Turkey's Deputy Prime Pinister Bulent Arinc said the aircraft was downed by a fighter jet after it ignored repeated warnings to leave Turkish airspace.South of Damascus, Syrian government troops backed by Lebanon's militant group Hezbollah captured parts of the town of Chebaa, the Observatory said. Chebaa is also close to the Sayida Zeinab shrine that is sacred to Shiites.Syrian troops shelled rebel-held areas and sent reinforcements to the southern region of Quneitra near Syria's Israeli-occupied Golan Heights, the Observatory said.Mroue reported from Beirut. Associated Press writers Jim Heintz and Vladimir Isachenkov in Moscow, Edith M. Lederer and Peter James Spielmann at the United Nations, and Zeina Karam in Beirut contributed to this report.
WASHINGTON — Iranian President Hassan Rouhani urged world leaders on Thursday to "seize the opportunity" presented by his election to engage Iran in constructive dialogue and said his country was ready to facilitate talks between the Syrian government and the opposition.In an opinion piece published in the Washington Post on Thursday in advance of the U.N. General Assembly annual meeting next week, the centrist cleric said nations needed to seek "win-win outcomes" instead of using "brute force" to combat terrorism, extremism, cybercrime and other challenges."Gone is the age of blood feuds," he wrote. "World leaders are expected to lead in turning threats into opportunities."The piece appeared to be Rouhani's latest signal that he plans to pursue a thaw in relations with the United States and other Western nations, which believe Iran is developing nuclear weapons and have imposed economic sanctions that have damaged Iran's economy.Rouhani said in an interview with an American television network this week that his country would never develop nuclear weapons. In the Post, he referred to Iran's "peaceful nuclear energy program" and made no suggestion of giving it up."To us, mastering the atomic fuel cycle and generating nuclear power is as much about diversifying our energy resources as it is about who Iranians are as a nation, our demand for dignity and respect and our consequent place in the world," he wrote.Acknowledging a change in tone from Iran since the cleric's election in June, the White House said on Thursday that President Barack Obama might meet with Rouhani in New York next week."A zero-sum, Cold War mentality leads to everyone's loss," Rouhani wrote in the Post. "Sadly, unilateralism often continues to overshadow constructive approaches. Security is pursued at the expense of the insecurity of others, with disastrous consequences."Rouhani said the people of the Middle East should be allowed to decide their own fate. He said he was ready to help in Syria, where government forces and rebels have fought a civil war for 2 1/2 years. Iran has supported Syrian President Bashar al-Assad with weapons and other military aid."I announce my government's readiness to help facilitate dialogue between the Syrian government and the opposition," Rouhani wrote.He said Iranians had embraced his pledge to engage in constructive interaction with the world."As I depart for New York for the opening of the U.N. General Assembly, I urge my counterparts to seize the opportunity presented by Iran's recent election. I urge them to make the most of the mandate for prudent engagement that my people have given me and to respond genuinely to my government's efforts to engage in constructive dialogue."
DAMASCUS, Syria — Facing extraordinary challenges, millions of Syrian children in government-controlled areas returned to school this week despite the civil war that has left almost 4,000 schools — one in five — damaged, destroyed or sheltering displaced families.In Damascus, the Syrian capital, a frequent target of mortar shells fired by rebels entrenched in the suburbs, the government insisted on starting the academic year on time, despite the constant threat.At the Suleiman Hassan Shuaib school in the upscale Mazzeh neighborhood of Damascus, children and parents greeted the start of school with a mix of anticipation and concern."The children are worried," said Majed Ibrahim, arriving at the elementary school Wednesday accompanying his three children carrying colorful school bags on their shoulders."They no longer sleep at regular times because of the loud sounds of artillery and mortar rounds," Ibrahim said. "Until now, they run to my room in panic whenever they hear loud booms."Principal Ali Ali said many of the school's 500 students are newcomers who transferred from schools in war-shattered towns and cities across the country. The school now uses an underground depot as a shelter in case of emergency, and employs a psychologist to deal with students suffering fear and trauma."It's normal that the habits of some pupils have changed, but in general, a large number of them look courageous and show indifference to what is happening," said Raneem Diab, the psychologist.She added that the worst hit were the new arrivals from schools in the Damascus suburbs, where fighting between government forces and rebels has raged for months."Regretfully, what is happening affects children, but we are trying to raise their morale and bring them up properly despite these difficult circumstances," she said.Children's activities have been restricted because of the war, so parents said the start of school was a chance to meet friends and have fun after a summer spent largely confined to home."The children have been paying a heavy price," said Youssef Abdel-Jelil, a UNICEF representative in Syria.A recent report by the Britain-based charity Save the Children estimated that hundreds of thousands of children have not attended school in the past two years. It warned that the civil war is reversing one of Syria's main prewar achievements — in 2010, nearly all children of school age had completed primary school.With the conflict well in its third year, the statistics serve as a testament to a gloomy future in which chances of Syrian children getting a basic education have been halved, Abdel-Jelil told The Associated Press.At least 4,000 schools — or one in five — have been damaged or destroyed nationwide in the conflict, according to recent estimates by UNICEF. About 1,000 schools serve as shelters for displaced Syrians, and some schools have been transformed into barracks. Since the last school year, almost 2 million Syrian children, aged 6 to 15, have had to leave school because of violence or displacement.Syrian Education Minister Hazwan al-Wiz insisted that schools would open on time despite the difficulties "because Syria's children are the future." The minister pointed out that some 600 schools have been renovated and 1,000 others have been turned into centers for displaced Syrians.In rebel-held areas, which have largely descended into chaos, most schools were closed.Mohammed al-Khatib, an activist based in the northern city of Aleppo, Syria's largest, said more than half the schools are closed."The security situation is bad and people are worried about explosions and kidnappings," al-Khatib said. "There is no electricity, no services and no heating in winter."In the absence of a proper school year, UNICEF has launched the "Back to Learning" campaign which aims to reach 1 million conflict-affected primary school children.In Damascus, children returning to school put on a brave face.Sitting at his desk in his blue uniform, 12-year-old Anas al-Hakim said he was happy to be back."It's better than staying at home. I am not afraid, it's normal now to hear those sounds," he said.Associated Press writers Bassem Mroue and Barbara Surk contributed from Beirut.
LONDON — British Prime Minister David Cameron's Conservatives have pulled level with the opposition Labour party for the first time in 18 months, according to a YouGov poll published on Thursday, as the economy shows signs of recovery.The poll puts both parties on 36 percent of the vote shortly before each hosts its annual conference to set out election strategy ahead of a 2015 national vote. The last time the two parties were level was in February 2012, YouGov said.Other polls still show a Labour lead of around 6 percentage points but that margin has been steadily shrinking after a row about party funding which has led to questions over Ed Miliband's leadership and a slide in his personal ratings."Labour has seen a double digit lead disappear in weeks. Its summer of discontent could turn into an autumn of despair," YouGov President Peter Kellner told the Sun newspaper which published the survey.Suggestions that trade unions have too much influence on Labour policy have dragged down the party's poll ratings while a succession of senior Labour figures have spoken out to criticize Miliband for failing to flesh out the party's own policies.The Liberal Democrats, currently the junior partner in the ruling coalition, were forecast to win 10 percent of the vote, trailing the anti-EU UK Independence Party (UKIP) on 12 percent.LibDem leader, Nick Clegg, said this week he intended to break the two-party mould of British politics once and for all and keep his party in coalition government - an objective he is more likely to achieve if Labour and the Conservatives remain level-pegging and unable to command a clear electoral majority.The Conservatives' fortunes have been buoyed by signs that the British economy is recovering after a prolonged recession - something Finance Minister George Osborne says vindicates his tough austerity policies since coming to power in 2010.Nevertheless, unity within the Conservative party remains delicate. Last month, rebel lawmakers helped defeat the party's policy on military intervention in Syria and earlier this year there were rebellions over a scheduled referendum on European Union membership and plans to legalize gay marriage.
PARIS — French President Francois Hollande saw his approval ratings fall to their lowest level so far in a monthly poll that showed less than a quarter of voters were satisfied with his actions.In a survey by pollster IFOP published in weekly paper Le Journal du Dimanche, Hollande's approval ratings dropped 5 points from last month to 23 percent.This was below his previous low of 25 percent in the same poll in April and close to the lowest ever score for a French president, the 22 percent recorded in 1991 by Francois Mitterand, France's previous Socialist president, the paper said.The poll underlines the task facing Hollande in reviving his popularity at a time when wrangling over tax levels has clouded efforts to revitalize a sluggish economy and his support for military strikes against Syria has drawn mixed reactions.The poll also showed Hollande's ratings among supporters of the Green party had slid by 19 points since last month, a sign of growing tensions between Hollande's Socialists and their Green allies in government.Hollande this week outlined plans to slash fossil fuel use, supported by a new carbon tax, in an announcement seen as aimed at reassuring the Green party.France's next presidential elections are due in 2017.
UNITED NATIONS — Iran has a unique chance to win respect in the Arab world if it pushes Syria's regime toward peace, Tunisia's president said Monday.President Moncef Marzouki also renewed his offer of asylum to Syrian President Bashar Assad as a last-ditch option to stop the 2 ½ -year civil war that has killed more than 100,000 people.Marzouki, at the United Nations for its annual General Assembly meeting beginning on Tuesday, called new Iranian President Hasan Rouhani a "key player" in efforts to negotiate a political settlement in Syria. Iran is Syria's main benefactor, but the newly elected Rouhani is a political moderate who has impressed the West by offering to facilitate negotiations between Assad and the Syrian rebel opposition.In an interview with The Associated Press, Marzouki said he plans to meet with Rouhani during the weeklong meetings in New York, and "I will tell him Iran would be much more respected, accepted, in the Arab world if they put the pressure on their man in Damascus."He added, "Backing Syria means they are losing the whole Arab world."Marzouki defended his asylum offer to Assad — whom he called a criminal — as a desperate attempt to stop the bloodshed in Syria."If we can avoid more massacres, if we can prevent thousands of Syrian to die, why not?" Marzouki said. "It's a terrible, terrible decision, but why not? I am a physician, and life is much more important than anything, even justice."Marzouki also warned about the return of dictatorships to the Mideast, two years after Arab Spring uprisings across the region that demanded democracy.He said political unrest and a rise in extremism in Tunisia has cost his country a year's worth of progress.Tunisia is considered the birthplace of the Arab Spring after a frustrated fruit seller set himself on fire there in December 2010 during a wave of anti-government anger. The Tunisian dictator at the time, Zine El Abidine Ben Ali, was ousted a month later after 23 years in power.Since then, Tunisia has been beset by a cratering economy and a sharp rise in extremism. Together, they have roiled the nation's political process. Efforts to produce a new constitution have been pushed back, faith in the transitional government has dwindled and the assassination of two opposition politicians this year has thrown the process into chaos.Both assassinations are believed to have been carried out by the al-Qaida-linked extremist group Ansar al-Shariah."They didn't assassinate one person, one human being — they did assassinate the whole nation," Marzouki said. "The whole trouble we have had was because of these political assassinations. If we didn't have them, I am quite sure that today we would have our constitution, a new government."He accused the extremist group of seeking to "make the situation in Tunisia like in Egypt — but fortunately, this was not the case."Marzouki said he was greatly concerned about unrest in Egypt, where the military ousted the country's first democratically elected president in July, and in neighboring Libya, where the government has relied on militias for security since the 2011 civil war that overthrew Moammar Gadhafi.He predicted Tunisia's government will survive and that another coup is not likely.However, "democracy cannot be an island in the ocean of dictatorships," Marzouki said. "This is why it is very, very important for us to have democracy succeed in Libya, in Egypt, everywhere."Marzouki said investigations are ongoing into the July killing of opposition politician Mohammed Brahmi and into last year's attack on the U.S. Embassy in Tunis. He expressed embarrassment about both events.The CIA had warned Tunisian officials before Brahmi's death that he was a potential target, and Marzouki said "some people probably will pay" for the security lapse. In the case of the embassy attack last September, Marzouki said he was displeased with court decisions to suspend the sentences of 20 people who were convicted in the riot, and he attributed the lax sanctions to a government that did not take terror threats seriously.
DAMASCUS, Syria — President Bashar Assad pledged in an interview broadcast Monday to honor an agreement to surrender Syria's stockpile of chemical weapons, but he said that rebels might try to block international arms inspectors from doing their work.As battles continued across Syria, new Associated Press video of an attack Sunday night showed the regime's helicopters dropping barrel bombs on opposition-held areas, creating chaotic scenes of destruction.In a sign of worsening infighting among the rebels, a top al-Qaida commander in Syria was killed in an ambush by rival, Western-backed group — an assassination sure to raise tensions among factions seeking to topple the regime.Assad's comments came as world leaders gathered in New York for the annual U.N. General Assembly, where the use of chemical weapons in Syria's civil war was high on the agenda.The Syrian leader told Chinese state TV that Damascus is dedicated to implementing the agreement reached between Russia and the U.S. to surrender its chemical weapons to international control. Syria's stockpile, he said, is "in safe areas and locations and under the full control of the Syrian Arab Army."Assad cautioned, however, that the rebels might block inspectors from reaching some of the locations, in order to frame the government."I'm referring to places where gunmen exist. Those gunmen might want to stop the experts' arrival," Assad told CCTV in the interview, which was shot Sunday in Damascus and broadcast Monday.Under the agreement brokered Sept. 14 in Geneva, inspectors are to be in Syria by November and all components of the chemical weapons program are to be removed from the country or destroyed by the middle of next year.The revelations of Syria's chemical weapons arsenal became public after an Aug. 21 attack near Damascus that a U.N. report found included the use of the nerve agent sarin. Hundreds of people died in the attack that brought Washington to the brink of military intervention before the accord was struck between the U.S. and Russia.The U.N. inspectors face enormous challenges, including maneuvering between rebel- and government-controlled territory. Last month, snipers opened fire on a U.N. convoy carrying a team on its way to investigate the Aug. 21 incident.Opposition fighters have insisted they will also cooperate with any inspectors or experts who come to Syria.Ralf Trapp, a former chemical arms inspector who is now a disarmament consultant, said Assad was legally obligated to let in inspectors under the chemical weapons treaty. But, he cautioned, "they can use the security situation as an excuse. They can delay things."Damascus met a first deadline under the Geneva agreement, submitting last week what was supposedly the full list of its chemical weapons and production facilities to the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons so they can be secured and destroyed.Also Monday, Hezbollah leader Sheik Hassan Nasrallah categorically denied rebel claims that his group had received chemical weapons from Syria.The U.S.-Russian deal has dealt a blow to the rebels, who had hoped a U.S.-led military strike would turn the war in their favor. Opposition leaders have warned the regime will continue to wield conventional weapons in the civil war, which has killed more than 100,000 people since the uprising began in March 2011.Fierce fighting between regime forces and rebels Monday included an airstrike that killed at least six people from the same family in central Hama province.Exclusive AP video showed a helicopter dropping explosives Sunday evening on the village of Habit, followed by pandemonium as civilians and fighters with flashlights searched frantically for survivors in the rubble.Villagers used a pickax and car jacks to try to rescue a man and his son buried under slabs of concrete. The father's face and hands could be seen protruding from the rubble. He did not survive, but his son was saved.Another AP video showed billowing smoke and destruction after helicopters and warplanes bombed rebel positions in the mostly abandoned village of Kafer Zita, also in the Hama region. Several men appeared to be groggy from the blasts and covered in dust. Hospital officials said they struggled to treat the injured, with scarce medication.Regime forces are fighting Sunni rebels in the Hama area to keep them from advancing on villages inhabited by Alawites, members of Assad's minority sect, an offshoot of Shiite Islam.In the latest inter-rebel fighting, the group known as the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant, an al-Qaida offshoot, said its commander in Idlib province, Abu Abdullah al-Libi, was killed in an ambush by members of the Free Syrian Army who opened fire on his car near a border crossing with Turkey on Sunday. The statement was posted on a militant website.Al-Libi, a Libyan national, is a high-profile militant who fought in Iraq, Libya and most recently in Syria.Charles Lister, an analyst with IHS Jane's, said the killing underlines the increasingly hostile environment for the ISIL. The group has sought to expand its influence across opposition-held territory in the north and has increasingly clashed with long-existing rebel units affiliated with the FSA.The killing "will undoubtedly raise the level of tension amid insurgent forces in northern Syria yet further," Lister said, adding that the perception within ISIL militant circles that the FSA is a hostile force will likely increase.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an activist group monitoring the conflict, confirmed the death of al-Libi, which is a nom de guerre. It said he was killed with 12 other al-Qaida fighters near the village of Hazanu, 10 kilometers (six miles) from the Bab al-Hawa border crossing with Turkey.Nadim Shehadi, an associate fellow at London's Chatham House, said the story surrounding rebel infighting was being used by the Assad regime to portray the opposition as unstable and dangerous."The story is being overblown, not because of the importance of the guy, but because it's seen that he was killed by the FSA," Shehadi said.Karam reported from Beirut. Associated Press writer Maamoun Youssef in Cairo, Raphael Satter in London and Lori Hinnant in Paris contributed to this report.
UNITED NATIONS — U.S. President Barack Obama told the U.N. General Assembly on Tuesday that there should be a basis for an agreement on Iran's nuclear ambitions but that the roadblocks will be difficult to overcome.In an address laying out U.S. policy toward the volatile Middle East and North Africa, Obama made clear that the United States will take direct action to eliminate threats when necessary and will use military force when diplomacy fails.Obama, in closely watched remarks on Iran based on a diplomatic opening offered by Iran's new president, Hassan Rouhani, said the United States wants to resolve the Iran nuclear issue peacefully but is determined to prevent Iran from developing a nuclear weapon."The roadblocks may prove to be too great but I firmly believe the diplomatic path must be tested," Obama said.He urged the U.N. Security Council to approve a strong resolution aimed at ensuring Syria keeps its commitments to give up chemical weapons and said the United States will provide an additional $340 million in humanitarian aid.
DAMASCUS — A car bomb killed at least seven civilians on Tuesday when it exploded in a southern Damascus neighborhood, a monitoring group said.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said 15 people had also been injured in the blast, which hit the district of Tadamon, where President Bashar al-Assad's forces have been fighting rebels for months.Syrian state television said "terrorists" were behind the explosion, a term it commonly uses to refer to rebels who are fighting to topple Assad.The Britain-based Observatory, which has a network of activists across Syria, said the blast had destroyed several buildings.What began as a peaceful pro-democracy movement 2-1/2 years ago has turned into a civil war in which more than 100,000 people have died.
BEIRUT — Syrian insurgents pressed a new assault in the strategic, heavily-defended southwestern suburbs of Damascus on Tuesday, saying they aimed to break an army blockade of rebel-held areas.Rebels fired mortars at government forces while army shelling hit the suburb of Derayya, the scene of recurrent fighting during the 30-month-old Syrian conflict, activists and rebels said.Insurgents have dug in around a crescent of suburbs outside the capital for about a year and a half, but President Bashar al-Assad's forces have halted or reversed their advances in several strategic districts that are now effectively blockaded.Assad's air power and better-equipped ground forces have so far fended off attacks by rebels whose main arms supply routes into the suburbs were severed by the army earlier this year.Fighting in Damascus subsided when the United States threatened punitive military action against Assad, but picked up after a diplomatic bargain for Syria to give up its chemical weapons averted the immediate threat of a strike.The rebels' new offensive, which they named "If You Return, We Return," united several factions operating in the area, including the al Qaeda-linked Nusra Front.Ahrar al-Sham, another big Islamist faction, also said it was playing a major role, along with the Sahaba Battalions, a powerful Damascus-based rebel unit.A Sahaba commander said the operation aimed to relieve residents of the Derayya and Mouadamiya areas in the capital's southwestern outskirts from a "suffocating blockade" that was cutting off food, medicine and arms."There are big shortages of humanitarian and medical supplies," said the spokesman, who goes by the name Abu Moaz, adding that the operation had started on Monday night."The situation is very bad. No food, no water. There had to be military action," he said.The southern suburbs will be a tough target for the rebels, given that they house several major military sites, including a military airport and a base for elite Republican Guard forces.A Damascus-based activist who calls himself Bassem Mohammed said the rebels were unlikely to gain from the latest assault."The regime's top forces are there," Mohammed said. "We on the ground consider these to be 'show' operations from the Free Army, especially in cooperation with Ahrar al-Sham and Nusra. It's a war of attrition. There is no winner and no loser."The British-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which has a network of sources across Syria, said rebels had taken control of the Tel Rakees and Tel Bouza areas south of the capital and had destroyed two vehicles.More than 100,000 people have died in Syria's conflict, which began in March 2011 with peaceful protests against four decades of Assad family rule and later descended into civil war.Mouadamiya was one of the sites struck by a chemical attack last month that killed hundreds of people and which Western powers blamed on Assad's forces. The government denied this.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syria's deputy foreign minister, Fayssal Mekdad, said Tuesday that his government aimed to negotiate an end to the country's civil war by talking with a broad range of Syrians, from religious and community leaders to peaceful opposition groups, dismissing the main Western-backed exile opposition as having little influence on the ground.The statements raised questions about the future of peace talks, because Mr. Mekdad's concept appeared to differ from the framework of a planned second peace conference, known as Geneva II, sponsored by global powers, for which talks between the government and the exile coalition were envisioned.Even as the United Nations General Assembly convened in New York, where world leaders were expected to push for the peace talks and negotiate a resolution requiring Syria to turn over its chemical weapons, there was a growing sense here that the talks could be long in coming and could still fall apart over basic issues like who will participate.Speaking with a renewed air of confidence since the United States backed off a planned military strike, Mr. Mekdad stuck to the government's longstanding insistence that it would not talk directly to any group carrying arms against it.But he opened the door, however slightly, to talks with Syrian religious and community leaders "who have influence on the ground" with fighters. By acknowledging ties between elements of the armed opposition and parts of Syrian society, the offer represented a subtle shift in tone from the government's portrayal of the armed rebellion as a foreign-led conspiracy.Still, the question of who within the diffuse opposition could both deliver results and be an acceptable negotiating partner to the government bedevils attempts to reach a political solution to the war in Syria, which has killed more than 100,000 people and forced millions from their homes.Mr. Mekdad exuded confidence that President Bashar al-Assad's government had taken the upper hand against the rebels and said that even as it pledged to give up its chemical weapons to avoid a United States airstrike, the government had achieved diplomatic and military victories.Sitting in an inlaid damascene chair in his office overlooking the city, Mr. Mekdad said the natural next step was an international push for Israel to relinquish its arsenal of nuclear weapons, which the neighboring state has never formally acknowledged and which was never linked to Syria's agreement to give up its chemical weapons stockpile.He said the government was "100 percent sure" that rebels, not government forces, fired the chemical weapons that killed hundreds of people in the Damascus suburbs in August, a statement dismissed by American officials and at odds with some of the scientific findings of United Nations inspectors sent to investigate the chemical attack.Asked about analyses of the inspectors' report that suggested the weapons could only have been operated by the government, and compass headings that indicated the chemicals were most likely fired from a government-held area that includes core military bases atop Mount Qasioun, he pointed to the mountain's ridge, a Damascus landmark, from his window."From that place, somebody may shoot at us now," he said. "Does it mean the government is killing the government?"Asked whether the government would talk with civilians representing Syrian opposition fighters — as opposed to foreign jihadist groups — Mr. Mekdad said, "Don't put me in a place where I have to say who is a terrorist and who is not a terrorist," stopping short of implying, as the government often has, that anyone tied to the rebellion supports terrorism.But Mr. Mekdad suggested the government doubted the usefulness of talking to leaders of the National Coalition of Syrian Revolutionary and Opposition Forces, the exile group that the West and its Arab allies have tried to set up as the government's opposition counterpart and the civilian leadership of the loose-knit rebel Free Syrian Army. Excluding that group would be a nonstarter for the United States and its allies.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Camouflage-clad militiamen guard sandbagged checkpoints along this storied city's elegant downtown boulevards. Merchants who once owned their own shops are reduced to selling plastic trinkets on the street. Families from war-torn provinces sleep in mosques and schools.The Syrian capital has been deeply altered by the country's civil war, now in its third year. The economy is collapsing. Displaced people arrive faster than they can be absorbed. Most of all, there is a sense that the war will continue, perhaps for years, making the country's rifts progressively harder to heal.Dark as it is, that foreboding has led to a convergence of sorts, a desire by many on both sides of the conflict to bring an end to the killing and destruction even if it means compromise."There is no more pro and anti," said a janitor who opposed the uprising, but like many here in the capital has relatives and co-workers who supported it. "We all want security."Some here wonder if that increasingly popular, though by no means universal, view could be the basis of peace talks that world leaders are seeking to arrange half a world away. Others warn that moderate sentiments on both sides — in a diverse city relatively unscathed by the fighting — may have little bearing on the combat, which is driven by government hard-liners, rebel extremists and anger over the deaths of more than 100,000 people.Yet in whispers, or among trusted friends, people in central Damascus across the political spectrum are increasingly questioning the value of pressing the conflict. Many no longer believe the assurances of their nominal leaders and doubt they have the interests of ordinary people in mind. Most share a horror of extremist Islamist groups in the armed opposition, disagreeing only on whether that translates into a desire for the current government to remain.With the war mired in stalemate and the possibility of American airstrikes receding, people here are no longer bracing for what many once expected, a rebel invasion of the city. Instead, problems seep from within. Political tensions intrude on social gatherings. The war is deforming relationships, neighborhoods and landscapes.The checkpoints, once shocking to residents here, have become fixtures, popping up every few blocks. Their red, white and black Syrian flags are tattered and gray; regular commuters greet guards by name; and some checkpoints have been expanded, from simple shelters to sandbagged concrete bunkers.The government rarely permits soldiers, checkpoints or military vehicles to be photographed, keeping from the international news media the visible militarization of daily life.Beneath highway overpasses, Syrians newly joining the five million pushed from their homes by war mill about with their baggage, not sure where to go.Outside the city center, some roads made impassable at times by the fighting are safe, at least during the day. But along one such highway, from Damascus to the suburb of Sahnaya to the southwest, malls, restaurants and office buildings stand abandoned, their windows shattered, their parking lots mostly empty. One lot is crowded with the twisted carcasses of burned city buses.Streets are busier now, giving a surface sense of normalcy. The plaza outside the Umayyad Mosque at the heart of the Old City hums in the evenings, no longer deserted after dark as it often was just a few months ago. Children race after balls, vendors sell roasted corn and housewares, and families rest along the base of the mosque's thick stone wall.But a closer look reveals that many of these people are displaced, living nearby in cramped apartments, storefronts and offices, filling the gap left by tourists and residents who fled the country.Ask them why they are venturing out, and Damascenes and newcomers offer similar answers: They do not necessarily feel safer; they are simply used to danger and sick of distorting their lives to avoid it.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Fighters from the fastest-growing Qaeda franchise in Syria have repeatedly clashed with other rebel brigades, seizing towns, replacing crosses on churches with black flags and holding classes to teach Syrian children about the importance of battling "infidels," meaning anyone who is not a Sunni Muslim.Since the group, the Islamic State in Iraq and Syria, or ISIS, announced its presence in Syria this year, it has emerged as the leading force for the foreign fighters streaming into the country, exploiting the chaos of the civil war as it tries to lay the groundwork for an Islamic state."They want to carve out a jihadi state or a jihadi territory and obviously anything above that is gravy, like overthrowing the Assad regime," said Bruce Hoffman, director of the Center for Security Studies at Georgetown University. "I don't think they have ambitions of taking over the entire country, although they'd be happy to."While the Syrian rebels initially welcomed the group as a powerful ally in the civil war against President Bashar al-Assad, many now resent it for putting its international jihadi agenda ahead of the fight to topple the government. Antigovernment activists say they detest the group's brutality and imposition of strict social codes, and even other Islamist rebels say the struggle's focus should remain on leadership change.The tensions have set off frequent fighting between rebel groups that has undermined the effort to combat the government and could complicate efforts to dispose of Syria's chemical weapons. An advance team from the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons arrived in Damascus on Tuesday to discuss with Syrian officials the logistics of destroying the country's chemical arsenal. Officials from the group said keeping its personnel safe during a raging civil war would be extremely difficult.The rise of extremist groups has exacerbated Syria's instability. ISIS has attacked rebel bases to capture supplies, and routed rebel groups last month to seize control of Azaz, a strategic city near the Turkish border, leading to a tense cease-fire. Last week, Qaeda fighters tried to storm a village in Idlib Province to kidnap some rebels, leaving 20 dead from both sides, including the jihadis' Libyan commander."We want to keep Syria together as a country of freedom and equality," a leader in an Islamist rebel group opposed to ISIS, called Suqour al-Sham, who gave his name as Abu Bashir, said via Skype. "They want to form an Islamic state that comes together with Iraq."In an audio statement released online late Monday, a Qaeda spokesman defended the group, saying its contributions to the anti-Assad fight had been underappreciated and denying that it had started fights with rebel groups."Those who aspire to sideline the state are many because of incorrect beliefs and doctrines," said the spokesman, Abu Mohammed al-Adnani al-Shami. "They are greedy for power and for the worthless things of this world."Analysts say the group is a revival and extension of Al Qaeda in Iraq, whose sectarian-fueled insurgency pushed that country to the brink of civil war in 2006 and 2007, before the group suffered major defeats at the hands of tribal fighters and American troops.In Syria, however, the group has found the vast territories that have fallen into rebel hands near Syria's northern and eastern borders as an ideal environment to regroup and advance its agenda.The area is stateless, covered by a weak patchwork of local councils and rebel groups struggling to administer their towns and often competing with one another for resources. This gives the group a wide area to work in with no immediate enemies. The porousness of the Iraqi and Turkish borders also makes it easy for the group to bring in supplies and fighters.Brian Fishman, a former director of research at the Combating Terrorism Center at West Point and now a fellow at the New America Foundation, said those factors gave Al Qaeda a more favorable environment in Syria than it ever had in Iraq."The conditions in Syria will be ripe for ISIS for quite some time," he said.The group is headed by an Iraqi named Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi. Its fighters hail from across the Arab world, Chechnya and other parts of Europe and are commanded by local emirs to whom they pledge obedience, according to rebels in contact with the group.
DAMASCUS, Syria — After weeks of threats and negotiations over Syria's chemical weapons stockpile, an advance team of international weapons inspectors has begun to take the first steps toward dismantling the arsenal . Early indications suggest that they are in for a long, hard slog.On Tuesday, the day they arrived, for example, a mortar shell crashed down near the Four Seasons Hotel, where most United Nations agencies have headquarters and where inspectors have stayed in the past, underscoring the way danger penetrates even the most secure areas of the capital, Damascus.A hotel security guard, still looking stunned hours later, held out two pieces of shrapnel he had pocketed, a reminder of the level of difficulty and danger that the team faces during even routine business, let alone in carrying out a complicated technical operation in the midst of a civil war.There is no outward indication that the Syrian government intends to disrupt the process; indeed, Syrian officials are portraying the deal as a victory that will cement their hold on power. But rebel groups have given no such assurances, and logistics will be further complicated by shifting battle lines and the fact that a third of the weapons sites are in areas outside the government's control.Syrians on the street showed little interest in the process, instead placing their hopes — if tentative — in planned peace talks in Geneva. Whether they support or oppose the government or consider themselves neutral, most seem to agree that dismantling chemical weapons is beside the point in a war that has killed well over 100,000 people, the vast majority by conventional arms.The advance team gave few new details on Wednesday about its plans and expectations, instead working quietly behind the scenes to arrange its first steps. United Nations officials said in a statement on Tuesday that the team, 19 inspectors from the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons and 14 United Nations staff members, traveled over land from Beirut, Lebanon, facilitated by the Syrian government, "without any incidents."The inspectors expect to spend the coming days focused on "verifying information provided by the Syrian authorities and the initial planning phase of helping the country destroy its chemical weapons production facilities." The group aims to complete this by Nov. 1, the statement said.But officials from other United Nations agencies with experience in Syria outlined in recent interviews the sometimes insuperable obstacles they faced in carrying out the ostensibly less controversial task of delivering food, medical supplies and other relief services to needy Syrians across the country.The officials say that while they and the Syrian Arab Red Crescent have been able to regularly reach many contested areas, in some places with growing food shortages they have routinely been blocked by either the government or the rebel groups, or both.Hopes had been high last week that a United Nations convoy would reach the embattled rebel-held suburb of Moadhamiya for the first time in months, after an initial green light from some government agencies. But the trip did not materialize, United Nations officials said, after the government said military operations were continuing in the area.The United Nations has also struggled to reach government-held parts of Aleppo, because the route from Damascus passes through areas controlled by myriad rebel groups. Many times, officials say, the convoys have been allowed through by a series of rebel factions, only to be stopped or looted by one farther along the road.A pro-government Syrian journalist said he was shocked to learn that a number of chemical weapons facilities were in rebel-held areas. That, he said, may well mean that the dismantling process could easily take well over the yearlong timetable that has been proposed, and could require international forces to guard the inspectors and any weapons or materials that have to be moved.That could draw international forces into direct conflict with rebel groups, something the journalist said could achieve a government goal: convincing the world that extremist groups among the rebels were the common enemy."There will eventually be a confrontation," he said. "The idea of terrorism in Syria has been flowing in the media for a long time, but there was never a sense of direct threat to the West. It is there, yet in the long term, still for the West it is 'the enemy of our enemy.' " But, he added, "when you get to a point of actually confronting it, things change."For their part, some rebel groups have issued statements saying that they will not cooperate with a process in which they say the teams will come under fire from pro-government fighters, but the government will blame the rebels.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Coming from a Syrian deputy prime minister, it was an unusual statement. The country's crisis, he said, began in part with a "popular movement" of peaceful protesters angry over economic disparities, and descended into war in part because officials were slow to make changes and failed to realize that the "repression of the popular movement" would lead to disaster.Now, days after the official, Qadri Jamil, spoke in an interview, President Bashar al-Assad himself has declared that he and his government have made mistakes and that they share some blame for the crisis with rebels. Mr. Assad told the German magazine Der Spiegel, in an interview to be published on Monday, that he could not claim that the insurgents "did everything and we did nothing." Reality, he said, has "shades of gray."After years of describing the country's civil war in black and white, as an international terrorist conspiracy, Syrian officials in recent days appear to be trying to sound more conciliatory, as global powers try to arrange peace talks in Geneva to end the bloody stalemate, and as international weapons inspectors began on Sunday to destroy Syria's chemical arsenal.Mr. Assad did not specify his mistakes, at least not in early excerpts released by the magazine, and he toughened his position in some ways, appearing to rule out negotiations with the armed opposition. But Mr. Jamil, one of two ministers from officially tolerated opposition parties appointed during the crisis, spent much of a 90-minute interview last week offering a detailed critique of the government, including the security forces."The Syrian regime is the hero of lost opportunities," he said.Mr. Jamil spoke in his office, beneath a portrait of Mr. Assad. Yet he said he spoke not for the government but as a member of Syria's nonviolent opposition, which he said aimed, in the next elections, to "make the current majority into a minority."Mr. Jamil, a Soviet-trained economist, is seen even by government supporters as having little to no authority over policy decisions, and is derided by backers of the uprising as part of a toothless opposition set up by the government to create the appearance of openness.He is not the first Syrian official to suggest that the government should meet some opposition demands; the vice president, Farouk al-Shara, warned last year in a Lebanese newspaper that the government could not win militarily, and called for a broad coalition government, only to be removed from public view and shunted from a top post in the governing Baath Party.Mr. Jamil described an internal power struggle between "clean forces" pushing for substantive changes and "forces of corruption," which he said included security hard-liners opposed to a political solution, as well as people on both sides benefiting financially from the chaos."There are certain segments inside the regime, similar to other segments inside the opposition, who don't want to have this political solution," he said. "This is either because of narrow-minded mentalities or because they have turned into merchants of the crisis."He added that "extremists on both sides" would "fight each other by day and sit to divide the spoils at night."Though he did not name Mr. Assad as one of the reformers, one of his advisers did, and Mr. Jamil's comments resonated with a view popular among the president's supporters that he has always aimed for reform but has been stymied by hard-liners.He insisted that he faced no risks in making the comments. "The West has to get used to the new Syria," he said.Mr. Jamil, affable and fluent in Russian, runs his office with the help of members of his tolerated Communist party, the People's Will. He echoed the government line on many issues, rejecting foreign intervention, calling on the West to adopt Syria as an ally against Islamist "neo-fascism" and declaring that removing Mr. Assad by means other than elections would short-circuit democracy.But he added his own twists. He dispensed with the government refrain that Mr. Assad is a democratically elected president, saying Syria has never had a free or transparent election."Nobody asked the people until now," he said.He said the influx of foreign weapons, funds and insurgents "from any side" should stop, not just extremist jihadists battling the government but also Lebanese, Iranian and Iraqi fighters supporting it. "If there are any" of those fighters, they came in response to an earlier jihadist infiltration, he said."We are not going to say 'first in first out,' but let's say 'everybody out,' " he said.
DAQAQA, Syria — Under a silvery canopy of olive trees, men and women crowded around the grave of a 24-year-old lieutenant in the Syrian Army. As a commander handed the dead man's mother a Syrian flag folded into a neat triangle, the scrape of branches shifting in the wind could be heard over quiet sobs and prayers.A rifle barrage erupted as the dead man's friends and relatives fired into the air, sending scores of empty shells clinking to the pebbly ground."God give victory to our president, Bashar al-Assad, heal our wounded, set our prisoners free and let our words be one word," a sheik in a white robe and skullcap intoned. "Don't think those who die for the sake of God are dead. The martyr is precious for all eternity."Killed in an ambush at the other end of the country, the lieutenant — whose family asked that he be called by his nickname, Abu Layth — was the first soldier to fall from this village of 125 people in Syria's coastal foothills, two years into a war that has only recently come close enough for the sounds of shelling to be heard.Such funeral scenes have been repeated tens of thousands of times across the country. They resonate deeply for many in Syria, where army service is required, but especially here in the coastal province of Latakia, where support for the government is strong.Even some critics of the president or government still profess loyalty to the army as a symbol of the country, one regularly honored on national holidays and heroically portrayed in classic movies about past wars with Israel.The Syrian government has given no official figures for the toll the civil war has taken on the Syrian Arab Army, as it is known officially in a nod to the state's Arab nationalist history. But the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an antigovernment monitoring group that tracks the conflict, says that of the 110,000 deaths it has tallied, nearly 29,000 are from the army and more than 18,000 are from pro-government militias.The funeral last week — and the stately, flag-bearing convoy that brought the body from the provincial capital, the city of Latakia — gave a glimpse of the confidence of loyalists in the coastal region, where many men pursue military careers, and of the nationalistic way they frame the conflict.The fallen lieutenant and his family are Alawites, members of the sect to which Mr. Assad belongs, which is disproportionately represented in the security forces and whose members have faced sectarian threats from rebels. Yet no mention was made of that identity at the funeral. Whether in speeches or emotional outbursts, people spoke of defending the Syrian state.Only when asked if they believed the insurgents were bent on driving out Syria's religious minorities did family members even refer to themselves as Alawites — or mention that part of their fight is to defend their community, especially after rebels were accused of massacring scores of Alawites in nearby villages in August."Because the regime is Alawite," one relative said of the opposing fighters, including some from nearby villages, "they think every Alawite should be killed."Conflicting emotions were on display throughout. In her crowded living room, Abu Layth's mother, Jamila, said, "God willing, there will be a compromise," just as another mourner declared, "We want to drink their blood." Much was said about protecting the country's resources, yet at the entrance to the village, a concrete barrier was spray-painted, "Assad or we burn the country."Military funerals take place virtually daily across Syria, but it is almost impossible to gain access to one in Damascus, the capital. Pro-government Syrian journalists said that was in part because the dead are disproportionately from the villages of the coastal region, and even urban families tend to hold funerals in ancestral villages. Others just fear holding processions for pro-government fighters so near to rebel-held territory in the suburbs.But here along the Mediterranean coast, where the family of Mr. Assad has its roots, there was no such hesitation.
NORTH OF DAMASCUS, Syria — Along the road that winds over Mount Qasioun on the way out of Damascus, concrete archways lead to gated military bases, and sentry posts perch atop the slopes and rises of the dry, scrabbly hills. From behind sand berms at army checkpoints, tanks point their heavy guns into traffic.Driving out of Damascus, the Syrian capital, toward the city of Homs about 100 miles to the north, it is easy to see why rebels fighting President Bashar al-Assad have been unable to advance toward the capital from the north and west. The mountains and open plains here are thick with defenses built over the 40 years of Assad family rule to protect the center of power.But as the highway continues between two mountain ridges and reaches a flatter stretch south of Homs near the Lebanese border, this crucial corridor of government control becomes more fragile, crossed by rebel supply and recruitment routes, and war feels closer.On a recent trip from Damascus to Latakia on Syria's Mediterranean coast, a driver paused before heading onto an overpass on the outskirts of Homs, where rebels are still active, to talk to a man changing a tire."Just repeat 'God' and go," the man replied, and the driver sped up and over the bridge, gunning the engine as he turned west, relaxing only after he reached the solidly state-controlled coast.To drive from Damascus past Homs to Latakia is to tour the strategic spine of the country, the ultimate prize in the civil war now in its third year. Most of Syria's population is clustered in a series of settlements in the west of the country, stretching north from Dara'a to Damascus, Homs, Tartus, Latakia, Idlib and Aleppo, cities where the government remains in full or partial control but must contend with insurgents harassing people on the roads and in rural areas between.Road tripping in Syria reveals the sometimes surreal experience of Syrians' trying to move themselves and their goods around a country that has become a patchwork of rebellion and control, where government and rebel fighters share the roads with families and traders trying to go about their business.The main highway out of Damascus leads past and through eastern suburbs where rebels are entrenched, but no barriers or warning signs indicate the start of areas where rebel snipers or government artillery could strike. Yet blue reflective road signs bearing the names of once-unremarkable working-class suburbs — Harasta, Douma — now indicate war zones, and many drivers take the older route over Mount Qasioun.On a bright, windy morning, a haze lay over most of the Damascus outskirts as they disappeared behind the mountain that overlooks the city. On the back side, military bases alternated with towns of concrete-block buildings and domed mosques, like Al-Tal, where despite government control around the town, rebels inside it are active, residents say.Some analysts say bases here were the source of chemical weapons fire that killed hundreds in August, prompting the deal to eliminate Syria's chemical arsenal; the government denies that. What is not in dispute is that artillery strikes from the general area target the suburbs daily, the sounds of launching shells echoing over the city."The Syrian Army for the sake of the safety of the people," read a poster at a checkpoint where men in camouflage checked cars; one driver appeared to be handing over a bag of lettuce to a soldier. "Yes to reforms" was scrawled on a concrete barrier. Nearby, the twisted carcass of a burned tanker truck lay on the shoulder, unexplained and ignored by people waiting for rides.On stretches between time-consuming checkpoints, truck drivers tried to make up for delays, rattling along at breakneck speeds. Signs that said "Traffic Police for Help" included a number to call. Despite everything, Syria's traffic police are far more effective than those in neighboring Lebanon, pulling over drivers and writing speeding and parking tickets.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Hundreds of people were allowed to leave a besieged, rebel-held suburb of Damascus, the Syrian capital, on Sunday in a rare cease-fire, according to the government and its opponents. But aid workers said they were still unable to enter the town, Moadhamiyeh, which international organizations have been trying to reach for months and where six people have reportedly died of malnutrition.Further underscoring the challenges of providing humanitarian aid in Syria, where millions are displaced and needy, seven aid workers were abducted near the town of Saraqeb in the northern province of Idlib on Saturday.Six were staff members at the International Committee of the Red Cross, aid officials said, and one was a volunteer at the Red Cross's local affiliate, the Syrian Arab Red Crescent. Officials declined to give the victims' nationalities.Kidnapping is a growing problem in rebel-held areas of northern Syria, where there is infighting among rebel factions and where jihadist organizations hostile to Western aid groups and Syrian civil activists are on the rise, along with criminal gangs seeking to profit from ransom.The danger posed by both opposition and government forces, and the difficulty of coordinating cease-fires, has severely hampered international and local efforts to provide food and medical care to civilians. Though United Nations and Red Crescent convoys do reach many far-flung conflict zones across the country, some areas have remained under siege for months, including government-held parts of Aleppo and rebel-held Damascus suburbs like Moadhamiyeh.In a rare success, hundreds of women and children left Moadhamiyeh on Sunday, crossing into government-held territory and heading to shelters, according to the official Syrian news agency, SANA, and the Red Crescent. At least seven times in the past several months, the United Nations and the Red Crescent have received permission to enter the area, only to have it rescinded for what officials say are security reasons.Government opponents say the army's blockade of the area and its regular shellings and bombings are starving civilians, while Syrian officials say that armed groups, which they call terrorists, are holding civilians hostage.Khaled Erksoussi, the Red Crescent's operations director, said that 1,500 civilians were evacuated from Moadhamiyeh on Sunday, adding that they were "in a state of major fatigue and were very scared," according to Agence France-Presse. Red Crescent workers were unable to enter to treat the sick, who were not evacuated, Mr. Erksoussi said.Syria's social affairs minister, Kinda Shmat, said that 3,000 people had left the town as the government worked "to protect citizens from terrorists," according to SANA. The discrepancy between her and Mr. Erksoussi's figures was not immediately explained. Video of the event showed women, children and people on stretchers being greeted by soldiers and Ms. Shmat.Moadhamiyeh was one of the suburbs hit by a chemical weapons attack in August for which United States officials have blamed the Syrian government.On Sunday night, the state news media reported two explosions, said to be car bombs, outside the headquarters of Syrian state television in Damascus. The attack took place in Umayyad Square, a central traffic roundabout that is home to an opera house and a military headquarters and is blocks from the Four Seasons Hotel, where international chemical weapons inspectors are staying as they work to dismantle Syria's toxic arsenal.The explosions came a day after an insurgent shell killed an 8-year-old girl near a school in Damascus and several children were killed by government strikes in the suburbs of the capital. Violence also continued elsewhere, with fighting in the northern province of Aleppo and government troops attempting to push further into rebel-held areas south of Damascus after retaking two towns there on Friday.
The stock market seesawed on Tuesday as the on-again, off-again talk of a debt deal in Washington made investors wonder just how pessimistic they should be.Stocks were flat or down all day, but the size of the losses waxed and waned depending on which politician was giving a news conference. The market closed with its first loss in a week; the Dow Jones industrial average was down 133 points. Yields on short-term government debt climbed as investors worried about the possibility of a default if the debt ceiling is not raised.The stakes are high in Washington's fiscal showdown and the deadline for raising the nation's debt ceiling is getting nearer. Unless the borrowing limit is raised, the United States is expected to bump up against a deadline on Thursday after which it can no longer borrow money to pay its bills. The possibility of a government debt default has rattled the financial markets all month.After the markets closed, Fitch Ratings warned that it might downgrade the government's AAA bond rating. The agency said it saw a higher risk of default because of the uncertainty over whether Congress would raise the debt limit. Fitch said it would make a decision by the end of March at the latest, depending on how long any agreement to raise the debt ceiling lasts.The Dow Jones industrial average fell 133.25 points, or 0.9 percent, to close at 15,168.01. The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index slipped 12.08 points, or 0.7 percent, to 1,698.06. The Nasdaq composite index fell 21.26 points, or 0.6 percent, to 3,794.01.The losses were broad. All 10 industry groups in the S.& P. 500 fell and three stocks fell for every one that rose on the New York Stock Exchange.Uri Landesman, president of Platinum Partners, an investment management group in New York, said he thought that a deal would be reached on the debt ceiling, but that investors were making a mistake in focusing so heavily on it given the many other difficulties the economy faces. He said investors did not appreciate the risk in poor economic reports, slow profit growth and the possibility of flare-ups in conflicts with Iran and Syria, which could cause a spike in energy prices."There's a lot more risk to the downside," Mr. Landesman said. "I don't think things are that robust out there."Among the stocks on the move, FedEx rose $4.71, or 4 percent, to $120.08, after it said it would buy back about 10 percent of its shares.Charles Schwab rose $1.02, almost 5 percent, to $23.03 after the brokerage company said its quarterly profit rose 17 percent as trading and interest revenue increased.The Omnicom Group rose $1.01, or almost 2 percent, to $64.96, after the advertising company reported financial results that were higher than analysts expected.Parts of the bond market were showing signs of stress as the fiscal showdown continued in Washington. The price of the Treasury's 10-year note fell 10/32, to 98 2/32, while its yield rose to 2.73 percent, from 2.69 percent on Friday. Bond trading was closed on Monday for Columbus Day. Yields on three- and six-month Treasury bills also rose.The yield on the one-month Treasury bill doubled in only a few hours, going from 0.18 percent early Tuesday to 0.38 percent by the afternoon. This maturity is considered the one that would be most heavily affected by a government default. Money market funds owned by Fidelity and JPMorgan Chase have been selling their one-month Treasury holdings to limit their exposure to the security.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — It seemed promising until the shelling started: under a brief cease-fire, 200 civilians were preparing to evacuate on Wednesday from a rebel-held town near Damascus that the government has blockaded for months. Their flight was arranged in a small-scale local deal that some aid workers and others hoped could become a blueprint for building trust and, perhaps, helping to end the war.But as the townspeople were getting ready to cross to buses waiting at a government checkpoint, shells rained down from an army post. Army officers told witnesses that the rebels had fired first; the rebels denied it. Several civilians died, the rest were forced back, and the evacuation was off, at least for now.The local negotiations, featuring talks between fighters in the town, Moadhamiya, and a nun who ventured in to mediate, had borne some fruit. Despite deep resentments built up during months of conflict, hundreds of women, children and older people had managed to leave during two earlier cease-fires over the last weekend. But the shelling, and earlier problems in the evacuation process, demonstrated the limits of such an approach.Moadhamiya was sealed off nine months ago by the government's army, which residents and aid workers say has blockaded supplies of food and medicine. The wide-eyed, exhausted-looking people who left over the weekend brought new evidence of desperation in the town, where residents say that several people — children, the sick and the wounded — have died of malnutrition just miles from lavish Damascus restaurants. The government blames the rebel fighters, saying they are holding the civilians hostage.The situation in Moadhamiya, one of several towns hit in the August chemical attacks that killed hundreds, is perhaps the most dramatic of many similar crises across the country. Frustration has grown at the inability to get food and medical care to pockets of civilians in places from government-held Aleppo to the rebel-held suburbs of Damascus.The Syrian Arab Red Crescent has failed seven times to deliver aid to Moadhamiya, receiving permission to bring in United Nations convoys only to be stopped at government checkpoints. So the Red Crescent's operations director, Khaled Erksoussi, welcomed the evacuation deal — but said many more were needed, in places like neighboring Daraya and the old city of Homs. "If it's a working model, let's work it everywhere," he said.Inside Moadhamiya, people said time would tell if the deal had helped. After the first evacuations, Qusai Zakarya, a spokesman for the rebels, said it was worth a try. "We cannot trust Bashar al-Assad or his regime," he said over Skype from Moadhamiya on Tuesday. "On the other hand, we want to make any kind of way to get a safe passage, safe corridors for the civilians."But on Wednesday, after the shelling, his mood darkened. He said he suspected either that the government planned all along to claim, "We tried our best, but the terrorists in Moadhamiya fired on civilians," or that elements of the army broke the cease-fire because they disagreed with the plan. But the nun who helped arrange the cease-fire, Mother Agnes Mariam of the Cross, said in an interview that the rebels shot first.The efforts in Moadhamiya began with a leap of faith by both sides, when rebels allowed a delegation that included government officials and Mother Agnes to enter the town. Talks produced a deal to allow women, boys under 15 and men over 65 to leave with no questions asked.Some residents and fighters were suspicious of the delegation and made threats, but Mr. Zakarya praised the group for persevering, calling the nun — whom he knew by her given name, Fadia — "a brave woman" for coming to a place that the government had portrayed as full of Islamic extremists. But some wondered if they had been too trusting when they realized she was the same nun who drew attention recently for declaring that videos of the August chemical attacks had been fabricated.The deal turned out to be less than aid workers had hoped for. The government refused to allow Red Crescent workers into Moadhamiya to treat or evacuate the wounded and sick, and boys and men from 15 to 65 years old were allowed to leave only if they first "went somewhere" for security checks, Mr. Erksoussi said.It was an offer almost no one chose to test, since they suspected that the checks could turn into indefinite detention.On the way to a shelter in the government-held suburb of Qudsaya, eight teenage boys were detained for several hours at a checkpoint by suspicious security officials. They were released after the Red Crescent told officials such detentions undermined its credibility, Mr. Erksoussi said.Most of the weekend evacuees had been taken to a state-run shelter where they departed within a short time — unimpeded by officials — to fend for themselves or stay with families.Residents said that 10 young boys had disappeared while playing near the shelter and that only four had returned, saying security forces had interrogated them about antigovernment activists and fighters. That report could not be independently confirmed. On Monday, further evacuations were postponed by the government, aid workers said. On Tuesday, the military attacked the town with warplanes in a heavy bombardment of Damascus suburbs during a major Muslim holiday, Id al-Adha. Rebels also attacked civilians in the capital.But Mr. Zakarya and Mother Agnes remained in contact, trying to figure out how to proceed with more evacuations. Fighters were "in a very aggressive mood," Mr. Zakarya said. "We kept pressure on them not to fire back." Mother Agnes said, "They are good people."
WASHINGTON — Months before a chemical weapons attack killed hundreds of Syrians and prompted threats of an American military strike, an anesthesiologist named Majid heard an explosion near his home in a Damascus suburb. He rushed to the makeshift hospital where he works and found patients with itching skin, burning eyes and shortness of breath .Majid, who gave only his first name to protect his safety, collected hair and urine samples, clothing, tree leaves, soil and even a dead bird. He shared it with the Syrian American Medical Society, a humanitarian group that had been delivering such samples to American intelligence officials, as proof of possible chemical attacks."We kept communicating with the State Department about what is next — they told us that these are limited attacks," said the society's president, Dr. Zaher Sahloul, adding that he had spoken with Robert S. Ford, the American ambassador to Syria, and Samantha Power, then a White House aide and now the United Nations envoy. "It was very important for us to get this information out, but it took time to gain traction, and for the world to react."Now the world has reacted. United Nations inspectors have taken the first steps to destroy Syria's chemical stockpile. But while the Obama administration claims credit for pushing President Bashar al-Assad into giving up the arsenal, some experts say the real credit lies with the doctors who risked their lives — and confronted thorny questions of medical ethics — to bring to light the use of chemical weapons.Syria's civil war has been especially dangerous for health professionals; a United Nations report issued last month described the "deliberate targeting of hospitals, medical personnel and transports" as "one of the most alarming features of the Syrian conflict." By varying estimates, more than 100 doctors have been killed and as many as 600 have been imprisoned.The country's once-functioning health system is in a shambles. More than half of its public hospitals have been damaged in the two-year-old civil war and 37 percent are out of service entirely, according to a recent report by the World Health Organization. Many Syrian doctors have fled; those who remain describe dire conditions where even the most basic care is not available.Mothers are desperate to have their children vaccinated; patients with chronic conditions like heart disease and diabetes struggle to get medicine; and there is "huge anxiety in the population," said Dr. Adi Nadimpalli, a 38-year-old New Orleans pediatrician and internist who runs two hospitals in northern Syria for the humanitarian group Doctors Without Borders.Working among conflicting rebel factions has proved a delicate task. Dr. Nadimpalli cut a deal with the fighters: "They check their guns at the door."Chemical warfare — which appeared to begin with small-scale attacks this year and culminated in the sarin gas attack in August that killed hundreds of Syrians — made that difficult situation even more complex, posing ethical questions about whether, and how, to speak up.Doctors Without Borders, also known as M.S.F. for its French name, Médecins Sans Frontières, is operating six makeshift hospitals in the rebel-controlled north, without permission from the Assad government. In January, it also began secretly providing technical advice, medical equipment and drugs — including atropine, an antidote to nerve agents — to hospitals and clinics in regions controlled by the government.On Aug. 21, the group got word from some of its "silent partner" hospitals of a flood of patients with "neurotoxic symptoms" — roughly 3,600 in a period of three hours, including 355 who died. Within days, its leaders had convened a conference call to debate how to handle the sensitive information, said Sophie Delaunay, the executive director of Doctors Without Borders' United States operations.Any public statement, she and her colleagues knew, could put the group's doctors and their Syrian partners at risk, exposing them to accusations of siding with rebels and leaving them vulnerable to retaliation from government forces. And they feared that Western governments, including the Obama administration, could use their words as grounds for a military strike.The group issued a public statement nonetheless; the information, Ms. Delaunay said, was "too big" and "too credible" to be withheld. The carefully worded release asked for an independent investigation, saying Doctors Without Borders could "neither scientifically confirm the cause of these symptoms nor establish who is responsible for the attack."Soon, though, Secretary of State John F. Kerry and Jay Carney, the White House press secretary, began citing Doctors Without Borders' findings as justification for military intervention, just as the group had feared. It followed with a second statement, cautioning again that its information "could not be used as evidence" to assign blame.A State Department official, speaking anonymously to discuss internal decision making, said that American officials had been gathering intelligence on chemical weapons, and that the work of doctors and humanitarian groups provided "just another indicator."But J. Stephen Morrison, a global health expert at the Center for Strategic and International Studies in Washington, said Ms. Delaunay and her colleagues "deserve an enormous amount of credit" for forcing the issue onto the international agenda. "They moved the global discussion forward," he said. "It was very risky, and a tough call, and things could have gotten ugly for them."
DAMASCUS, Syria — Some five million Syrians are now refugees in their own country, many living hand-to-mouth in vacant buildings, schools, mosques, parks and the cramped homes of relatives. Others are trapped in neighborhoods isolated by military blockades, beyond the reach of aid groups. Already desperately short of food and medicine as winter closes in, they could begin to succumb in greater numbers to hunger and exposure, aid workers say.The long civil war has forced two million Syrians outside the country's borders, but more than twice that number face mounting privations at home, and the toll keeps rising. The deepening humanitarian crisis threatens to set the country's development back decades and dwarfs any aid effort that could conceivably be carried out while the conflict continues, aid workers and analysts say.The cost of replacing damaged homes and infrastructure alone is estimated at more than $30 billion, and the ruin mounts daily. More than half of the country's hospitals are destroyed or closed, and according to Save the Children a fifth of Syrian families go without food one week a month. Syria's economy has shrunk by half.Even in relatively safe areas, a closer look at bustling streets reveals the displaced spilling from every corner. Thousands of people live in the gyms and hallways of a sports complex turned state-run shelter in the coastal city of Latakia. In the capital, Damascus, newcomers crowd ramshackle hotels, half-finished buildings, offices and storefronts. Long lines form outside the shrinking number of government bakeries still operating. In some of the suburbs, people have confessed to eating dogs and cats, and imams have even issued decrees saying it is religiously permissible.Outside the Umayyad Mosque in the heart of old Damascus, Nasreen, 25, cradled her baby in her lap one recent evening. She and her siblings, husband and parents, who declined to give their family name for fear of reprisals, were cramped into a single room nearby, having fled the suburb of Daraya after their home was damaged.With rising rent depleting their savings, and the shop they relied on for income now sealed off behind a government blockade, they accept occasional handouts from neighborhood organizations. But what weighs on them most are thoughts of the future: They said they could not imagine when or how they might return to a hometown where entire blocks have been bombed to rubble."We have only God," she said.Even those still in their homes are increasingly suffering as inflation soars and food shortages grow, especially in areas blockaded by the government or rebels. Many are angry and mystified that more help has not reached them from the outside world."It is as if we are living on Jupiter or Mars," said Qusai Zakarya, a spokesman for an opposition council in Moadhamiya, south of Damascus, where the government has not allowed aid convoys to enter for nine months. "Everyone is looking at us from the window and we are in a separate world. Everyone left us alone, every single person on this planet."In a news conference in Kuwait on Thursday, the Turkish foreign minister, Ahmet Davutoglu, said that Turkey, which has absorbed 600,000 Syrian refugees, would keep its border with Syria open, but he also expressed his "deep disappointment and frustration because of the absence of a proper reaction by the international community" to the humanitarian crisis.A $1.5 billion international aid effort, carried out under dangerous and politically charged conditions by the United Nations, the Syrian Arab Red Crescent and smaller local organizations, provides stopgap food, schooling and medicine to millions of people. But it is underfinanced, covers just a fraction of the needs, fails to reach people in blockaded areas and does not begin to address the collapse of Syria's health, education and economic infrastructure and its devastating implications for the country's future, aid officials in Syria and across the region say."If we continue to deal with this crisis as a short-term disaster instead of a long-term effort, the region will face even more severe consequences," Neal Keny-Guyer, the chief executive of Mercy Corps, wrote recently, calling for increased American financing and a new focus on longer-term development projects, like repairing water infrastructure.Some go further, saying that the only meaningful humanitarian action now is to end the fighting.
WASHINGTON — When Prime Minister Nuri Kamal al-Maliki of Iraq last visited the White House, he and his host painted a glowing picture of the situation in Iraq after the withdrawal of American forces."The prime minister leads Iraq's most inclusive government yet," President Obama said in a joint news conference with Mr. Maliki in December 2011. "Violence remains at record lows."Nearly two years later, however, many of the political and security gains that Mr. Obama acclaimed have been reversed. Bombings in Iraq have drastically increased. Al Qaeda in Iraq has been rejuvenated, and the terrorist group in Iraq has expanded into Syria to fuel the civil war there.As Mr. Maliki prepares to meet with Mr. Obama on Friday he is appealing for military aid — Apache helicopter gunships, more American intelligence and other forms of counterterrorism support like reconnaissance drones that would be operated by Americans.And to win over a Congress and an American public reluctant to revisit the past in Iraq, he is being helped by a prominent Washington lobbying firm: the Podesta Group, which the Iraqi government is paying $960,000 a year. An Iraqi embassy official said that the group has provided advice on how to get Iraq's message across to American lawmakers as well as "feedback" on a recent Op-Ed article Mr. Maliki wrote for The New York Times.In their public comments, Mr. Maliki and senior American officials have portrayed Iraq largely as a victim of circumstances — mainly the disorder that is spilling over from neighboring Syria. To be sure, many jihadists who have come to Syria to wage war against the government of President Bashar al-Assad have been repurposed by Al Qaeda's regional affiliates to serve as suicide bombers in Iraq. But experts say that ambivalent policies in Washington and Baghdad have also contributed to the rapidly deteriorating security situation.Until now, Mr. Maliki was reluctant to openly ask for United States support. A former American official said that in 2012 Mr. Maliki was on the verge of asking the United States to fly reconnaissance drones over Iraq to help pinpoint the growing terrorist threat but backed off at the last moment when the request became public.Mr. Maliki's reluctance to share power with a Sunni minority and his authoritarian bent, critics say, have also made fertile ground for Al Qaeda's appeals."He has not done enough to rein in efforts by other Shiite politicians and by certain state organs to freeze out many Sunnis," said James Jeffrey, a former American ambassador to Iraq in the Obama administration.Another factor, according to a classified C.I.A. analysis, is corruption with Iraq's security forces and Justice Ministry. That has helped Qaeda operatives bribe their way their checkpoints and carry out prison breaks.But the Obama administration's ambivalence about being drawn deeply into Iraq's affairs has also been a factor, experts say. Administration officials insist that the State and Defense Departments as well as Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr., who is Mr. Obama's point man on Iraq, have not lost their focus on the country. But some former officials said the administration's involvement has been episodic at best."We just haven't been engaged with Iraq at a high level," said Ryan C. Crocker, the former American ambassador to Iraq from March 2007 to February 2009. "Kerry made the one visit, and that was the first secretary of state visit in four years and there hasn't been another one."Since the withdrawal of American forces, the United States Embassy in Baghdad has maintained an office of security cooperation, which has had the mission of facilitating arms sales and, significantly, mentoring Iraqi officers. But under budgetary pressure, it is shrinking its staff size to 59 by fiscal year 2015 from its original 260.A September report by the Defense Department's inspector general said the office has been plagued by disagreements between the State and Defense Departments on its mission and questioned whether security cooperation could be adequately carried out with a staff of 59.Michael Knights, a fellow at the Washington Institute for Near East Policy who recently returned from a trip to Iraq, said security there had seriously deteriorated. In 2010, he said, there was a multicity synchronized bombing attack about every four months; now, he said one occurs about every 10 days.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Syria's ability to produce chemical weapons has been destroyed and its remaining toxic armaments secured, weapons inspectors said Thursday, as President Bashar al-Assad has offered unexpectedly robust cooperation, at least so far, with a Russian-United States accord to dismantle his arsenal.Elimination of Mr. Assad's manufacturing ability is the most significant milestone yet in a process that still faces a monumental task: destroying the government's 1,290 tons of declared chemical weapons in the midst of a bloody civil war that has killed well over 100,000 people and carved up control of the country.Weapons inspectors who have been in the country just one month say that despite battles raging across the country, deep international disagreement over how to stop the war and even what United States officials say was an Israeli strike on a Syrian Army base late Wednesday night, Syria has so far met all of its commitments and deadlines.By doing so, Mr. Assad's government can claim success in what it said would be a key benefit of the accord — seizing a new measure of credibility and portraying itself not as an outlaw regime but as a reliable and legitimate international player. But opponents of Mr. Assad, including the rebels, are deeply critical of the deal for that very reason — it has helped buttress his position but done nothing to stop the war."They want to tell you, 'It's not because you put a deadline — when we say something, we do it before the time,' " a pro-government Syrian journalist, speaking on the condition of anonymity for fear of reprisal, said of Syrian officials. "The main problem with the West, until now it never understood how the Syrian regime works. Whenever you threaten them you won't get anything."Mr. Assad's opponents have bitterly denounced the accord as a distraction, and they were dismayed that the chemical weapons attack in August that American officials say killed 1,400 men, women and children near Damascus led not to American military intervention, as President Obama initially threatened, but to an agreement that allows Mr. Assad's supporters to portray him as a statesman.The deal also created a de facto expectation that Mr. Assad would remain in office at least until mid-2014, when the elimination of the weapons is supposed to be complete under the agreement, critics say. And Syrians — supporters and opponents of the government alike — widely considered chemical weapons a side issue that global leaders were focusing on, rather than finding ways to end the war and its humanitarian disaster.The government's international opponents emphasized on Thursday that the deal was still incomplete and that they still hold Mr. Assad accountable for the suffering of Syrians. The British Foreign Office said in a statement that while the destruction of chemical facilities was "an important first milestone, it brings no relief to the Syrian people," since the government continues to use artillery, air power and "siege tactics" against civilians.In a statement on Thursday, the international chemical weapons watchdog group, the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons, said Syria had disabled all of the chemical weapons production and mixing facilities it declared to inspectors, rendering them inoperable, ahead of the deadline of Friday.The organization said that its inspectors and United Nations officials had visited 39 of the 41 facilities at 21 of the 23 sites that Syria had declared to them. While the two remaining sites — where chemical weapons are developed, stored and tested — were too hazardous to visit because of fighting, chemical-making equipment had been moved to other sites that the inspectors could visit, the statement said."The joint mission is now satisfied that it has verified — and seen destroyed — all of Syria's declared critical production and mixing/filling equipment," the weapons organization's statement said. "Given the progress made, no further inspection activities are currently planned."
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Rana Obaid began her life less than two years ago in a comfortable house draped with roses, the daughter of a grocer locally famous for his rich homemade yogurt. But war and siege brought hunger so quickly to their town near Damascus that when she died in September, at 19 months, her arms and legs were as thin as broomsticks.In a nearby town, a woman with a son suffering from kidney failure makes her children take turns eating on alternate days. In a village outside Aleppo in northern Syria, people say they are living mainly on wild greens.Aid workers say that Syrian refugee children are arriving in northern Lebanon thin and stunted, and that suspected malnutrition cases are surfacing from rebel-held areas in northern Syria to government-held suburbs south of Damascus.Across Syria, a country that long prided itself on providing affordable food to its people, international and domestic efforts to ensure basic sustenance amid the chaos of war appear to be failing. Millions are going hungry to varying degrees, and there is growing evidence that acute malnutrition is contributing to relatively small but increasing numbers of deaths, especially among small children, the wounded and the sick, aid workers and nutrition experts say. The experts warn that if the crisis continues into the winter, deaths from hunger and illness could begin to dwarf deaths from violence, which has already killed well over 100,000 people, and if the deprivation lasts longer, a generation of Syrians risks stunted development."I didn't expect to see that in Syria," said Dr. Annie Sparrow, an assistant professor and pediatrician at Mount Sinai Hospital in New York, who examined Syrian refugee children in Lebanon and was shocked to find many underweight for their height and age."It's not accurate to say this is Somalia, but this is a critical situation," she said. "We have a middle-income country that is transforming itself into something a lot more like Somalia."While the war has prevented a precise accounting of the number of people affected, evidence of hunger abounds. The government is using siege and starvation as a tactic of war in many areas, according to numerous aid workers and residents, who say that soldiers at checkpoints confiscate food supplies as small as grocery bags, treating the feeding of people in strategic rebel-held areas as a crime. Rebel groups, too, are blockading some government-held areas and harassing food convoys.But even for those living in more accessible areas, what aid workers call "food insecurity" is part of Syrians' new baseline. Inflation has made food unaffordable for many; fuel and flour shortages close some bakeries, while government airstrikes target others; agricultural production has been gutted. Though the World Food Program says it is providing enough food for three million Syrians each month, its officials say they can track only what is delivered to central depots in various cities, not how widely or fairly it is distributed from there.One aid worker — who, in a sign of the political challenges of delivering aid in Syria, asked that his organization not be identified — said he recently met Syrian health workers who reported a dozen cases of apparent malnutrition in a government-held Damascus suburb. He suspected that the situation could be far worse in rebel-held areas.Lack of medical care and clean water exacerbates the problem. So does the fact that Syrians have little experience diagnosing or treating malnutrition. Particularly troubling, aid workers say, are reports of mothers who stop breast feeding, unaware that it is the best way for even a malnourished mother to keep her child alive.Some aid groups are trying to train Syrian doctors to use simple tools that measure upper arm circumference to assess malnutrition, as convincing data on its prevalence could help spur a stronger international response. Aid workers caution against overblown claims that could discredit such efforts. Some government supporters even dismissed the images of bone-thin children from blockaded areas as propaganda after several thousand civilians were evacuated from the encircled Damascus suburb of Moadhamiya in recent weeks, looking exhausted, shellshocked and thin, but not on the verge of starving to death.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Syrian rebels recaptured a base near the international airport in the northern city of Aleppo in a counteroffensive hours after the Syrian Army had advanced into the area, activists said on Saturday.The rebels were able to recapture the military base of Brigade 80 after government troops seized parts of it early Friday, according to the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an antigovernment monitoring group based in Britain, and the Aleppo Media Center, another rebel group. The observatory said 40 rebels and more than 20 government troops were killed in the latest fighting, which began Friday and continued early Saturday.The main job of Brigade 80 was to protect the government-held Aleppo International Airport, which has been closed because of fighting for almost a year.Syria's state-run news agency, SANA, said a rocket fired by opposition fighters struck near a health center in Aleppo's Ashrafieh neighborhood, killing six children and wounding six.
It was a deadly case of mistaken identity set against the chaotic, sectarian backdrop of the Syrian conflict.Jihadists from the Islamic State in Iraq and Syria, a rebel group linked to Al Qaeda, discovered a man named Mohamed Fares Marroush in a hospital after a battle this week near Aleppo, in northern Syria. He was badly wounded and under anesthesia, muttering the names of Shiite religious figures, according to a group that monitors the Syrian war and a spokesman for the Islamic State in Iraq and Syria, Omar al-Qahtani.To the jihadists who found him, his half-conscious mumblings marked him as both an apostate and an enemy combatant, and when a hospital aide told them that he believed Mr. Marroush to be a Shiite, they promptly killed him, according to an account of the episode posted to Twitter by Mr. Qahtani.But Mr. Marroush's killers did not stop there. On Wednesday, the same day he is believed to have been killed, the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an opposition group that is based in Britain and draws information from activists in Syria, posted a graphic video to YouTube that showed two jihadists holding aloft Mr. Marroush's severed head and warning a crowd about the danger posed by Shiites."If they come here, they won't differentiate between opposition and government supporters," said one jihadist in the video, while the other held Mr. Marroush's head in one hand and a knife in the other. "They will come and rape the men before the women, that's what these infidels will do. They will rape the men before the women. God make us victorious over them!"But if their goal was to make a gruesome example of Shiites and government supporters, there was just one problem: Mr. Marroush was neither.Mr. Marroush was a rebel fighter with Ahrar al-Sham, an Islamist group allied with the Islamic State in Iraq and Syria, and he appeared to be an enthusiastic supporter of the call to holy war in Syria. In an undated video, he can be seen leading a group of men in chants of, "Our path is jihad!"It is not clear why, in his injured state, he might have muttered Shiite religious invocations.Mr. Qahtani, the spokesman, described Mr. Marroush as "our brother" when he recounted the circumstances of his death on Twitter on Wednesday, but also recounted a religious parable from early Islamic history to urge forgiveness for the killers.Ahrar al-Sham, however, reacted to the death of Mr. Marroush with outrage, and on Thursday released a wanted poster for the two men who appear in the video. The group has said the men will face a trial in a Shariah court.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Refugees poured into Arsal, a Lebanese town in the Bekaa Valley near Syria , on Saturday amid reports that a battle was beginning along the mountainous border, a sign that the government was broadening its offensive against rebel strongholds.Heavy clashes were reported along the main highway from Damascus to Homs between the towns of Nabak and Qara, a corridor that is vital to both sides. It serves as a conduit for rebel fighters and arms from Lebanon and links Damascus to solidly government-held territory to the north along the Syrian coast.Fighting in the area, known as Qalamoun, has long been expected, since the government took Qusayr, another border town, in May. There were indications that government forces and their allies from the Lebanese militia Hezbollah were massing in the area, as were rebels from the Nusra Front and other groups, according to the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, an antigovernment monitoring organization in Britain that tracks the violence in Syria.The fighting threatens an area that until now had enjoyed a measure of autonomy under local rebels and opposition activists. In the town of Yabroud, people of various sects and political views were living together, residents say. The area was also a haven for refugees from Qusayr.An informal local agreement had persisted for months, overseen by an officer in the Republican Guards, an elite military unit, who accepted money to keep the situation quiet, residents said, but he was recently replaced by a more hard-line officer."A week ago, top figures from Qara visited him, trying to convince him not to bomb Qara, but he refused," said a man who gave his name as Abu Said. He is a refugee from Qusayr who fled to Arsal a few months ago and has relatives in Qara.He said in a telephone interview that hundreds of new arrivals were straining the resources of Arsal, which has already absorbed thousands of Syrian refugees and become a hub for rebels near the porous border."We don't have enough space," he said. "They're hosted by people who are refugees themselves."He said dozens were waiting to register with local authorities outside the municipal building, where a tent had been erected to shelter them from a chilly rain. Many were sleeping in mosques or in the streets, Abu Said added.Lebanon, a country of four million people, is already struggling to absorb about a million Syrian refugees. Tensions have run high in the Bekaa Valley for months. Last week, Syrian forces bombarded Arsal, and rockets were fired at areas believed to be Hezbollah strongholds; residents blamed rebels.Government forces have pushed into rebel-held areas on the outskirts of Damascus and Aleppo, Syria's largest cities, in recent days.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Syrian government forces have recently ousted rebels from a string of suburbs outside Damascus, threatening their yearlong control of territory south of the capital city, cutting supply lines and surrounding strongholds that one fighter called their "last castle" in the area.Around the northern city of Aleppo, rebels are also newly on the defensive. They are demanding that all fighters mobilize against a government offensive or face consequences in Islamic courts.These recent battlefield successes — allowing the government to threaten rebel strongholds in and around Syria's two main cities — prompted Syria's prime minister, Wael al-Halqi, to declare on Thursday that the government was heading for an "astounding victory," just as President Bashar al-Assad prepares for peace talks that the United States and Russia hope to convene by year's end.Yet early declarations of victory may be premature, as has been the case many times with both sides in this two-and-a-half-year-old civil war.Still, Mr. Assad has made gains, and the momentum has tipped, at least for now, in his direction even while the nation remains badly fractured. He has kept rebels from advancing into a partially encircled Damascus and has now retaken crucial suburbs that rebels relied on to keep pressure on the capital. He forestalled a United States attack with a chemical weapons deal that solidified his global position. And the rise of extremist Islamists among the rebels has kept the West at bay and demoralized supporters of the rebellion.The coming weeks will show whether the government can make lasting gains and move battle lines that have shifted only marginally in the past year. Until recently, escalating tactics have yielded little but mounting civilian suffering, with neither side advancing even as the government was accused of using siege and starvation as well as chemical and incendiary weapons, and rebels shelled civilian areas to chip away at the comfort zone inside central Damascus.In recent days, rebels say, the government has come close to encircling rebels in the southern suburb of Hajar al-Aswad and neighboring Yarmouk Camp, a district once home to both Syrians and Palestinian refugees that has been a battle zone for more than a year and is now fiercely contested by pro- and antigovernment Palestinian fighters.But just one neighborhood away, in Tadamon, on the southern edge of Damascus, pro-government militias remain dug in, facing rebels along long-static front lines. On a recent visit, officers there — surveying deserted, rubble-strewn streets as rebel automatic rifle fire smacked into nearby buildings — said it took them weeks last November to push invading rebels back just a few hundred yards in fighting that shattered blocks of apartment houses.They said they viewed the opposing fighters as their equals in skill and equipment, and that they had no plans to try to advance, to avoid military and civilian casualties that would further stress hospitals and fighters already stretching their capacity."We don't need more mortars or injuries," said an officer who asked to be identified as Abu Salim. He said his mission was simply not to let the enemy advance, "whatever it costs."Pro-government militias like his have been left to guard such areas while better trained and equipped army units fight more crucial battles, sometimes alongside the Lebanese Shiite group Hezbollah and Iraqi Shiite militias, whose fighters have long been gathered around Sayeda Zeinab, home to a revered Shiite shrine southeast of Damascus.Part of the failure of Syrian forces to capitalize fully on their gains, according to government fighters and supporters, stems from conflicting strategies within the government. Some officials are trying to moderate the fighting and seek local cease-fires, especially after the threat of an American strike and the government's effort to portray itself as seeking peace on the international stage. Others are advocating a more aggressive strategy.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — At least 31 Syrian troops, including four senior officers, were killed on Sunday in a bombing that collapsed a building on a government military base just north of Damascus, the Syrian capital, an antigovernment monitoring group said. It was one of the deadliest attacks on government soldiers in recent months.The deaths came as a government offensive against rebels continued on three fronts: in the outskirts of Damascus, in the south; outside Aleppo, in the north; and in the Qalamoun mountain region bordering Lebanon, in western Syria.The explosion, at the army's transport base in the contested suburb of Harasta, appeared to have been set off by a device placed inside the building or in a tunnel, according to the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a Britain-based group that tracks the violence in Syria. The blast caused the building to collapse, the group said. There was no immediate confirmation of the attack from the state media, although SANA, the government news agency, reported that mortar shells fired by the rebels killed eight civilians in Damascus on Sunday.The timing of the bombing on the army base suggested that rebels fighting to oust President Bashar al-Assad were trying to blunt, at least psychologically, recent government advances that have allowed troops to threaten long-held rebel territory around the country's two largest cities, Aleppo and Damascus.Fighting continued in the border area of Qalamoun, where a battle has been expected since government troops pushed rebels from the nearby town of Qusayr in May, but there were widely varying estimates of the effect on civilians.At least 1,000 Syrians have crossed into Lebanon since the fighting erupted Friday, according to the United Nations refugee agency, though many have probably not registered as refugees yet. But the former mayor of the Lebanese border town of Aarsal told reporters that 10,000 had sought refuge.This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: An article on Monday about a bombing on a military base north of Damascus, Syria, that killed 31 soldiers, according to an antigovernment monitoring group, paraphrased incorrectly from a comment about the number of Syrian refugees said to have crossed into the Lebanese border town of Aarsal to escape fighting between rebels and the government. The former mayor of the town told reporters that 10,000 Syrians had sought refuge, not "tens of thousands."
BEIRUT, Lebanon — He was a Syrian rebel commander who led homegrown fighters like himself and had a prescient view of the conflict: a Syrian insurgency with nowhere else to turn, he said nearly a year ago, would tilt toward foreign fighters and Al Qaeda.By the time a government airstrike caught him in northern Syria last week, even some of his most fervent admirers believed he had become, in some ways, part of that tilt.The commander, Abdulkader al-Saleh, 33, was a recognized and accessible leader in a fragmented insurgency that has few. He managed to gather ragtag local militias into the Tawhid Brigades, for a time one of the most organized and effective rebel battle groups, and to bridge the gap between relatively secular army defectors and Islamist fighters.But when he died Thursday of wounds from an airstrike in Aleppo, he and Tawhid were months into a slow decline from the peak of their influence. The extremist Islamic State in Iraq and Syria had edged out Tawhid as the pace-setting group policing the northern province. And as that group's foreign fighters stepped up kidnappings, public executions and attacks on Tawhid and its rebel allies, Mr. Saleh disappointed some of his comrades by remaining largely silent, trying to mediate the disputes rather than fighting to prevent the atrocities and infighting that have gutted the revolt from within.Mr. Saleh's story, much like that of the movement for which he left his life as a seed trader and father of five, unfolded as one of optimism and possibility diverted by war's disappointments and, it seemed, its moral exigencies and dark alliances.As foreign fighters and money from extremist Islamists poured into Syria, he seemed to decide that was the direction the war was going and to coast with it. He spoke often, in meetings over the past year with New York Times reporters who also spent time with Tawhid, of Syrian hospitality and a commitment to an open, pluralistic Syria. But he ultimately made accommodations with ISIS that, to some of his allies, were at best disappointing and at worst ugly.Though he had welcomed journalists and aid workers, when Islamist groups began kidnapping them, even holding hostages at a compound he shared with ISIS in Aleppo, he made no public moves to stop it. He aligned openly with the Nusra Front, a Qaeda-linked group, even as he maintained ties with the Western-backed Free Syrian Army, saying he was a moderate Islamist and a pragmatist.And he did not act to stop ISIS from driving his Free Syrian Army allies, the North Storm brigade, from the crucial border town of Azaz in September — an example of the infighting that has helped recent government advances in Aleppo.A commander in North Storm said in a telephone interview on Monday that although Mr. Saleh mediated between rebel factions, "had he used his power, position and character in the Azaz incident, things now would have been otherwise."The commander spoke on condition of anonymity because of the sensitivity of criticizing Mr. Saleh, whom he called a "great man," so soon after his death.Another North Storm leader said that Tawhid lost five fighters in clashes with ISIS — something Tawhid denies — and that Mr. Saleh stood by and then tried to broker an end to the fight. The leader said Mr. Saleh had explained that a tough stand against ISIS could have endangered Tawhid fighters in ISIS-run areas.Even so, fighters and government opponents across Syria, those with Islamist and secular views alike, mourned Mr. Saleh on Monday, when Tawhid announced that he had died in a Turkish hospital. It had been concealed, fighters said, to allow his safe burial in his hometown Marea and to preserve morale."How are we going to make it to Damascus without you?" a resident of the northern province of Idlib, identifying himself as Najd, wrote on Facebook.Mohammed al-Hadi, an antigovernment activist, said he was incredulous that Tawhid leaders had met in a place that was a clear target, an infantry school held by rebels near the front lines. "It is an error by Tawhid," he said in a Skype interview, adding that he feared that with the commander's death whatever cooperation remained between Islamist and secular rebels would disintegrate.The lanky Mr. Saleh, often wearing Polo shirts and an infectious smile, was a chatty fixture on the front lines, unfazed by gunfire. He survived a would-be assassin's bullet and joked about a rumored $200,000 price on his head. He said he participated in peaceful protests against President Bashar al-Assad and turned to arms after the government crackdown, as Tawhid grew to claim 10,000 fighters and replace its slingshots and hunting rifles with automatic weapons and tanks.Tawhid spearheaded the rebel invasion of Aleppo in 2012, widely seen as a mistake and a blow to popular support because it forced the city into battles that destroyed many revered historical sites.Times journalists witnessed Tawhid fighters using a prisoner as an unwitting suicide bomber. The group's fighters were accused of looting and of executing prisoners, though, by the dismal standards that came to prevail, they remained more respected than many other groups.Mr. Saleh used to stress that he fought for all Syrians and would not harm minorities. But days before his death, he told his men they were fighting "for the Sunnis.""All the ummah abandoned us," he said, referring to Muslims worldwide. "Depend not on weapons but on God." He closed, presciently, with a warning not to gather in large groups. "Beware of that," he said.
HACIPASA, Turkey — At an unmarked border crossing here in this village in southwestern Turkey, soldiers were interrogating four Syrian men trying to walk into this country one recent morning. Three, after a few animated minutes, were let in.Walking down a dirt road with wide grins, the three men explained that the fourth, a relative who was a serious collector of pigeons, like many Syrian men, had refused to abandon his birds at the border."He loves his pigeons," said Ahmed Ahvani, 33, who had fled to Turkey months earlier but returned to his hometown, Jisr al-Shughour, a place of heaving shelling about 25 miles from here, to bring in two cousins.The pigeons, Mr. Ahvani said, were not for sale. "He's had them for 15 years," he said. "The soldiers told him he couldn't bring any animals into Turkey. So he said he'll go back to Syria. He's 40, and he's raised pigeons since he was 3 years old."One of the cousins, Ibrahim Annus, 20, said, "Ask him to pick between his wife and his pigeons — he'll pick the pigeons for sure."The men laughed out loud. Their relative, they were sure, would slip into Turkey at another spot.Syria's pigeon collectors, hamemati as they are known back home, are among the most ardent in the Arab world. They do not breed or race them. They will trade and sell them, but mostly they just keep them as treasured pets. So it comes as little surprise that some have gone to great lengths to pursue their hobby in exile, especially since no one expects Syria's two-and-a-half-year civil war to end anytime soon.A coop atop a trailer in a refugee camp; a flock of pigeons circling above a building in a neighborhood with Syrian newcomers. These are the telltale signs of the hamemati in Turkey, Lebanon and Jordan, the nations with the most Syrian refugees. Even if the collectors have not managed to resume their hobby yet, any Syrian will immediately identify the local hamemati, who often gather together and endlessly swap pigeon stories.Like most Syrian refugees, the hamemati tend to oppose President Bashar al-Assad. But some express a more visceral opposition to the Syrian government, adding pigeons to the long list of losses they say they have suffered at the hands of Mr. Assad and his forces."They shoot both pigeons and people for fun," said Yasseen Taha Atra, 29, a refugee in Wadi Khalid, in northern Lebanon. "I hate Bashar so much."In Ar Rastan, in northern Syria, Mr. Atra, a hamemati since the age of 9, said he had amassed about 100 pigeons before the war. But because his home was near a military base, his pigeons became the targets of government snipers. He would find his pigeons, one after the other, dead on his roof or on the surrounding streets. By the time he left Syria for Lebanon a year ago with his wife and two children, only 20 pigeons were left. He set them free.His only consolation is that the relatives he is now staying with in Lebanon are also pigeon collectors. "But nothing, of course, can replace my own pigeons in Syria," Mr. Atra said, his wife standing next to him with the hint of an indulgent smile.One of his Lebanese relatives, Khaled al-Sarhan, 28, said he understood the pain of the pigeonless hamemati."If I don't see my pigeons every day, I can't sleep," he said.Mr. Sarhan's pigeons were drawing hamemati refugees like Khaled al-Wahibi, 41, who said he had collected pigeons for three decades in Baba Amr, a neighborhood of heavy fighting in the city of Homs. After soldiers destroyed his home last year, he released his surviving pigeons and fled with his family to Lebanon."I miss my pigeons like they were my sons," said Mr. Wahibi, who found solace in visiting Mr. Sarhan's pigeons.He had not considered bringing his pigeons with him from Homs, he said, because some would inevitably fly back to Homs, as all hamemati train their birds to return home.In fact, many hamemati make tidy profits by selling their pigeons at markets in other cities, knowing that many would fly to their original owner's roof. Other strategies involve trying to lure away another hamemati's pigeons with food or female pigeons. With hamemati often quarreling over the ownership of a prized bird, they are often regarded askance by the non-hamemati. A popular belief in Syria holds that the hamemati are not actually interested in pigeons at all, but like to stand on rooftops to peek into women's bedrooms.In the past, a hamemati was considered so untrustworthy that his testimony was not accepted in certain courts in Syria.Mr. Wahibi waved away the hamemati's poor image, adding, "There's nothing that money can't take care of in court."At a refugee camp in Kilis, Turkey, Abdullah al-Noeimi, 30, had fashioned a pigeon coop on top of his trailer. He had lost all of his pigeons in his home in Latakia in Syria, saying only, "The regime took my pigeons."After climbing up a rickety ladder that he had made, Mr. Noeimi released some 25 pigeons from their cage. The birds flew above his corner of the camp, and all came back. He had bought the pigeons in Kilis, he explained, so they would not fly far away.In Hacipasa, just as the three men had predicted, their relative, Mohammed Emir, had found another way into Turkey. He appeared in the middle of the village less than half an hour later, carrying a large white box containing eight pigeons. He was slightly breathless and on edge from the adrenaline of his border detour. He lit a cigarette.Relaxing, he said he had fled to Turkey months ago, entrusting the birds to a neighbor in Jisr al-Shughour, also his hometown. But seeing no end to the war, he had gone back home, despite the shelling, to retrieve his flock.Glancing at his relatives, he said: "They're exaggerating. Of course, I would pick my wife. She is, after all, the mother of my children."Inside the courtyard of his rented house here, Mr. Emir set the birds free, though not before immobilizing their wings with Scotch tape. The pigeons, like Mr. Emir himself, would not be returning to Syria for a while.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — Seven of Syria's most powerful rebel groups said that they had forged a new Islamic force seeking to topple the government of President Bashar al-Assad and replace it with an Islamic state.The new alliance, the Islamic Front, was announced in a video shown on Al Jazeera television on Friday and featured some of Syria's most widely recognized rebel commanders.While some rebels and opposition activists hailed the new group's formation as a major step forward for the anti-Assad insurgency, it remained unclear to what extent the announcement reflected a true reorganization of rebel forces or what difference it would make in practice.Most of the participating groups, while maintaining their own command structures, have long cooperated in battle. And through two and a half years of civil war, new rebel formations have been announced frequently, many of them faring no better against government forces than those they preceded.Some rebels said the unification was also meant as a show of force by mainline rebel factions against one of Syria's Al Qaeda affiliates, the Islamic State in Iraq and Syria, or ISIS, which has recruited thousands of foreign jihadists, seized patches of territory and clashed with other groups for resources.The statement announcing the Islamic Front described it as "an independent political, military and social formation that seeks to completely topple the Assad regime in Syria and build an orthodox Islamic state."A spokesman for Al Tawhid Brigade, which joined the group, said by telephone from northern Syria that it was formed after months of discussion among rebel leaders who sought an alternative to the opposition's nominal leadership, the Syrian National Coalition, which many fighters consider out of touch."The opposition coalition gets its legitimacy from the civilians and fighters inside Syria, so if the coalition can't fulfill their wishes, it should admit that," said the spokesman, who gave his name as Abu Harith.He said the Islamic Front would work to integrate all the forces that joined it and create a single office to receive and distribute military aid. Competition for financing and arms has long created rifts among rebel groups.Abu Harith denied that the Islamic Front was formed to challenge ISIS, but said it would oppose the group if it oppressed civilians."The Islamic Front was born to defend the Syrian people and to achieve their goals of freedom and a decent life," he said. "So if people complain about ISIS's behavior, we will have their complaints solved."The formation of the Islamic Front is another blow to efforts by the United States and other powers to organize talks aimed at ending the war. It also highlights the increasing irrelevance of the rebels' Supreme Military Council, formed last year under pressure from the West to bolster more moderate fighting groups at the expense of extremists.A number of the Islamic Front's founding brigades were members of the Supreme Military Council. Although it was unclear if they had officially broken with it, none have spoken of the military council as a major source of support.A spokesman for the council, Louay Mekdad, said that the groups had not quit the council and that he supported all efforts to unify the rebels."We see this as a new stage with the formation of this large, respectable group, and we hope that all the forces on the ground will unify," he said. "The umbrella doesn't matter to us; the principles of the revolution do."Yet a high-ranking member of the military council who spoke on the condition of anonymity said the new group's formation could harm the rebellion by further splitting support for the fighters."If the support we used to get is split between the S.M.C. and the Islamic Front, this means less effectiveness for both sides," he said.
KILIS, Turkey — As the boom of shelling resounded along Turkey's border with Syria here on a recent afternoon, Zakaria Deeb had nowhere left to run.He had traveled 100 miles to Kilis with his family, chasing a false rumor that refugees would be allowed into a Turkish-run camp in the city, about 50 miles north of the Syrian city Aleppo. Instead, along with hundreds of other Syrians, the Deebs were now squatting in a gravel-strewn field across from the camp, sleeping under plastic sheets hanging from the branch of a cypress tree.Nearly three years of bloody civil war in Syria have created what the United Nations, governments and international humanitarian organizations describe as the most challenging refugee crisis in a generation — bigger than the one unleashed by the Rwandan genocide and laden with the sectarianism of the Balkan wars. With no end in sight in the conflict and with large parts of Syria already destroyed, governments and organizations are quietly preparing for the refugee crisis to last years.The Deebs fled their home a year ago because of fighting between Syrian rebels and government forces. Recent clashes between Kurdish fighters and the Al Qaeda-linked Islamic State of Iraq and Syria, or ISIS, pushed them into Turkey. Now, just on the other side of the border here, ISIS fighters were battling yet another rebel group, the Northern Storm."We expected the revolution to be over quickly, like in Libya and Egypt, but it's been nearly three years already, and God knows when this war will end," Mr. Deeb, 31, said, peering at the plumes of white smoke rising inside Syria. Children shrieked as another large mortar shell exploded across the border.A stray bullet from Syria had landed inside the camp in the morning, wounding a 5-year-old girl in the foot. "If this camp is full, we're willing to go to any camp inside Turkey," he said. "We don't want to go back to Syria."Syrians have been pouring out of their country in recent months, fleeing an increasingly violent and murky conflict that is pitting scores of armed groups against one another as much as against the government. Numbering just 300,000 one year ago, the refugees now total 2.1 million, and the United Nations predicts their numbers could swell to 3.5 million by the end of the year."The fighting continues, people are getting displaced and we don't know how long it's going to take," said Amin Awad, the head of the United Nations' refugee agency in the Middle East. "Therefore, aside from making sure the humanitarian operations are running, we need to support the host communities and governments."The exodus has stretched the resources of the region's host countries — Lebanon, Jordan, Iraq and even Turkey, the biggest and richest by far. Camps are full. But so are many neighborhoods in cities, towns and villages, where the Syrians' presence has raised rents, undercut wages and increased tensions. In Lebanon, the smallest of the host nations and the most politically fragile, Syrian refugees are expected soon to make up a quarter of the population.The flood has also raised fears that the refugees will import the Syrian conflict into the host countries, and destabilize already fragile borders. Like the other host nations, Turkey, which is actively supporting the Syrian opposition, was struggling to control the mass movements across its border.In Hatay, Turkey's southwestern province, hundreds of Syrians could be seen crossing illegally, unchecked by border guards or soldiers. Stretches of the border appeared porous and lawless. Criminal gangs thriving in the cross-border smuggling of gasoline and other goods could be seen working in broad daylight, using walkie-talkies to direct trucks in and out of Syria.A few miles from one of the biggest smuggling centers, the Turkish border town Bes Arslan, soldiers could sometimes be seen chasing individual Syrians clambering down a hill into Turkey. In a cat-and-mouse game played out over the day, Syrians crouched behind trees and rocks, some successfully slipping into Turkey; others were caught by soldiers and sent back.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — A group of Syrian rebel brigades, including an affiliate of Al Qaeda, seized a large oil and gas field from government forces on Saturday, opposition activists said, further depriving the government of President Bashar al-Assad of the resources it needs to remain solvent.Videos posted online showed scores of black-clad rebels walking through a large arch over an entrance to the Omar oil field, rummaging through its buildings and standing atop tanks.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a Britain-based opposition group that monitors the war, said a number of rebel brigades seized the area after an overnight battle and the withdrawal of government troops. Among the groups that participated were the Islam Army, which was formed east of Damascus, the Syrian capital, and the Nusra Front, which is affiliated with Al Qaeda.Two and a half years of civil war in Syria and strict international sanctions have battered the country's oil sector, once an important source of government revenue.Syria's oil and gas fields are concentrated in the country's largely rebel-controlled north and east. Most have been taken over by rebels or Kurdish militias, some of which finance their operations by selling the small amounts of crude they produce or processing it locally into usable gasoline products.It was unclear whether the field's production infrastructure had been damaged and whether the rebels would be able to maintain control, much less resume production.Also on Saturday, a British think tank released a report saying more than 11,000 children had been killed since the uprising began in March 2011, including hundreds who were shot by snipers or executed after capture and 112 who were tortured.The report, published by the Oxford Research Group, based its findings on the databases of four Syrian organizations that seek to document the war.But not all agreed with its findings. Rami Abdul Rahman, the head of the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, said many of its numbers appeared to be high.His organization, which was not cited in the report, has documented the deaths of only 6,490 children as of mid-November, including only about 20 who had been tortured.He said any documentation of deaths in Syria must navigate efforts by both sides to exaggerate their enemies' crimes and whitewash their own."Now in Syria we have a huge problem with propaganda, both from the Syrian regime and from the rebels," he said.Government forces carried out a series of airstrikes in and around the northern city of Aleppo on Saturday, killing more than 40 people, most of them reported by activists to be civilians.Aleppo, Syria's largest city, has been divided between government- and rebel-controlled zones for more than a year, although the rebels control the territory north of the city to the Turkish border and have used it to organize and manage supplies.Still, they remain largely helpless against the government's air power.Airstrikes in rebel-held parts of the city killed 22 people, including one woman and four children, said the observatory. One strike appeared to be aimed at a rebel headquarters but hit a market nearby, it said.Other airstrikes hit in and near the rebel-held city of Al Bab, killing 22 people, according to the observatory and Bari Abdul-Latif, an antigovernment activist in Al Bab who was reached via Skype.Mr. Abdul-Latif said that warplanes remained in the sky throughout much of the day and that the strikes hit near a school and the headquarters of a local aid organization.The observatory said at least seven government soldiers were also killed in clashes in Aleppo Province on Saturday.The Syrian state news media did not comment on the fighting near the oil fields or on the airstrikes in Aleppo Province.They did report that Syria's reconciliation minister, Ali Haidar, had survived an assassination attempt when gunmen opened fire on one of his cars as it drove through a government-controlled area near the Mediterranean coast. Mr. Haidar was not in the car, but his driver was killed.
DAMASCUS, Syria — In a terrace cafe within earshot of army artillery, a 28-year-old graduate student wept as she confessed that she had stopped planning antigovernment protests and delivering medical supplies to rebel-held towns.Khaled, 33, a former protester who fled Damascus after being tortured and fired from his bank post, quit his job in Turkey with the exile opposition, disillusioned and saying that he wished the uprising "had never happened."In the Syrian city of Homs, a rebel fighter, Abu Firas, 30, recently put down the gun his wife had sold her jewelry to buy, disgusted with his commanders, who, he said, focus on enriching themselves. Now he finds himself trapped under government shelling, broke and hopeless."The ones who fight now are from the side of the regime or the side of the thieves," he said in a recent interview via Skype. "I was stupid and naïve," he added. "We were all stupid."Even as President Bashar al-Assad of Syria racks up modest battlefield victories, this may well be his greatest success to date: wearing down the resolve of some who were committed to his downfall. People have turned their backs on the opposition for many different reasons after two and a half years of fighting, some disillusioned with the growing power of Islamists among rebels, some complaining of corruption, others just exhausted with a conflict that shows no signs of abating.But the net effect is the same, as some of the Syrians who risked their lives for the fight are effectively giving up, finding themselves in a kind of checkmate born of Mr. Assad's shrewdness and their own failures — though none interviewed say they are willing to return to his fold.Their numbers are impossible to measure, and there remain many who vow to keep struggling. Yet a range of Mr. Assad's opponents, armed and unarmed, inside and outside Syria, tell of a common experience: When protests began, they thought they were witnessing the chance for a new life. They took risks they had never dreamed of taking. They lost jobs, houses, friends and relatives, suffered torture and hunger, saw their neighborhoods destroyed. It was all they could do, yet it was not enough.What finally forced them to the sidelines, they say, were the disarray and division on their side, the government's deft exploitation of their mistakes, and a growing sense that there is no happy ending in sight. Some said they came to believe that the war could be won only by those as violent and oppressive as Mr. Assad, or worse.Such conclusions have been expressed by more and more people in recent months, in interviews in Damascus, the Syrian capital; Lebanon; and Turkey and via Skype across rebel-held areas in Syria. Many more fighters say they continue mainly because quitting would leave them feeling guilty toward other fighters."It's undeniable that a lot of your early activists are disillusioned," said Emile Hokayem, a Syria analyst at the International Institute for Strategic Studies, adding that in revolutions, it is often "your most constructive, positive people who are engaged early on who find themselves sidelined."Because such groups tend to be more vocal, he said, their changed views may be magnified beyond their numbers. Most are urbanites who had little understanding of the conservative poor whose mobilization is the backbone of the insurgency, he said. But their backing off has real impact, he said, especially on local governance, where they tended to be active.Disillusioned activists say that early on, euphoric at being able to protest at all, they neglected to build bridges to fence-sitters, or did not know how. Homegrown fighters desperate for help welcomed foreign jihadists, and many grew more religious or sectarian in tone, alarming Mr. Assad's supporters, dividing his opponents and frightening the West out of substantially supporting them.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syrian rebels including members of al-Qaida-linked Jabhat al-Nusra entered a predominantly Christian village near Damascus on Saturday and are fighting government forces in the old part of the town, activists and state media said.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said rebels broke in to Maaloula in the early hours after starting the offensive the previous night, leaving casualties on both sides. The group says Jabhat al-Nusra members are among those fighting in the area.Syria's state news agency SANA said government forces "wiped out a number of terrorists" while targeting their hideouts near Maaloula, using its preferred term for rebels fighting to overthrow President Bashar Assad. It gave no further details.It was the second attack on the area in nearly three months. Opposition fighters, including jihadis, stormed the village and held it for several days until troops launched a counter offensive in early September and regained control. Since then, most of Maaloula's 3,300 residents fled to safer areas.Maaloula, about 60 kilometers (40 miles) northeast of the capital, had previously been firmly in the government's grip despite being surrounded by rebel-held territory. The village was a major tourist attraction before the civil war. Some of its residents still speak a version of Aramaic, a biblical language believed to have been used by Jesus.The attack comes as Assad's forces went on the offensive earlier this month into the rugged Qalamoun region near the Lebanese border in order to cut off rebel supply routes and stem the flow of fighters.Maaloula is on the edge of Qalamoun, southwest of the town of Nabek that has been the focus of a government push for the past three days. Troops already captured two other major towns in the area."The aim of this operation is to cut regime supply lines from Damascus to Nabek," said an activist who goes with the name of Khalil al-Harastani. He is based in Qalamoun.The Observatory and al-Harastani reported heavy fighting in Nabek on Saturday, saying the army's air force was taking part in the government offensive.Maaloula overlooks the highway that links Damascus with the central city of Homs, Syria's third largest. The highway has been cut since mid-November when the fighting in Qalamoun began.A Maaloula resident told The Associated Press in Damascus that the rebels are now in the western part of the town and have captured the Mar Takla convent, where several nuns were staying.Earlier Saturday, Syrian troops shelled a marketplace near the northern city of Aleppo, killing at least six in what appeared to preparations for a government push to clear the northern city of rebels, activists said.The shelling hit the Nafasin market in the rebel-held town of al-Bab, said Rami Abdurrahman, who heads the Observatory.An Aleppo-based activist who goes by the name of Abu Raed corroborated the report, saying said the strike was likely to attack fighters who filter through the town into rebel-held areas of eastern Aleppo. Abu Raed, like al-Harastani in Qalamoun, does not use his real name for fear of government reprisals.Assad's forces and rebels seeking his overthrow are poised for battle in Aleppo, Syria's largest city and former economic capital, much of which has been reduced to rubble.Mroue reported from Beirut. Associated Press writer Diaa Hadid contributed to this report from Beirut.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syria's government will try to move the most lethal components of its chemical weapons program to a port city by the end of the year, and the U.S. has offered to pick up and destroy the hazardous material at an offshore facility, the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons and Syrian officials said Saturday.The international organization's director-general, Ahmet Uzumcu, said in The Hague, Netherlands, that the U.S. government will contribute "a destruction technology, full operational support and financing to neutralize" the weapons — most likely on a ship in the Mediterranean Sea. The weapons are to be removed from Syria by Dec. 31.Separately, the woman appointed as go-between for the United Nations and the OPCW on destroying Syria's chemical weapons stockpile laid out some logistical details. Sigrid Kaag said the weapons will first be sealed and packaged and then transported from multiple sites within Syria to the country's largest port, Latakia. Then they will be loaded onto ships owned by other OPCW members before a second hand-off to U.S. vessels.The weapons and chemicals "will not be (destroyed) in Syrian territorial waters," Kaag said at a news conference in Damascus.Kaag, who is due to travel to The Hague by Monday, said the mission will require international contributions in terms of packaging material, other logistic needs and special equipment needed to get the job done.The OPCW was given the responsibility of overseeing the destruction of Syria's chemical weapons arsenal under an agreement reached between the U.S. and Syrian ally Russia on Sept. 14. The U.S. then shelved plans for a military strike on Syria's government as punishment for a chemical weapons attack in August that killed hundreds of people, including many children, in rebel-held Damascus suburbs. Syria's government acknowledged it possessed chemical weapons and committed to giving them up.Since then, the OPCW has been scrambling to meet ambitious deadlines for disarming and destroying Syria's estimated 1,300-ton arsenal, which includes mustard gas and some precursor materials for sarin. Syria's production capacity was destroyed or rendered inoperable by the end of October, the OPCW said, and now it is tackling the tougher problem of how to deal with its existing weapons and hazardous chemicals.An initial plan to destroy chemicals and weapons in a third country was rejected after no nation was willing to accept the hazardous waste. The possibility of destroying chemicals and weapons in Syria itself was rejected as unworkable amid the country's civil war.Syrian Deputy Foreign Minister Faisal Mekdad told the Lebanon-based TV station Al-Mayadeen Saturday that Damascus is willing to transport the weapons to Latakia but "we need equipment. We need armored vehicles and monitoring equipment so that terrorists don't attack these convoys."Asked whether equipment for safe storage of chemicals is already being transported into Syria from Lebanon, Mekdad said "it will start entering." He added that several countries including Russia have promised to donate equipment."We in Syria are ready," he said. "We are not cooperating (with the destruction operation) 99 percent: We are cooperating 100 percent."He and Kaag both said the year-end deadline can be achieved, but obstacles — such as a closure of the Homs-Damascus road — could cause delays.In Saturday's statement, the OPCW said a U.S. naval vessel "is undergoing modifications to support the operations and to accommodate verification activities by the OPCW."The Associated Press reported on Thursday that the ship in question is likely the MV Cape Ray, which would destroy chemical materials using a process developed by the Pentagon but never employed in an actual operation.Citing several U.S. officials who spoke on the condition of anonymity because they were not authorized to identify themselves, the AP reported the U.S. plans to use what it calls a mobile Field Deployable Hydrolysis System to process the chemical material, making it unusable as weapons. The system was developed by the Defense Threat Reduction Agency, which is an arm of the Pentagon. Its titanium reactor uses heated water and chemicals to neutralize hazardous materials.According the officials, two of the hydrolysis units would be mounted on the Cape Ray under the current plan.Separately, the OPCW is drawing up plans to remove 800 tons of dual-use chemicals, many of which are common industrial chemicals, from Syria by Feb. 5 and later destroy them through private companies. All elements of Syria's chemical weapons program are due to be eradicated by mid-2014.Uzumcu said Saturday that 35 private companies have applied so far to participate and are at an early stage of being vetted. He also called on governments of the 190 countries that belong to the OPCW to contribute funds to the effort, or by contracting directly with companies to help destroy chemicals.The OPCW's executive council met Friday night and a general meeting of member states begins Monday.Bassem Mroue contributed to this story from Beirut, Lebanon. Sterling contributed from Amsterdam.
BEIRUT — Islamist fighters in Syria have taken over the ancient quarter of the Christian town of Maaloula and are holding several nuns in a monastery there, state news agency SANA said on Monday.Fighting for the town, about five km (three miles) from the main road linking Damascus to Homs, is part of a wider struggle between rebel fighters and President Bashar al-Assad's forces for control of the strategic central Syrian highway.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said on Monday fighters from the al Qaeda-linked Nusra Front had captured the old quarter of Maaloula after several days of fighting.Observatory director Rami Abdulrahman said he could not confirm the SANA report that Nusra fighters had stormed the Greek Orthodox monastery of Mar Thecla and were holding several nuns captive.But the monastery is in the old part of Maaloula, which is now under the control of the Nusra Front and other rebels, he said. Four rebel fighters were killed in fierce fighting on Monday as the army and pro-Assad militia fought to retake the district, Abdulrahman said.Restrictions by Syrian authorities make it difficult to verify accounts from inside the country.The town was the scene of heavy fighting in September, when it changed hands four times in a series of attacks and counter-assaults by rebels and government forces. At the time, the Mother Superior at Mar Thecla denied reports circulated by pro-government groups that rebels had pillaged Christian sites.The latest fighting coincides with a government offensive to secure other towns on the road from Damascus to the city of Homs and Assad's Alawite heartland overlooking the Mediterranean.Control of the road would help secure Assad's grip over central Syria, and would also enable safe passage for hundreds of tonnes (1 tonne = 1.102 metric tons) of chemical agents which are due to be shipped out of the country by the end of the year for destruction.The fighting prevented the head of the international mission overseeing the elimination of those weapons from going by road from Damascus to the port of Latakia during a visit last week.Sigrid Kaag, head of the joint mission of the United Nations and Organisation for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons (OPCW), said she had to travel by helicopter instead."Security remains a key challenge for all. The destruction of a chemical weapons program has never taken place under such challenging and dangerous conditions," Kaag told delegates of the OPCW in The Hague.In the last fortnight Assad's forces have extended their control in Qara and Deir Attiyah, two towns near the road, and have been fighting to take a third, Nabak.State television said on Monday the army had "completely eliminated armed terrorist groups" around Deir Attiyah and Nabak. The Observatory's Abdulrahman said rebels were still in part of Nabak but the western sector of the town, which is closest to the Damascus-Homs road, was under army control.Before Syria's 2-1/2-year-old conflict erupted, Maaloula attracted both Christian and Muslim pilgrims. Some of its residents still speak Aramaic, the language of Christ, and the monastery of Mar Thecla had a reputation for miraculous cures.Syria's Christian community, about 10 percent of the population, is wary of the rising power of Islamist groups within the rebel movement. A small percentage of Christians so far have taken up arms in the civil war that broadly pits minorities, in particular Assad's Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ite Islam, against the Sunni Muslim majority.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Opposition fighters abducted 12 nuns from a Christian village overrun by rebels, Syria's Greek Orthodox patriarch and the head of a convent said Tuesday, adding to fears that hard-line Muslim rebels trying to overthrow President Bashar Assad were increasingly targeting Christians.The nuns join two bishops and a priest who were previously kidnapped by rebels. Syria's minorities, including Christians, have mostly sided with Assad or remained neutral in Syria's civil war, fearing for their fate if the rebels, increasingly dominated by Islamic extremists, come to power. Christians have accused radicals among the rebels of abusing residents and vandalizing churches after taking Christian towns.The nuns and three other women were seized Monday from the Greek Orthodox Mar Takla convent in the village of Maaloula and taken to the nearby rebel-held town of Yabroud, which also has a large Christian population, said Mother Superior Febronia Nabhan, head of the nearby Saidnaya Convent.Greek Orthodox Patriarch John Yazigi made a fervent plea for the release of the women, as well as some two dozen orphans the nuns care for at the convent, although it could not be immediately confirmed that the children were also taken."We appeal to the seed of conscience that God planted in all humans, including the kidnappers, to release our sisters safely," he said in a statement."We call upon the international community and world governments to (help secure the) release of nuns of Mar Takla convent and the orphans who are being held since yesterday."Nabhan told The Associated Press that the Maaloula convent's mother superior, Pelagia Sayaf, called her late Monday from Yabroud and said the nuns and the other women were all safe. She made no mention of the orphans.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which has a network of activists around the country, said the fate of the nuns is unknown, adding there were conflicting reports on whether they were taken to a nearby area or not.The Observatory said it received information late Monday saying that the nuns "are still alive." It gave no further details.Syrian rebels captured large parts of Maaloula, some 40 miles (60 kilometers) northeast of the capital, on Monday after three days of fighting. Activists say the rebels who stormed the town included members of the al-Qaida-linked Jabhat al-Nusra or Nusra Front.In September, rebels seized parts of Maaloula only to be driven out within a few days by government forces. The town was a major tourist attraction before the conflict began in March 2011. Some of its residents still speak a version of Aramaic, a biblical language spoken by Jesus.The Syrian Foreign Ministry said "terrorists" broke into the Mar Takla convent and held mother superior Sayaf and a number of other nuns "as hostages and sabotaged churches and houses." It urged the international community to condemn the attack.In two letters sent to the heads of the U.N. Security Council and the U.N. secretary-general late Monday, the ministry said: "Syria is facing a barbarian war launched by extremist ... gangs targeting its present and future."It urged the Security Council to condemn the attack on Maloula in "the strongest terms" and exert pressure on the countries supporting the rebels to stop providing them with logistical and financial support.The nuns are the latest Christian clergy members to be abducted. Two bishops were seized in rebel-held areas in April, and an Italian Jesuit priest, Father Paolo Dall'Oglio, went missing in July after traveling to meet militants in Raqqa. None has been heard from since.Al-Qaida-linked militants, who seized control of Raqqa in March, have set fires to churches and knocked the crosses off them, replacing them with the group's black Islamic banner.Loay al-Mikdad, a spokesman for the mainstream rebel Free Syrian Army, denounced the behavior of some groups in Maaloula, but blamed the regime for placing tanks and other military hardware inside the village. Speaking to Al-Arabiya TV, he said rebels went into Maaloula not for sectarian reasons but because of its strategic location.In other violence, Syria's state TV reported that a suicide attacker blew himself up in central Damascus, killing four people and wounding 17 others. The TV gave no further details about the blast in the central Jisr Abyad neighborhood and did not say what the target was.Such blasts in Damascus are not uncommon and have killed scores of people in the city.Meanwhile, troops continued their advance in the western town of Nabek after they captured most of it Monday and reopened the highway linking Damascus with the central city of Homs. A government official, speaking on condition of anonymity in line with regulations, said that although the road was opened it is still dangerous because of fighting in nearby areas.The highway is a key road leading to Syria's coast and could open the way for transporting the country's chemical weapons to be sent to the port of Latakia before they are taken out of the country for destruction.The Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons is aiming to destroy Syria's entire chemical weapons program by mid-2014.Meanwhile, across the border in the northern Lebanese city of Tripoli, Lebanese troops began deploying in areas between pro- and anti-Assad groups after four days of fighting that left a dozen people dead and more than 100 wounded.The Tuesday deployment came a day after the government authorized the army to take charge of security in Lebanon's second-largest city for six months.The army said in a statement that 21 people from both sides have been detained.
BEIRUT — Syrians called it the "bride of the revolution".The eastern city of Raqqa was swept by celebrations after residents woke up one morning in March to see the last batch of forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad leaving.Believing a new era of freedom had arrived, they promised to make Raqqa, the first and only city to have fallen completely under rebel control, an example of a post-Assad era."At the time we were all happy with the liberation, it was not important who was there. Raqqa was for all Syrians and all those who helped liberate it," said one of several residents and activists contacted by Reuters via Skype.The euphoria did not last.In the weeks that followed, prisons appeared in public buildings, electricity was cut off and shops were banned from selling tobacco, considered anti-Islamic by the ultra-puritan, masked Islamist fighters who began patrolling the city."They also closed the universities saying that because women are also taking lessons there it should be shut," said a resident whose son is a media activist and is now wanted by the Islamists.Following a pattern seen across northern Syria, the al Qaeda-affiliated Islamic State in Iraq and the Levant (ISIL) slowly tightened its grip."When Raqqa was liberated we thought now that the regime is out, the era of freedom has begun. People started cleaning the streets. We thought we were living a dream," said another resident who, like most Raqqa locals, declined to be named for their safety. "It was dream. They killed it."The fighters took over government buildings, turning them into headquarters and prisons. The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said an Armenian church in Raqqa was converted into an office and another into an administrative building.The jihadi fighters carried out public executions in a main square, instilling fear among residents and stifling any possibility of protest.During the day, only a few shops are open, selling basic foodstuffs. By nightfall streets are emptied, residents say."Electricity is cut off from the whole city; only their buildings have power. The whole city lives in the dark and they have the light," said an activist who fled weeks ago.An activist from Raqqa, who has moved to the north-western province of Idlib, blamed the Western-backed Free Syrian Army rebel fighters for allowing the jihadis to take over."All the FSA cared for was stealing and accumulating money. From the first day of Raqqa's liberation they left it to the Islamic State," he said.Residents say they know little about the fighters. They include Iraqis, Gulf Arabs and Libyans, they say, but keep their identity hidden behind masks and avoid conversation."At first these masked gunmen were nice to people, they helped the people here," said a resident in his 40s.But then problems emerged, particularly after ISIL began executions of people who had supported the revolt and even helped the rebels take over the city."They began assassinating the leaders of the (rebel) Free Syrian Army. They burnt churches, destroyed statues in parks and also robbed museums, saying statues and imagery were against Islam," said the father of the wanted activist."The bride changed. Instead of the white dress it was forced to wear black."
WASHINGTON — The United States will conduct a sea test this month of equipment that could be used to neutralize Syria's most deadly chemical weapons at sea, U.S. defense officials said on Thursday.Two large chemical neutralization units, which employ a process known as hydrolysis to render toxic chemicals safe enough to be disposed of at commercial sites, are being installed below deck on the Cape Ray, a U.S. Merchant Marine ship."This is a proven technology," a U.S. defense official, speaking on condition of anonymity, told reporters at the Pentagon. "The chemicals and their reactions are very well understood."The hydrolysis technology, which turns dangerous chemicals into a low-toxicity liquid waste, has been used to destroy other hazardous materials in the United States. But if the initiative moves forward, it would be the first time the system is used to destroy such materials at sea.A sea trial of the equipment aboard the Cape Ray is planned for later this month, Pentagon officials said.The Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons (OPCW), which won the Nobel Peace Prize in October, is overseeing plans to destroy Syria's chemical arsenal under an agreement that averted U.S. missile strikes earlier this year.But arranging for hundreds of tons of toxic chemicals to be safely transported to war-torn Syria's northern port of Latakia, and then stored or destroyed elsewhere, has proven difficult.A second U.S. defense official said that the Syrian government was "taking the process very seriously.""They recognize that they bear a lot of responsibility for getting the materials safely delivered," the official said. "Obviously it's a challenging environment and they're working through that."Earlier on Wednesday, the head of the joint mission of the United Nations and the OPCW said that the mission was awaiting approval from an unidentified country to use one of that country's ports to load Syrian chemical weapons onto a U.S. ship for destruction.Italy, Norway and Denmark have offered to transport Syria's chemicals from Latakia with military escorts. The chemicals would then be transferred to the Cape Ray at another port. The plan has yet to be formally approved by the OPCW, Pentagon officials said.The U.S. official said stockpiles that would be destroyed at sea would include mustard gas and materials used to make the nerve agent sarin. The destruction would take between 45 and 90 days.The ship, which could be ready within weeks, will be manned by about 100 people, including Pentagon employees and contractors, who will use protective equipment when treating the chemicals."Our assessment is that the risks from the neutralization operations are very low," the first official said.It's not yet clear where the Cape Ray would pick up the Syrian chemicals, or where the offshore destruction would take place. The U.S. official said that none of the liquid created by the hydrolysis process would be dumped at sea but would be stored at an undetermined location.
The United Nations official in charge of coordinating the disposal of Syria 's chemical weapons arsenal provided new details on Wednesday about the plan to eliminate them, saying the most dangerous materials would be sealed by trained Syrians and sent overland to the country's Mediterranean port of Latakia, where ships would take them to a second, unspecified foreign port.From there, the official said, the chemicals would be transferred to a specially equipped naval vessel offered by the United States, which is capable of safely neutralizing the chemicals at sea.The official, Sigrid Kaag, acknowledged that the overland routes in Syria were dangerous because of the civil war, but that the Syrian authorities were taking steps to secure them and had designated Latakia as the departure point for the chemicals.Under a timetable established by the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons, which is collaborating with the United Nations in a joint mission to oversee the destruction of Syria's arsenal under a Security Council resolution passed Sept. 27, the most dangerous chemical agents are to be removed from the country by Dec. 31 — less than four weeks away.Under the resolution, the entire stockpile of Syrian chemical weapons must be destroyed by mid-2014."If there are delays due to security conditions, we have to assess and revisit that of course," Ms. Kaag, the coordinator of the joint mission, told reporters after privately briefing the Security Council on the mission's progress. "But for now, we don't assume any alternatives."The chemical weapons mission has been working in Syria for more than two months, and under its supervision, the country's ability to manufacture chemical munitions has been rendered inoperable. The mission's work has been a conspicuous success, so far, in a conflict that has grown increasingly violent and complicated since it began in March 2011.But the most important phase of the mission's work — overseeing the destruction of the weapons facilities and chemical agents that had been amassed by Syria's government over many years — is also considered the most difficult and dangerous."Of course there are security constraints that are serious," Ms. Kaag told reporters. As an example, she pointed to the closing of the highway between Damascus and Homs, a major city that has been a center of fighting between insurgents and the forces of the Syrian president, Bashar al-Assad."It's a main artery, as you know," she said. "If we cannot travel there, it's a real issue."In her own recent inspection of Latakia, Ms. Kaag said, she had to travel there via helicopter from Lebanon, partly because the overland passage inside Syria was not secure enough at the time. "There are issues, there are factors that are beyond our control," she said.Asked if other possible exit routes were under consideration, Ms. Kaag said no. "Latakia is the designated port for exit of the chemical agents," she said. "It's chosen by the government. The port has been assessed as functional, capable of handling this process."Ms. Kaag said the mission had trained the Syrians on how to package and seal the chemical agents to be sent to Latakia, where ships from other United Nations member states would load and export them. She did not identify their nationalities nor identify the foreign port where the chemicals will be sent and transferred to the American disposal vessel.She expressed confidence that environmental safety and health dangers in the disposal plan had been addressed, but couched her words with caution."I am not aware that this operation has ever been carried out in this way," she said. "That said, in life, one can never exclude anything from happening and going wrong. So I have to be very pragmatic about it."
BEIRUT — A Syrian rebel group calling itself "Free Qalamoun" has claimed the kidnapping of 12 nuns and said it wants to trade them for a thousand female detainees held by the government, a pan-Arab newspaper reported on Friday.Rebel spokesman Mohannad Abu al-Fidaa told Asharq al-Awsat that the nuns were safe but "will not be released until several demands have been implemented, most importantly, the release of 1,000 Syrian women held in regime prisons".Reuters could not independently confirm the report.An official at the Greek Orthodox Patriarchate in Damascus said the nuns were safe but would not comment on which group had taken them.Syria's Christian minority have generally tried to stay on the sidelines of the sectarian conflict pitting majority Sunni Muslims against the Alawite minority. Many Christians fear the rise of hardline Islamist groups.Islamist fighters who captured the Christian village of Maaloula north of Damascus moved the nuns from the Greek Orthodox monastery of Mar Thecla to the nearby town of Yabrud on Monday, according to the Vatican envoy to Syria, Mario Zenari.The militants took the ancient quarter of Maaloula on Monday after heavy fighting with President Bashar al-Assad's forces in the Qalamoun region near the Lebanese border.The fighting, which pits al Qaeda-linked Nusra Front fighters and other rebels against Assad's forces, is part of a wider struggle for control of the Damascus-Homs highway in central Syria.
DAMASCUS — Syrian Christians offered prayers Sunday for a group of more than a dozen nuns and orphanage workers held by rebels for nearly a week, fueling fears in the minority community that they are being targeted by extremists among the fighters seeking to oust President Bashar Assad.The seizure of the 12 Greek Orthodox nuns and at least three other women is the latest attack to spark panic among Syria's Christians over the strength of al-Qaida-linked militants and other Islamic radicals in the nearly 3-year-old revolt against Assad's government. A priest and two bishops previously kidnapped by rebels remain missing, and extremists are accused of vandalizing churches in areas they have captured.Rebels seized the nuns on Monday from the Greek Orthodox Mar Takla convent when fighters overran Maaloula, a mainly Christian village north of Damascus that lies on a key highway and has changed hands several times in fierce fighting between rebels and government forces. The group, along with three women — themselves orphans — who work in the convent's orphanage were taken to the nearby rebel-held town of Yabroud.The eldest of the nuns is nearly 90 years old, and the youngest of the orphanage workers is in her mid-teens, according to Mother Superior Febronia Nabhan, head of the Saidnaya Convent.On Friday, a video was released of the nuns, in which they denied being kidnapped, saying they were in good health and that fighters had taken them to a location away from the combat out of concerns for their safety.The video only stoked the worries of Christians who gathered Sunday for a Mass at the Mariamiya Church in Damascus, the main Greek Orthodox church in the country."They're coming after us," Odette Abu Zakham, a 65-year-old woman in the congregation who lives in the nearby historic Christian district of Bab Touma. "All they do is massacre people, all they know is killing."Another woman at the Mass noted that in the video, the nuns appeared in their black robes but with no signs of religious symbols on them. "They didn't even let them wear their crosses," she said. "This just shows they aren't capable of respecting Christians.""It's been a week. If they're only holding them for their safety, they could have handed them over by now," she said, speaking on condition of anonymity for fear of retaliation against herself or her family.Christians and other minorities tend to support the government of Assad, who comes from a Shiite offshoot sect. Syria's Sunni Muslim majority form the backbone of the uprising against Assad. But nationalist fighters among them have been overshadowed by the increasing power of extremists, including Syrian rebels who have taken up hard-line al-Qaida-style ideologies and foreign fighters.In his sermon at the Mass, the Greek Orthodox patriarch for Antioch and All the East, Yohanna al-Yaziji, asked "anyone with any connection, direct or indirect" to intercede to win the group's return. "We hope this will happen today, not tomorrow. We urge everyone to adhere to the logic of dialogue and peace, not to violence and weapons."He carefully avoided describing the nuns as "kidnapped" or asking for their release — praying only for their "return" — a sign of concerns among Church officials that any statements could enflame the situation.The rebel faction that released the video, aired on Al-Jazeera television, did not identify itself, and no faction has announced it is holding the group. Syrian opposition activists and Church officials have said the al-Qaida-linked group Jabhat al-Nusra, or the Nusra Front, is holding them.One activist said a Syrian Christian businessman is trying to mediate between the Nusra Front and the government for their release in return for the release of seven Saudi fighters. The activist spoke on condition of anonymity to discuss the secret mediation, but did not have further details. Greek Orthodox Church officials would not comment.AP correspondents Albert Aji in Damascus and Bassem Mroue in Beirut contributed to this report.
BEIRUT — Forces loyal to Syrian President Bashar al-Assad have killed at least five children during fighting for the town of Nabak north of the capital Damascus, activists said on Sunday.The fighting in Nabak pits Assad's army and allied militia against rebel factions including two linked to al Qaeda, the Nusra Front and the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant.The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, a British-based pro-opposition monitoring group, said five children were shot dead when pro-Assad forces entered Nabak's industrial area.Activists posted images on social media of the bloodied corpses of five children and said up to seven had been killed. Some blamed a Shi'ite militia for the killings, but this could not be confirmed. The rebels are mostly Sunni Muslims."What we know is that they (the children) were killed by shooting," Rami Abdulrahman, the Observatory's director, said.Reuters could not independently verify the reports.Nabak lies 80 km (50 miles) north of Damascus on Syria's north-south highway linking the capital to the central city of Homs and the coastal heartland of Assad's minority Alawite sect.Fighting in the area intensified last month when the government launched an offensive to secure towns along the road.The Observatory said pro-government forces shelled the eastern areas of Nabak and raided homes in the western areas as clashes continued on Sunday. Fighters from the Lebanese Shi'ite group Hezbollah joined in on the government side, it added.The state news agency SANA made no mention of casualties, but said the army was carrying out operations in the area and had eliminated "armed terrorist groups" around Nabak.More than 100,000 people have been killed in Syria's 2-1/2-year-old conflict and efforts by divided world powers to end the violence have made little progress.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syrian troops seized a key opposition-held town Monday along a major north-south highway critical for transporting the government's chemical weapons stocks to a port where they could be shipped out for destruction by the international community.The government has been cooperating with chemical weapons inspectors, and the capture of the town of Nabek may make the transfer of the stocks go more smoothly.But the head of the global chemical arms watchdog warned that worsening security may make it difficult to meet a Dec. 31 deadline to remove the toxic chemicals from the country.The Syrian army has been on a crushing offensive in the mountainous Qalamoun region near the Lebanese border and has seized a string of towns and villages in the area near the highway that connects Damascus with the city of Homs to the north.That road serves as a crucial link between the capital and northern Syria as well as government strongholds in the northwest along the Mediterranean. The Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons said last week it would consider using the road to transport the chemical weapons to the port of Latakia from where the arms would be shipped for destruction abroad or at sea.Troops reopened the highway Sunday, nearly 20 days after it was closed because of the fighting. On Monday, state media said President Bashar Assad's forces took full control of Nabek, which lies on the edge of the road. Lebanese fighters from the Iranian-backed Hezbollah group have aided the troops.Syrian TV showed a huge Syrian flag unfurled over a building in Nabek's main square and dozens of people waving Syrian flags. The broadcast showed a young Syrian woman saying to the TV reporter: "May God protect our Syrian soldiers. I feel safe now."Another woman told the reporter that residents suffered from lack of food and water since the fighting began three weeks ago. "We lived very difficult 20 days," she said.Rami Abdurrahman, director of the Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, confirmed that government forces are now in control of Nabek except for a pocket of resistance in a small area east of the town. He added that while the highway was now under full control of the government, it can still be targeted by opposition fighters.In Norway, the head of the organization leading the mission to destroy Syria's chemical weapons said there may be delays in transporting the chemicals out of the war-torn country. Ahmet Uzumc, director-general of the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons, said the Dec. 31 deadline to get the most toxic chemicals out of Syria "will be quite difficult to meet."He also called the goal to get less toxic chemicals out of Syria by Feb. 5 "quite an ambitious timeline" and added "there might be a few days' delay." Nevertheless, Uzumc said he's hopeful all the Syrian chemicals will be destroyed by mid-2014 as planned.He was in the Norwegian capital of Oslo to collect the Nobel Peace Prize on behalf of the OPCW on Tuesday.In Moscow, Russia's Deputy Foreign Minister Mikhail Bogdanov said his government was discussing the issue of transportation with the Americans and the OPCW. He did not give details.On Monday, the opposition marked 1,000 days since Syria's uprising against Assad's rule began in March 2011. More than 120,000 have been killed, according to the Observatory, and millions of Syrians have been uprooted from their homes."Today marks a tragic milestone, which honors our country's democratic resistance and serves to remind us of the many lives lost in Syria in pursuit of freedom," said Najib Ghadbian, the U.N. representative for the Syrian National Coalition, which is the political arm of the Free Syrian Army rebel group.In a statement, British Foreign Secretary William Hague described the conflict's toll as "the biggest humanitarian catastrophe of this century" and reiterated that Assad cannot be part of Syria's future.In Damascus, the Syrian Foreign Ministry complained about what it described as the continued "flagrant intervention" by Saudi Arabia in Syria's internal affairs, saying government forces have so far killed more than 300 Saudis.Saudi Arabia is one of the strongest backers of the Syrian opposition and a harsh critic of Assad.In two letters sent to the presidents of the U.N. Security Council and the United Nations, the ministry said the Saudi government is still "submitting aid to armed groups and practicing its sabotaging role" by recruiting extremists affiliated with al-Qaida.Meanwhile, the Observatory reported Monday that members of the radical Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant shot and killed diesel vendor Ibrahim Qassoum, a father of three, in Syria's northwestern province of Idlib two days after detaining him and accusing him of blasphemy. It said the jihadis asked Qassoum why the diesel he sold was not pure, and that he answered: "How would I know? Am I the God of diesel?"Myklebost reported from Oslo, Norway. Associated Press writers Vladimir Isachenkov in Moscow contributed to this report.
MANILA, Philippines — The Philippines on Monday banned its workers from going to Yemen after an attack by militants there killed more than 50 people, including seven Filipinos.The decision, announced by Department of Foreign Affairs spokesman Raul Hernandez, means Filipinos cannot take up jobs in Yemen while 1,500 to 2,000 of those already working in the country can choose to return home at the government's expense.Al-Qaida claimed responsibility for Friday's attack on Yemen's military headquarters in Sanaa, saying it was retaliation for U.S. drone strikes that have killed dozens of the terror network's leaders.The seven Filipinos killed included a doctor and nurses. Eleven others were wounded. They were among 40 Filipinos working in the hospital inside the complex.About 10 million Filipinos work overseas, mostly in the Middle East, sending home millions of dollars that support the Southeast Asian nation's economy.Filipino workers also have been barred from Somalia and Syria.
WASHINGTON — The NSA chief said Wednesday he knows of no better way his agency can help protect the U.S. from foreign threats than with spy programs that collect billions of phone and Internet records from around the world.Pleading with the Senate Judiciary Committee to not abolish the National Security Agency's bulk-collection programs, Gen. Keith Alexander warned that global threats are growing — specifically in Iraq and Syria — that pose what he called "an unacceptable risk" to America."How do we connect the dots?" Alexander said, referring to often-hidden links between a foreign terror threat and a potential attack on the U.S. "There is no other way that we know of to connect the dots. ... Taking these programs off the table is absolutely not the thing to do."The committee's chairman, Sen. Patrick Leahy, D-Vt., said it was troubling that the government was sweeping up millions, if not billions, of Americans' records. He has proposed legislation to prohibit the NSA from the bulk collection of U.S. phone records, and said Wednesday that he was concerned that Americans' Internet records also were vacuumed up before the program ended in 2011. That program now focuses only on people who live outside the United States — which could include Americans living abroad.Alexander acknowledged the privacy concerns that have dogged the NSA since leaker Edward Snowden revealed the programs in June. And he said the NSA was open to talking to technology companies for a better solution without compromising security."It's like holding onto a hornet's nest," Alexander said. "We're getting stung."But, "If we let this down I think we will have let the nation down," he said.Leahy's proposal has broad bipartisan support, especially in the House, where it is being pushed by Rep. James Sensenbrenner, R-Wis., who was the chief congressional architect of laws that gave the government broad surveillance powers in the days following the 2001 terror attacks.But lawmakers who oversee U.S. intelligence agencies have proposed more modest reforms that call for greater oversight of the NSA and the creation of penalties for people who access classified information without authorization. Their plan has the support of most congressional leaders and Obama administration officials who are resisting deep cuts to intelligence authorities.The vast differences between the two proposals have so far stymied Congress from passing an NSA overhaul this year, despite dwindling public trust in U.S. intelligence systems that have underscored the demand for change. Additionally, Silicon Valley is escalating pressure on the White House to curb the surveillance programs. A coalition of eight major Internet companies lashed out on a website and in an open letter printed Monday in major newspapers as part of an effort by the companies to limit potential damage from the NSA revelations that threaten the technology industry's financial livelihood.The coalition included Twitter Inc., LinkedIn Corp., AOL Inc., Google Inc., Apple Inc., Yahoo Inc., Facebook Inc. and Microsoft Corp. Together, the group is immersed in the lives of just about everyone who uses the Internet or a computing device.Alexander took pains to underscore that the NSA is not listening in on Americans' phone calls or reading their Internet messages without court approval. Currently, the NSA is monitoring about 200 phone numbers for FBI scrutiny, compared with about 300 for all of 2012, Alexander said.The American people have been told that all of their phone records are relevant to counterterror investigations," Leahy said. "Now they are told that all Internet metadata is also relevant, and apparently fair game for the NSA to collect. This legal interpretation is extraordinary."
TEL SARHAN CAMP, Lebanon — The season's first snow settled in parts of Lebanon on Wednesday and refugee children who have fled the war in Syria took the opportunity to have a snowball fight outside their tents.But the worst of winter is yet to come for 2.2 million refugees living outside Syria and millions more displaced inside the country.A storm named Alexa is sweeping across Syria and Lebanon, bringing with it high winds and freezing temperatures - and marking the beginning of the third winter since the Syrian conflict began in March 2011.The snow wreaked havoc across the region and grounded the start of a humanitarian airlift that was meant to start bringing supplies from Iraq into the northeastern Kurdish areas of Syria, where tens of thousands of people have been out of reach.In a tented settlement a few kilometers (miles) from the border in Lebanon's Bekaa Valley, more than 1,000 people live in rudimentary shelters.Refugee Ibrahim, 27, spoke to Reuters in his tent where the dirt floor had turned to mud and strong winds blew snow in the entrance. Children gathered in one corner around a fire in a metal crate."The storm will finish us. It's freezing now. I seek refugee in God," he said.His family does not have enough money for food or to build a sturdier shelter.Men filled bags with dirt to hold down tents and placed car tires and bricks atop the flimsy wooden structures to prevent the wind from tearing them apart.In Lebanon, more than 835,000 refugees live in tented camps, unused buildings or with friends or family. The Lebanese government has decided not to house them in formal camps due to local sensitivities that they will stay permanently.Aid agencies can help them with food, tents, blankets and clothes but they cannot set up formal refugee camps.Ibrahim, who arrived last week, said the aid is not sufficient for the new arrivals."We came here in the winter but it would have been better if we had stayed in Syria. At least if you die, you die in your own house," he said.Simon Ingram, a spokesman for the U.N. Children's Fund, said the agency has been able to mobilize winter supplies for Syrians in the country and its neighbors but "the needs will outstrip what we and our partners are able to provide."The start of winter coincides with a polio vaccination campaign that seeks to vaccinate 750,000 children in Lebanon after an outbreak of the disease was confirmed in eastern Syria in October. (ID:nL5N0IT3YZ)"Polio spreads through water and sewage," Ingram said. "This is one the big dangers - overflowing drains."Chief of Lebanon's Meteorological Department, Mark Whaybeh, said that in past years, snow and rainfall had increased and temperatures decreased over December and into January."We are still at the beginning of the season," he said. "We should have rain and cold periods during the next two months."Whaybeh said Alexa will last until Saturday night and that temperatures could plummet to minus 7 degrees Celsius in some mountainous areas of Lebanon.Minister for Social Affairs Wael Abu Faour said the government was "trying its best" and that the army had been called in to make refugee shelters ready for winter.He told Reuters his main worry was that some refugees are living in a flood area near the Litani river."Abu Faour said he was trying to rehouse refugees near the river, which flooded during storms in January but that so far there was no place available."It's beyond our capacity," he said. "We tried mosques, we tried schools, we have tried everything. It will be a disaster."Snowfall in Syria has not halted the fighting between rebels and forces loyal to President Bashar al-Assad, which has killed more than 100,000 people in the past 2-1/2 years.Shelling continued on Wednesday across the country, including in the strategic Qalamoun area between Damascus and the Lebanese border, activists said.Footage filmed by opposition activists and posted to the Internet on Wednesday showed the corpse of a baby they said had frozen to death in the central Syrian town of Rastan. Reuters could not independently confirm the report.The weather has also forced the U.N. to cancel an airlift announced Tuesday which aimed to deliver food and winter supplies from Iraq to northeast Syria. (ID:nL6N0JP29I)"Qamishli airport (in Syria) has suspended all flights due to weather conditions, snow and poor visibility," UNHCR spokesman Dan McNorton said."We're not going to be able to make those flights happen until the weather improves," he said.
BEIRUT — Major international news organizations sent a letter to the leadership of the armed opposition in Syria Wednesday, calling for urgent action against rebel groups increasingly targeting journalists for kidnappings.The letter, signed by 13 news organizations including The Associated Press, is in response to a sharp rise in the kidnapping of journalists while on assignment in opposition-held areas in northern Syria.The widespread seizure of journalists is unprecedented and has so far been largely under-reported by news organizations in the hope that keeping the kidnappings out of public view may help with negotiating the captives' release. The scale of the abductions — more than 30 are believed to be currently held — and the lack of response to individual mediation efforts have encouraged some families and employers to speak out.Most kidnappings since the summer have taken place in rebel-held territories, particularly in chaotic northern and eastern Syria, where militant al-Qaida-linked groups hold influence. Among the most dangerous places are the northeastern city of Raqqa, which was taken over by al-Qaida militants shortly after it became the first city to fall entirely into rebel hands; the eastern Deir el-Zour province; the border town of Azaz; and the corridor leading to Aleppo, once a main route for journalists going into Syria."As long as kidnappings are permitted to continue unabated, journalists will not be willing to undertake assignments inside Syria, and they will no longer be able to serve as witnesses to the events taking place within Syria's borders," the letter said.Signatories to the letter are the AP, Agence France Presse, Reuters, BBC, The New York Times, The Washington Post, The Wall Street Journal, Atlantic Media, The Economist, Getty Images, The Guardian, the Los Angeles Times and The Telegraph.The open letter is being sent to the leadership of the Western-backed mainstream Free Syrian Army and to individual armed groups including the Islamic Front, an umbrella organization of six of the most powerful brigades in Syria.Syria's rebels are a disparate group of brigades and battalions, increasingly dominated by Islamic extremists, including al-Qaida-linked groups such as the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant and Jabhat al-Nusra.The closest thing to a central command is the Supreme Military Council of the Free Syrian Army, headed by Gen. Salim Idris, a secular-minded moderate. But he holds limited sway over the myriad groups inside Syria, some of which have broken away from the Free Syrian Army, announcing that the group did not represent them. Infighting between the extremists and moderates is on the rise, undermining their fight against President Bashar Assad.While jihadi groups are believed responsible for most kidnappings since the summer, government-backed militias, criminal gangs and rebels affiliated with the Free Syrian Army also have been involved. Their motives have ranged from ransom to prisoner exchanges.The Syrian National Coalition, Syria's main opposition group in exile considered to be the political arm of the Free Syrian Army, condemned the kidnapping of journalists in a statement issued Wednesday."The Syrian Coalition and the General Staff of the Free Syrian Army reiterate their commitment to exerting all efforts necessary to secure the release of all kidnapped persons and provide protection to journalists and human rights activists operating in Syria," the statement said.The New York-based Committee to Protect Journalists says approximately 30 foreign and Syrian journalists are missing and 55 have been killed since Syria's civil war began in early 2011. CPJ also has documented at least 26 other journalists who disappeared this year but are now safe.Many of the abduction cases go unreported at the request of the families or employers. News organizations on a case-by-case basis are inclined to respect such requests, regardless of the identity of the person abducted, if they are convinced that publication would increase the danger for the victim.On Tuesday, the families of two Spanish journalists abducted nearly three months ago appealed publicly for their release, after failing to make contact with the captors via intermediaries. Javier Espinosa, Middle East bureau chief of El Mundo newspaper, and Ricardo Garcia Vilanova, a freelance photographer who was traveling with him, were taken captive Sept. 16 by members of the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant at a checkpoint in the northeastern Raqqa province, the families said.In the letter, the 13 news organizations said it was "imperative" for the leadership of the armed opposition to commit itself to assuring that journalists can work within Syria, secure from the threat of kidnapping."Among other things, we ask the leadership to assist in identifying those groups currently holding journalists and take the steps necessary to bring about their release," the statement said.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syria is hitting back at Saudi Arabia for supporting rebels who want to topple President Bashar Assad by promoting an English-language movie that depicts the founder of the monarchy as a bloodthirsty womanizer."King of the Sands" opened to much fanfare under tight security Thursday at the Damascus Opera House despite calls from the Saudi royal family to have it banned, underlining the unprecedented downturn in relations between the two countries.The much-touted first screening, attended by more than 1,000 officials and VIPs amid a raging civil war, demonstrated how far Syrian authorities were willing to go to lash out at the oil-rich kingdom, which they accuse of funding the uprising and sending scores of suicide bombers and extremists into Syria. Several mortar shells crashed about 100 meters (yards) from the venue during the screening."King of the Sands" is directed by Najdat Anzour, one of Syria's best-known producers and most acclaimed directors, who is also an Assad supporter. The movie debuted in London at a private screening on Sept. 11, a date that Anzour suggested he had chosen to highlight that the terrorists who carried out the 9/11 terrorist attacks in the U.S. had their roots in Saudi Arabia.The film purports to show events leading up to the creation of Saudi Arabia in 1932. In the movie, King Abdul-Aziz Al Saud is portrayed as a merciless ruler fighting opponents with a sword, commanding that the hands of thieves be cut off, ordering the stoning of couples for having premarital sex, and taking numerous wives himself. He is also shown as a man who enjoys underage women."What's wrong with blood? A kingdom is only taken with blood. The sultan will never be obeyed but by the sword," Abdul-Aziz, played by Italian actors Fabio Testi and Marco Foschi, is shown as saying in the film."A sword was raised for the sake of the kingdom and the sultan making the sand soaked with blood," a narrator says.The movie has enraged the Saudi monarchy.Prince Talal bin Abdul-Aziz, a half brother of Saudi King Abdullah, posted a statement on his official Twitter account this month, saying he had asked a mutual friend of Assad to try to convince the president to ban the movie."I hope he responds positively in honoring King Abdul-Aziz as a person," the Saudi prince wrote, adding: "We cannot let such unsuccessful works tarnish the image of a great historical figure like King Abdul-Aziz."The movie, which uses clichés and crude language to make its point, breaks longstanding taboos when it comes to criticism of Saudi Arabia in the Arab world. The Saudi monarch is the custodian of Islam's two holiest shrines in Mecca and Medina, a position that lends him special importance and influence.Fadia Kiwan, a political science professor at Beirut's St. Joseph University, said showing a movie that tarnishes symbols in Saudi Arabia may bring relations "to the point of no return."There has rarely been any warmth in the Syria-Saudi relationship, which plummeted in 2005 after the assassination of former Lebanese Prime Minister Rafik Hariri, one of the kingdom's closest allies. Syria denied involvement but was blamed by many.After the monthlong war in 2006 between Israel and the Syria-backed Lebanese Hezbollah, Assad called King Abdullah and other Arab leaders "half-men" for being critical of the militant group. That led to a severe strain in relations, and during an Arab summit in Damascus in 2008, the Saudi delegation was headed by the ambassador to Syria in a clear snub to Assad.Relations later improved, only to plunge again when the Syrian uprising began in 2011. The Saudi king was among the first to criticize Assad's military crackdown on protesters, and as it turned more militant, the kingdom emerged as a chief backer of the rebels seeking to bring down Assad.The Saudi-owned Al Arabiya channel is often referred to in Syrian state media as the "blood channel," and Syrian authorities regularly single out the kingdom as an exporter of terrorism to Syria. Damascus has complained to the U.N. Security Council about Saudi Arabia's support for armed groups in Syria.Last month, Assad was quoted by state media as saying that "Saudi Arabia is leading the widest sabotage campaign in the Arab world." He added that Saudi Arabia has mobilized tens of thousands of extremist fighters and is paying $2,000 a month for anyone carrying weapons.Syria says its troops are fighting Sunni radical extremists that are referred to takfiris or salafis. They also refer to them as Wahhabis, a reference to the kingdom's strict interpretation of Islam."Personally, I strongly encourage this movie," Syrian Cabinet minister Ali Haidar told The Associated Press this week. "Relations might mend once Saudi Arabia corrects its policy, halts its support of terrorism and apologizes for what had happened in Syria."Anzour said he has received death threats over the film.He said the movie was carried out with "the help of friends who believe in my work," and was filmed in several Arab countries that he refused to identify, adding that the actors are from Europe, Turkey and some Arab states."The seeds of terrorism are the work of the fanatic salafi, Wahhabi terrorist ideology that has become an epidemic that needs to be eradicated," he told the AP in Damascus."From here came the idea to highlight part of the region's history and how this kingdom was established and under what circumstances," he said.Anzour is no stranger to controversy. He was widely criticized earlier this year for entering the Damascus suburb of Daraya with army protection to shoot a Ramadan soap opera series, "Under the Homeland Sky," at a time when the area was being attacked by government troops.He also received death threats and blistering criticism for an earlier series on suicide bombers in which he condemned terrorism by Islamic extremists as a global threat that hurts Muslims."King of the Sands" will appear in Syrian theaters this week following a heavy advertising campaign on state-run TV.
BEIRUT — Islamist rebels killed at least 15 civilians from the minority Alawite and Druze sects in the central Syrian city of Adra on Wednesday and Thursday, the pro-opposition Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said.One other victim was a pro-government fighter, said the British-based monitoring group, which has a network of sources across Syria.Syria's Sunni Muslim majority has largely joined the revolt against President Bashar al-Assad, who is an Alawite, while minority sects have largely stood behind him in the conflict that has killed more than 125,000 since it began in March 2011.Many cities in Syria have become segregated along sectarian lines but Adra - strategically important as one of the rebels' only routes into Damascus - has mostly resisted that.Witnesses, activists and Syrian state media accused the Islamic Front, an alliance of several large rebel groups, and the al Qaeda-linked Nusra Front of carrying out the attacks.One woman in Adra, who said she was too frightened to say what religious minority she was from, told Reuters armed men from the Islamic Front and the Nusra Front entered her family's house around 3 a.m. (0100 GMT) on Thursday and took her son.The militants said her son would be returned, but he was still missing on Thursday afternoon, she said.Adra, about 20 km (12 miles) northeast of Damascus, has a population of about 100,000 including Alawites, Druze, Christians and Sunni Muslims.Activists on social media said some residents had fled the city while others were hiding in their basements.Several blamed the Army of Islam, an Islamic Front member group led by Zahran Alloush, and some put the death toll as high as 40, but these reports could not be independently verified."Zahran Alloush has committed a massacre," one activist based in the Damascus suburbs told Reuters.State news agency SANA said the army was sending troops to "restore security" in the city."Terrorist groups belonging to the Nusra Front infiltrated the residential area of Adra in the suburbs of Damascus and attacked residents in their homes," it said, using its term for rebels fighting against Assad.
Thirteen international news organizations, including the BBC, The Associated Press and The New York Times, have written a letter to the armed opposition in Syria asking for assurances that their reporters will not be abducted.Over the past year, the letter says, the organizations have "witnessed a disturbing rise in the kidnapping of journalists while on assignment within the northern provinces of Aleppo, Idlib and al-Raqqa," and elsewhere in Syria. The organizations estimate that more than 30 journalists are now being held, the letter said, and that as a result many of them have "decided to limit their coverage of the war.""We understand that, as in any war zone, reporters face great risk of injury and death," the letter says, "and we accept those risks, but the risk of kidnapping is unacceptable, and the leadership is in a position to reduce and eliminate risk."Other news organizations signing the letter are The Washington Post, The Wall Street Journal, The Los Angeles Times, Reuters, Agence France-Presse, Atlantic Media, The Economist, The Guardian, The Telegraph and Getty Images.The Committee to Protect Journalists, in a blog post about the letter, said that even "the Iraq War, the deadliest conflict for journalists" since the committee was founded, "did not reach such chilling numbers." There have been seven abductions in the past two months alone, the organization said, and at least one journalist has been tortured while in captivity.
BEIRUT — Warehouses captured by Islamic militants in Syria last weekend contained a cache of machine guns and ammunition intended for Syria's Western-backed rebels, a senior opposition official said Friday, demanding the gear be returned.The comments by Monzer Akbik of the Syrian National Opposition group were a startling indication of the rapidly expanding rivalry between Syria's moderate rebel factions and Islamic groups whose rising power and influence has deprived Washington and its European allies of an effective partner inside Syria.The seizure by fighters loyal to Syria's newly created Islamic Front, an umbrella group of powerful, mostly ultra-conservative Islamic fighters, prompted the U.S. and Britain to suspend nonlethal military aid to the opposition in northern Syria, fearing that it could fall into the hands of Islamic extremists. Such non-lethal aid, often equipment such as night vision goggles, laptop computers and secure radios, was also in the warehouses.The incident dealt a serious blow to the Syrian opposition, which is struggling to maintain international support as extremists expand their hold across rebel-held territories.Akbik acknowledged the urgent need to revamp the FSA, adding there was a risk of "complete chaos" if the group is not restructured.Also Friday, Syrian soldiers surrounded an industrial area near Damascus after an al-Qaida linked rebel faction infiltrated it earlier this week, reportedly killing dozens of civilians, the government and activists said.Jabhat al-Nusra, also known as the Nusra Front, entered buildings housing workers and their families, shooting men, women and children in Adra, northeast of the capital, according to the reports. Most residents of the area are from the minority Alawite and Druse sects, which largely support President Bashar Assad in his fight against mainly Sunni rebels.The exact death toll could not be determined. State-run Syrian TV reported that scores of civilians have been killed since Wednesday, prompting the army to surround the town.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said it has documented the names of 19 civilians killed — mostly Alawites and Druse — and many more were feared dead after the rampage.Akbik told reporters in London that it still wasn't completely clear how the Islamic Front came to control the warehouses at the Bab al-Hawa border crossing between Syria and Turkey."The reality is that the Islamic Front are holding, now, the hardware," he said. "They should return it."Akbik said Gen. Salim Idris, the Free Syrian Army commander, was in southern Turkey meeting with members of the Islamic Front to demand the return of the weapons.On Friday, the alliance's military spokesman, Islam Alloush, said he had no information about such a meeting, adding: "What is there to talk about?"There are conflicting stories over how the Islamic Front won control of the warehouses. The Islamic Front denies that it took the weapons by force, saying it was responding to a call for help from the Free Syrian Army after the group came under attack from unknown gunmen.Akbik refused to give any details on what happened, saying the situation was "foggy," but said ammunition — mostly AK-47 bullets — and heavy machine guns were seized.U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry said U.S. officials have been in touch with Idris to inventory the equipment that was in the warehouse raided by the Islamic Front."We are in discussions with our friend and consulting with the opposition about our next steps in support of the Syrian people," he said at a press conference in Jerusalem.With just about a month to go before the start of internationally brokered peace talks to end the civil war, Assad's forces have stepped up a punishing offensive against rebels in a mountainous region near the border with Lebanon.The fractured opposition movement has been losing ground militarily as rebel factions turn their guns against each other.Despite the incident, Akbik said the opposition was still hoping to include Islamic fighters as part of their delegation to the peace talks which are scheduled to start Jan. 22, which aim to end the fighting that activists say has killed over 120,000 people in three years.He said the opposition was "keen to form a delegation that will be as wide as possible" and that the Islamic Front was welcome to send a representative to the talks as part of the opposition delegation.The Syrian conflict began in March 2011 as a popular uprising against Assad that quickly deteriorated into a civil war.The country's 23 million people belong to a patchwork of different religious groups, and the three-year conflict has taken on increasingly sectarian overtones in the past year, particularly as fighting brigades composed of al-Qaida loyalists gain influence.Assad is an Alawite, an offshoot of Shiite Islam, as are many of his security forces. Other minorities in the country including Christians, Druse and Shiites have mostly sided with Assad or remained on the fence, fearing a takeover of the country by Islamic extremists.Also Friday, fighters of the al-Qaida-linked group the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant kidnapped 120 Kurdish civilians from a town in the northern Aleppo province near the border with Turkey, the Observatory said. It said at least six women were among those taken by the rebel faction. The fate of the abducted civilians is unknown, the Observatory said.Meanwhile in Lebanon, snow fell on northern and eastern regions where tens of thousands of Syrian refugees are staying, many of them in flimsy plastic tents. Syrian refugees struggled to keep tents in place and were seen gathering sticks of wood from nearby fields to use them for heating. Families crammed into damp, muddy tents struggling to keep warm. In some cases, Syrian children came out of their tents to play with the snow.
UNITED NATIONS — Chemical weapons were used repeatedly in the Syria conflict this year, not only in a well-documented Aug. 21 attack near Damascus but also in four other instances, including two subsequent attacks that targeted soldiers, the United Nations said in a report released Thursday.The report, prepared by chemical weapons specialists and doctors who traveled to Syria to conduct interviews and collect samples amid fighting, is the most comprehensive independent assessment of facts and allegations surrounding the use of chemical weapons in the conflict.It was the first time the United Nations asserted as fact that chemical weapons had been used on multiple occasions in the fighting between the forces of President Bashar al-Assad and the insurgents seeking to topple him, including chemical weapons use after world outrage over the Aug. 21 attack, which killed hundreds of civilians, including children.A preliminary version of the report, which was released on Sept. 16 and focused only on the Aug. 21 attack near Damascus, played a role in developments that ultimately led to an agreement in which the Syrian government pledged to destroy all of its chemical munitions.The destruction, which the United Nations is helping to oversee, has been proceeding for two months and is considered a conspicuous success in what is an increasingly grim conflict that has claimed more than 100,000 lives."The United Nations Mission concludes that chemical weapons have been used in the ongoing conflict between the parties in the Syrian Arab Republic," the final United Nations report stated.Secretary General Ban Ki-moon received the final version on Thursday and made it public about half an hour later.The authors, members of a panel led by the Swedish scientist Ake Sellstrom, studiously avoided saying who was responsible in any of the attacks, saying it was their mandate only to ascertain whether they had taken place.In the preliminary report on the Aug. 21 attack, findings implicated Mr. Assad's military by documenting the shape of the munitions and the precise direction from which two had been fired. But in the other attacks investigated by the panel in the final report, it is much less clear who was responsible.In some, the panel said it could not establish a link between the actual attack and the victims, either because the investigators could not travel to the site or because they could not directly collect chemical or medical samples.The report said the panel had corroborated "credible allegations" that chemical weapons were used in the first reported attack — a March 19 episode involving soldiers and civilians in Khan al-Assal in the country's north. The investigators could not travel there, though, so verification was impossible.United Nations officials had been locked in an argument with the Syrian government for months over access to that site. It became inaccessible later because of heavy fighting. The United Nations disarmament chief, Angela Kane, said in an interview this fall that the failure to investigate that first chemical attack had haunted her.Each side in the conflict accused the other in that attack. The Syrian government pressed the United Nations to investigate that site alone, but the United Nations insisted on investigating other sites as well, which Syria refused. In the following months, the Khan al-Assal area was seized by insurgents linked to Al Qaeda, rendering travel there by the weapons inspectors too risky.And so, the panel of experts said, they interviewed medical and military personnel involved in the rescue operations at Khan al-Assal. The report said, "None of the parties in the Syrian Arab Republic denied the use of chemical weapons" in Khan al-Assal.Syria also insisted that chemical weapons had been used against its soldiers after the Aug. 21 attack. The report said there was evidence supporting "the probable use of chemical weapons" in two episodes in the Damascus area — in Jobar on Aug. 24 and Ashrafiah Sahnaya on Aug. 25. In both cases, the report said, chemical weapons may have been used on "a relatively small scale against soldiers."The report also concluded that chemical weapons had been used in the northwest town of Saraqeb on April 29, based on evidence that included interviews with medical clinicians, medical records and organ samples of a deceased victim.
DAMASCUS, Syria — The United Nations' humanitarian chief briefly visited Syria Saturday, where she discussed with officials ways of improving winter conditions for millions of people displaced by the country's civil war as a harsh snow storm struck the region.Valerie Amos said her trip to Syria from Lebanon was delayed because of the storm, which has worsened the misery of Syrian refugees, many of whom are living in tents without heating."I have also just been in Lebanon and was able there to talk to the (U.N.) team about the programs we have been putting in place to help people through the winter," Amos said in brief remarks in the Syrian capital. "Winter is extremely harsh as you can see. I was delayed on my own trip over here."Amos met with Foreign Minister Walid al-Moallem, his deputy Faysal Mikdad and Minister of Social Affairs Kinda Shammat before she headed back to Lebanon in the early afternoon.Shammat said following her meeting with Amos that the two sides have agreed on more cooperation with "international organizations to bring in all aids to all Syrian areas and to those who deserve those aids." She did not elaborate.The storm, which began on Wednesday, stuck large parts of Syria as well as Lebanon and Jordan where hundreds of thousands of Syrians have fled since the country's crisis began in March 2011. The civil war has left more than 120,000 people dead.By Saturday afternoon, the weather improved and the skies became clear as the storm, dubbed Alexa, was reaching its end. Despite the clear skies however, temperatures remained near freezing forcing many Syrian refugees in Lebanon to stay in their tents.In the border Lebanese town of Arsal, which is home to more than 40,000 Syrian refugees, activists distributed dozens of diesel heaters. But there were not enough for everyone.Baseem al-Atrash, who heads the Jusour al-Nour or Bridges of Hope organization, said some refugees in tents in the town were still without heaters. He added that they were distributing 20 liters of diesel for every family."There were families covering themselves with blankets and shivering in the cold," al-Atrash said by telephone from Arsal. He added that many refugees went to the town's clinics asking for medicines.Lebanese police spokesman Lt. Col. Joseph Musalam said they did not receive any reports of refugee deaths as a result of the storm.On Friday, a Lebanese security official said a three-month-old Syrian baby died in the northern town of Akroum. The official, who spoke on condition of anonymity in line with regulations, said the newborn had respiratory problems and the cold spell may have aggravated his condition.In Syria, the Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said two men were found frozen to death Saturday near the central town of Houla in the Homs province. The Observatory added that a local commander of the Suqour al-Sham rebel group was found frozen to death in the northwestern province of Idlib.In Beirut, Italian Prime Minister Enrico Letta met his Lebanese counterpart Najib Mikati and promised that Rome will give $50 million in aid to help Beirut's efforts in the refugee crisis.Lebanon, a country of 4.5 million, is hosting more than a million refugees.Also Friday, the commander of the main Western-backed rebel group Gen. Salim Idris made his first public statements since Islamic militants captured warehouses in Syria last weekend that contained a cache of machine guns and ammunition intended for his group.The seizure by fighters loyal to Syria's newly created Islamic Front, an umbrella group of powerful, mostly ultra-conservative Islamic fighters, prompted the U.S. and Britain to suspend nonlethal military aid to the opposition in northern Syria, fearing that it could fall into the hands of Islamic extremists. Such non-lethal aid, often equipment such as night vision goggles, laptop computers and secure radios, was also in the warehouses.The incident dealt a serious blow to the Syrian opposition, which is struggling to maintain international support as extremists expand their hold across rebel-held territories.Idris, the Free Syrian Army commander, told Al-Arabiya TV that "negotiations are ongoing and our aim with the brothers in the Islamic Front is to unite our stances." He did not elaborate, adding that he was speaking from an area on the Turkish-Syrian border.
FAYADA, Lebanon — In a cold so biting that exposed fingers quickly start to ache, Syrian children in plastic sandals trudge through mud and chunks of ice, their tiny feet red from exposure.Young girls pick their way across hillocks of garbage to dip up cloudy water from a shallow well and collect some of the trash to burn for heat. The luckier ones wear rubber boots and wool sweaters; many shiver in cotton sweatshirts and thin leggings. At night, parents sleep entwined with their children, fending off the fate of several infants just across the border in Syria who, in the snowstorms of recent days, froze to death.This is just one of the hundreds of informal, scattered camps that house most of the several hundred thousand Syrians who have fled to Lebanon. Already suffering from shortages of food aid, schooling, clean water, sanitation and employment, Syrians displaced inside the country and throughout the region — about nine million people — now must contend with bitter weather that, according to Unicef, threatens more than 100,000 children living in temporary and often flimsy shelters in Lebanon alone.The stormy cold has descended over much of the Middle East. While snow is common in Lebanon and parts of Syria, some Cairenes saw snow for the first time in their lives and Jerusalem this week recorded the heaviest December snowfall since the 1950s.Here, among farm fields now spotted with snow, scores of Syrians, mostly farming families from the northeastern province of Raqqa, have been living for several months in and around a roofless, ruined building that was once an onion processing plant. They left their village, Sweida, they said, after masked rebels entered the town and government airstrikes began.Families huddle in shacks that they built themselves, stitching together burlap sacks or hoisting bright plastic tarps advertising goods they cannot afford. Some of the shelters have flooded, their dirt floors covered with soggy cloth, and their occupants fear that as more snow piles on, they will collapse.The wind drove stinging, sand-like snowflakes across the old factory grounds on Friday afternoon as Abdullah Arat teetered across slippery mud, wearing a light blazer over a cotton gown and sandals, a red kaffiyeh wrapped around his head. In the distance, new snow had covered the mountains leading to the Syrian border."We are dying from this cold," Mr. Arat said, lifting the flap of a damp shack that still awaits a heater promised by aid groups. His children are coughing and suffering from diarrhea, he said; he married off two daughters, 15 and 16 years old, hoping they would be better off.A flock of small boys trotted by. "Bring us clothes!" one shouted. "We are cold!" called another.To stay warm, families sleep piled together. One neighbor said wryly, "The single people have no one to cuddle them." Abu Ayham said if he had the money, he would rather return to Raqqa, despite the bombs and the extremists who now control it. Mr. Arat scoffed: "It's not safe."Nearby, a 2-year-old girl played barefoot, an infected sore on her instep from a stove burn. Other children had cold sores blotching their faces, but shouted and laughed as they chased each other between laundry lines.The closest school cannot fit all the children. Those who go must walk half a mile along a highway; one boy was recently killed by a car on his way. United Nations workers are training camp residents to run their own school.For now, Mariam, a petite 10-year-old with daisy-shaped earrings and a composed and intelligent gaze, has appointed herself teacher. She gathers the smaller children for lessons in a chilly factory outbuilding, channeling a favorite teacher she misses from back home."Every night she takes out a notebook and a pen," said her mother, Nadia Karbo, 26. "In Syria, they never missed a day of school, even when they were sick."The cold is only the latest worry for Ms. Karbo, who said, "Our children are missing their future.""I want to see a sign that says 'Doctor' with my son's name on it," she added, framing a rectangle in the air with her hands and gazing intently, as if she could see it.
UNITED NATIONS — The United Nations secretary general on Friday said that those who used chemical weapons in Syria should be brought to justice, even as a team of United Nations investigators said their inquiries alone could not establish who did what."The international community has a moral and political responsibility to hold accountable those responsible, to deter future incidents and to ensure that chemical weapons can never re-emerge as an instrument of warfare," the secretary general, Ban Ki-moon, told members of the General Assembly on Friday. His remarks came as he discussed the final report of a United Nations-appointed panel of experts charged with investigating allegations of the use of chemical weapons.That group concluded in a report submitted Thursday that chemical arms had been used in at least five instances between March and August. Corroborating the accusations proved hard: The investigators could not travel to some of the sites in question or inspect the munitions used. Instead, they relied on the testimony of witnesses and in some cases, medical tests.Speaking to reporters late Friday, members of the team took pains to say that others, namely United Nations human rights officials, would have to undertake additional forensic investigations to determine who did what.
ROME — Italy has agreed to provide a port for use in the transfer of Syria's chemical weapons arsenal between ships on the way to its destruction at sea, its Foreign Ministry said Sunday.Syria is due to hand over deadly toxins which can be used to make sarin, VX gas and other lethal agents under an international agreement forged in the wake of an attack on the outskirts of Damascus which killed hundreds last August.Danish and Norwegian ships will collect the toxic arsenal from the Syrian port city of Latakia. The chemicals will be destroyed at sea on board a specially adapted U.S. ship because they are too dangerous to import into a country.Until now, it was not clear how the containers of chemicals could be transferred from the Scandinavian ships onto the U.S. vessel.An Italian Foreign Ministry official said the use of the port was the maximum role Italy was prepared to serve in the operation, and that the chemicals would not touch Italian territory at any point.The official would not identify which port would be used.Syria's 2-1/2-year civil war has killed at least 125,835 people, according to Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, and over 2 million refugees have fled, often overwhelming neighboring countries.
BEIRUT — Syrian government aircraft dropped barrels packed with explosives on opposition-held areas of the contested northern city of Aleppo on Sunday, leveling buildings, incinerating cars and killing at least 37 people including 16 children, activists said.Aleppo has been a major front in the Syrian civil war since rebels launched an offensive on the city in mid-2012. Nearly a year and a half of fighting has destroyed much of the city, while also cutting it up into rebel-held and government-controlled areas.On Sunday, government helicopters pounded the opposition neighborhoods of Haidariya, Ard al-Hamra, Sukhour, Marjeh and at least two others with barrel bombs, the Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said. Observatory director Rami Abdurrahman said Syrian air force jets were also flying sorties over the same districts.The government frequently uses barrel bombs, which contain hundreds of kilograms (pounds) of explosives and cause massive damage on impact.The Aleppo Media Center activist group said government aircraft dropped at least 25 barrel bombs on the city Sunday.One amateur video provided by the AMC showed the aftermath of a strike on a roundabout in Haidariya where an informal station for transport vans was located. In the video, residents investigate the smoldering wreckage of at least three vehicles destroyed in the bombing. Sirens wail in the background.Another amateur video posted online showed the aftermath of a strike on Sukhour. The footage shows a crowd gathered in a narrow street littered with shattered masonry and other rubble from a house that appeared to have been hit by the airstrike.The videos appeared genuine and corresponded to other AP reporting.The Observatory, which monitors the conflict through a network of activists on the ground, also said the number people killed in the town of Adra northeast of Damascus after an al-Qaida-linked rebel faction attacked on Wednesday has risen to 32.Abdurrahman said the dead are primarily members the Alawite sect, as well as a few Druse and Shiite Muslims.The killings point at the dark sectarian overtones the conflict has taken on since the uprising against President Bashar Assad began with largely peaceful protests in March 2011.Assad is an Alawite, and members of the offshoot of Shiite Islam form the core of his security forces. Other minorities in the country, including Christians, Druse and Shiites, have mostly sided with Assad or remained on the fence, fearing a takeover of the country by Islamic extremists. The rebels, meanwhile, are primarily Sunni Muslims.The Observatory and Syria's SANA state news agency both reported fighting in Adra on Sunday.
ISTANBUL — Syrian rebel leaders said they would do all they could to protect journalists but were hampered by infighting, after international news organizations complained kidnappings were preventing full media coverage of the civil war.In a letter over the weekend, the western-backed Supreme Military Council (SMC), which is in charge of the rebel Free Syrian Army (FSA), said it would seek to free all journalists who have been abducted.At least 30 journalists are estimated by media organizations to be being held.The SMC is the main body representing moderate rebel fighters but it has no sway over extremist groups suspected of carrying out abductions."It is imperative that we reiterate that the FSA, along with all of its units and brigades, will do its utmost to protect and support journalists in order that they can fulfill their vital work," a letter from the SMC said.On Wednesday editors from 13 media companies, including Reuters, called on Syrian rebel leaders to stop armed groups kidnapping journalists.Kidnappings are common in rebel-held northern areas around Aleppo, Idlib and Raqqa. The Committee to Protect Journalists has recorded at least seven abductions in the past two months alone.Despite a series of groups defecting and forming their own alliances, the SMC remains the main rebel coalition but brigades aligned with it have their own identities and separate commands.The SMC said it would try to ensure the letter is sent to "all unit commanders and brigades operating within Syria, who share in the values of freedom, justice and democracy".But it added: "We are today, however, facing the challenges of infighting in some of the liberated areas and in a number of areas we face ongoing clashes with the regime and the militia groups who support it."
UNITED NATIONS — The United States is urging the U.N. Security Council to condemn violence by all parties in Syria and express outrage at Syrian government airstrikes, especially this week's indiscriminate use of heavy weapons in Aleppo that killed more than 100 people.A proposed council statement would express deep concern at the escalating level of violence in the Syrian conflict, including the use of SCUD missiles and "barrel bombs" in Aleppo.The draft, obtained Wednesday by The Associated Press, would reiterate the council's call for greater access for humanitarian workers, and welcome the Jan. 22 peace conference in Geneva to try to end the Syrian conflict.Council members have been deeply divided over Syria. The U.S. Mission said the statement will be adopted if there are no objections by Thursday morning.
BEIRUT — The mother and brother of a British surgeon who died in a Syrian prison days before his planned release this week are pleading with authorities to return the man's body and put an end to their family's 13-month ordeal.Fatima Khan said the government has not released the body of her son Abbas, an orthopedic surgeon from south London who had been imprisoned since last November after traveling to rebel-held Aleppo to offer his medical services."If you wouldn't give him to me alive, at least give me his dead body," she said between sobs during an interview with Reuters on Wednesday.Fatima, who doesn't speak Arabic but spent the past five months in war-torn Damascus working for her son's release, said authorities had promised to release him this week. But when she went to pick him up on Monday, she was told he had killed himself.The Khan family, who are of Indian origin, said it's inconceivable that Abbas committed suicide and suspects foul play."He was not a man that was in despair or had lost hope. He wasn't in that state of mind. He was cheerful," his brother Afroze told Reuters. "That sort of man doesn't commit suicide. It is a falsehood for anyone to say otherwise."Afroze said his brother's case was being handled by a civil court until last week when he was transferred to the headquarters of the Syrian national security agency. He said the last minute change in custody "raises questions that somewhere in the intelligence community in Syria there was a change of heart."Hundreds of Western Europeans are suspected of picking up arms in the conflict, but Fatima said her son was a humanitarian, not a fighter. "His profession was to give life not to take life," she said.She said she suspects her son's British nationality contributed to his death."When National Security came to know that it's a big fish and he's a Britisher, they thought, 'The British did so much to us, why should we let him go?'"She said she would not accept the Syrian government's invitation to send a team of foreign doctors to perform an autopsy on her son's body in Damascus."We don't want an investigation," she said. "He's dead now, just give us his body and we'll go."Fatima said the British government did not do enough to help rescue her son.The foreign office said it had frequently sought consular access to Khan as well as information on his detention, both directly and through the Russians, Czechs and others. Britain closed its embassy in Damascus in February 2012."These requests have consistently been ignored," it said in a statement on Tuesday.After security forces repressed peaceful protests against more than 40 years of President Bashar al-Assad's family rule in 2011, an armed revolt ensued with an increasingly sectarian element.Well over 100,000 people have been killed and millions forced from their homes.
PARIS — Reporters Without Borders says fewer journalists were killed this year than last, but many more were kidnapped.The media freedom watchdog said Wednesday that 71 journalists have been killed in connection with their work this year. That is a decrease from last year's 88, but 2012 was considered an exceptionally deadly year and this year's toll is still above those in recent years.The civil war in Syria has significantly contributed to the rise in journalist deaths in the past two years. Ten were killed in Syria this year.The conflict in Syria also contributed to a dramatic increase in journalist kidnappings, which more than doubled to 87. Reporters Without Borders said the abductions in Syria — of which there were 49 this year — were also becoming more systematic.
WASHINGTON — Lawmakers accused the U.S. Senate's Democratic leaders of stifling debate on everything from Iran sanctions to terrorist detention policy on Wednesday as they began considering the annual defense policy bill under rules barring amendments.The measure would authorize a Pentagon base budget of $526.8 billion in 2014, plus $17.6 billion for nuclear weapons programs in the Energy Department and $7.7 billion in mandatory defense spending. It also calls for $80.7 billion for the war in Afghanistan and other overseas operations.The bill - the National Defense Authorization Act - would add legislative teeth to the military's effort to crack down on sexual assault, and it would boost President Barack Obama's efforts to close the prison for suspected terrorists at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba.The measure, which was passed by the House of Representatives last week, is expected to be voted on by the Senate this week before being sent to President Barack Obama for his signature.Senator Carl Levin, the chairman of the Senate Armed Services Committee, said the bill included more than 30 provisions to help address the problem of sexual assault in the military, including providing attorneys for victims and making it a crime to retaliate against people who report assaults.The bill did not include tougher measures advocated by Senator Kirsten Gillibrand, who had sought to amend the measure to place decisions about prosecuting sexual assault crimes in the hands of special attorneys rather than officers in the victim's chain of command.Republican lawmakers expressed frustration over Senate Majority Leader Harry Reid's deal to bar amendments on the bill. Debate on the measure stalled last month over efforts to limit the hundreds of amendments offered in the Senate.Under a compromise deal, leaders of the Armed Services committees in the House of Representatives and Senate cobbled together a new authorization act. The House passed the measure last week before adjourning for the year. The Senate concludes its session this week."The majority leader won't allow a robust amendment process because he can't stomach a vote on Iran sanctions," Senate Republican leader Mitch McConnell told lawmakers on Wednesday."What are our policies for preventing the ungoverned portions of Syria from becoming a terrorist safe haven? Unfortunately we will not be having that debate this session of Congress," McConnell said. "What is our policy for capturing, interrogating and detaining terrorists? ... We will not have that debate."The NDAA is considered a must-pass piece of legislation. Failure to approve it would result in the expiration of a variety of annual authorizations, including those for incentive pay, depriving troops of about $1.5 billion in income, a defense official said.Although the NDAA authorizes spending levels, it does not actually provide the funding. That is done through a separate appropriations bill. The Pentagon can spend appropriated funds even without an authorization act, the defense official said, but it does require authorization for some types of spending."The underlying bill is an important one," McConnell said. "It contains the authorization needed for key military construction projects on our military bases, for multi-year procurement that's more efficient ... and for combat pay and special pay our troops deserve."Levin said the bill included authorizations that would permit the Defense Department to spend money on the destruction of Syrian chemical weapons and to help Jordan pay to secure its border with Syria, which is in the middle of a civil war.
BEIJING — China is to send a military ship to help protect a specially adapted U.S. vessel that will destroy Syria's chemical weapons arsenal, the Foreign Ministry said on Thursday.Syria is due to hand over deadly toxins which can be used to make sarin, VX gas and other lethal agents under an international agreement forged after an attack on the outskirts of Damascus killed hundreds in August.The chemicals will be destroyed on board the specially adapted U.S. ship because they are too dangerous to import into any country. There is no agreement yet on where the ship will anchor while the work is carried out."China has decided to send a military ship to participate in the protection mission for the shipping of Syrian chemical weapons," ministry spokeswoman Hua Chunying told a daily news briefing.She added that it was an "important move" to show China's support."China hopes that the relevant work on removing Syria's chemical weapons can be completed safely and smoothly. This will assist in pushing for a political resolution to the Syrian issue, will assist in increasing regional peace and stability and accords with the interest of all sides," Hua said.China has repeatedly called for a political resolution. It has also called for a full and impartial investigation by U.N. chemical weapons inspectors and warned against pre-judging the results. It has said that anyone who uses chemical weapons should be held accountable.Chemical weapons were likely used in five out of seven attacks investigated by U.N. experts in Syria, where a two-and-a-half-year civil war has killed more than 100,000 people, a U.N. report said last week.The most serious use was on August 21, when hundreds of people were killed in a sarin gas attack in the outskirts of the capital, Damascus. The worst poison gas attack in a quarter of a century prompted the threat of missile strikes by the United States against the regime of President Bashar al-Assad.A month-long tender for the commercial destruction of hundreds of tonnes of industrial chemicals and toxic waste from Syria's chemical weapons starts on Thursday, with contracts likely to go to a handful of firms.
UNITED NATIONS — Buried in the annex of a United Nations inquiry into chemical weapons use in Syria is information that some outside analysts say could further implicate the government of Syria in the deadliest of the five confirmed attacks.The investigators, who released their final report last week, said they had found a chemical called hexamethylenetetramine from environmental samples in Ghouta, the Damascus suburb that was the site of the deadliest attack, on Aug. 21. Hexamine, as the chemical is also known, can be used as an additive in the production of chemical weapons using sarin, the nerve agent, according to analysts, along with other commercial uses. The Syrian government happens to have a stockpile of hexamine; it is part of a list of chemicals scheduled to be destroyed as part of the deal to dismantle Syria's chemical weapons program.United Nations investigators who conducted the inquiry pointedly steered clear of assigning blame for any of the attacks. The investigators have declined to explain Syria's purpose in amassing the hexamine, a common commercial chemical.But some experts who reviewed the panel's final report said the presence of hexamine at Ghouta was in some ways akin to the police finding red lipstick in a woman's purse that matches collar stains on a murder victim. While considered circumstantial evidence, it added to information in the panel's interim report on Ghouta released in September, on the type of projectiles used that appeared to implicate the Syrian government.The hexamine connection was pointed out last week by Dan Kaszeta, an independent security consultant and former officer in the United States Army's Chemical Corps. He argued that the presence of hexamine pointed to the involvement of the government in the attack on Ghouta."I consider the presence of hexamine both in the field samples and in the official stockpile of the Syrian government to be very damning evidence of government culpability," Mr. Kaszeta wrote on his website.The Syrian government, which has denied carrying out any of the attacks, declared possession of 80 tons of hexamine. It is listed among substances that need to be treated and disposed, according to the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons, or O.P.C.W., a group based in The Hague working with the United Nations to oversee the dismantling of Syria's arsenal.The group in November invited bids from companies that could carry out the disposal. Before that bidding invitation was made public, it had not been widely known that Syria had hexamine. The group has not said whether and how Syria used hexamine.Asked about the presence of hexamine in the annex of the United Nations panel's report, Scott Cairns, a chemical weapons expert who is a member of the panel, would say only that hexamine is a chemical that could be used in the production of weapons using sarin. It is also commonly found in heating fuel, as well as in conventional explosives.Ron Manley, a chemical arms expert who headed the verification team at the Organization for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons from 1993 to 2002, said hexamine was certainly part of the government's chemical weapons arsenal. Otherwise, it would not have been listed on the items that must be destroyed."The fact that they declared it to the O.P.C.W. means it was part of their C.W. program," he said "There's no doubt it was part of their program. What part it played we don't know."Both Mr. Manley and Mr. Kaszeta said hexamine could be particularly valuable in reducing the corrosive effects of what are known as binary sarin weapons. Those weapons can produce highly destructive acids that can corrode even the metal cylinders that hold the nerve agent. Hexamine can neutralize the acids, ensuring that they do not destroy the weapon itself. That could explain, Mr. Kaszeta said, why the government had so much hexamine.While hexamine is not a common additive to stabilize sarin, both analysts said it could have been used for that purpose.Since hexamine is also widely available commercially, analysts noted, it is impossible to point to hexamine's presence on the battlefield as conclusive evidence of who made the chemical weapons used in the Ghouta attack.Other chemists have said hexamine could have been used in the blaster components of the weapons that dispersed the nerve agent, but that would not explain why hexamine was on the list of chemicals in the government's arsenal.The United Nations investigators have repeatedly said that their mandate was limited to establishing the facts of what happened and not who was responsible. They investigated seven possible episodes in all, from March to August. In five, including Ghouta, they found credible evidence that chemical weapons had been used. In Ghouta, they collected the most information, including environmental samples from where the ordnance landed. Their final report was submitted to Ban Ki-moon, the United Nations secretary general, last Thursday and made public.Their report lists several places where they found hexamine in Ghouta, including on the floor and a wall of a house where a rocket had landed, a piece of ordnance from the floor of an outdoor terrace next door, and in a rocket fragment found on a nearby roof.The investigation yielded few details on the four other episodes. The United Nations team was unable to go to the site of the attacks in some cases and could not collect biomedical or environmental samples directly. Unlike in Ghouta, some of the attacks appeared to have been small-scale efforts, using unusual methods, including what witnesses described to be plastic grenades dropped from helicopters.The Syrian government, which has blamed insurgents for all the attacks, has been unusually cooperative in getting rid of its arsenal since making the pledge to ban them in September. The Syrian ambassador to the United Nations, Bashar Jaafari, told reporters on Monday that in his country, "the chapter is closed."
WASHINGTON — President Barack Obama on Friday gave the military a one-year deadline to better prevent and respond to a wave of sexual assault in the ranks and warned that if progress isn't made, he will consider tougher reforms than those approved by Congress.The ultimatum from their commander in chief and pressure from lawmakers puts the onus on the Pentagon to live up to its vows of zero tolerance for sexual assault, or face the potential of losing authority to prosecute offenders in its own courts."So long as our women and men in uniform face the insider threat of sexual assault, we have an urgent obligation to do more to support victims and hold perpetrators accountable for their crimes, as appropriate under the military justice system," Obama said in a statement issued hours after the Senate sent a bill for his signature that would crack down on the crime.The president said he wants Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel and Army Gen. Martin Dempsey, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, to report back to him by Dec. 1, 2014, on improvements they've made preventing and responding to sexual assault."If I do not see the kind of progress I expect, then we will consider additional reforms that may be required to eliminate this crime from our military ranks and protect our brave service members who stand guard for us every day at home and around the world," Obama said in the statement, his first comments in response to sexual assault legislation that has been furiously debated on Capitol Hill in recent months.The Pentagon estimates that 26,000 military members were victims last year.The sexual assault measures were part of a sweeping, $632.8 billion bill the Senate passed on an 84-15 vote late Thursday that also covers combat pay and other benefits, new ships and aircraft and military bases. The legislation also:—Provides $552.1 billion for the regular military budget and $80.7 billion for the war in Afghanistan and other overseas operations, a reflection of deficit-driven efforts to trim spending and the drawdown in a conflict lasting more than a decade.—Gives the administration additional flexibility to move detainees out of the U.S. prison at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, to foreign countries. It stops well short of the president's goal of closing the detention facility and bans detainee transfers to the United States.—Authorizes funds for the destruction of chemical weapons in Syria—Provides money to study the feasibility of establishing a missile defense site on the East Coast.The legislation would strip military commanders of their ability to overturn jury convictions, require a civilian review if a commander declines to prosecute a case and require that any individual convicted of sexual assault face a dishonorable discharge or dismissal. The bill also would provide victims with legal counsel, eliminate the statute of limitations for courts-martial in rape and sexual assault cases, and criminalize retaliation against victims who report a sexual assault. The legislation also would change the military's Article 32 proceedings to limit intrusive questioning of victims, making it more similar to a grand jury.Obama didn't specify what other reforms he would consider to address sexual assault if the military review doesn't meet his standards. The Senate is still debating a contentious proposal from Sen. Kirsten Gillibrand, D-N.Y., that would take away authority for prosecuting accused attackers from military commanders. The White House says Obama hasn't taken a position on the bill, which has been vigorously opposed by the Pentagon, creating a split within the administration.Hagel said in a statement shortly after Obama announced his orders that "we share his commitment to doing whatever it takes to solve this problem." Hagel said he is pleased with the changes to the Uniform Code of Military Justice that were made by Congress and said he's already been making some of the changes required."Sexual assault is a stain on the honor of millions of military men and women, a threat to the discipline and the cohesion of our force, and we will not allow this to stand," Hagel said.The White House said the president remains open to all ideas for reform but that he supports the thrust of the reforms passed by the Senate in Thursday and wants to give them time to work.Gillibrand said she spoke with Obama about the matter Thursday but that she remains committed to earning enough support to pass her legislation, which could come up for a vote as early as next month."I do not want to wait another year to enact the one reform survivors have asked for in removing commanders with no legal training and conflicts of interest from the decision of whether or not to prosecute a rape or sexual assault," she said in a statement. "We have the best fighting force in the world and they deserve a first class justice system. Nowhere in America do we allow a boss to decide if an employee was sexually assaulted or not, except the United States military."Presidential aides said the White House will be working with the Pentagon to develop a set of benchmarks so that the military's review will be rigorous enough to bring about change. They said the review will include all the efforts underway to address the problem, including training and prevention programs and the way the justice system deters the problem and supports victims.The Pentagon has ordered a host of reviews and studies across the department and military services. In March, Hagel ordered a review of the military's justice system in connection with sexual assaults. And a month later he laid out a department-wide sexual assault plan to better coordinate the initiatives being launched across the services.Hagel has been meeting weekly with senior service officers to track the progress of the beefed up training, prevention and treatment programs that the services have put in place over the year. And service members are already taking updated surveys that put increased accountability on commanders to enforce better command climates in their units, including their response to any sexual assault cases.Associated Press writer Lolita C. Baldor contributed to this report.
Hackers breached The Washington Post's computer servers for the third time in three years, the newspaper reported late Wednesday.This time hackers gained access to employee user names and passwords, The Post reported, but it said there was no evidence they obtained subscriber information, like credit cards or home addresses. The paper also said there was no sign the hackers gained access to its publishing system, emails or other personal information of employees, such as their Social Security numbers.The company said it suspected that Chinese hackers were behind the current raid. Post officials said that they were informed of the breach on Wednesday by Mandiant, its web security contractor, and that it lasted less than a week."This is an ongoing investigation, but we believe it was a few days at most," said Kris Coratti, a Post spokeswoman.Ms. Coratti did not release a press statement or take questions about the hack, but instead referred reporters to an article in The Post for further information.The Post system was compromised previously last August, when the Syrian Electronic Army, a hacker collective that supports President Bashar al-Assad of Syria, briefly directed some readers of the paper's website to a site that lauded President Assad and condemned the country's rebels.In 2011,  The Post, as well as The New York Times and The Wall Street Journal, were subject to sophisticated attacks thought to have originated in China. It was believed then that Chinese hackers were looking for sources on stories about the country. At the time, The Post declined to release details of how much information the intruders received, but that first breach was thought to be extensive.On Wednesday, the paper emphasized the brevity of the most recent attack. But at the same time, it asked employees to change their user names and passwords."Although company passwords are stored in encrypted form," said the newspaper's article on the episode, "hackers in some cases have shown the ability to decode such information."
BEIRUT — More than 300 people have been killed in a week of air raids on the northern Syrian city of Aleppo and nearby towns by President Bashar al-Assad's forces, a monitoring group said on Monday.Many of the casualties, who included scores of women and children, were killed by so-called barrel bombs dropped from helicopters, the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said.Syrian authorities say they are battling rebels who have controlled parts of Aleppo, Syria's biggest city, and most of the surrounding countryside for the past 18 months.But human rights group have condemned the use of the improvised bombs - oil drums or cylinders which are packed with explosives and metal fragments, often rolled out of the aircraft cargo bay - as an indiscriminate form of bombardment.Rami Abdulrahman, director of the British-based pro-opposition Observatory, said 87 children and 30 women were among the 301 people killed in the Aleppo air raids since December 15.The United states condemned "the ongoing air assault by Syrian government forces on civilians, including the indiscriminate use of SCUD missiles and barrel bombs in and around Aleppo over the last week."In a statement, the White House also called on the Syrian government to "fulfill its November commitment to do more to facilitate the safe and unhindered delivery of humanitarian assistance, so that millions of Syrian men, women, and children have access to urgently needed services."Assad's forces have clawed back territory to the southeast of the city in recent weeks and reasserted control over several Damascus suburbs in the build-up to planned peace talks next month aimed ending Syria's almost three-year-old conflict.The army is thought unlikely to be able to recapture major parts of Aleppo before the talks in Switzerland start on January 22, but Abdulrahman said the air raids might be aimed instead at turning the remaining residents against the rebel fighters by showing that the insurgents could not protect civilians.The pro-opposition Observatory said more than 125,000 people have been killed in Syria's civil war, which has also forced 2 million people to seek refuge abroad and driven more than a third of the country's 23 million people from their homes.Human Rights Watch said in a report at the weekend that barrel bomb attacks in Aleppo had hit residential and shopping areas, describing the air raids as illegal."The Syrian air force is either criminally incompetent, doesn't care whether it kills scores of civilians, or deliberately targets civilian areas," the group's senior emergency researcher, Ole Solvang, said in the report.Rebels also appeared to have violated international law by indiscriminately launching rockets and mortar bombs at civilian areas in the government-controlled part of Aleppo, Human Rights Watch said.It said on December 4 they fired at least 10 surface-to-surface rockets into residential areas, killing at least 19 civilians.
BEIRUT — A new round of Syrian government air raids on rebel-held areas of the northern city of Aleppo killed at least 15 people on Tuesday, including three children, activists said.The strikes extended the furious aerial assault by President Bashar Assad's warplanes and helicopters on the embattled city into its tenth day. Activists say more than 360 people were killed in the first nine days of the campaign, which began Dec. 15.Tuesday's airstrikes hit the rebel-held Sukkari neighborhood of Aleppo, the Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said, which said at least 15 were killed.Another activist group, the Aleppo Media Center, said at least 33 people were killed and 150 were wounded. Disparate death tolls are common in the chaotic aftermath of such attacks.The Aleppo Media Center said the strikes were carried out by jets and helicopters, and hit at least three sites, causing extensive damage, toppling apartment buildings and setting houses and cars ablaze.The soaring death toll and massive damage caused by the aerial campaign prompted the U.S. and Britain on Monday to both condemn the assault on Aleppo.The main Western-backed Syrian opposition group, the Syrian National Coalition, also threatened Monday that if the bombing campaign against Aleppo continues, it will not take part in U.N.-sponsored peace talks planned for Jan. 22 in Switzerland.The U.S. and Russian-brokered talks aim to find a political solution to Syria's conflict, which has killed more than 120,000 people since it began in March 2011.In Damascus, mortar rounds slammed into the Zablatani neighborhood, killing four people and wounding 20, the state news agency said. Mortar shells believed to be fired by rebels frequently land in central Damascus, causing casualties and damaging buildings.
DAMASCUS, Syria — Syrian government forces ambushed members of an al-Qaida-linked group on Friday, killing dozens of them near a historic Christian village north of Damascus, activists and state media said.State TV said troops surprised fighters of the Jabhat al-Nusra or Nusra Front at dawn near Maaloula, which the group along with other rebels captured in late November for the second time this year. Maaloula had previously been firmly in the government's grip despite being surrounded by rebel-held territory.The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights also said that dozens of opposition fighters were killed, and that 20 were wounded.Maaloula is on the edge of the rugged Qalamoun region, about 60 kilometers (40 miles) northeast of the capital, where the government has been on the offensive for weeks capturing a number of towns and villages in the area.Syrian TV aired footage of dead rebels in an open area with patches of snow. Most of the gunmen were civilian clothes and some still had their rifles. One of the dead had two rocket-propelled-grenades tied to his back.A TV reporter moved toward a wounded rebel who was lying on the ground and asked him what nationalities they had among them, and the wounded gunman responds, "We had Saudi citizens with us."Saudi Arabia is among the strongest backers of Syrian opposition fighters who are trying to remove President Bashar Assad from power.Maaloula was a major tourist attraction before the civil war. Some of its residents still speak a version of Aramaic, a biblical language believed to have been used by Jesus.The village has been under rebel control since last month. Most of Maaloula's 3,300 residents have fled to safer areas.In the northern city of Aleppo, Syria's largest, mortar rounds struck the government-held neighborhood of Jamaliyah killing at least four people, the state news agency SANA and the Observatory said. SANA said 14 people were wounded in the attack while the Observatory put the number of 15.More than 120,000 people have been killed so far in the war, now in its third year, according to the Observatory, a Britain-based watchdog that closely monitors the violence in Syria through a network of activists across the country. The U.N. said in July that 100,000 Syrians have been killed, and has not updated that figure since. Millions of Syrians have been uprooted from their homes because of the fighting.Associated Press writer Bassem Mroue contributed to this report from Beirut.
BEIRUT, Lebanon — The rebel-held Syrian town of Moadhamiya hoisted the government's flag from its tallest building on Thursday as part of a tentative truce deal, a symbolic victory for the government, which has blockaded the town for nearly a year, preventing food and medical supplies from entering.According to antigovernment activists in the town and others familiar with the deal, government security officials had promised in return to bring cooked meals into the town, where doctors and activists say at least half a dozen people have died of malnutrition.But in an indication of the difficulty of striking and keeping such pacts in an atmosphere of deep mistrust, by Thursday evening no food had been delivered, rebels in the town were being accused by comrades elsewhere of striking a deal for money, and the planned 48-hour cease-fire appeared to be threatened by clashes between government and rebel fighters.The government in recent months has stepped up a strategy of pursuing small-scale local cease-fires even as it continues to bombard rebel-held areas and as prospects for a comprehensive peace settlement appear remote.Rebels and activists in Moadhamiya said they were under heavy pressure from the 8,000 civilians there — government supporters put the figure around 3,000 — to accept the deal, despite their suspicion that it was a trick. They also said they believed that daily cooked meals, rather than bulk food supplies that could be stretched out to provide many meals, were being offered as a way to control the town, under threat of stopping the deliveries.The government says the civilians are being held hostage by the fighters, while activists there say the government is using starvation as a weapon of war against the town, which is just outside the city limits of Damascus, the government-held capital.Fighters in Moadhamiya have repeatedly pleaded with rebels elsewhere to help them break the siege, but they face a military challenge because they are sandwiched between important military installations."To this moment we did not get anything," Qusai Zakarya, the nom de guerre of a spokesman for Moadhamiya's rebel council, said Thursday via Skype. "We are just waiting, and all the fighters who let us down are talking and gossiping about us that we sold Moadhamiya out."There appeared to be disagreements over the terms. The spokesman for Moadhamiya's rebel council said initially that the rebels had not agreed to disarm. But later, he and other activists involved in the negotiations said the government would not bring food until rebels gave up their heavy weapons and ejected anyone from the town who was not a legal resident, which would reduce the ranks of rebel fighters.A Syrian Parliament member, George Nakhleh, told the Lebanese television channel Al Mayadeen that after the rebels handed over their heavy weapons, residents would establish armed groups whose job would be to protect the town, an arrangement that sounds much like the pro-government militias operating elsewhere. He said the army would not enter the area but instead would guard it from outside."The army will protect Moadhamiya, but inside the town the residents will protect it," he said. "They will carry weapons and set up checkpoints to prevent the entrance of strangers who came from around the world to destroy our country."Another activist who gave only his first name, Ahmed, said clashes had erupted as government forces tried to approach the town, and rebels had fired back. He said they were trying to keep the response low-key to avoid breaking the truce before food arrives."If the regime does not bring it tomorrow, we will break it forever and no one can blame us," he said.In recent months, several thousand civilians have been evacuated from Moadhamiya in cease-fires brokered between rebels and the government. But the brief truces have ended in recriminations, once when shelling broke out as civilians tried to exit the town, and again when activists said hundreds of civilians were arrested soon after leaving.
BEIRUT — The United Nations appealed on Monday for the Syrian army and rebel fighters to allow urgent aid to reach a Palestinian district of southern Damascus where it said 15 people have died of malnutrition in recent months.U.N. Relief and Works Agency (UNRWA) spokesman Chris Gunness said five Palestinian refugees died in the Yarmouk district over the weekend. Ten others have died since September, the last time the U.N. was able to deliver aid to Yarmouk."The situation has progressively deteriorated for some 20,000 Palestinians trapped inside Yarmouk," he told Reuters."The continued presence of armed groups that entered the area at the end of 2012 and its closure by government forces have thwarted all our humanitarian efforts."Syria is home to half a million Palestinians, refugees of the 1948 conflict which led to the creation of the state of Israel. Before the 2011 uprising against President Bashar al-Assad, many of them lived in the Yarmouk neighborhood on the southern edge of the Syrian capital.But the 2011 protests led to a civil war which has driven out most Yarmouk residents, forcing them once again into homelessness. Those that remain in Yarmouk have been trapped by the fighting for months."If this situation is not addressed urgently, it may be too late to save the lives of thousands of people including children," Gunness said."We urgently ask all parties to immediately heed their legal obligations and facilitate the urgent provision of humanitarian assistance to Yarmouk and other Palestinian refugee camps where fighting impedes the delivery of such assistance."A video uploaded by activists on Sunday showed people crowded around an UNRWA official, asking about aid deliveries."We just want this situation to end," one resident said. "We want the roads to be open for us, for people to come in and out safely ... We can't tolerate it any more."Tens of thousands of Syrians are trapped in other besieged districts. In the Mouadamiya suburb southwest of Damascus, government forces and rebel fighters agreed a brief truce last week to allow food to be brought in.
BEIRUT — The death toll in Syria's civil war has risen to at least 130,433, more than a third of them civilians on both sides of the conflict, but the real figure is probably much higher, the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights said on Tuesday.The conflict in Syria began in March 2011 as peaceful protests against four decades of rule by President Bashar al-Assad's family, but turned into an armed insurgency whose sectarian dimensions have reverberated across the Middle East.The anti-Assad Observatory, based in Britain but with a network of sources across Syria, put the number of women and children killed in the conflict so far at 11,709.It said the death toll among rebels fighting the Assad government was at least 29,083.Deaths among the Syrian armed forces and fighters supporting Assad were at least 52,290, including 262 fighters from the Lebanese Shi'ite group Hezbollah and 286 from other non-Syrian Shi'ite groups.Both Sunni and Shi'ite militants from the region have joined the fight on opposite sides.Many Sunni Muslim nations support the rebels, who are led by Syria's Sunni majority. Shi'ite Muslim states back Assad, who is from the minority Alawite sect, an offshoot of Shi'ism.The Observatory said at least 17,000 people are being held in government prisons while more than 6,000 government supporters are in the custody of Islamist rebels.It said the actual number of people killed and imprisoned is likely to be at least 50,000 higher, but said it could not verify those cases because the identities of the victims were hidden or missing.The United Nations does not give regular casualty counts for Syria and has said for months that more than 100,000 have been killed.
